scientificName
Lysichiton americanus Hultén & H.St.John
Diplacus aurantiacus (Curtis) Jeps.
Salvia apiana Jeps.
Fritillaria affinis (Schult. & Schult.f.) Sealy
Phlox diffusa Benth.
Trifolium willdenovii Spreng.
Adenostoma fasciculatum Hook. & Arn.
Ipomopsis longiflora (Torr.) V.E.Grant
Ribes sanguineum Pursh
Marrubium vulgare L.
Genista monspessulana (L.) L.A.S.Johnson
Tragopogon dubius Scop.
Eriogonum nudum Douglas ex Benth.
Aesculus californica (Spach) Nutt.
Eschscholzia californica Cham.
Triteleia peduncularis Lindl.
Sidalcea hirtipes C.L.Hitchc.
Taraxacum officinale Weber ex Wiggins
Garrya elliptica Douglas ex Lindl.
Zeltnera venusta (A.Gray) G.Mans.
Acer macrophyllum Pursh
Castilleja foliolosa Hook. & Arn.
Sambucus cerulea Raf.
Isocoma acradenia (Greene) Greene
Aquilegia coerulea James
Bebbia juncea (Benth.) Greene
Vinca major L.
Calyptridium monandrum Nutt.
Brassica nigra (L.) W.D.J.Koch
Matricaria discoidea DC.
Marah fabacea (Naudin) Greene
Silene coronaria (L.) Clairv.
Lysimachia arvensis (L.) U.Manns & Anderb.
Claytonia cordifolia S.Watson
Rumex crispus L.
Carnegiea gigantea (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Fouquieria splendens Engelm.
Glandularia gooddingii (Briq.) Solbrig
Claytonia sibirica L.
Claytonia perfoliata Donn.
Mentzelia involucrata S.Watson
Conium maculatum L.
Scrophularia californica Cham. & Schltdl.
Clarkia unguiculata Lindl.
Lathyrus vestitus subsp. alefeldii (T.G.White) Broich
Geranium dissectum L.
Iris pseudacorus L.
Isocoma menziesii (Hook. & Arn.) G.L.Nesom
Cynosurus echinatus L.
Monotropa uniflora L.
Epilobium canum (Greene) P.H.Raven
Kopsiopsis hookeri (Walp.) Govaerts
Echinocereus engelmannii subsp. fasciculatus (Engelm. ex Watson) W.Blum & Mich.Lange
Nolina parryi S.Watson
Lapsana communis L.
Lupinus albifrons Benth.
Prunus andersonii Gray
Syringa vulgaris L.
Streptopus amplexifolius (L.) DC.
Plantago lanceolata L.
Rubus armeniacus Focke
Toxicodendron diversilobum (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Cylindropuntia ganderi (C.B.Wolf) Rebman
Fumaria L.
Asclepias speciosa Torr.
Echinocereus engelmannii subsp. engelmannii
Carex concinnoides Mack.
Cortaderia selloana (Schult. & Schult.f.) Asch. & Graebn.
Malacothrix saxatilis (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Platanus racemosa Nutt. ex Audubon
Crassula connata (Ruiz & Pav.) A.Berger
Prunella vulgaris L.
Ericameria nauseosa (Pall. ex Pursh) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
California macrophylla (Hook. & Arn.) Aldasoro, C.Navarro, P.Vargas, L.Sáez & Aedo
Daucus pusillus Michx.
Juglans hindsii (Jeps.) Jeps. ex R.E.Sm.
Acmispon glaber (Vogel) Brouillet
Fumaria muralis Koch
Eriastrum sapphirinum (Eastw.) Mason
Clinopodium douglasii (Benth.) Kuntze
Campanula prenanthoides Durand
Pterospora andromedea Nutt.
Fragaria vesca L.
Foeniculum vulgare Mill.
Cuscuta pacifica Costea & M.A.R.Wright
Lepidospartum squamatum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Rumex acetosella L.
Physocarpus capitatus (Pursh) Kuntze
Arctostaphylos nevadensis A.Gray
Ferocactus cylindraceus (Engelm.) Orcutt
Hordeum murinum L.
Rosa nutkana C.Presl
Calliandra eriophylla Benth.
Cercis occidentalis Torr. ex A.Gray
Linanthus jonesii (A.Gray) Greene
Yucca brevifolia Engelm.
Malosma laurina (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Engl.
Umbellularia californica (Hook. & Arn.) Nutt.
Vicia benghalensis L.
Yucca elata (Engelm.) Engelm.
Senecio triangularis Hook.
Rubus pedatus Sm.
Portulaca oleracea L.
Homalocephala polycephala (J.M.Bigelow & Engelm.) Vargas & Bárcenas
Vicia sativa L.
Eschscholzia minutiflora S.Watson
Perityle emoryi Torr.
Ceanothus pendletonensis D.O.Burge, Rebman & M.R.Mulligan
Iris douglasiana Herb.
Madia exigua (Sm.) Greene
Quercus douglasii Hook. & Arn.
Lupinus arboreus Sims
Salvia leucophylla Greene
Mitella breweri A.Gray
Plantago patagonica Jacq.
Nicotiana obtusifolia M.Martens & Galeotti
Erythranthe cardinalis (Douglas ex Benth.) Spach
Oxalis pes-caprae L.
Yucca schidigera Roezl ex Ortgies
Lamium amplexicaule L.
Euphorbia peplus L.
Baccharis pilularis DC.
Bloomeria crocea (Torr.) Coville
Scutellaria mexicana (Torr.) A.J.Paton
Delphinium variegatum Torr. & A.Gray
Ceanothus palmeri Trel.
Lomatium californicum (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) Mathias & Constance
Astragalus oophorus var. clokeyanus Barneby
Chelidonium majus L.
Iris tenax Douglas ex Lindl.
Croton setiger Hook.
Aquilegia desertorum (M.E.Jones) Cockerell ex A.Heller
Heteromeles arbutifolia (Lindl.) M.Roem.
Lilium parvum Kellogg
Apocynum androsaemifolium L.
Linnaea borealis L.
Populus tremuloides Michx.
Achillea millefolium L.
Clintonia uniflora (Menzies ex Schult. & Schult.f.) Kunth
Hesperoyucca whipplei (Torr.) Trel.
Rhododendron occidentale (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Aesculus parryi A.Gray
Aphyllon tuberosum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Mirabilis multiflora (Torr.) Gray
Arbutus menziesii Pursh
Mammillaria grahamii Engelm.
Zostera marina L.
Fouquieria macdougalii Nash
Rhus aromatica Aiton
Nicolletia occidentalis A.Gray
Carex macrocephala Willd. ex Spreng.
Symphoricarpos mollis Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray
Carpobrotus chilensis (Molina) N.E.Br.
Asarum caudatum Lindl.
Salvia mellifera Greene
Parentucellia latifolia (L.) Caruel
Eschscholzia caespitosa Benth.
Geranium molle L.
Ferocactus viridescens subsp. viridescens
Oenothera cespitosa Nutt.
Trillium ovatum Pursh
Lepidium flavum Torr.
Streptanthus oblanceolatus T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Helminthotheca echioides (L) Holub
Ficus carica L.
Primula hendersonii (A.Gray) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Atriplex leucophylla (Moq.) D.Dietr.
Carduus pycnocephalus L.
Camissoniopsis cheiranthifolia (Hornem. ex Spreng.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Viola adunca Sm.
Papaver heterophyllum (Benth.) Greene
Erythranthe guttata (DC.) G.L.Nesom
Yucca madrensis Gentry
Sanicula bipinnatifida Douglas
Chlorogalum pomeridianum (DC.) Kunth
Trillium albidum J.D.Freeman
Zantedeschia aethiopica (L.) Spreng.
Frangula californica (Eschsch.) A.Gray
Goodyera oblongifolia Raf.
Ceratophyllum demersum L.
Rumex obtusifolius L.
Encelia californica Nutt.
Galium aparine L.
Erysimum capitatum (Douglas ex Hook.) Greene
Helianthus petiolaris var. canescens A.Gray
Lathyrus aphaca L.
Rhinotropis californica (Nutt.) J.R.Abbott
Platanthera elegans subsp. elegans
Quercus kelloggii Newb.
Symphyotrichum chilense (Nees) G.L.Nesom
Epilobium luteum Pursh
Frasera speciosa Douglas ex Hook.
Encelia farinosa A.Gray ex Torr.
Viola purpurea Kellogg
Cylindropuntia bigelovii
Ilex aquifolium L.
Castilleja exserta (A.Heller) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Baccharis salicifolia (Ruiz & Pav.) Pers.
Cardamine breweri S.Watson
Anthriscus caucalis M.Bieb.
Asclepias cryptoceras subsp. davisii (Woodson) Woodson
Philadelphus coronarius L.
Ehrendorferia ochroleuca (Engelm.) Fukuhara
Asclepias californica Greene
Leucanthemum vulgare Lam.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. agourensis K.M.Nakai
Silybum marianum (L.) Gaertn.
Calochortus weedii Alph.Wood
Argentina anserina (L.) Rydb.
Leptarrhena pyrolifolia (D.Don) R.Br. ex Ser.
Diplacus brevipes (Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Rudbeckia occidentalis Nutt.
Ribes lacustre (Pers.) Poir.
Petrophytum caespitosum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Viola sempervirens Greene
Cornus nuttallii Audubon ex Torr. & A.Gray
Abronia maritima Nutt. ex S.Watson
Lamarckia aurea (L.) Moench
Yucca baccata Torr.
Pterostegia drymarioides Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Spiraea betulifolia Pall.
Sanicula crassicaulis Poepp. ex DC.
Prunus emarginata (Douglas ex Hook.) Walp.
Crassula ovata (Mill.) Druce
Salix sitchensis Sanson ex Bong.
Dasyochloa pulchella Willd.
Quercus durata Jeps.
Gaultheria shallon Pursh
Xylorhiza orcuttii (Vasey & Rose) Greene
Lepidium fremontii S.Watson
Larrea tridentata (Sessé & Moc. ex DC.) Coult.
Eucnide urens (Parry ex Gray) Parry
Senecio integerrimus Nutt.
Phlox hoodii Richardson
Deinandra bacigalupii B.G.Baldwin
Collomia grandiflora Lindl.
Cornus sericea L.
Dudleya cymosa (Lem.) Britton & Rose
Centaurea melitensis L.
Alnus rubra Bong.
Olneya tesota A.Gray
Hecastocleis shockleyi Gray
Erigeron foliosus (Phil.)
Leptosiphon bicolor Nutt.
Aegilops triuncialis L.
Lilium parryi S.Watson
Allionia incarnata L.
Acacia redolens Maslin
Lilium humboldtii subsp. ocellatum (Kellogg) Thorne
Bromus diandrus Roth
Armeria maritima (Mill.) Willd.
Umbellularia californica var. californica
Acourtia microcephala DC.
Acer platanoides L.
Encelia farinosa f. farinosa
Pachycereus pringlei (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Sphaeralcea ambigua A.Gray
Eriogonum fasciculatum Benth.
Cardiospermum corindum L.
Chaerophyllum temulum L.
Primula pauciflora (Durand) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Borago officinalis L.
Rubus bifrons Vest ex Tratt.
Cirsium arvense (L.) Scop.
Hedera helix L.
Washingtonia robusta H.Wendl.
Ranunculus repens L.
Agave shawii Engelm.
Calandrinia menziesii Hook.
Scandix pecten-veneris L.
Asclepias fascicularis Decne.
Quercus lobata Née
Opuntia polyacantha Haw.
Phytolacca icosandra L.
Senecio flaccidus Less.
Arctostaphylos parryana subsp. deserticum J.E.Keeley, L.Boykin & Massihi
Quercus agrifolia Née
Lupinus succulentus Douglas ex K.Koch
Parkinsonia florida (Benth. ex A.Gray) S.Watson
Prosartes smithii (Hook.) Utech, Shinwari & Kawano
Eremalche exilis (A.Gray) Greene
Delphinium nuttallianum Pritz. ex Walp.
Melilotus albus Medik.
Sambucus racemosa L.
Triteleia ixioides (Dryand. ex W.T.Aiton) Greene
Fragaria chiloensis (L.) Duchesne
Triteleia laxa Benth.
Stenocereus thurberi subsp. thurberi
Clarkia purpurea (Curtis) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Xanthisma grindelioides (Nutt.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Plectritis macrocera Torr. & Gray
Delphinium nudicaule Torr. & A.Gray
Marah macrocarpa (Greene) Greene
Allium serra McNeal & Ownbey
Ranunculus californicus Benth.
Ambrosia chamissonis (Less.) Greene
Rhus integrifolia (Nutt.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Brewer & S.Watson
Prosartes hookeri Torr.
Lathyrus vestitus Nutt.
Silene gallica L.
Briza maxima L.
Juglans major (Torr.) A.Heller
Tiarella trifoliata L.
Crucihimalaya virgata (Nutt.Ex Torr. & A.Gray) D.A.German & A.L.Ebel
Govenia liliacea (Lex.) Lindl.
Rhus ovata S.Watson
Abutilon abutiloides (Jacq.) Garcke
Chylismia claviformis A.Heller
Vaccinium parvifolium Sm.
Chaenactis douglasii (Hook.) Hook. & Arn.
Frasera albomarginata var. induta (Tidestr.) Card
Frangula purshiana (DC.) J.G.Cooper
Rhus glabra L.
Geum triflorum Pursh
Verbascum thapsus L.
Cirsium vulgare (Savi) Ten.
Eriogonum latifolium Sm.
Chloropyron maritimum subsp. maritimum
Chimaphila umbellata (L.) W.P.C.Barton
Artemisia californica Less.
Veronica persica Poir.
Parkinsonia microphylla Torr.
Enceliopsis argophylla (D.C.Eaton) A.Nelson
Peritoma arborea (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Iltis
Ceanothus cuneatus (Hook.) Nutt.
Eriogonum inflatum Torr.
Yucca brevifolia var. brevifolia
Geum macrophyllum Willd.
Calypso bulbosa var. occidentalis (Holz.) Cockerell
Calochortus albus (Benth.) Douglas ex Benth.
Leucocrinum montanum Nutt. ex A.Gray
Arnica discoidea Benth.
Packera werneriifolia (A.Gray) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Eriogonum lobbii Torr. & A.Gray
Lepidium perfoliatum L.
Amaryllis belladonna L.
Allotropa virgata Torr. & A.Gray
Trifolium pratense L.
Calochortus leichtlinii Hook.f.
Phragmites australis (Cav.) Trin. ex Steud.
Trichostema lanceolatum Benth.
Prunus virginiana L.
Atriplex canescens (Pursh) Nutt.
Prunus laurocerasus L.
Aphyllon Mitch.
Petalonyx thurberi A.Gray
Bloomeria humilis Hoover
Rubus parviflorus Figert ex Sprib.
Berberis nervosa Pursh
Silene latifolia Poir.
Deinandra fasciculata (DC.) Greene
Erigeron divergens Torr. & A.Gray
Physalis crassifolia Benth.
Antennaria parvifolia Nutt.
Lobularia maritima (L.) Desv.
Petasites frigidus var. palmatus (Aiton) Cronquist
Raphanus sativus L.
Glandularia chiricahensis Umber
Cylindropuntia fulgida (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Bromus rubens L.
Opuntia lindheimeri Engelm.
Diplacus longiflorus Nutt.
Thinopyrum obtusiflorum (DC.) Banfi
Agoseris apargioides (Less.) Greene
Geranium robertianum L.
Hypochaeris radicata L.
Medicago sativa L.
Urtica dioica L.
Quercus vacciniifolia Kellogg
Lomatium dasycarpum (Torr. & Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Euphorbia polycarpa Benth.
Verbesina encelioides (Cav.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex A.Gray
Uropappus lindleyi (DC.) Nutt.
Collinsia parviflora Douglas ex Lindl.
Giliastrum acerosum (A.Gray) Rydb.
Veronica americana (Raf.) Schwein. ex Benth.
Xerophyllum tenax (Pursh) Nutt.
Centranthus ruber (L.) DC.
Pseudognaphalium biolettii Anderb.
Brassica tournefortii Gouan
Limonium sinuatum (L.) Mill.
Maianthemum racemosum subsp. amplexicaule (Nutt.) LaFrankie
Poa annua L.
Oenothera californica (S.Watson) S.Watson
Acmispon argophyllus (A.Gray) Brouillet
Ageratina adenophora (Spreng.) R.King & H.Rob.
Philadelphus lewisii Pursh
Lathyrus japonicus Willd.
Ribes aureum Pursh
Eremogone ferrisiae (Abrams) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Rafinesquia neomexicana A.Gray
Diplacus bigelovii var. cuspidatus (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Delphinium trolliifolium A.Gray
Trixis californica var. californica
Oemleria cerasiformis (Torr. & A.Gray) J.W.Landon
Nolina cismontana Dice
Fumaria capreolata L.
Chaenactis suffrutescens A.Gray
Euphorbia hypericifolia L.
Arum italicum Mill.
Lysimachia latifolia (Hook.) Cholewa
Pedicularis densiflora Benth.
Polypogon monspeliensis (L.) Desf.
Rosa multiflora Thunb.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia (Hook. & Arn.) Nutt.
Funastrum cynanchoides (Decne.) Schltr.
Ailanthus altissima (Mill.) Swingle
Hedera helix f. helix
Daphne laureola L.
Lonicera ciliosa (Pursh) Poir.
Limonium perezii (Stapf) F.T.Hubb. ex L.H.Bailey
Artemisia douglasiana Besser
Primula clevelandii (Greene) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Mammillaria dioica subsp. dioica
Malva arborea (L.) Webb & Berthel.
Adelinia grande (Douglas ex Lehm.) J.I.Cohen
Arctostaphylos nevadensis subsp. knightii (Gankin & Hildreth) P.V.Wells
Aristolochia watsonii Wooton & Standl.
Plantago erecta Morris
Rubus spectabilis Pursh
Aruncus dioicus (Walter) Fernald
Calochortus plummerae Greene
Gilia brecciarum subsp. brecciarum
Purshia stansburiana (Torr.) Henrickson
Artemisia frigida Willd.
Astragalus brauntonii Parish
Centromadia pungens (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Phyllodoce breweri (A.Gray) A.Heller
Sidalcea malviflora (DC.) Gray ex Benth.
Diplacus rattanii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Fritillaria recurva Benth.
Ribes speciosum Pursh
Rubus ursinus subsp. macropetalus (Douglas ex Hook.) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Stephanomeria pauciflora (Torr.) A.Nelson
Nasturtium officinale R.Br.
Dipterostemon capitatus (Benth.) Rydb.
Ladeania lanceolata (Pursh) Reveal & A.N.Egan
Populus fremontii S.Watson
Cenchrus setaceus (Forssk.) Morrone
Calochortus nitidus Douglas
Abronia latifolia Eschsch.
Mycelis muralis (L.) Dumort.
Rubus ursinus Cham. & Schltdl.
Arundo donax L.
Abronia villosa var. villosa
Lithophragma affine A.Gray
Sarcodes sanguinea Torr.
Yucca valida Brandegee
Diplacus bigelovii var. bigelovii
Anticlea elegans (Pursh) Rydb.
Berberis aquifolium Pursh
Senecio vulgaris L.
Calypso bulbosa var. americana (R.Br.) Luer
Fragaria virginiana Duchesne
Lonicera conjugialis Kellogg
Dasiphora fruticosa (L.) Rydb.
Packera cana (Hook.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Anaphalis margaritacea (L.) Benth.
Carex congdonii L.H.Bailey
Iva hayesiana A.Gray
Mesembryanthemum crystallinum L.
Lunaria annua L.
Erodium cicutarium (L.) L'Hér.
Monardella villosa Benth.
Claytonia lanceolata Pursh
Allium validum S.Watson
Mentzelia laevicaulis (Douglas ex Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Chamaenerion angustifolium (L.) Scop.
Actaea rubra (Aiton) Willd.
Sisyrinchium bellum S.Watson
Lonicera subspicata var. denudata Rehder
Diplacus ×australis (Mc Minn ex Munz) Tulig
Clematis lasiantha Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Lonicera hispidula (Lindl.) Douglas ex Lindl.
Linanthus californicus (Hook. & Arn.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Monardella odoratissima Benth.
Malva parviflora L.
Hypochaeris glabra L.
Lasthenia gracilis (DC.) Greene
Holodiscus discolor (Pursh) Maxim.
Pedicularis racemosa Douglas ex Hook.
Condea emoryi (Torr.) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Cardionema ramosissima (Weinm.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Erigeron aphanactis var. aphanactis
Opuntia phaeacantha Engelm.
Simmondsia chinensis (Link) C.K.Schneid.
Cylindropuntia ×fosbergii (C.B.Wolf) Rebman, M.A.Baker & Pinkava
Senegalia greggii (A.Gray) Britton & Rose
Nuttallanthus texanus (Scheele) D.A.Sutton
Cynodon dactylon (L.) Pers.
Arctostaphylos columbiana Piper
Phyla nodiflora (L.) Greene
Amelanchier utahensis Koehne
Ceanothus velutinus Douglas
Allium platycaule S.Watson
Ambrosia salsola (Torr. & A.Gray) Strother & B.G.Baldwin
Phlox longifolia Nutt.
Vaccinium ovalifolium Sm.
Galium angustifolium Nutt.
Sarcomphalus obtusifolius var. canescens (A.Gray) Hauenschild
Boykinia occidentalis Torr. & A.Gray
Asclepias welshii N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Nicotiana glauca Graham
Sisymbrium altissimum L.
Maianthemum dilatatum (Alph.Wood) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Ptelea crenulata Greene
Hypericum scouleri Hook.
Tradescantia occidentalis (Britton) Smyth
Acer grandidentatum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Agave deserti var. deserti
Fritillaria ojaiensis Davidson
Trixis californica Kellogg
Xylococcus bicolor Nutt.
Anemonoides grayi (Behr & Kellogg) Starod.
Datura wrightii hort. ex Regel
Cylindropuntia prolifera (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Argemone munita Durand & Hilg.
Purshia pinkavae Schaack
Lupinus leucophyllus Douglas ex Lindl.
Bellis perennis L.
Toxicoscordion fremontii (Torr.) Rydb.
Claytonia rubra (Howell) Tidestr.
Vitis girdiana Munson
Trichostema lanatum Benth.
Cornus unalaschkensis Ledeb.
Fagonia laevis Standl.
Dudleya farinosa (Lindl.) Britton & Rose
Fouquieria splendens subsp. splendens
Oxalis incarnata L.
Achlys triphylla (Sm.) DC.
Dysphania ambrosioides (L.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Eranthis hyemalis (L.) Salisb.
Glebionis coronaria (L.) Tzvelev
Oncosiphon pilulifer (L.f.) Källersjö
Dudleya saxosa subsp. aloides (Rose) Moran
Arctostaphylos viscida subsp. viscida
Grewia occidentalis L.
Geranium viscosissimum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Salvia columbariae Benth.
Symphoricarpos occidentalis Hook.
Lupinus lepidus var. lobbii (A.Gray ex S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Erigeron canadensis L.
Centaurea solstitialis L.
Heterotheca grandiflora Nutt.
Claytonia exigua Douglas ex Torr. & A.Gray
Ricinus communis L.
Dipsacus fullonum Thore
Dipterostemon capitatus subsp. capitatus
Spartium junceum L.
Linum bienne Mill.
Scutellaria siphocampyloides Vatke
Krameria erecta Willd. ex Schult.
Prunus serotina Ehrh.
Ulex europaeus L.
Plantago major L.
Calystegia macrostegia (Greene) Brummitt
Erodium botrys (Cav.) Bertol.
Paxistima myrsinites (Pursh) Raf.
Euphorbia maculata L.
Mammillaria poselgeri Hildm.
Potentilla recta L.
Penstemon caesius A.Gray
Eriogonum compositum Douglas ex Benth.
Crossosoma californicum Nutt.
Delphinium cardinale Hook.
Atriplex semibaccata R.Br.
Lamium purpureum L.
Ranunculus muricatus L.
Trifolium dubium Sibth.
Drosera rotundifolia L.
Daucus carota L.
Arbutus arizonica (A.Gray) Sarg.
Psorothamnus schottii (Torr.) Barneby
Plantago ovata Forssk.
Acmispon rigidus (Benth.) Brouillet
Arctostaphylos glandulosa Eastw.
Stachys rigida Nutt. ex Benth.
Vicia villosa Roth
Eryngium armatum (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Spiraea douglasii Hook.
Phytolacca americana L.
Tolmiea menziesii (Pursh) Torr. & A.Gray
Solanum douglasii Dunal
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi (L.) Spreng.
Trifolium repens L.
Cardamine hirsuta L.
Malacothamnus fasciculatus (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Adolphia californica S.Watson
Lupinus microcarpus Sims
Vinca minor L.
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. aridus (Piper) Jeps.
Viola canadensis L.
Hosackia crassifolia Benth.
Tanacetum bipinnatum (L.) Sch.Bip.
Heracleum maximum Bartram
Mammillaria johnstonii (Britton & Rose) Orcutt
Boerhavia wrightii A.Gray
Escobaria chlorantha (Engelm.) Buxb.
Prunus ilicifolia (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) D.Dietr.
Teesdalia nudicaulis (L.) W.T.Aiton
Eremalche rotundifolia (A.Gray) Greene
Rosa californica Cham. & Schltdl.
Triteleia grandiflora Lindl.
Aralia nudicaulis L.
Castilleja minor (Gray) Gray
Corallorhiza maculata Raf.
Johnstonella angustifolia (Torr.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Oenothera curtiflora W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Senecio scorzonella Greene
Trifolium hirtum All.
Triphysaria eriantha (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Cylindropuntia imbricata subsp. spinosior
Rubus laciniatus Willd.
Erigeron aphanactis (A.Gray) Greene
Dimorphotheca sinuata DC.
Stachys mexicana Benth.
Senecio fremontii Torr. & A.Gray
Polemonium pulcherrimum Hook.
Brickellia californica (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Castilleja attenuata (A.Gray) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Mortonia utahensis (Coville ex A.Gray) J.Nelson
Galium odoratum (L.) Scop.
Lupinus chamissonis Eschsch.
Campanula rotundifolia L.
Euphorbia setiloba Engelm. ex Torr.
Palafoxia arida B.L.Turner & M.I.Morris
Arabis blepharophylla Hook. & Arn.
Malva L.
Corallorhiza striata var. striata
Sedum stenopetalum Pursh
Gentianopsis holopetala (A.Gray) Iltis
Eriogonum gracile var. incultum Reveal
Claytonia multiscapa subsp. pacifica (Mc Neill) John M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Parkinsonia Plum. ex L.
Ferocactus wislizenii (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Olsynium douglasii (A.Dietr.) E.P.Bicknell
Stellaria media (L.) Vill.
Eriophyllum confertiflorum (DC.) A.Gray
Abronia elliptica A.Nelson
Tiarella trifoliata var. trifoliata
Acer circinatum Pursh
Corylus avellana L.
Iris foetidissima L.
Cardamine californica (Nutt.) Greene
Rhamnus ilicifolia Kellogg
Cylindropuntia tesajo (Engelm. ex Coult.) F.M.Knuth
Fritillaria purdyi Eastw.
Epilobium ciliatum Raf.
Dactylis glomerata L.
Calochortus striatus Parish
Senecio elegans L.
Vancouveria hexandra (Hook.) Morren & Decne.
Trillium chloropetalum (Torr.) Howell
Parkinsonia aculeata L.
Eryngium aristulatum Jeps.
Distichlis spicata (L.) Greene
Opuntia basilaris Engelm. & Bigelow
Petasites frigidus (L.) Fr.
Gentiana calycosa Griseb.
Oxalis oregana Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Ceanothus megacarpus Nutt.
Baccharis sarothroides A.Gray
Castilleja hispida var. hispida
Convallaria majalis L.
Corallorhiza mertensiana Bong.
Mirabilis jalapa L.
Dudleya caespitosa (Haw.) Britton & Rose
Cotula australis (Sieber ex Spreng.) Hook.fil.
Dudleya lanceolata (Nutt.) Britton & Rose
Balsamorhiza sagittata (Pursh) Nutt.
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. williamsiae Reveal
Veronica cusickii A.Gray
Potentilla gracilis Douglas
Quercus gambelii Nutt.
Salix gooddingii C.R.Ball
Limnanthes macounii Trel.
Populus trichocarpa Torrey & A.Gray
Camassia quamash (Pursh) Greene
Onopordum acanthium L.
Cotula coronopifolia L.
Astragalus utahensis (Torr.) Torr. & A.Gray
Elaeagnus angustifolia L.
Geranium caespitosum E.James
Erysimum asperum (Nutt.) DC.
Croton californicus Müll.Arg.
Euthamia occidentalis Nutt.
Psorothamnus spinosus (A.Gray) Barneby
Pickeringia montana Nutt.
Epipactis helleborine (L.) Crantz
Lomatium nudicaule (Pursh) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Palafoxia arida var. gigantea (M.E.Jones) B.L.Turner & M.I.Morris
Langloisia setosissima subsp. setosissima
Allium triquetrum L.
Solanum elaeagnifolium Cav.
Quercus hypoleucoides A.Camus
Amorpha californica Nutt.
Navarretia squarrosa (Eschsch.) Hook. & Arn.
Vaccinium ovatum Pursh
Eriogonum caespitosum Nutt.
Mimosa dysocarpa Benth.
Acalypha neomexicana Müll.Arg.
Baccharis salicifolia subsp. salicifolia
Lupinus excubitus M.E.Jones
Clarkia amoena (Lehm.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Frasera parryi Torr.
Ribes roezlii Regel
Symphyotrichum frondosum (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Pittosporum crassifolium Banks & Sol. ex A.Cunn.
Commelina erecta L.
Vitis californica Benth.
Euphorbia serpens Kunth
Opuntia fragilis (Nutt.) Haw.
Cytisus scoparius (L.) Link
Streptanthus breweri A.Gray
Clarkia concinna (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Greene
Echinomastus johnsonii (Parry ex Engelm.) E.M.Baxter
Anemonoides oregana (A.Gray) Starod.
Glechoma hederacea L.
Anemopsis californica (Nutt.) Hook. & Arn.
Castilleja hispida Benth.
Calochortus nuttallii Torr.
Castilleja ambigua Hook. & Arn.
Geraea canescens Torr. & A.Gray
Cylindropuntia ramosissima (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Holodiscus discolor var. discolor
Opuntia engelmannii Salm-Dyck
Extriplex californica (Moq.) E.H.Zacharias
Erythranthe dentata (Nutt. ex Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Cotoneaster horizontalis Decne.
Atriplex prostrata DC.
Galium triflorum Michx.
Calochortus amabilis Purdy
Platystemon californicus Benth.
Parietaria judaica L.
Sedum divergens S.Watson
Coleogyne ramosissima Torr.
Myosotis sylvatica Ehrh. ex Hoffm.
Arnica cordifolia Hook.
Senecio L.
Raphanus raphanistrum L.
Hypericum perforatum L.
Gaillardia aristata Pursh
Eriocoma hymenoides (Roem. & Schult.) Rydb.
Myosotis latifolia Poir.
Viola nuttallii Pursh
Packera hesperia (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Tragopogon porrifolius L.
Grayia spinosa (Hook.) Moq.
Medicago polymorpha L.
Angelica capitellata (A.Gray) Spalik, Reduron & S.R.Downie
Cirsium occidentale (Nutt.) Jeps.
Shepherdia canadensis (L.) Nutt.
Salvia spathacea Greene
Lewisia rediviva Pursh
Ribes quercetorum Greene
Collinsia heterophylla Buist ex Graham
Astragalus hoodianus Howell
Aquilegia formosa Fisch.
Eriophyllum lanatum (Pursh) Forbes
Silene bernardina S.Watson
Xanthium strumarium L.
Sanicula arctopoides Hook. & Arn.
Castilleja densiflora (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Juglans californica S.Watson
Pectocarya heterocarpa (I.M.Johnst.) I.M.Johnst.
Penstemon eximius D.D.Keck
Dichelostemma multiflorum (Benth.) A.Heller
Chorizanthe rigida (Torr.) Torr. & A.Gray
Yucca gigantea Lem.
Sairocarpus multiflorus (Pennell) D.A.Sutton
Mammillaria dioica K.Brandegee
Cycladenia humilis Benth.
Euphorbia misera Benth.
Erigeron glacialis (Nutt.) A.Nelson
Chasmanthe bicolor (Gasp.) N.E.Br.
Calochortus apiculatus Baker
Eriogonum umbellatum Torr.
Ericameria linearifolia (DC.) Urbatsch & Wussow
Echium candicans L.fil.
Nerium oleander L.
Digitalis purpurea L.
Spiraea splendens Baumann ex K.Koch
Arctostaphylos glauca Lindl.
Chamaebatiaria millefolium (Torr.) Maxim.
Solanum triflorum Nutt.
Viola pedunculata Torr. & A.Gray
Ceanothus leucodermis Greene
Hirschfeldia incana (L.) Lagr.-Foss.
Maianthemum stellatum (L.) Link
Rhododendron columbianum (Piper) Harmaja
Bassia scoparia (L.) A.J.Scott
Cucurbita foetidissima Kunth
Limonium duriusculum (Girard) Fourr.
Euphorbia serpillifolia Pers.
Eriogonum heermannii Durand & Hilg.
Thamnosma montana Torr. & Frém.
Rumex hymenosepalus Torr.
Plectritis ciliosa (Greene) Jeps.
Opuntia ficus-indica (L.) Mill.
Poa bulbosa L.
Cylindropuntia echinocarpa (Engelm. & Bigelow) F.M.Knuth
Hesperocallis undulata A.Gray
Atriplex hymenelytra (Torr.) S.Watson
Hordeum brachyantherum Nevski
Antennaria rosea Greene
Brodiaea elegans Hoover
Lewisia nevadensis (Gray) B.L.Rob.
Allium cernuum Roth
Persicaria maculosa Gray
Chondrilla juncea L.
Impatiens capensis Meerb.
Trillium angustipetalum (Torr.) J.D.Freeman
Jaumea carnosa (Less.) A.Gray
Calochortus venustus Douglas ex Benth.
Penstemon newberryi Gray
Lupinus polyphyllus var. burkei (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Hypericum androsaemum L.
Penstemon ellipticus Coult. & Fisher
Stephanomeria tenuifolia (Torr.) Hall
Cylindropuntia molesta subsp. molesta
Calystegia occidentalis (A.Gray) Brummitt
Pyrola asarifolia Michx.
Diplacus deschutesensis G.L.Nesom
Cylindropuntia ganderi subsp. ganderi
Linanthus dichotomus Benth.
Romulea rosea (L.) Eckl.
Camissoniopsis bistorta (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Lupinus bicolor Lindl.
Layia platyglossa (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) A.Gray
Silene laciniata subsp. californica (Durand) J.K.Morton
Acacia cyclops A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Lomatium foeniculaceum (Nutt.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Monotropa hypopitys L.
Trifolium depauperatum Desv.
Astragalus purshii Douglas ex G.Don
Ceanothus perplexans Trel.
Erythronium grandiflorum Pursh
Anisocarpus madioides Nutt.
Rhamnus crocea Nutt.
Asphodelus fistulosus L.
Eulobus californicus Nutt.
Quercus garryana Douglas ex Hook.
Malephora crocea (Jacq.) Schwantes
Prunus fremontii S.Watson
Asclepias albicans S.Watson
Taraxia ovata (Nutt.) Small
Mirabilis laevis (Benth.) Curran
Calystegia collina (Greene) Brummitt
Campsis radicans (L.) Seem.
Tribulus terrestris L.
Carpobrotus edulis (L.) N.E.Br.
Coursetia glandulosa A.Gray
Ferocactus townsendianus Britton & Rose
Hoffmannseggia repens (Eastw.) Cockerell
Prosartes trachycarpa S.Watson
Apocynum cannabinum L.
Juncus balticus Willd.
Viburnum lantana L.
Osmorhiza berteroi DC.
Purshia tridentata (Pursh) DC.
Euphorbia florida Engelm.
Plantago coronopus L.
Penstemon glandulosus var. glandulosus
Ligustrum lucidum W.T.Aiton
Lupinus arizonicus (S.Watson) S.Watson
Iris macrosiphon Torr.
Diplacus puniceus Nutt.
Betula pendula Roth
Ribes cereum Douglas
Eriogonum heracleoides Nutt.
Eriogonum arborescens Greene
Quercus berberidifolia Liebm.
Euphorbia magdalenae Benth.
Linanthus dianthiflorus (Benth.) Greene
Vaccinium oxycoccos L.
Bonellia macrocarpa (Cav.) B.Ståhl & Källersjö
Lupinus polyphyllus Lindl.
Tropaeolum majus L.
Platanthera dilatata (Pursh) Lindl. ex L.C.Beck
Linaria dalmatica (L.) Mill.
Cirsium scariosum Nutt.
Passiflora mexicana A.Juss.
Madia sativa Molina
Leptosiphon montanus (Greene) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Batis maritima L.
Castilleja rubicundula (Jeps.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja integra A.Gray
Iris chrysophylla Howell
Chenopodiastrum murale (L.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Cynara cardunculus L.
Opuntia littoralis (Engelm.) Cockerell
Clematis occidentalis var. grosseserrata (Rydb.) J.S.Pringle
Ligusticum L.
Artemisia tridentata (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Calochortus lyallii Baker
Lycium fremontii A.Gray
Chorizanthe brevicornu Torr.
Gilia stellata A.Heller
Oxalis corniculata L.
Polygonum aviculare L.
Maurandya antirrhiniflora Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Washingtonia filifera (Rafarin) H.Wendl. ex de Bary
Poa pratensis L.
Oloptum miliaceum (L.) Röser & Hamasha
Penstemon gracilentus A.Gray
Rhododendron albiflorum Hook.
Thermopsis rhombifolia (Pursh) Richardson
Peritoma serrulatum (Pursh) DC.
Carex obnupta L.H.Bailey
Tamarix L.
Castilleja chromosa A.Nelson
Melica subulata (Griseb.) Scribn.
Crepis vesicaria L.
Penstemon eatonii A.Gray
Grindelia camporum Greene
Astragalus sepultipes (Barneby) Barneby
Cirsium occidentale var. californicum (A.Gray) D.J.Keil & C.E.Turner
Agave schottii Engelm.
Lonicera subspicata Hook. & Arn.
Hesperaloe parviflora (Torr.) J.M.Coult.
Cypripedium californicum A.Gray
Physaria gordonii (A.Gray) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Erythranthe lewisii (Pursh) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Lupinus arcticus S.Watson
Muilla maritima (Torr.) S.Watson ex Benth.
Cylindropuntia arbuscula (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Tanacetum vulgare L.
Sisymbrium loeselii L.
Hemitomes congestum Gray
Toxicoscordion venenosum (S.Watson) Rydb.
Douglasia laevigata A.Gray
Hymenoxys cooperi (A.Gray) Cockerell
Calochortus catalinae S.Watson
Prosopis glandulosa Torr.
Solidago canadensis L.
Holocarpha heermannii (Greene) D.D.Keck
Keckiella cordifolia (Benth.) Straw
Campanula piperi Howell
Thalictrum fendleri Engelm. ex A.Gray
Calochortus nudus S.Watson
Oxytropis campestris (L.) DC.
Chenopodium album L.
Symphoricarpos albus (L.) C.Koch
Antennaria luzuloides Torr. & A.Gray
Grindelia stricta DC.
Sisymbrium officinale (L.) Scop.
Streptanthus farnsworthianus J.T.Howell
Ranunculus acris L.
Helenium puberulum DC.
Oreocarya abortiva Greene
Madia gracilis (Sm.) D.D.Keck & J.C.Clausen ex Applegate
Dendromecon rigida Benth.
Antennaria dimorpha (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Dicentra formosa (Andrews) Walp.
Kelloggia galioides Torr.
Cichorium intybus L.
Sphaeralcea rusbyi A.Gray
Erythranthe alsinoides (Douglas ex Benth.) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Fritillaria liliacea Lindl.
Ditaxis lanceolata (Benth.) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Corallorhiza striata Lindl.
Euphorbia oblongata Griseb.
Whipplea modesta Torr.
Agoseris glauca (Nutt. ex Pursh) Raf.
Dudleya pulverulenta (Nutt.) Britton & Rose
Notholithocarpus densiflorus (Hook. & Arn.) Manos, Cannon & S.H.Oh
Deschampsia cespitosa (L.) P.Beauv.
Acer negundo L.
Horsfordia alata (S.Watson) Gray
Psilostrophe cooperi (A.Gray) Greene
Convolvulus arvensis L.
Nepeta cataria L.
Lespedeza bicolor Turcz.
Erodium moschatum (L.) L'Hér.
Capsella bursa-pastoris (L.) Medik.
Pluchea odorata var. odorata
Penstemon fruticosus (Pursh) Greene
Aesculus hippocastanum L.
Androsace lehmanniana Spreng.
Impatiens glandulifera Royle
Calycanthus occidentalis Hook. & Arn.
Adenocaulon bicolor Hook.
Aphyllon purpureum (A.Heller) Holub
Ericameria ericoides (Less.) Jeps.
Pontederia crassipes Mart.
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa (Engelm. & Bigelow) F.M.Knuth
Polemonium foliosissimum var. alpinum Brand
Juncus patens E.Mey.
Thysanocarpus curvipes Hook.
Lomatium utriculatum (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Bahiopsis laciniata (A.Gray) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Castilleja linariifolia Benth.
Luzula comosa E.Mey.
Pachycormus discolor (Benth.) Coville
Lilium columbianum Leichtlin
Euphorbia capitellata Engelm.
Mentha pulegium L.
Chimaphila menziesii (R.Br. ex D.Don) Spreng.
Oenothera deltoides subsp. deltoides
Dudleya virens subsp. hassei (Rose) Moran
Allium campanulatum S.Watson
Lathyrus latifolius L.
Holcus lanatus L.
Gilia tricolor Benth.
Ficaria verna Huds.
Streptanthus insignis Jeps.
Lupinus lepidus Douglas ex Lindl.
Platanthera sparsiflora (S.Watson) Schltr.
Bergerocactus emoryi (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Delphinium sutherlandii M.J.Warnock
Clarkia rubicunda (Lindl.) H. & M.E.Lewis
Helianthus gracilentus A.Gray
Arctostaphylos crustacea Eastw.
Odontostomum hartwegii Torr.
Pulicaria paludosa Steud., 1841
Eriophyllum staechadifolium Lag.
Leptosiphon nuttallii (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Ipomopsis congesta (Hook.) V.E.Grant
Dracocephalum parviflorum Nutt.
Typha latifolia L.
Lasthenia californica subsp. californica
Asclepias cordifolia (Benth.) Jeps.
Diphysa occidentalis Rose
Robinia neomexicana A.Gray
Cercocarpus ledifolius Nutt.
Avena barbata Pott ex Link
Primula conjugens (Greene) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Navarretia leptalea (A.Gray) L.A.Johnson
Antennaria racemosa Hook.
Centromadia parryi subsp. australis (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Verbascum thapsus subsp. thapsus
Salix lasiolepis Benth.
Ceanothus crassifolius Torr.
Keckiella antirrhinoides (Benth.) Straw
Alliaria petiolata (M.Bieb.) Cavara & Grande
Micropus californicus Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Hyacinthoides massartiana Geerinck
Ceanothus gloriosus var. exaltatus J.T.Howell
Pulsatilla occidentalis (S.Watson) Freyn
Hibiscus syriacus L.
Erythranthe grandis (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Olea europaea L.
Dudleya brittonii D.A.Johans.
Circaea alpina L.
Tamarix ramosissima Ledeb.
Opuntia diploursina Stock, N.Hussey & Beckstrom
Heracleum mantegazzianum Sommier & Levier
Agave deserti Engelm.
Caragana arborescens Lam.
Oenothera elata subsp. hirsutissima (A.Gray ex S.Watson) W.Dietr.
Nandina domestica Thunb.
Sherardia arvensis L.
Allium praecox Brandegee
Linum lewisii Pursh
Chilopsis linearis (Cav.) Sweet
Diplacus bigelovii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Oenothera deltoides Torr. & Frém.
Funastrum hirtellum (Gray ex Brewer & S.Watson) Schltr.
Bouteloua curtipendula (Michx.) Torr.
Hoffmannseggia microphylla Torr.
Robinia pseudoacacia L.
Sedum lanceolatum Torr.
Fraxinus uhdei (Wenz.) Lingelsh.
Triteleia hyacinthina (Lindl.) Greene
Silene laciniata Cav.
Lithospermum ruderale Douglas ex Lehm.
Scirpus microcarpus J.Presl & C.Presl
Diplacus linearis (Benth.) Greene
Quercus pacifica Nixon & C.H.Müll.
Lythrum junceum Banks & Sol.
Epipactis gigantea Douglas ex Hook.
Sorghum halepense (L.) Pers.
Cotoneaster coriaceus Franch.
Galium divaricatum Pourr. ex Lam.
Hibiscus coulteri Harv. ex A.Gray
Ambrosia acanthicarpa Hook.
Scoliopus bigelovii Torr.
Corylus cornuta Marshall
Rhododendron menziesii Craven
Castilleja subinclusa var. franciscana (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Heterotheca sessiliflora (Nutt.) Shinners
Calochortus argillosus (Hoover) Zebzll & Fielder
Eurybia radulina (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Iris tenuissima Dykes
Centaurea cyanus L.
Alnus rhombifolia Nutt.
Brodiaea coronaria (Salisb.) Jeps.
Penstemon centranthifolius Benth.
Calochortus luteus Douglas ex Lindl.
Trifolium fucatum Lindl.
Verbascum virgatum Stokes
Heliopsis parvifolia A.Gray
Lasthenia fremontii (Torr. ex A.Gray) Greene
Aphyllon fasciculatum Torr. & Gray
Polycarpon tetraphyllum (L.) L.
Caltha leptosepala DC.
Eriogonum thymoides Benth.
Penstemon pseudospectabilis M.E.Jones
Lotus corniculatus L.
Alnus alnobetula (Ehrh.) K.Koch
Madia elegans D.Don
Nabalus alatus Hook.
Liquidambar styraciflua L.
Astragalus trichopodus var. lonchus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Hedera hibernica Poit.
Arctostaphylos viscida Parry
Sairocarpus vexillocalyculatus (Kellogg) D.A.Sutton
Cirsium occidentale var. occidentale
Lythrum salicaria L.
Ceanothus velutinus var. velutinus
Toxicodendron rydbergii (Small ex Rydb.) Greene
Ceanothus thyrsiflorus Eschw.
Solanum umbelliferum Eschsch.
Lomatium papilioniferum J.A.Alexander & Whaley
Cymopterus gilmanii Morton
Veratrum viride Aiton
Setaria viridis (L.) P.Beauv.
Horsfordia newberryi (S.Watson) Gray
Marah oregana (Torr. & A.Gray) Howell
Dudleya pauciflora Rose ex Britton & Rose
Acmispon grandiflorus (Benth.) Brouillet
Linanthus pungens (Torr.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Oreocarya humilis (A.Gray) Greene
Sanicula tuberosa Torr.
Erigeron glaucus Ker Gawl.
Cenchrus ciliaris L.
Blitum californicum S.Watson
Fritillaria biflora Lindl.
Sonchus asper (L.) Hill
Scabrethia scabra (Hook.) W.A.Weber
Micranthes californica (Greene) Small
Calochortus kennedyi var. kennedyi
Sedum laxum subsp. laxum
Malacothamnus fasciculatus var. fasciculatus
Salvia clevelandii (A.Gray) Greene
Sairocarpus coulterianus (A.DC.) D.A.Sutton
Brachychiton populneus (Schott & Endl.) R.Br.
Dittrichia graveolens (L.) Greuter
Castilleja exserta var. exserta
Sparaxis tricolor (Schneev.) Ker Gawl.
Malus domestica Borkh.
Erigeron sumatrensis Retz.
Gilia capitata Sims
Festuca roemeri (Pavlick) E.B.Alexeev
Lactuca serriola L.
Leptosiphon ciliatus (Benth.) Jeps.
Pistacia vera L.
Caulanthus inflatus S.Watson
Atriplex lentiformis (Torr.) S.Watson
Erigeron compositus Pursh
Lonicera involucrata (Richards.) Banks ex Spreng.
Crocanthemum scoparium Millsp.
Cypripedium fasciculatum Kellogg
Rhododendron macrophyllum D.Don ex G.Don
Pleurocoronis pluriseta (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Frasera paniculata Torr.
Zinnia grandiflora Nutt.
Collinsia tinctoria Hartw. ex Benth.
Prosopis glandulosa var. torreyana (L.D.Benson) M.C.Johnst.
Gilia modocensis Eastw.
Erythrostemon mexicanus (A.Gray) Gagnon & G.P.Lewis
Sanguisorba minor Bertol.
Prunus virginiana var. demissa (Nutt.) Torr.
Viola lobata Benth.
Centaurea diffusa Lam.
Penstemon spectabilis Thurb. ex Torr. & Gray
Plantago maritima L.
Bolboschoenus maritimus (L.) Palla
Ipomopsis aggregata (Pursh) V.E.Grant
Ferocactus emoryi (Engelm.) Orcutt
Lomatium nevadense (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Valeriana arizonica A.Gray
Smelowskia americana (Regel & Herder) Rydb.
Triadica sebifera (L.) Small
Bromus tectorum L.
Coptis laciniata A.Gray
Chaenactis fremontii A.Gray
Bahiopsis parishii (Greene) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Lupinus argenteus Pursh
Hieracium albiflorum Hook.
Blennosperma nanum var. nanum
Phyllodoce empetriformis (Sm.) D.Don
Penstemon incertus Brandegee
Schoenoplectus pungens var. longispicatus (Britton) S.G.Sm.
Caulanthus lasiophyllus (Hook. & Arn.) Payson
Alyssum simplex Rudolphi
Oxytropis lambertii Pursh
Allium acuminatum Hook.
Lomatium cuspidatum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Asclepias curassavica L.
Senecio mohavensis A.Gray
Platanthera elongata (Rydb.) R.M.Bateman
Eucalyptus sideroxylon A.Cunn. ex Woolls
Bellardia trixago (L.) All.
Eschscholzia Cham.
Artemisia campestris L.
Maianthemum racemosum (L.) Link
Verbena lasiostachys Link
Angelica lineariloba A.Gray
Cotoneaster pannosus Franch.
Hemizonia congesta DC.
Quercus parvula var. shrevei (C.H.Mull.) Nixon
Urtica urens L.
Mirabilis laevis var. retrorsa (A.Heller) Jeps.
Centaurium erythraea Rafn
Dipterostemon capitatus subsp. pauciflorus (Torr.) R.E.Preston
Oenothera speciosa Nutt.
Digitaria sanguinalis (L.) Scop.
Commelina dianthifolia Redouté
Salix exigua Nutt.
Malacothamnus orbiculatus (Greene) Greene
Rhododendron groenlandicum (Oeder) Kron & Judd
Mesembryanthemum nodiflorum L.
Heuchera cylindrica Douglas
Jacobaea vulgaris Gaertn.
Trifolium bifidum var. decipiens Greene
Comarum palustre L.
Prunus cerasus L.
Eriogonum parvifolium Sm.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. tomentosa
Ehrendorferia chrysantha (Hook. & Arn.) J.Rylander
Arctostaphylos pungens Kunth
Tripleurospermum inodorum (L.) Sch.-Bip
Clematis drummondii Torr. & A.Gray
Veronica missurica subsp. stellata (Pennell) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Asarum hartwegii S.Watson
Wyethia mollis A.Gray
Viola glabella Nutt.
Leptosiphon parviflorus Benth.
Primula jeffreyi (Van Houtte) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Fraxinus latifolia Benth.
Penstemon whippleanus A.Gray
Mammillaria tetrancistra Engelm.
Sonchus oleraceus L.
Muhlenbergia rigens (Benth.) Hitchc.
Platanthera dilatata var. leucostachys (Lindl.) Hultén
Heliomeris multiflora Nutt.
Phyllospadix torreyi S.Watson
Sisymbrium irio L.
Amsonia tomentosa Torr. & Frém.
Angelica scabrida Clokey & Mathias
Bolandra oregana S.Watson
Pedicularis bracteosa Benth.
Plantago subnuda Pilg.
Mentzelia lindleyi Torr. & A.Gray
Prosopis L.
Oplopanax horridus (Sm.) Miq.
Penstemon rostriflorus Kellogg
Trifolium wigginsii J.M.Gillett
Trichostema rubisepalum Elmer
Dudleya edulis (Nutt.) Moran
Carlowrightia arizonica A.Gray
Ranunculus glaberrimus Hook.
Solanum dulcamara L.
Packera pseudaurea (Rydb.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Oenothera elata Kunth
Lepidium campestre (L.) W.T.Aiton
Collomia heterophylla Douglas ex Hook.
Toxicoscordion paniculatum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Dasylirion wheeleri S.Watson ex Rothr.
Cymopterus terebinthinus var. albiflorus (Torr. & A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Kickxia elatine (L.) Dumort.
Opuntia semispinosa Griffiths
Glehnia littoralis (A.Gray) F.Schmidt
Lagerstroemia indica L.
Asclepias subverticillata (Gray) Vail
Yucca brevifolia var. jaegeriana McKelvey
Montia parvifolia (Moc. ex DC.) Greene
Lithophragma parviflorum (Hook.) Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Ribes velutinum Greene
Iris longipetala Herb.
Navarretia leucocephala Benth.
Dicentra uniflora Kellogg
Cakile maritima Scop.
Oenanthe sarmentosa C.Presl ex DC.
Drymocallis glandulosa (Lindl.) Rydb.
Galium boreale L.
Cotoneaster simonsii Baker
Caulanthus heterophyllus (Nutt.) Payson
Stenocereus thurberi (Engelm.) Buxb.
Romneya coulteri Harv.
Arnica parryi A.Gray
Encelia farinosa var. phenicodonta (S.F.Blake) I.M.Johnst.
Lycium brevipes Benth.
Aegopodium podagraria L.
Cakile edentula (Bigelow) Hook.
Sanicula bipinnata Hook. & Arn.
Calochortus uniflorus Hook. & Arn.
Eriastrum diffusum (A.Gray) Mason
Saxifraga bronchialis L.
Amsinckia menziesii (Lehm.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Delairea odorata Lem.
Ambrosia salsola var. salsola
Pluchea sericea (Nutt.) Coville
Lilium pardalinum subsp. shastense (Eastw.) M.W.Skinner
Cryptantha nevadensis A.Nelson & Kenn.
Asperugo procumbens L.
Veronica officinalis L.
Phalaris arundinacea L.
Menyanthes trifoliata L.
Penstemon pruinosus Douglas
Eriogonum abertianum Torr.
Ribes bracteosum Douglas ex Hook.
Bromus carinatus Hook. & Arn.
Echinocereus triglochidiatus subsp. mojavensis (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) W.Blum & Mich.Lange
Salsola australis R.Br.
Dysphania botrys (L.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Senna pendula (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Briza minor L.
Justicia californica (Benth.) D.N.Gibson
Melampodium leucanthum Torr. & A.Gray
Cryptantha intermedia (A.Gray) Greene
Dichelostemma congestum (Sm.) Kunth
Triteleia crocea (Alph.Wood) Greene
Senna covesii (A.Gray) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Alnus alnobetula subsp. sinuata (Regel) Raus
Artemisia tridentata subsp. wyomingensis Beetle & A.L.Young
Gaillardia pinnatifida Torr.
Eriogonum elongatum Benth.
Amsinckia tessellata A.Gray
Astragalus desperatus M.E.Jones
Lonicera utahensis S.Watson
Penstemon fruticiformis Coville
Penstemon heterophyllus Lindl.
Ceanothus prostratus Benth.
Penstemon serrulatus Menzies
Celtis pallida Torr.
Chorizanthe fimbriata var. laciniata (Torr.) Jeps.
Solanum parishii A.Heller
Sedum oreganum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Aliciella latifolia (S.Watson) J.M.Porter
Paeonia brownii Douglas
Pedicularis groenlandica Retz.
Clarkia rhomboidea Douglas
Eremogone capillaris (Poir.) Fenzl
Pilosella caespitosa (Dumort.) P.D.Sell & C.West
Galium andrewsii subsp. andrewsii
Plantago macrocarpa Cham. & Schltdl.
Baccharis pilularis subsp. consanguinea (DC.) C.B.Wolf
Tellima grandiflora (Pursh) Douglas ex Lindl.
Cistus creticus L.
Triphysaria versicolor Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Salvia munzii Epling
Lonicera interrupta Benth.
Anemonastrum deltoideum (Hook.) Mosyakin
Cylindropuntia thurberi subsp. versicolor (Engelm. ex J.M.Coult.) M.A.Baker
Leptosiphon latisectus (E.G.Buxton) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Pinguicula vulgaris L.
Penstemon clevelandii var. clevelandii
Descurainia pinnata (Walter) Britton
Trifolium aureum Pollich
Epilobium brachycarpum C.Presl
Veronica arvensis L.
Acanthomintha ilicifolia A.Gray
Fritillaria atropurpurea Nutt.
Aralia californica S.Watson
Lomatium martindalei (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Helianthus annuus L.
Eriogonum plumatella Durand & Hilg.
Heuchera micrantha Douglas
Pseudognaphalium stramineum (Kunth) Anderb.
Leuzea repens (L.) D.J.N.Hind
Astragalus megacarpus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Cardiospermum halicacabum L.
Solanum houstonii Martyn
Erythronium oregonum Applegate
Alopecurus pratensis L.
Garrya wrightii Torr.
Triphysaria versicolor subsp. faucibarbata (A.Gray) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Aphyllon cooperi A.Gray
Ferocactus viridescens (Nutt.) Britton & Rose
Monolopia lanceolata Nutt.
Penstemon albomarginatus M.E.Jones
Rubus neomexicanus A.Gray
Sedum laxum subsp. heckneri (M.Peck) Clausen
Cyperus erythrorhizos Muhl.
Myoporum laetum G.Forst.
Cuscuta californica Choisy
Arctostaphylos pringlei subsp. drupacea (Parry) P.V.Wells
Cylindropuntia thurberi (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Cupaniopsis anacardioides (A.Rich.) Radlk.
Trifolium arvense L.
Calochortus vestae (Purdy) Wallace
Sibbaldia procumbens L.
Scutellaria galericulata L.
Thalictrum occidentale A.Gray
Nolina microcarpa S.Watson
Cercocarpus intricatus S.Watson
Herniaria hirsuta L.
Cordylanthus rigidus subsp. setigerus T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Veratrum californicum Durand
Lomatium latilobum (Rydb.) Mathias
Malacothamnus fremontii (Torr. ex Gray) Greene
Leptosiphon lemmonii (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Mertensia ciliata (James ex Torr.) G.Don
Ditaxis serrata (Torr.) A.Heller
Acamptopappus shockleyi A.Gray
Berberis fremontii Torr.
Calochortus splendens Douglas ex Benth.
Ludwigia hexapetala (Hook. & Arn.) Zardini, H.Y.Gu & P.H.Raven
Cirsium mohavense (Greene) Petr.
Lolium multiflorum Lam.
Helenium autumnale L.
Verbena brasiliensis Vell.
Anemone drummondii S.Watson
Cistus creticus subsp. eriocephalus (Viv.) Greuter & Burdet
Bolandra californica A.Gray
Bromus hordeaceus L.
Allium nevadense S.Watson
Eriogonum wrightii var. subscaposum S.Watson
Solanum lycopersicum L.
Dudleya abramsii Rose
Eriophyllum lanatum var. integrifolium (Hook.) Bailey
Asparagus officinalis L.
Cylindropuntia alcahes subsp. alcahes
Acmispon argophyllus var. argophyllus
Triodanis biflora Nieuwl.
Lagophylla ramosissima Nutt.
Artemisia pycnocephala (Less.) DC.
Lepidium latifolium L.
Sisyrinchium longipes (E.P.Bicknell) Kearney & Peebles
Caulanthus anceps Payson
Triteleia bridgesii (S.Watson) Greene
Sorbus sitchensis M.Roem.
Astragalus toquimanus Barneby
Navarretia hamata subsp. hamata
Dudleya blochmaniae subsp. blochmaniae
Ribes menziesii Pursh
Luetkea pectinata (Pursh) Kuntze
Quercus rugosa Née
Torilis arvensis (Huds.) Link
Eschscholzia glyptosperma Greene
Fritillaria affinis var. affinis
Myrica gale L.
Collinsia torreyi A.Gray
Ceanothus rigidus Nutt.
Psorothamnus arborescens (Torr. ex A.Gray) Barneby
Pulsatilla nuttalliana (DC.) Spreng.
Melilotus indicus (L.) All.
Lomatium triternatum (Pursh) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Mammillaria sheldonii (Britton & Rose) Boed.
Populus alba L.
Carex exsiccata L.H.Bailey
Sedum spathulifolium Hook.
Clarkia affinis H. & Lewis
Stephanomeria exigua Nutt.
Lilium pardalinum Kellogg
Lactuca saligna L.
Gutierrezia sarothrae (Pursh) Britton & Rusby
Calochortus bruneaunis A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Acmispon watsonii (Vasey & Rose) Brouillet
Chorizanthe membranacea Benth.
Acmispon parviflorus (Benth.) D.D.Sokoloff
Apodanthera undulata A.Gray
Calochortus umbellatus Alph.Wood
Erysimum capitatum var. capitatum
Datisca glomerata (C.Presl) Baill.
Harpagonella arizonica (I.M.Johnst.) Guilliams & B.G.Baldwin
Myriophyllum aquaticum (Vell.) Verdc.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. pseudiodanthus (Barneby) J.A.Alexander
Mitella stauropetala Piper
Veronica anagallis-aquatica L.
Euphorbia albomarginata Torr. & A.Gray
Silene chalcedonica (L.) E.H.L.Krause
Calochortus pulchellus (Benth.) Alph.Wood
Epilobium canum subsp. latifolium (Hook.) P.H.Raven
Astragalus eremiticus E.Sheld.
Sidalcea oregana subsp. spicata (Regel) C.L.Hitchc.
Fragaria vesca subsp. californica (Cham. & Schltdl.) Staudt
Lepidium lasiocarpum subsp. lasiocarpum
Oenothera suffrutescens (Ser.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Ambrosia dumosa (A.Gray) Payne
Monoptilon bellioides (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Triteleia lugens Greene
Viola purpurea subsp. purpurea
Petrorhagia dubia (Raf.) G.López & Romo
Euonymus alatus (Thunb.) Siebold
Parthenocissus inserta (A.Kern.) Fritsch
Dudleya greenei Rose ex Britton & Rose
Lamprocapnos spectabilis (L.) Fukuhara
Cercocarpus betuloides Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Mentha canadensis L.
Pyracantha coccinea M.Roem.
Veronica rubra (Douglas ex Hook.) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Malva nicaeensis All.
Lophocereus schottii var. schottii
Eriophyllum pringlei A.Gray
Sidalcea glaucescens Greene.
Pseudognaphalium californicum (DC.) Anderb.
Monarda fistulosa L.
Tauschia kelloggii (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Geranium oreganum Howell
Comandra umbellata (L.) Nutt.
Trifolium subterraneum L.
Glycyrrhiza lepidota Pursh
Cryptantha crinita Greene
Euphorbia myrsinites L.
Acmispon wrangelianus (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Sokoloff
Rosa rugosa Thunb.
Mammillaria brandegeei subsp. brandegeei
Corylus cornuta subsp. californica (A.DC.) A.E.Murray
Stachys coccinea Ortega
Crataegus monogyna Jacq.
Acer glabrum Torr.
Agoseris grandiflora (Nutt.) Greene
Carex nudata W.Boott
Penstemon heterophyllus var. heterophyllus
Pediomelum californicum (S.Watson) Rydb.
Taraxia tanacetifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Piper
Shepherdia rotundifolia Parry
Sedum album L.
Mentzelia micrantha (Hook. & Arn.) Torr. & A.Gray
Darlingtonia californica Torr.
Castilleja subinclusa Greene
Elymus elymoides (Raf.) Swezey
Clematis vitalba L.
Callitriche palustris L.
Castilleja elmeri Fernald
Cnidoscolus angustidens Torr.
Dalea mollissima (Rydb.) Munz
Polemonium foliosissimum A.Gray
Cynoglossum officinale L.
Holocarpha virgata (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Grindelia squarrosa (Pursh) Dunal
Calochortus monophyllus (Lindl.) Lem.
Goodmania luteola (Parry) Reveal & Ertter
Eryngium heterophyllum Engelm.
Ipomoea purpurea (L.) Roth
Fritillaria pudica (Pursh) Spreng.
Eucephalus engelmannii (D.C.Eaton) Greene
Malus fusca (Raf.) C.K.Schneid.
Bursera microphylla A.Gray
Chaenactis glabriuscula DC.
Ehrharta erecta Lam.
Chamaebatia foliolosa Benth.
Funastrum heterophyllum (Engelm.) Standl.
Melilotus officinalis (L.) Lam.
Silene douglasii Hook.
Cyclamen hederifolium Aiton
Pectocarya recurvata I.M.Johnst.
Claytonia parviflora Douglas ex Hook.
Tiarella trifoliata var. unifoliata (Hook.) Kurtz
Munroa squarrosa (Nutt.) Torr.
Echinocereus santaritensis W.Blum & Rutow
Triantha occidentalis (S.Watson) R.R.Gates
Yucca angustissima Engelm. ex Trel.
Sabulina macra (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Leptosiphon breviculus (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Empetrum nigrum L.
Collinsia sparsiflora Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Ulmus americana L.
Calochortus tolmiei Hook. & Arn.
Polemonium pulcherrimum var. delicatum (Rydb.) Cronquist
Fouquieria diguetii (Tiegh.) I.M.Johnst.
Thysanocarpus curvipes subsp. amplectens (Greene) P.J.Alexander & Windham
Artemisia dracunculus L.
Potentilla thurberi A.Gray ex Lehm.
Thymophylla concinna (A.Gray) Strother
Neottia banksiana (Lindl.) Rchb.f.
Erigeron linearis (Hook.) Piper
Quercus peninsularis Trel.
Dudleya abramsii subsp. abramsii
Calochortus macrocarpus Douglas
Moehringia macrophylla (Hook.) Fenzl
Berberis darwinii Hook.
Dudleya arizonica Rose
Plagiobothrys collinus (Phil.) I.M.Johnst.
Ottleya strigosa (Nutt.) D.D.Sokoloff
Apium graveolens L.
Ceanothus integerrimus Hook. & Arn.
Tetradymia glabrata Torr. & A.Gray
Abronia umbellata Lam.
Streptanthus tortuosus Kellogg
Solanum xanti A.Gray
Agastache urticifolia var. urticifolia
Euphorbia spathulata Lam.
Aconitum columbianum Nutt.
Campanula parryi var. parryi
Cirsium andersonii (A.Gray) Petr.
Malva moschata L.
Lupinus truncatus Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.
Euphorbia terracina L.
Malacothrix glabrata (D.C.Eaton ex A.Gray) A.Gray
Trichoptilium incisum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Cirsium arizonicum (A.Gray) Petr.
Salvia pachyphylla Epling ex Munz
Astragalus lentiginosus Douglas ex Hook.
Lithospermum multiflorum S.Watson
Crocosmia crocosmiiflora (Lemoine) N.E.Br.
Cyperus eragrostis Lam.
Paeonia californica Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Carex praegracilis W.Boott
Valeriana californica A.Heller
Callianthe picta (Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.) Donnell
Campanula alaskana (A.Gray) W.Wight ex J.P.Anderson
Navarretia tagetina Greene
Penstemon heterodoxus A.Gray
Lithophragma glabrum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Cylindropuntia abyssi (Hester) Backeb.
Wyethia angustifolia (DC.) Nutt.
Bistorta bistortoides (Pursh) Small
Dirca occidentalis A.Gray
Nassella tenuissima (Trin.) Barkworth
Calochortus kennedyi Porter
Avena fatua L.
Conicosia pugioniformis (L.) N.E.Br.
Ammophila arenaria (L.) Link
Iris missouriensis Nutt.
Viola praemorsa Douglas
Berberis repens Lindl.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. cymosa
Grindelia hirsutula Hook. & Arn.
Chasmanthe floribunda (Salisb.) N.E.Br.
Erythranthe laciniata (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Senecio flaccidus var. monoensis (Greene) B.L.Turner & T.M.Barkley
Salvia sonomensis Greene
Pilostyles thurberi A.Gray
Calochortus flexuosus S.Watson
Vesper purpurascens (A.Gray) R.L.Hartm. & G.L.Nesom
Euphorbia parishii Greene
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. polifolium (Benth.) Torr. & A.Gray
Eriophyllum wallacei (A.Gray) A.Gray
Bouvardia ternifolia (Cav.) Schltdl.
Calochortus clavatus S.Watson
Ambrosia deltoidea (Torr.) Payne
Quercus robur L.
Platanus wrightii S.Watson
Eremogone kingii var. kingii
Agoseris aurantiaca (Hook.) Greene
Boerhavia coccinea Mill.
Orthilia secunda (L.) House
Ipomoea quamoclit L.
Atriplex argentea var. longitrichoma (Stutz, G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.) S.L.Welsh
Galium stellatum Kellogg
Hulsea heterochroma A.Gray
Marsdenia edulis S.Watson
Silene campanulata S.Watson
Solanum hindsianum Benth.
Venegasia carpesioides DC.
Medicago minima (L.) Bartal.
Argentina pacifica Rydb.
Echinocereus scopulorum Britton & Rose
Rosa gymnocarpa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Enceliopsis nudicaulis var. nudicaulis
Betula papyrifera Marshall
Astragalus limnocharis var. montii (S.L.Welsh) Isely
Amelanchier alnifolia (Nutt.) Nutt.
Eriogonum flavum Nutt.
Senecio lugens Richards.
Pachycereus pecten-aboriginum (A.Berger) Britton & Rose
Soliva sessilis Ruiz & Pav.
Coreocarpus parthenioides var. parthenioides
Castilleja covilleana Hend.
Arctostaphylos silvicola Jeps. & Wiesl.
Schoenoplectus californicus (C.A.Mey.) Soják
Mohavea confertiflora (Benth. ex A.DC.) A.Heller
Senna artemisioides subsp. artemisioides
Stachys rigida subsp. quercetorum (A.Heller) Epling
Agave parryi Engelm.
Erythranthe primuloides (Benth.) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Salvia lemmonii A.Gray
Cirsium edule Nutt.
Lomatium repostum (Jeps.) Mathias
Quercus garryana var. garryana
Sedum stenopetalum subsp. stenopetalum
Silene lemmonii S.Watson
Centaurea ×moncktonii Thuill.
Adenophyllum porophylloides (A.Gray) Strother
Graptopetalum bartramii Rose
Horkelia clevelandii (Greene) Rydb.
Arctostaphylos pajaroensis (J.E.Adams ex Mc Minn) J.E.Adams
Calystegia silvatica (Kit.) Griseb.
Buddleja davidii Franch.
Sambucus racemosa var. melanocarpa (A.Gray) Mc Minn
Cherleria obtusiloba (Rydb.) A.J.Moore & Dillenb.
Vicia cracca L.
Bebbia juncea var. aspera Greene
Volutaria tubuliflora (Murb.) Sennen
Pluchea odorata (L.) Cass.
Zeltnera exaltata (Griseb.) G.Mans.
Hesperis matronalis L.
Eschscholzia californica subsp. mexicana (Greene) C.Clark
Eriogonum rupinum Reveal
Helianthus petiolaris Nutt.
Spiranthes romanzoffiana Cham.
Montia fontana L.
Krascheninnikovia lanata (Pursh) A.Meeuse & Smit
Veronica serpyllifolia L.
Medicago lupulina L.
Spergula arvensis L.
Lilium pardalinum subsp. pardalinum
Coptis aspleniifolia Salisb.
Echinocereus arizonicus subsp. nigrihorridispinus W.Blum & Rutow
Lupinus sparsiflorus Benth.
Chylismia parryi Small
Vicia hirsuta (L.) Gray
Myosurus cupulatus S.Watson
Lepidium lasiocarpum Nutt.
Chorispora tenella (Pall.) DC.
Artemisia spinescens Eaton
Collomia linearis Nutt.
Valeriana edulis Torr. & Gray
Corydalis scouleri Hook.
Hazardia squarrosa (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Dudleya virens (Rose) Moran
Salicornia pacifica Standl.
Hibiscus denudatus Benth.
Delphinium scaposum Greene
Salvia eremostachya Jeps.
Stachys bullata Benth.
Phleum alpinum L.
Ambrosia psilostachya DC.
Lupinus latifolius Lindl. ex J.Agardh
Glyceria elata (Nash) M.E.Jones
Pisum sativum L.
Calystegia purpurata subsp. purpurata
Viburnum tinus L.
Opuntia santa-rita (Griffiths & Hare) Rose
Salvia dorrii (Kellogg) Abrams
Opuntia chlorotica Engelm. & Bigelow
Packera quercetorum (Greene) C.Jeffrey
Romneya trichocalyx Eastw.
Sisymbrium orientale L.
Viola beckwithii Torr. & A.Gray
Oligomeris linifolia (Vahl ex Hornem.) J.F.Macbr.
Spiranthes infernalis Sheviak
Xylorhiza tortifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Rosa woodsii Lindl.
Heterotheca fulcrata (Greene) Shinners
Quercus dumosa Nutt.
Trillium chloropetalum var. giganteum (Hook. & Arn.) Munz
Eriogonum ursinum var. ursinum
Penstemon barbatus (Cav.) Roth
Calystegia soldanella (L.) R.Br.
Clarkia biloba subsp. brandegeae (Jeps.) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Eucalyptus conferruminata D.J.Carr & S.G.M.Carr
Geranium lucidum L.
Aquilegia flavescens S.Watson
Dalea pulchra Gentry
Triphysaria eriantha subsp. eriantha
Ranunculus populago Greene
Juncus bufonius L.
Platanthera transversa (Suksd.) R.M.Bateman
Oxytheca perfoliata Torr. & A.Gray
Rubus leucodermis Douglas ex Hook.
Hyoscyamus niger L.
Prunus ilicifolia subsp. ilicifolia
Bloomeria crocea var. crocea
Layia gaillardioides Hook. & Arn.
Arnica sonnei Greene
Canotia holacantha Torr.
Trifolium wormskioldii Lehm.
Ajuga reptans L.
Penstemon rupicola (Piper) Howell
Chrysolepis chrysophylla var. chrysophylla
Polygonum paronychia Cham. & Schltdl.
Tetramerium nervosum Nees
Cucurbita palmata S.Watson
Arctostaphylos patula Greene
Solanum laciniatum Aiton
Quercus engelmannii Greene
Castilleja miniata var. miniata
Kallstroemia grandiflora Torr. ex A.Gray
Echinomastus erectocentrus var. erectocentrus
Lomatium dissectum (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) Mathias & Constance
Cycladenia humilis var. jonesii (Eastw.) S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Penstemon rydbergii var. oreocharis (Greene) Holmgren
Primula tetrandra (Suksd.) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Malva sylvestris L.
Hosackia crassifolia var. crassifolia
Thlaspi arvense L.
Castilleja densiflora var. obispoensis (D.D.Keck) J.M.Egger
Symphytum officinale L.
Pyrola picta Sm.
Cylindropuntia californica subsp. rosarica (G.E.Linds.) U.Guzmán
Arnica latifolia Bong.
Solanum nigrum L.
Calendula arvensis L.
Monardella viridis Jeps.
Cylindropuntia munzii (C.B.Wolf) Backeb.
Acmispon grandiflorus var. grandiflorus
Symphoricarpos rotundifolius A.Gray
Erythranthe carsonensis N.S.Fraga
Castilleja wightii Elmer
Saltugilia splendens (Douglas ex H.Mason & A.D.Grant) L.A.Johnson
Ericameria cuneata var. spathulata (A.Gray) Mc Clatchie
Lepidium nitidum Nutt.
Castilleja densiflora var. gracilis (Benth.) J.M.Egger
Asclepias subulata Decne.
Yucca utahensis McKelvey
Oxalis articulata Savigny
Narcissus pseudonarcissus L.
Echinocereus fendleri subsp. fendleri
Acmispon americanus var. americanus
Hippuris vulgaris L.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. pumila (Rose) K.M.Nakai
Penstemon speciosus Douglas
Asclepias eriocarpa Benth.
Lantana camara L.
Quercus cornelius-mulleri Nixon & K.P.Steele
Arctomecon californicum Torr. & Frém.
Cosmos bipinnatus Cav.
Schinus terebinthifolia Raddi
Iris hartwegii Baker
Calochortus eurycarpus S.Watson
Arctostaphylos tomentosa (Pursh) Lindl.
Brickellia longifolia var. multiflora (Kellogg) Cronquist
Navarretia nigelliformis Greene
Eriophyllum wallacei var. rubellum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Allophyllum gilioides subsp. violaceum (A.Heller) A.G.Day
Calochortus weedii var. intermedius Ownbey
Spergularia macrotheca var. macrotheca
Penstemon deustus Douglas
Plectritis congesta (Lindl.) DC.
Leptosyne gigantea Kellogg
Prunus fasciculata (Torr.) Gray
Juglans regia L.
Cephalanthus occidentalis L.
Gratiola ebracteata Benth. ex A.DC.
Sesuvium portulacastrum (L.) L.
Euphorbia characias L.
Pediocactus simpsonii (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Astragalus malacus A.Gray
Clarkia bottae (Spach) H. & Lewis
Lilium humboldtii W.Bull
Eriogonum cinereum Benth.
Euphorbia serpillifolia subsp. serpillifolia
Parietaria hespera Hinton
Brodiaea kinkiensis Niehaus
Symphyotrichum ciliatum (Ledeb.) G.L.Nesom
Astragalus amphioxys A.Gray
Acmispon maritimus (Nutt.) D.D.Sokoloff
Fraxinus parryi Moran
Astragalus palmeri A.Gray
Stylocline gnaphaloides Nutt.
Prunella vulgaris subsp. vulgaris
Frankenia salina I.M.Johnst.
Sedum obtusatum A.Gray
Dudleya attenuata subsp. attenuata
Arctostaphylos manzanita Parry
Sairocarpus nuttallianus (A.DC.) D.A.Sutton
Erigeron compactus S.F.Blake
Aira caryophyllea L.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus Nutt.
Limnanthes douglasii R.Br.
Castilleja grisea Dunkle
Pyrola chlorantha Sw.
Neottia convallarioides (Sw.) Rich.
Agave americana L.
Erigeron bonariensis L.
Mammillaria heyderi subsp. macdougalii (Rose) D.R.Hunt
Acmispon decumbens var. decumbens
Geum urbanum L.
Astragalus filipes Torr. ex A.Gray
Commicarpus scandens (L.) Standl.
Crocidium multicaule Hook.
Malacothrix coulteri Harv. & Gray ex A.Gray
Ceanothus pumilus Greene
Penstemon palmeri A.Gray
Eschscholzia californica var. maritima (Greene) Jeps.
Ceanothus papillosus Torr. & A.Gray
Polemonium pulcherrimum var. pulcherrimum
Tetragonia tetragonoides (Pall.) Kuntze
Layia discoidea D.D.Keck
Vaccinium uliginosum L.
Camassia leichtlinii (Baker) S.Watson
Stanleya pinnata (Pursh) Britton
Dipsacus sativus (L.) Honck.
Astragalus ceramicus E.Sheld.
Lonicera arizonica Rehder
Erythrostemon gilliesii (Hook.) Klotzsch
Thinopyrum intermedium (Host) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Tanacetum parthenium (L.) Sch.Bip.
Eclipta prostrata (L.) L.
Adenostoma sparsifolium Torr.
Acmispon heermannii var. orbicularis (A.Gray) Brouillet
Echinocereus ledingii Peebles
Epilobium densiflorum (Lindl.) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Vaccinium macrocarpum Aiton
Platanthera ephemerantha R.M.Bateman
Pseudotrillium rivale (S.Watson) S.B.Farmer
Reynoutria japonica Houtt.
Leptosiphon androsaceus Benth.
Geranium californicum G.N.Jones & F.F.Jones
Sanicula arguta Greene ex J.M.Coult. & Rose
Neogaerrhinum filipes (A.Gray) Rothm.
Lamium galeobdolon subsp. argentatum (Smejkal) J.Duvign.
Bowlesia incana Ruiz & Pav.
Vicia L.
Oxyria digyna (L.) Hill
Linum usitatissimum L.
Luzula parviflora (Ehrh.) Desv.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. mollis (J.E.Adams) P.V.Wells
Atriplex polycarpa (Torr.) S.Watson
Stillingia linearifolia S.Watson
Fallopia convolvulus (L.) Á.Löve
Ceanothus oliganthus Nutt.
Pedicularis contorta var. contorta
Ancistrocarphus filagineus A.Gray
Oxalis californica (Abrams) R.Knuth
Castilleja levisecta Greenm.
Abronia villosa var. aurita (Abrams) Jeps.
Chorizanthe staticoides Benth.
Erysimum franciscanum Rossbach
Penstemon albertinus Greene
Castilleja miniata Douglas
Ligusticum canbyi (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Chylismia cardiophylla subsp. cardiophylla
Linanthus parryae (A.Gray) Greene
Kalmia microphylla (Hook.) A.Heller
Valeriana dioica L.
Ulmus pumila L.
Ferocactus peninsulae (F.A.C.Weber) Britton & Rose
Lolium perenne L.
Castilleja mendocinensis (Eastw.) Pennell
Penstemon attenuatus Douglas
Ceanothus cordulatus Kellogg
Galium nuttallii A.Gray
Rupertia physodes (Douglas) J.W.Grimes
Townsendia incana Nutt.
Anticlea occidentalis (A.Gray) Zomlefer & Judd
Pleiacanthus spinosus (Nutt.) Rydb.
Myosotis discolor Pers.
Valeriana sitchensis Bong.
Collomia larsenii (A.Gray) Payson
Cordylanthus pilosus A.Gray
Astragalus miser Douglas ex Hook.
Hooveria parviflora (S.Watson) D.W.Taylor & D.J.Keil
Psilocarphus tenellus Nutt.
Collinsia grandiflora Douglas ex Lindl.
Prosopis velutina Wooton
Eriogonum nidularium Coville
Karwinskia humboldtiana (Roem. & Schult.) Zucc.
Layia fremontii (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Mecardonia procumbens (Mill.) Small
Ericameria brachylepis (A.Gray) Hall
Fritillaria agrestis Greene
Galium wigginsii Dempster
Verbascum blattaria L.
Brasenia schreberi J.F.Gmel.
Pogogyne nudiuscula A.Gray
Delphinium patens Newb.
Collinsia corymbosa Herder
Calycadenia multiglandulosa DC.
Trifolium hybridum L.
Arctostaphylos canescens subsp. canescens
Veronica regina-nivalis M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Echinocereus rigidissimus subsp. rigidissimus
Echinochloa crus-galli (L.) P.Beauv.
Matelea parvifolia (Torr.) Woodson
Bromus catharticus Vahl
Sphaeralcea ambigua var. rugosa (Kearney) Kearney
Juncus tenuis Willd.
Beckmannia syzigachne (Steud.) Fernald
Gayophytum diffusum Torr. & A.Gray
Heuchera grossulariifolia Rydb.
Gilia diegensis (Munz) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Opuntia basilaris var. basilaris
Sagittaria sanfordii Greene
Calyptridium monospermum Greene
Rorippa palustris (L.) Besser
Ruppia maritima L.
Galium andrewsii A.Gray
Dracunculus vulgaris Schott
Ranunculus occidentalis Nutt.
Viola ocellata Torr. & A.Gray
Koenigia phytolaccifolia (Meisn. ex Small) T.M.Schust. & Reveal
Basella alba L.
Chylismia cardiophylla subsp. robusta (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Sixalix atropurpurea (L.) Greuter & Burdet
Schinus molle L.
Dieteria canescens (Pursh) Nutt.
Phoenix canariensis H.Wildpret
Calochortus coeruleus (Kellogg) S.Watson
Orthocarpus cuspidatus Greene
Camissonia strigulosa (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Raven
Lathyrus delnorticus C.L.Hitchc.
Leymus condensatus (J.Presl) Á.Löve
Triphysaria floribunda (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Bromus maritimus (Piper) Hitchc.
Allophyllum glutinosum (Benth.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Sambucus racemosa var. arborescens (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Jepsonia parryi (Torr.) Small
Lepidium didymum L.
Ceanothus tomentosus Parry
Claytonia panamintensis Stoughton
Pentachaeta aurea subsp. aurea
Linaria vulgaris Mill.
Pseudoziziphus parryi (Torr.) Hauenschild
Moneses uniflora (L.) A.Gray
Euphorbia lathyris L.
Centaurea montana L.
Polygonum spergulariiforme Meisn. ex Small
Quercus wislizeni A.DC.
Chamaebatia australis (Brandegee) Abrams
Heterotheca villosa (Pursh) Shinners
Polemonium californicum Eastw.
Nassella pulchra (Hitchc.) Barkworth
Delphinium californicum Torr. & A.Gray
Helenium bigelovii A.Gray
Malacothamnus densiflorus (S.Watson) Greene
Phlox condensata (A.Gray) E.Nelson
Delphinium parishii subsp. subglobosum (Wiggins) Lewis & Epling
Fraxinus anomala Torr. ex S.Watson
Datura L.
Calochortus weedii var. weedii
Freesia laxa subsp. laxa
Alternanthera philoxeroides (Mart.) Griseb.
Epiphyllum oxypetalum (DC.) Haw.
Astragalus whitneyi A.Gray
Allenrolfea occidentalis (S.Watson) Kuntze
Lewisia pygmaea (Gray) B.L.Rob.
Prunus subcordata Benth.
Wyethia glabra A.Gray
Leptosiphon liniflorus (Benth.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Hypericum concinnum Benth.
Rhodiola integrifolia Raf.
Gentianella amarella (L.) Börner
Calochortus minimus Ownbey
Micranthes ferruginea (Graham) Brouillet & Gornall
Cardamine occulta Hornem.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. leucophylla J.E.Keeley, M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Lyonothamnus floribundus subsp. aspleniifolius (Greene) P.H.Raven
Ornithogalum umbellatum L.
Cneoridium dumosum (Nutt.) Hook.fil.
Calochortus obispoensis Lemmon
Eucalyptus globulus Labill.
Symphyotrichum lanceolatum var. hesperium (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Tillandsia recurvata (L.) L.
Geranium richardsonii Fisch. & Trautv.
Cercocarpus montanus Raf.
Agave angustifolia Haw.
Bellardia viscosa (L.) Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Sidalcea calycosa subsp. rhizomata (Jeps.) S.R.Hill
Castilleja scabrida var. scabrida
Sedum spathulifolium var. pruinosum (Britton) B.Boivin
Ribes viburnifolium A.Gray
Cottsia gracilis (A.Gray) W.R.Anderson & C.Davis
Hesperevax caulescens (Benth.) A.Gray
Akebia quinata (Houtt.) Decne.
Lupinus stiversii Kellogg
Pyrola aphylla Sm.
Tradescantia pinetorum Greene
Euphorbia revoluta Engelm.
Dudleya attenuata (S.Watson) Moran
Salix ×sepulcralis Simonk.
Cercocarpus ledifolius var. intermontanus N.H.Holmgren
Cardamine flexuosa With.
Bouteloua aristidoides (Kunth) Griseb.
Baileya multiradiata Harv. & Gray ex Torr.
Platanthera tescamnis Sheviak & W.F.Jenn.
Lessingia hololeuca Greene
Psilocarphus brevissimus var. brevissimus
Rosa canina L.
Dudleya ingens Rose ex Britton & Rose
Rhinanthus minor L.
Lepidium L.
Lythrum hyssopifolia L.
Eriophyllum confertiflorum var. confertiflorum
Alnus incana (L.) Moench
Quercus chrysolepis Liebm.
Juncus bolanderi Engelm.
Malvella leprosa (Ortega) Krapov.
Rhus microphylla Engelm.
Neottia cordata (L.) Rich.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. ineptus (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Asclepias lemmonii A.Gray
Anthoxanthum odoratum L.
Elaeagnus commutata Bernh. ex Rydb.
Geraea viscida (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Potentilla indica (Andr.) Wolf
Lepechinia calycina (Benth.) Epling
Conopholis alpina Liebm.
Calycadenia truncata DC.
Monardella odoratissima subsp. pallida (A.Heller) Epling
Diplacus grandiflorus Groenland
Leptosiphon bolanderi (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Trifolium longipes Nutt.
Cyclospermum leptophyllum (Pers.) Sprague
Euphorbia prostrata Aiton
Delphinium glareosum Greene
Lonicera japonica Thunb.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. marcescens Moran
Nigella damascena L.
Lessingia glandulifera A.Gray
Veronica wormskjoldii Roem. & Schult.
Erythronium californicum Purdy
Trifolium variegatum Nutt.
Leptospermum laevigatum (Gaertn.) F.Muell.
Elodea canadensis Michx.
Cymbalaria muralis P.Gaertn., B.Mey. & Scherb.
Castilleja applegatei Fernald
Cerastium glomeratum Thuill.
Astragalus trichopodus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. macrostegia
Dithyrea californica Harv.
Allium unifolium Kellogg
Camissonia campestris (Greene) Raven
Lilium washingtonianum Kellogg
Rhamnus pirifolia Greene
Ceratocephala testiculata (Crantz) Roth
Eremothera boothii subsp. condensata (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Veronica ranunculina (Pennell) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Oreostemma alpigenum (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Penstemon grinnellii Eastw.
Acalypha californica Benth.
Sanicula marilandica L.
Streptanthus glandulosus Hook.
Tagetes lemmonii A.Gray
Euphorbia micromera Boiss.
Krameria bicolor S.Watson
Ehrharta calycina Sm.
Jamesia americana Torr. & A.Gray
Artemisia ludoviciana Nutt.
Echeandia flavescens (Schult. & Schult.f.) Cruden
Sphaeralcea ambigua var. rosacea (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Kearney
Malacothamnus enigmaticus K.Morse & T.Chester
Agnorhiza elata (H.M.Hall) W.A.Weber
Aphyllon arizonicum (L.T.Collins) A.C.Schneid.
Dudleya virens subsp. virens
Celtis occidentalis L.
Erythranthe caespitosa (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Lithospermum incisum Lehm.
Navarretia hamata Greene
Astragalus asymmetricus E.Sheld.
Delphinium ×pavonaceum Ewan
Thelypodium laciniatum (Hook.) Endl.
Castilleja thompsonii Pennell
Senecio spartioides Torr. & A.Gray
Prunus cerasifera Ehrh.
Mertensia subcordata Greene
Calochortus superbus Purdy ex Howell
Morella californica (Cham. & Schltdl.) Wilbur
Lupinus albifrons var. douglasii (J.Agardh) C.P.Sm.
Allium simillimum L.F.Hend.
Astragalus oophorus var. oophorus
Bituminaria bituminosa (L.) C.H.Stirt.
Clarkia similis F.H.Lewis & W.R.Ernst
Heuchera rubescens Torr.
Artemisia palmeri A.Gray
Salvia vaseyi (Porter) Parish
Triphysaria pusilla (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Vicia americana Muhl. ex Willd.
Keckiella rothrockii var. jacintensis (Abrams) N.H.Holmgren
Ribes montigenum Mc Clatchie
Gentiana sceptrum Griseb.
Taraxacum Weber
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. sanctorum (Milliken) Mason
Erythranthe bicolor (Hartw. ex Benth.) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Drymocallis glandulosa var. glandulosa
Astragalus traskiae Eastw.
Ribes malvaceum Sm.
Lupinus hirsutissimus Benth.
Penstemon davidsonii var. davidsonii
Ericameria laricifolia (A.Gray) Shinners
Fallugia paradoxa (D.Don) Endl.
Ludwigia peploides (Kunth) P.H.Raven
Stemodia durantifolia (L.) Sw.
Penstemon compactus (D.D.Keck) Crosswh.
Sidalcea sparsifolia (C.L.Hitchc.) S.R.Hill
Loeseliastrum matthewsii (A.Gray) Timbrook
Triphysaria eriantha subsp. rosea (A.Gray) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Diplacus torreyi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Lupinus concinnus J.Agardh
Mentzelia gracilenta (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Hilaria rigida (Thurb.) Benth. ex Scribn.
Helianthus cusickii A.Gray
Lomatium linearifolium (S.Watson) J.F.Sm. & Mansfield
Brodiaea elegans subsp. elegans
Phlox austromontana Coville
Pedicularis centranthera A.Gray
Echinocereus fendleri subsp. rectispinus (Peebles) N.P.Taylor
Astragalus mollissimus Torr.
Balsamorhiza careyana A.Gray
Caesalpinia pulcherrima (L.) Sw.
Echinocystis lobata (Michx.) Torr. & A.Gray
Lamium galeobdolon (L.) L.
Atriplex confertifolia (Torr. & Frém.) S.Watson
Penstemon davidsonii Greene
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. glandulosus
Physocarpus malvaceus (Greene) Kuntze
Euphorbia abramsiana L.C.Wheeler
Leymus mollis (Trin.) Pilg.
Escobaria vivipara (Nutt.) Buxb.
Carduus nutans L.
Chylismia claviformis subsp. peirsonii (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Monolopia stricta Crum
Penstemon clevelandii A.Gray
Urospermum picroides (L.) Scop. ex F.W.Schmidt
Scorzoneroides autumnalis (L.) Moench
Hedysarum alpinum L.
Eriogonum ovalifolium Nutt.
Nolina palmeri S.Watson
Layia glandulosa (Hook.) Hook. & Arn.
Lantana montevidensis (Spreng.) Briq.
Trifolium microcephalum Pursh
Physalis hederifolia A.Gray
Drosera capensis L.
Lycium andersonii A.Gray
Pedicularis semibarbata var. charlestonensis Pennell & Clokey
Lantana velutina M.Martens & Galeotti
Aliciella latifolia subsp. latifolia
Salvia L.
Chloropyron maritimum subsp. canescens (A.Gray) Tank & J.M.Egger
Downingia bicornuta A.Gray
Pseudognaphalium microcephalum (Nutt.) Anderb.
Tamarix aphylla (L.) Karst.
Lithophragma heterophyllum (Hook. & Arn.) Torr. & A.Gray
Artemisia tridentata subsp. vaseyana (Rydb.) Beetle
Stephanomeria exigua subsp. coronaria (Greene) Gottlieb
Solidago velutina subsp. californica (Nutt.) Semple
Perityle congesta (M.E.Jones) Shinners
Ambrosia monogyra (Torr. & A.Gray) Strother & B.G.Baldwin
Ceanothus oliganthus var. sorediatus (Hook. & Arn.) Hoover
Opuntia macrorhiza Engelm.
Aristolochia californica Torr.
Townsendia condensata Parry
Hazardia orcuttii (A.Gray) Greene
Silene acaulis (L.) Jacq.
Cuscuta subinclusa Durand & Hilg.
Allium peninsulare var. franciscanum McNeal & Ownbey
Erigeron filifolius (Hook.) Nutt.
Aloysia wrightii A.Heller
Sphaeralcea incana Torr. ex A.Gray
Symphyotrichum laeve (L.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Pectocarya setosa A.Gray
Cerastium arvense L.
Acacia longifolia (Andrews) Willd.
Anemonoides piperi (Rydb.) Holub
Carex brainerdii Mack.
Calochortus tiburonensis A.J.Hill
Clinopodium vulgare L.
Potentilla hippiana Lehm.
Geranium incanum Burm.f.
Potamogeton crispus L.
Geranium purpureum Vill.
Crocanthemum aldersonii (Greene) Janch.
Dudleya variegata (S.Watson) Moran
Acmispon heermannii (Durand & Hilg.) Brouillet
Castilleja rubicundula var. lithospermoides (Benth.) J.M.Egger
Limonium ramosissimum (Poir.) Maire
Rosa spithamea A.Gray
Hypericum anagalloides Cham. & Schltdl.
Pedicularis attollens A.Gray
Elliottia pyroliflora (Bong.) Brim & P.F.Stevens
Abelmoschus esculentus (L.) Moench
Dudleya cymosa subsp. ovatifolia (Britton) Moran
Agave shawii subsp. shawii
Calochortus elegans Pursh
Crocus stellaris Haw.
Podistera nevadensis (A.Gray) S.Watson
Suaeda californica S.Watson
Astragalus nuttallii (Torr. & A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Dicranostegia orcuttiana (A.Gray) Pennell
Sarcobatus vermiculatus (Hook.) Torr.
Peniocereus greggii subsp. transmontanus (Engelm.) U.Guzmán
Gentiana affinis Griseb.
Stephanomeria cichoriacea A.Gray
Galanthus nivalis L.
Clarkia davyi (Jeps.) H. & Lewis
Bouteloua gracilis (Kunth) Lag. ex Griffiths
Perideridia kelloggii (A.Gray) Mathias
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. nivale (Canby ex Coville) M.E.Jones
Tabernaemontana tomentosa (Greenm.) A.O.Simões & M.E.Endress
Eriophyllum wallacei var. wallacei
Chaenactis carphoclinia var. carphoclinia
Araujia sericifera Brot.
Hackelia floribunda (Lehm.) I.M.Johnst.
Arctostaphylos virgata Eastw.
Chlorogalum pomeridianum subsp. pomeridianum
Castilleja latifolia Hook. & Arn.
Pieris japonica (Thunb.) D.Don ex G.Don
Stachys albens A.Gray
Primula L.
Thymophylla pentachaeta (DC.) Small
Lophocereus schottii (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Ceanothus jepsonii Greene
Typha domingensis Pers.
Carex hendersonii L.H.Bailey
Lysiloma candidum Brandegee
Solanum quitoense Lam.
Eriogonum trichopes Torr.
Samolus L.
Cotoneaster salicifolius Franch.
Penstemon utahensis Eastw.
Penstemon nitidus Douglas ex Benth.
Cotoneaster franchetii Boiss.
Brodiaea coronaria subsp. rosea (Greene) Niehaus
Lomatium mohavense (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Astragalus tener A.Gray
Draba verna L.
Arnica longifolia D.C.Eaton
Buxus sempervirens L.
Arnica mollis Hook.
Astragalus cibarius E.Sheld.
Echinocereus bakeri W.Blum, Oldach & J.Oldach
Pyrus communis L.
Deinandra paniculata (A.Gray) Davidson & Moxley
Gymnosteris parvula (Rydb.) A.Heller
Eucalyptus polyanthemos Schauer
Dudleya cymosa subsp. paniculata (Jeps.) K.M.Nakai
Chilopsis linearis subsp. arcuata (Fosberg) Henrickson
Corylus cornuta subsp. cornuta
Astragalus aridus A.Gray
Petrosedum rupestre (L.) P.V.Heath
Calochortus concolor (Baker) Purdy & L.H.Bailey
Impatiens ecornuta Gerry Moore, Zika & Rushworth
Ferocactus herrerae J.G.Ortega
Astragalus lentiginosus var. coachellae Shreve & Wiggins
Agropyron cristatum (L.) Gaertn.
Gamochaeta ustulata (Nutt.) Holub
Peucephyllum schottii A.Gray
Erythranthe moschata (Douglas ex Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Triantha occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Persicaria amphibia (L.) Gray
Ayenia compacta Rose
Calystegia malacophylla subsp. pedicellata (Jeps.) Munz
Juncus effusus L.
Triteleiopsis palmeri (S.Watson) Hoover
Silene verecunda S.Watson
Ceanothus pauciflorus Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Verbena hastata L.
Asclepias vestita Hook. & Arn.
Microsteris gracilis (Hook.) Greene
Grindelia integrifolia DC.
Ericameria paniculata A.Gray ex Rydb.
Lavandula pedunculata (Mill.) Cav.
Echinocereus brandegeei (J.M.Coult.) K.Schum.
Leptosyne maritima (Nutt.) A.Gray
Viola purpurea subsp. quercetorum (M.Baker & J.C.Clausen) R.J.Little
Clintonia andrewsiana Torr.
Pilosella aurantiaca (L.) F.W.Schultz & Sch.Bip.
Erythranthe erubescens G.L.Nesom
Maclura pomifera (Raf. ex Sarg.) C.K.Schneid.
Wyethia helenioides (DC.) Nutt.
Phyla nodiflora var. nodiflora
Dalea mollis Benth.
Cordylanthus rigidus (Benth.) Jeps.
Calyptridium umbellatum (Torr.) Greene
Peritoma arborea var. arborea
Funastrum utahense (Engelm.) Liede & Meve
Penstemon ambiguus Torr.
Ipomoea cristulata Hallier fil.
Pilosella horrida (Fr.) F.W.Schultz & Sch.Bip.
Prunus caroliniana (Mill.) Aiton
Passiflora palmeri Rose
Barbarea orthoceras Ledeb.
Calystegia subacaulis subsp. episcopalis Brummitt
Eremogone kingii var. glabrescens (S.Watson) Dorn
Festuca bromoides Michx., 1803
Senecio integerrimus var. exaltatus (Nutt.) Cronquist
Allium diabolense (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) McNeal
Euphorbia lurida Engelm.
Acmispon americanus (Nutt.) Rydb.
Cephalanthera austiniae (A.Gray) A.Heller
Photinia serratifolia (Desf.) Kalkman
Spathiphyllum wallisii Regel
Salix babylonica L.
Elymus glaucus Buckley
Acacia dealbata Link
Agave palmeri Engelm.
Corallorhiza maculata var. occidentalis (Lindl.) Ames
Gleditsia triacanthos L.
Eriogonum villiflorum A.Gray
Ipomopsis arizonica (Greene) Wherry
Lycium berlandieri Dunal
Cosmos sulphureus Cav.
Papaver californicum A.Gray
Clematis occidentalis (Hornem.) DC.
Vaccinium deliciosum Piper
Anisophyllum N.J.Jacquin, 1763
Lupinus citrinus Kellogg
Metastelma californicum Benth.
Crossosoma bigelovii S.Watson
Gilia flavocincta A.Nelson
Streptanthus longirostris (S.Watson) S.Watson
Agave moranii Gentry
Aphyllon epigalium subsp. epigalium
Cypripedium montanum Douglas ex Lindl.
Agave schottii var. schottii
Cenchrus longisetus M.C.Johnst.
Keckiella ternata (Torr. ex Gray) Straw
Acer pseudoplatanus L.
Condea laniflora (Benth.) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Leptosiphon pygmaeus (Brand) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Escobaria alversonii (J.M.Coult.) N.P.Taylor
Eriastrum pluriflorum subsp. albifaux S.J.De Groot
Arctostaphylos parryana Lemmon
Castilleja affinis Hook. & Arn.
Acmispon glaber var. brevialatus (Ottley) Brouillet
Galium oreganum Britton
Asclepias nyctaginifolia A.Gray
Abronia villosa S.Watson
Lilium philadelphicum L.
Hoffmannseggia drepanocarpa A.Gray
Carex geyeri Boott
Ceanothus parvifolius (S.Watson) Trel.
Cardamine nuttallii Greene
Tauschia arguta (Torr. & Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Passiflora fruticosa Killip
Pinguicula lusitanica L.
Leersia oryzoides (L.) Sw.
Eschscholzia parishii Greene
Helichrysum luteoalbum (L.) Rchb.
Senecio californicus DC.
Parthenium incanum Kunth
Gilia angelensis V.E.Grant
Ivesia saxosa (Lemmon ex Greene) Ertter
Lomatium lucidum (Nutt.) Jeps.
Calochortus amoenus Greene
Mertensia paniculata (Aiton) G.Don
Trifolium dasyphyllum Torr. & A.Gray
Carex nigricans C.A.Mey.
Nicotiana quadrivalvis Pursh
Dalea jamesii (Torr.) Torr. & A.Gray
Parthenocissus quinquefolia (L.) Planch.
Trifolium depauperatum var. amplectens (Torr. & A.Gray) S.Watson
Chaenactis stevioides Hook. & Arn.
Sphaeralcea coulteri (S.Watson) Gray
Calendula officinalis L.
Navarretia intertexta (Benth.) Hook.
Tetradymia spinosa Hook. & Arn.
Acmispon argophyllus var. fremontii (A.Gray) Brouillet
Ivesia gordonii (Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Corynopuntia invicta (Brandegee) F.M.Knuth
Carex subfusca W.Boott
Heterotheca subaxillaris (Lam.) Britton & Rusby
Solanum americanum Mill.
Nymphaea mexicana Zucc.
Rubus ulmifolius var. anoplothyrsus Sudre
Sagina procumbens L.
Salix laevigata Bebb
Lupinus flavoculatus A.Heller
Garrya flavescens S.Watson
Brodiaea terrestris Kellogg
Castilleja miniata var. dixonii (Fernald) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Myosotis stricta Link ex Roem. & Schult.
Berteroa incana (L.) DC.
Euphorbia brachycera Engelm.
Anemone multifida Poir.
Fritillaria camschatcensis (L.) Ker Gawl.
Fraxinus velutina Torr.
Arctostaphylos pumila Nutt.
Juncus effusus subsp. solutus (Fernald & Wiegand) Hämet-Ahti
Asclepias erosa Torr.
Ipomopsis tenuituba subsp. latiloba V.E.Grant & Wilken
Chrysolepis chrysophylla (Douglas ex Hook.) Hjelmq.
Ceanothus verrucosus Nutt.
Hedypnois rhagadioloides (L.) F.W.Schmidt
Caulanthus amplexicaulis var. barbarae (J.T.Howell) Munz
Psorothamnus emoryi (A.Gray) Rydb.
Eremocarya lepida Greene
Sanicula crassicaulis var. tripartita (Suksd.) H.Wolff
Lilium maritimum Kellogg
Rhamnus L.
Jatropha macrorhiza Benth.
Pyrola dentata Sm.
Astragalus pomonensis M.E.Jones
Nephrophyllidium crista-galli (Menzies ex Hook.) Gilg
Keckiella ternata var. ternata
Euphorbia lomelii V.W.Steinm.
Mentzelia torreyi var. torreyi
Mirabilis longiflora L.
Lupinus formosus Greene
Mirabilis laevis var. crassifolia (Choisy) Spellenb.
Amsinckia Lehm.
Linanthus maculatus (Parish) Milliken
Eriastrum eremicum subsp. eremicum
Chaenactis douglasii var. douglasii
Eriogonum wrightii var. membranaceum S.Stokes ex Jeps.
Oenothera rosea Aiton
Persicaria robustior (Small) E.P.Bicknell
Cylindropuntia whipplei (Engelm. & Bigelow) F.M.Knuth
Galanthus elwesii Hook.f.
Poliomintha incana (Torr.) A.Gray
Primula pauciflora var. zionensis (Eastw.) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Sorbus aucuparia L.
Astragalus cobrensis A.Gray
Caulanthus coulteri (A.Gray ex S.Watson) S.Watson
Sida neomexicana A.Gray
Draba cuneifolia Nutt.
Lupinus albifrons var. albifrons
Cyperus alternifolius subsp. flabelliformis Kük.
Heterotheca cinerascens (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Ferocactus viridescens subsp. littoralis (G.E.Linds.) F.Wolf & R.Wolf
Achlys californica Fukuda & Baker
Gossypium thurberi Tod.
Eriogonum racemosum Nutt.
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa subsp. thornberi (Thornber & Bonker) Lodé
Keckiella breviflora (Lindl.) Straw
Castilleja pallescens var. inverta (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Edwin
Atriplex canescens var. laciniata Parish
Hedera canariensis Willd.
Lewisia maguirei A.H.Holmgren
Agastache urticifolia (Benth.) Kuntze
Solanum laxum Spreng.
Achyrachaena mollis Schauer
Ageratina paupercula (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Eucalyptus spathulata Hook.
Ribes divaricatum Douglas
Iris germanica L.
Logfia gallica (L.) Coss. & Germ.
Poa infirma Kunth
Castilleja tenuiflora Benth.
Lepidium draba L.
Penstemon confertus Douglas
Ipomoea costellata Torr.
Baccharis plummerae (A.Gray) F.H.Hellw.
Potentilla villosa Pall. ex Pursh
Chrysolepis sempervirens (Kellogg) Hjelmq.
Rosa nutkana var. hispida Fernald
Calamagrostis nutkaensis (J.Presl) Steud.
Helianthella castanea Greene
Quercus turbinella Greene
Salvia carduacea Benth.
Acamptopappus sphaerocephalus var. sphaerocephalus
Ipomoea ternifolia Cav.
Veratrum fimbriatum A.Gray
Calochortus subalpinus Piper
Hesperostipa comata (Trin. & Rupr.) Barkworth
Viburnum edule (Michx.) Raf.
Ribes indecorum Eastw.
Eriophyllum lanosum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Melissa officinalis L.
Primula latiloba (A.Gray) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Antennaria umbrinella Rydb.
Scrophularia parviflora Wooton & Standl.
Punica granatum L.
Enemion occidentale (Hook. & Arn.) J.R.Drumm. & Hutch.
Eremothera nevadensis (Kellogg) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Achyronychia cooperi A.Gray
Claytonia megarhiza (Gray) Parry ex S.Watson
Gutierrezia californica (DC.) Torr. & A.Gray
Dieteria asteroides var. glandulosa (B.L.Turner) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Mirabilis tenuiloba S.Watson
Delphinium parryi A.Gray
Eriogonum microtheca Nutt.
Pediocactus nigrispinus (Hochstätter) Hochstätter
Brickellia nevinii A.Gray
Senecio minimus Poir.
Euphorbia melanadenia Torr. & A.Gray
Gaillardia pulchella Foug.
Chaenactis artemisiifolia (Harv. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Micranthes tolmiei (Torr. & A.Gray) Brouillet & Gornall
Eriogonum marifolium A.Gray
Arabidopsis thaliana (L.) Heynh.
Chylismia brevipes Small
Orobanche hederae Duby
Nolina bigelovii (Torr.) S.Watson
Swertia perennis L.
Porophyllum gracile Benth.
Arctium minus (Hill) Bernh.
Trianthema portulacastrum L.
Crassula tillaea Lest.-Garl.
Diplacus douglasii (Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Cirsium undulatum (Nutt.) Spreng.
Nuphar polysepalum Engelm.
Dudleya saxosa (M.Bieb.Jones) Britton & Rose
Brodiaea coronaria subsp. coronaria
Delphinium glaucum S.Watson
Corallorhiza maculata var. maculata
Diplacus congdonii (B.L.Rob.) G.L.Nesom
Picradeniopsis absinthifolia (Benth.) B.G.Baldwin
Agave utahensis Engelm.
Lathyrus cicera L.
Dudleya candelabrum Rose ex Britton & Rose
Mentzelia affinis Greene
Chaenactis carphoclinia var. peirsonii (Jeps.) Munz
Opuntia polyacantha var. erinacea (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) B.D.Parfitt
Ribes californicum Hook. & Arn.
Suaeda taxifolia (Standl.) Standl.
Physalis hederifolia var. fendleri (A.Gray) Cronquist
Calochortus palmeri var. palmeri
Spergularia rubra (L.) J.Presl & C.Presl
Euphorbia ocellata subsp. ocellata
Erythrina flabelliformis Kearney
Navarretia hamata subsp. leptantha (Greene) Mason
Helianthus niveus subsp. tephrodes (A.Gray) Heiser
Dicoria canescens A.Gray
Castilleja tenuis (A.Heller) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Lycium californicum Nutt. ex A.Gray
Chloropyron molle subsp. molle
Phragmites australis subsp. australis
Diplacus tricolor (Hartw. ex Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Cylindropuntia californica F.M.Knuth
Stenocereus gummosus (Engelm.) A.C.Gibson & K.E.Horak
Geum rossii (R.Br.) Ser.
Carex kelloggii W.Boott
Chylismia cardiophylla Small
Amsinckia menziesii var. intermedia (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.)
Hackelia patens (Nutt.) I.M.Johnst.
Calycoseris wrightii A.Gray
Quercus tomentella Engelm.
Iris tenax subsp. tenax
Acer saccharinum L.
Halerpestes cymbalaria (Pursh) Greene
Phalaris aquatica L.
Ratibida columnifera (Nutt.) Wooton & Standl.
Elaeagnus umbellata Thunb.
Verbena bonariensis L.
Erythranthe percaulis G.L.Nesom
Muilla coronata Greene
Salsola tragus L.
Astragalus johannis-howellii Barneby
Centrostegia thurberi A.Gray ex Benth.
Erythronium montanum S.Watson
Bloomeria crocea var. montana (Greene) Ingram
Crocus kotschyanus K.Koch
Cylindropuntia cholla (F.A.C.Weber) F.M.Knuth
Calochortus ambiguus (M.E.Jones) Ownbey
Osteospermum moniliferum L.
Ambrosia ambrosioides (Cav.) Payne
Halenia recurva (Sm.) Allen
Betula occidentalis Hook.
Senna didymobotrya (Fresen.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Clarkia purpurea subsp. quadrivulnera (Douglas) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Collomia tinctoria Kellogg
Campanula rapunculoides L.
Impatiens parviflora DC.
Clarkia biloba (Durand) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Eryngium vaseyi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Osmadenia tenella Nutt.
Juglans nigra L.
Schoenoplectus americanus (Pers.) Volkart
Heterotheca oregona (Nutt.) Shinners
Galium catalinense subsp. acrispum Dempster
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. filaginifolia
Proboscidea althaeifolia (Benth.) Decne.
Cercis canadensis L.
Cypripedium passerinum Richardson
Baileya pauciradiata Harv. & Gray ex A.Gray
Viola purpurea var. aurea (Kellogg) M.S.Baker ex Jeps.
Fumaria capreolata subsp. babingtonii (Pugsley) Sell
Rhus virens Lindh. ex Gray
Scutellaria potosina Brandegee
Cuscuta approximata Bab.
Verbena bracteata Cav. ex Lag. & Rodr.
Hackelia californica (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Sabulina douglasii (Fenzl ex Torr. & A.Gray) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides Nutt.
Centaurea stoebe L.
Phyllodoce glanduliflora (Hook.) Coville
Iris hartwegii subsp. australis (Parish) L.W.Lenz
Eucnide cordata (Kellogg) Kellogg ex Curran
Erythronium multiscapideum (Kellogg) A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Desmanthus covillei (Britton & Rose) Wiggins
Lupinus arbustus Douglas
Malaxis corymbosa (S.Watson) Kuntze
Ferocactus emoryi subsp. emoryi
Forestiera pubescens Nutt.
Flourensia cernua DC.
Trifolium incarnatum L.
Populus mexicana subsp. dimorpha (Brandegee) Eckenw.
Grindelia hallii Steyerm. ex Rothrock
Nemacladus orientalis (McVaugh) Morin
Pickeringia montana var. montana
Glossopetalon spinescens Gray
Primula parryi A.Gray
Ceanothus sanguineus Pursh
Persicaria capitata (Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don) H.Gross
Anemonoides blanda (Schott & Kotschy) Holub
Lysimachia punctata L.
Salix petrophila Rydb.
Sibara filifolia (Greene) Greene
Orthocarpus imbricatus Torr. ex S.Watson
Navarretia atractyloides (Benth.) Hook. & Arn.
Polygonum douglasii Greene
Plagiobothrys scouleri (Hook. & Arn.) I.M.Johnst.
Lotus tenuis Waldst. & Kit. ex Willd.
Collinsia multicolor Lindl. & Paxton
Gilia clivorum (Jeps.) V.E.Grant
Encelia actonii Elmer
Ribes hudsonianum Richardson
Pedicularis contorta Benth.
Linaria dalmatica subsp. dalmatica
Sparganium angustifolium Michx.
Zinnia acerosa (DC.) A.Gray
Smilax californica (A.DC.) A.Gray
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. purpureum (Nutt.) Durand
Lomatium foeniculaceum subsp. fimbriatum W.L.Theob.
Claytonia washingtoniana (Suksd.) Suksd.
Cirsium occidentale var. venustum (Greene) Jeps.
Aquilegia chrysantha A.Gray
Anisacanthus thurberi (Torr.) Gray
Darmera peltata (Torr. ex Benth.) Voss
Arctostaphylos rudis Jeps. & Wiesl.
Collomia diversifolia Greene
Perideridia gairdneri (Hook. & Arn.) Mathias
Cyclachaena xanthiifolia (Nutt.) Fresen.
Lepidium flavum var. felipense C.L.Hitchc.
Layia Hook. & Arn.
Koeleria macrantha (Ledeb.) Schult.
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. fasciculatum
Dipterostemon capitatus subsp. lacuna-vernalis (L.W.Lenz) R.E.Preston
Juncus effusus subsp. effusus
Viola odorata L.
Eriogonum saxatile S.Watson
Lomatium macrocarpum (Hook. & Arn.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Sesuvium verrucosum Raf.
Lupinus constancei T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Delphinium californicum subsp. interius (Eastw.) Ewan
Mentzelia reflexa Coville
Lupinus densiflorus Benth.
Alchemilla L.
Filago arvensis L.
Taeniatherum caput-medusae (L.) Nevski
Brandegea bigelovii (S.Watson) Cogn.
Diplacus jepsonii (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Eriastrum eremicum (Jeps.) Mason
Navarretia pubescens (Benth.) Hook. & Arn.
Mitella caulescens Nutt.
Lysimachia maritima (L.) Galasso, Banfi & Soldano
Tragia ramosa Torr.
Astragalus pachypus var. pachypus
Penstemon deustus var. pedicellatus M.E.Jones
Nolina brandegeei (Trel.) L.Hern.
Bassia hyssopifolia (Pall.) Kuntze
Cirsium quercetorum (A.Gray) Jeps.
Stachys chamissonis var. cooleyae (A.Heller) G.A.Mulligan & D.B.Munro
Chrysolepis chrysophylla var. minor (Benth.) Munz
Melica frutescens Scribn.
Euphorbia arizonica Engelm.
Vachellia constricta (Benth.) Seigler & Ebinger
Convolvulus equitans Benth.
Brickellia atractyloides var. arguta (B.L.Rob.) Jeps.
Astragalus crotalariae (Benth.) A.Gray
Diplacus kelloggii (Curran ex Greene) G.L.Nesom
Stanleya elata M.E.Jones
Fendlera rupicola A.Gray
Perityle microglossa Benth.
Chorizanthe fimbriata Nutt.
Brickellia coulteri A.Gray
Trichostema parishii Vasey
Phalaris minor Retz.
Castilleja parviflora Bong.
Escobaria missouriensis subsp. missouriensis
Dicentra pauciflora S.Watson
Euphorbia hyssopifolia L.
Allionia incarnata var. villosa (Standl.) Munz
Eustoma exaltatum (L.) Salisb.
Senna artemisioides (Gaudich. ex DC.) Randell
Diplotaxis muralis (L.) DC.
Platanthera stricta Lindl.
Mirabilis multiflora var. pubescens S.Watson
Erythranthe diffusa (A.L.Grant) N.S.Fraga
Ranunculus uncinatus D.Don ex G.Don
Milla biflora Cav.
Barbarea vulgaris (L.) W.T.Aiton
Deinandra clementina (Brandegee) B.G.Baldwin
Echinocereus maritimus subsp. maritimus
Polemonium viscosum Nutt.
Spermolepis lateriflora G.L.Nesom
Cornus canadensis L.
Atriplex julacea S.Watson
Passiflora foetida L.
Suaeda nigra (Raf.) J.F.Macbr.
Lewisia triphylla (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Eriastrum sparsiflorum (Eastw.) Mason
Malacothrix incana (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Arctium L.
Dudleya densiflora (Rose) Moran
Calystegia subacaulis subsp. subacaulis
Kopsiopsis strobilacea (A.Gray) Beck
Prunus avium (L.) L.
Nicotiana clevelandii A.Gray
Thermopsis californica S.Watson
Crataegus douglasii Lindl.
Calystegia occidentalis subsp. fulcrata (A.Gray) Brummitt
Myrrhis odorata (L.) Scop.
Clarkia mildrediae subsp. mildrediae
Helianthus niveus (Benth.) Brandegee
Greeneocharis circumscissa (Hook. & Arn.) Rydb.
Eriocoma parishii (Vasey) Romasch.
Ceanothus crassifolius var. crassifolius
Ranunculus californicus var. californicus
Sphaeralcea munroana (Douglas ex Lindl.) Spach
Taraxacum erythrospermum Andrz. ex Besser
Crepis capillaris (L.) Wallr.
Sorbus scopulina Greene
Cymopterus longipes S.Watson
Castilleja applegatei var. pinetorum (Fernald) Holmgren
Spiraea splendens var. splendens
Platanthera elegans Lindl.
Plagiobothrys nothofulvus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Clarkia pulchella Pursh
Maytenus boaria Molina
Muhlenbergia porteri Scribn.
Cylindropuntia imbricata (Haw.) F.M.Knuth
Lomatium klickitatense J.A.Alexander & Whaley
Lysimachia monellii (L.) U.Manns & Anderb.
Lasthenia californica DC. ex Lindl.
Mohavea breviflora Coville
Downingia pulchella (Lindl.) Torr.
Pseudognaphalium canescens (DC.) Anderb.
Viola macloskeyi F.E.Lloyd
Fragaria cascadensis K.E.Hummer
Bacopa monnieri (L.) Pennell
Alisma lanceolatum With.
Baccharis salicina Torr. & A.Gray
Downingia concolor Greene
Oenothera elata subsp. hookeri (Torr. & A.Gray) W.Dietr. & W.L.Wagner
Acmispon brachycarpus (Benth.) D.D.Sokoloff
Vitis arizonica Engelm.
Medicago arabica (L.) Huds.
Melia azedarach L.
Montia chamissoi (Ledeb. ex Spreng.) Greene
Monolopia congdonii (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Erigeron reductus var. angustatus (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Descurainia sophia (L.) Webb ex Prantl
Erigeron coulteri Porter & Coult.
Chionophila tweedyi (Canby & Rose) Hend.
Datura discolor Bernh.
Cyperus brevifolius (Rottb.) Hassk.
Leucothoe davisiae Torr. ex A.Gray
Rainiera stricta (Greene) Greene
Trifolium oliganthum Steud.
Vachellia pacensis (Rudd & A.M.Carter) Seigler & Ebinger
Angelica hendersonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Mirabilis laevis var. villosa (Kellogg) Spellenb.
Pediomelum castoreum (S.Watson) Rydb.
Rubus idaeus L.
Psittacanthus sonorae (Watson) Kuijt
Cuscuta psorothamnensis Stefanovic, M.A.García & Costea
Juncus acutus subsp. leopoldi (Parl.) Snogerup
Rhus typhina L.
Hulsea vestita subsp. vestita
Chamaesaracha coronopus (Dunal) A.Gray
Aloe arborescens Mill.
Stachys byzantina K.Koch
Erythranthe nasuta (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Viola adunca var. adunca
Tetradymia comosa A.Gray
Lathyrus polyphyllus Nutt.
Delphinium parishii A.Gray
Melinis repens (Willd.) Zizka
Saxifraga oppositifolia L.
Tetradymia canescens DC.
Layia heterotricha (DC.) Hook. & Arn.
Lappula occidentalis (S.Watson) Greene
Navarretia leptalea subsp. bicolor (H.Mason & A.D.Grant) L.A.Johnson
Symphyotrichum subulatum (Michx.) G.L.Nesom
Langloisia setosissima subsp. punctata (Coville) Timbrook
Calochortus invenustus Greene
Anulocaulis annulatus (Coville) Standl.
Desmanthus cooleyi (Eaton) Trel. ex Branner & Coville
Erythranthe suksdorfii (A.Gray) N.S.Fraga
Hosackia gracilis Benth.
Quercus wislizeni var. frutescens Engelm.
Calypso bulbosa (L.) Oakes
Astragalus purshii var. purshii
Cressa truxillensis Kunth
Peniocereus greggii (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Hemizonia congesta subsp. lutescens (Greene) Babc. & H.M.Hall
Lomatium dasycarpum subsp. dasycarpum
Artemisia absinthium L.
Sium suave Walter
Cuscuta indecora Choisy
Verbena menthifolia Benth.
Conoclinium dissectum A.Gray
Fremontodendron californicum (Torr.) Coult.
Abronia umbellata var. umbellata
Eriastrum virgatum (Benth.) Mason
Logfia filaginoides (Hook. & Arn.) Morefield
Trifolium angustifolium L.
Vaccinium myrtilloides Michx.
Leymus triticoides (Buckley) Pilg.
Calochortus umpquaensis Fredricks
Ranunculus orthorhynchus Hook.
Holodiscus dumosus (Nutt.) A.Heller
Echinocereus llanurensis (Rutow) W.Blum & D.Felix, 2002
Cassiope mertensiana (Bong.) D.Don
Iris tenuissima subsp. purdyiformis (R.C.Foster) L.W.Lenz
Tauschia parishii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.F.Macbr.
Rosa gymnocarpa var. gymnocarpa
Tradescantia fluminensis Vell.
Fraxinus dipetala Hook. & Arn.
Senecio hydrophiloides Rydb.
Trichophorum cespitosum (L.) Hartm.
Mesembryanthemum cordifolium L.fil.
Feijoa sellowiana (O.Berg) O.Berg
Ericameria arborescens (A.Gray) Greene
Malacothamnus foliosus (S.Watson) Kearney
Dichondra occidentalis House
Penstemon linarioides A.Gray
Festuca californica Vasey
Hesperocnide tenella Torr.
Carex comosa Boott
Aristida purpurea Nutt.
Plagiobothrys acanthocarpus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Mimosa distachya Cav.
Euonymus occidentalis Nutt. ex Torr.
Erythronium grandiflorum subsp. grandiflorum
Packera multilobata (Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Spiraea betulifolia var. lucida (Douglas ex Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Phlox speciosa Pursh
Lupinus oreganus A.Heller
Rumex conglomeratus Murray
Anthemis cotula L.
Ipomoea indica (Burm.) Merr.
Eriogonum gracile Benth.
Eriogonum rosense var. rosense
Iliamna rivularis (Douglas ex Hook.) Greene
Cercocarpus minutiflorus Abrams
Gazania linearis (Thunb.) Druce
Crepis acuminata Nutt.
Quercus emoryi Torr.
Dudleya formosa Moran
Hulsea algida A.Gray
Malva neglecta Wallr.
Alcea rosea L.
Papaver orientale L.
Aquilegia jonesii Parry
Sisyrinchium montanum Greene
Carex aperta Boott
Androstephium breviflorum S.Watson
Salvia funerea M.E.Jones
Eremocarya micrantha (Torr.) Greene
Melica californica Scribn.
Silene dioica (L.) Clairv.
Agnorhiza ovata (Torr. & A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Dudleya acuminata Rose ex Britton & Rose
Hoita macrostachya (DC.) Rydb.
Calochortus howellii S.Watson
Juncus ensifolius Wikstr.
Viola arvensis Murray
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. niger (Greene) Al-Shehbaz, M.S.Mayer & D.W.Taylor
Ceanothus spinosus Nutt.
Russelia equisetiformis Schltdl. & Cham.
Saponaria officinalis L.
Delphinium parishii subsp. parishii
Ericameria palmeri (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Securigera varia (L.) Lassen
Angelica arguta Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray
Glandularia pubera (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Luina hypoleuca Benth.
Allium crenulatum Wiegand
Halogeton glomeratus (Stephan ex M.Bieb.) C.A.Mey.
Erica lusitanica Rudolphi
Brodiaea orcuttii (Greene) Baker
Scoliopus hallii S.Watson
Eriogonum umbellatum var. majus Hook.
Polygala alba Nutt.
Camassia leichtlinii subsp. suksdorfii (Greenm.) Gould
Astragalus lentiginosus var. piscinensis Barneby
Nothochelone nemorosa (Douglas ex Lindl.) Straw
Herissantia crispa (L.) Brizicky
Cornus sericea subsp. occidentalis (Torr. & A.Gray) Fosberg
Oxalis purpurea L.
Carduus tenuiflorus Curtis
Rhus trilobata Nutt.
Spiranthes diluvialis Sheviak
Curio talinoides var. mandraliscae (Tineo) P.V.Heath
Stachys chamissonis Benth.
Astragalus coccineus (Parry) Brandegee
Rumex venosus Pursh
Tigridia pavonia (L.f.) Redouté
Koeberlinia spinosa Zucc.
Pectocarya anisocarpa Veno
Echinocereus canyonensis Clover & Jotter
Valerianella locusta (L.) Laterr.
Drosanthemum floribundum (Haw.) Schwantes
Parietaria hespera var. hespera
Tolpis barbata (L.) Gaertn.
Ceanothus fendleri A.Gray
Diplacus mephiticus (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Veronica copelandii Eastw.
Penstemon spectabilis var. spectabilis
Downingia concolor subsp. brevior (McVaugh) R.M.Beauch.
Liatris punctata Hook.
Holosteum umbellatum L.
Oenothera deltoides subsp. howellii (Munz) W.M.Klein
Lupinus L.
Claytonia parviflora subsp. parviflora
Micranthes integrifolia (Hook.) Small
Phleum pratense L.
Tetraneuris acaulis (Pursh) Greene
Eriogonum niveum Douglas ex Benth.
Cylindropuntia bigelovii subsp. bigelovii
Marah gilensis (Greene) Greene
Myrtillocactus cochal Britton & Rose
Baileya pleniradiata Harv. & A.Gray
Vaccinium cespitosum Michx.
Dichelostemma volubile (Kellogg) A.Heller
Asclepias solanoana Woodson
Gambelia speciosa Nutt.
Dudleya saxosa subsp. saxosa
Erysimum ammophilum A.Heller
Angelica lucida L.
Astragalus oxyphysus A.Gray
Erysimum concinnum Eastw.
Cirsium eatonii (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Amorpha fruticosa L.
Ipomoea hederacea Jacq.
Aphyllon parishii subsp. brachylobum (Heckard) A.C.Schneid.
Opuntia engelmannii var. engelmannii
Leymus cinereus (Scribn. & Merr.) Á.Löve
Blepharipappus scaber Hook.
Quercus rubra L.
Agoseris heterophylla (Nutt.) Greene
Astragalus bicristatus A.Gray
Tetradymia axillaris A.Nelson
Symphoricarpos longiflorus A.Gray
Dudleya Britton & Rose
Arctostaphylos pringlei subsp. pringlei
Eriogonum davidsonii Greene
Xanthisma spinulosum (Pursh) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Layia chrysanthemoides (DC.) A.Gray
Yucca capensis L.W.Lenz
Sidalcea candida A.Gray
Leptosiphon floribundum (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Lilium kelleyanum Lemmon
Cistanthe ambigua (S.Watson) Carolin ex Hershk.
Phytolacca heterotepala H.Walter
Leptosiphon nuttallii subsp. pubescens (R.Patt.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Eriogonum scalare S.Watson
Heuchera sanguinea Engelm.
Deinandra corymbosa (DC.) B.G.Baldwin
Ceanothus megacarpus var. insularis (Eastw.) Munz
Oenothera pallida Lindl.
Castilleja nana Eastw.
Allium fimbriatum var. fimbriatum
Xylorhiza cognata (H.M.Hall) T.J.Watson
Ambrosia eriocentra (A.Gray) Payne
Boechera lyallii (S.Watson) Dorn
Limonium otolepis (Schrenk) Kuntze
Fimbristylis thermalis S.Watson
Trifolium macrocephalum (Pursh) Poir.
Hosackia rosea Eastw.
Atriplex coulteri (Moq.) D.Dietr.
Cistanthe maritima (Nutt.) Carolin ex Hershk.
Nemacladus californicus (A.Gray) Morin
Rapistrum rugosum (L.) All.
Cacaliopsis nardosmia (A.Gray) A.Gray
Aquilegia eximia Van Houtte ex Planch.
Streptanthus hesperidis Jeps.
Euphorbia marginata Pursh
Chamaenerion latifolium (L.) Sweet
Stephanomeria exigua subsp. deanei (J.F.Macbr.) Gottlieb
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. cyclostegia (House) Brummitt
Erigeron karvinskianus DC.
Frangula californica subsp. tomentella (Benth.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Montia linearis (Douglas ex Hook.) Greene
Dianthus armeria L.
Penstemon procerus Douglas ex Graham
Echinocereus nicholii (L.D.Benson) B.D.Parfitt
Harfordia macroptera Greene & Parry
Astragalus pycnostachyus A.Gray
Dudleya verityi K.M.Nakai
Cirsium arizonicum var. bipinnatum (Eastw.) D.J.Keil
Abutilon incanum (Link) Sweet
Nemacladus longiflorus A.Gray
Physaria didymocarpa (Hook.) A.Gray
Astragalus kentrophyta A.Gray
Ipomoea arborescens (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) G.Don
Euphorbia pediculifera Engelm.
Opuntia oricola Philbrick
Sphaeralcea coccinea (Nutt.) Rydb.
Vancouveria planipetala Calloni
Lupinus excubitus subsp. austromontanus (A.Heller) R.M.Beauch.
Anthriscus sylvestris (L.) Hoffm.
Festuca microstachys Nutt.
Petalonyx parryi Gray
Eriogonum reniforme Torr. & Frém.
Viburnum ellipticum Hook.
Rosa acicularis Lindl.
Monardella hypoleuca subsp. hypoleuca
Hordeum jubatum L.
Eriogonum wrightii Torr. ex Benth.
Pentaglottis sempervirens (L.) L.H.Bailey
Acer glabrum var. douglasii (Hook.) Dippel
Penstemon euglaucus English
Pittosporum tenuifolium Gaertn.
Silene cserei Baumg.
Pectis papposa var. papposa
Draba densifolia Nutt.
Parkinsonia praecox (Ruiz & Pav.) Hawkins
Arabis aculeolata Greene
Styrax redivivus (Torr.) Wheeler
Sedum acre L.
Ambrosia ilicifolia (A.Gray) Payne
Eriogonum pusillum Torr. & A.Gray
Morus alba L.
Penstemon kingii S.Watson
Clematis hirsutissima Pursh
Scutellaria tuberosa Benth.
Ericameria bloomeri (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Marina parryi (Torr. & A.Gray) Barneby
Carex mertensii J.D.Prescott ex Bong.
Blitum nuttallianum Roem. & Schult.
Galium trifidum L.
Allium neapolitanum Cirillo
Asparagus asparagoides (L.) Druce
Amaranthus deflexus L.
Mertensia longiflora Greene
Echinocereus yavapaiensis M.A.Baker
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus (Hook.) Nutt.
Bidens pilosa L.
Bulbine frutescens (L.) Willd.
Cylindropuntia ×multigeniculata (Clokey) Backeb.
Amblyopappus pusillus Hook. & Arn.
Pseudognaphalium macounii (Greene) Kartesz
Collinsia concolor Greene
Dieteria asteroides Torr.
Euphorbia fendleri Torr. & A.Gray
Platanthera dilatata var. dilatata
Aphanes L.
Clematis pauciflora Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Scilla siberica Andrews
Packera breweri (Burtt Davy) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Bouteloua aristidoides var. aristidoides
Helianthella californica A.Gray
Senna phyllodinea (R.Br.) Symon
Gutierrezia microcephala (DC.) A.Gray
Dudleya cultrata Rose ex Britton & Rose
Allium amplectens Torr.
Cryptantha intermedia var. intermedia
Mertensia arizonica Greene
Rafinesquia californica Nutt.
Juncus chlorocephalus Engelm.
Saltugilia splendens subsp. splendens
Melaleuca L.
Brickellia longifolia S.Watson
Hesperolinon congestum (A.Gray) Small
Bernardia incana C.V.Morton, 1939
Eriophyllum lanatum var. leucophyllum (DC.) W.R.Carter
Gilia sinuata Douglas ex Benth.
Doronicum pardalianches L.
Brassica oleracea L.
Vitis vinifera L.
Clarkia epilobioides (Nutt.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Astragalus gilviflorus E.Sheld.
Lomatium multifidum (Nutt.) R.P.Mc Neill & Darrach
Geranium bicknellii Britton
Ceanothus thyrsiflorus var. thyrsiflorus
Juncus acutus L.
Cordylanthus wrightii A.Gray
Oxytropis sericea Nutt.
Mitella pentandra Hook.
Evolvulus arizonicus A.Gray
Cardamine oligosperma Nutt.
Erythranthe androsacea (Curran ex Greene) N.S.Fraga
Nemacladus secundiflorus var. robbinsii Morin
Potentilla concinna Richardson
Bistorta vivipara (L.) Delarbre
Sedum cockerellii Britton
Epilobium obcordatum A.Gray
Tiarella trifoliata var. laciniata (Hook.) Wheelock
Geum calthifolium Menzies ex Sm.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. borreganus M.E.Jones
Fritillaria pluriflora Torr. ex Benth.
Vaccinium membranaceum Douglas ex Hook.
Ageratina occidentalis (Hook.) R.King & H.Rob.
Penstemon grinnellii var. grinnellii
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. montana (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) V.E.Grant
Funastrum crispum (Benth.) Schltr.
Arctostaphylos pechoensis (Abrams) Dudley
Encelia frutescens var. frutescens
Geranium Tourn. ex L.
Tonella tenella (Benth.) Jeps.
Eriogonum maculatum A.Heller
Lessingia leptoclada A.Gray
Ericameria cuneata (A.Gray) Mc Clatchie
Cordylanthus rigidus subsp. rigidus
Pericome caudata A.Gray
Yucca baccata var. brevifolia L.D.Benson & Darrow
Sporobolus airoides (Torr.) Torr.
Oxalis laxa Hook. & Arn.
Nolina interrata Gentry
Dudleya albiflora Rose ex Britton & Rose
Malvaviscus arboreus Cav.
Hymenothrix dissecta (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Camissoniopsis cheiranthifolia subsp. suffruticosa (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Fritillaria glauca Greene
Nemacladus sigmoideus G.T.Robbins
Prenanthella exigua (A.Gray) Rydb.
Ceanothus tomentosus var. olivaceus Jeps.
Clinopodium chandleri (Brandegee) P.D.Cantino & Wagstaff
Senecio linearifolius A.Rich.
Cylindropuntia fulgida var. fulgida
Arctostaphylos Adans.
Agave simplex (Gentry) Salywon & W.C.Hodgs.
Lupinus variicolor Steud.
Carex pendula Huds.
Rubus vestitus Weihe & Nees
Amaranthus fimbriatus (Torr.) Benth. ex S.Watson
Cryptantha pterocarya (Torr.) Greene
Sida abutifolia Mill.
Campanula scouleri Hook. ex A.DC.
Perityle crassifolia Brandegee
Nicotiana attenuata Torr. ex S.Watson
Acanthus mollis L.
Eriogonum grande var. rubescens (Greene) Munz
Eucephalus paucicapitatus (B.L.Rob.) Greene
Asclepias tuberosa L.
Saxifraga cespitosa L.
Gilia achilleifolia Benth.
Eriogonum deflexum Torr.
Quercus morehus Kellogg
Eriogonum gracilipes S.Watson
Platanthera yadonii (Rand.Morgan & Ackerman) R.M.Bateman
Salix lasiandra var. lasiandra
Trifolium campestre Schreb.
Rorippa curvisiliqua (Hook.) Bessey ex Britton
Amaranthus blitoides S.Watson
Lithophragma maxima Bacig.
Eriogonum angulosum Benth.
Collinsia sparsiflora var. sparsiflora
Lactuca virosa L.
Echium pininana Webb & Berthel.
Hippuris montana Ledeb. ex Rchb.
Nothocalais troximoides (A.Gray) Greene
Bursera fagaroides (Kunth) Engl.
Vicia ludoviciana Nutt.
Pedicularis semibarbata A.Gray
Paspalum dilatatum Poir.
Lupinus shockleyi S.Watson
Cicuta douglasii (DC.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Jensia rammii (Greene) B.G.Baldwin
Triteleia ixioides subsp. anilina (Greene) L.W.Lenz
Achillea filipendulina Lam.
Isolepis cernua (Vahl) Roem. & Schult.
Cirsium brevistylum Cronquist
Streptanthus cordatus Nutt.
Leptosiphon chrysanthus subsp. chrysanthus
Lamium maculatum (L.) L.
Artemisia michauxiana Besser
Quercus agrifolia var. agrifolia
Lupinus littoralis Douglas ex Lindl.
Lewisia cotyledon var. howellii (S.Watson) Jeps.
Malva assurgentiflora (Kellogg) M.F.Ray
Malacothamnus davidsonii (B.L.Rob.) Greene
Sclerocactus parviflorus Clover & Jotter
Gentiana newberryi A.Gray
Eriogonum fastigiatum Parry
Penstemon californicus (Munz & L M.Johnst.) D.D.Keck
Physaria chambersii Rollins
Rubus lasiococcus A.Gray
Trifolium striatum L.
Malacothamnus gracilis (Eastw.) Kearney
Ledebouria socialis (Baker) Jessop
Reseda luteola L.
Solidago multiradiata Aiton
Malacothamnus marrubioides (Durand & Hilg.) Greene
Hulsea mexicana Rydb.
Rubus chamaemorus L.
Lysimachia ciliata L.
Chorizanthe douglasii Benth.
Eriobotrya japonica (Thunb.) Lindl.
Madia elegans subsp. vernalis D.D.Keck
Viburnum plicatum Thunb.
Clarkia delicata (Abrams) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Polanisia dodecandra (L.) DC.
Clarkia williamsonii (Durand & Hilg.) H. & Lewis
Layia hieracioides (DC.) Hook. & Arn.
Sonchus arvensis L.
Fraxinus pennsylvanica Marshall
Kerria japonica (L.) DC.
Ivesia tweedyi Rydb.
Tetracoccus hallii Brandegee
Opuntia ×columbiana Griffiths
Veronica filiformis Sm.
Sanicula laciniata Hook. & Arn.
Eryngium aristulatum var. aristulatum
Astragalus humistratus A.Gray
Lathyrus littoralis (Nutt.) Endl. ex Walp.
Sabulina nuttallii var. gracilis (B.L.Rob.) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Keckiella corymbosa (Benth.) Straw
Primula conjugens var. viscida (Piper) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Musineon divaricatum (Pursh) Nutt.
Saxifraga bronchialis subsp. vespertina (Small) Piper
Galinsoga quadriradiata Ruiz & Pav.
Horkelia cuneata Lindl.
Ferocactus diguetii subsp. diguetii
Tauschia hartwegii (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. manzanita
Carex obispoensis Stacey
Thelypodium integrifolium (Nutt.) Endl.
Navarretia leucocephala subsp. bakeri (H.Mason) A.G.Day
Linanthus bellus (A.Gray) Greene
Carex densa (L.H.Bailey) L.H.Bailey
Echium vulgare L.
Cannabis sativa L.
Bahiopsis reticulata (S.Watson) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Veronica chamaedrys L.
Ipomopsis tenuituba (Rydb.) V.E.Grant
Chorizanthe brevicornu var. spathulata (Small ex Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium pinnatifidum Ledeb.
Quercus havardii Rydb.
Poa fendleriana (Steud.) Vasey
Myriophyllum spicatum L.
Pithecellobium dulce (Roxb.) Benth.
Quercus sadleriana R.Br.ter
Ivesia lycopodioides Gray
Petrosedum forsterianum (Sm.) Grulich
Talinum paniculatum (Jacq.) Gaertn.
Vicia americana subsp. americana
Lupinus brevicaulis S.Watson
Cirsium fontinale var. obispoense J.T.Howell
Laennecia coulteri (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Leptochloa dubia (Kunth) Nees
Alyssum desertorum Stapf
Calypso Salisb.
Arctostaphylos montana Eastw.
Rubus rolfei Vidal
Hemizonella minima (A.Gray) A.Gray
Narcissus poeticus L.
Galium porrigens Dempster
Gastridium phleoides (Nees & Meyen) C.E.Hubb.
Thermopsis montana Nutt.
Desmodium batocaulon A.Gray
Ipomopsis thurberi (Torr. ex Gray) V.E.Grant
Lygodesmia juncea (Pursh) D.Don ex Hook.
Sphaeralcea ambigua var. ambigua
Monardella australis subsp. australis
Dieteria canescens var. canescens
Trifolium fragiferum L.
Cylindropuntia leptocaulis (DC.) F.M.Knuth
Yabea microcarpa (Hook. & Arn.) Koso-Pol.
Leucojum aestivum L.
Crassula multicava subsp. multicava
Hordeum vulgare L.
Scutellaria lateriflora L.
Malacothrix saxatilis var. implicata (Eastw.) H.M.Hall
Holodiscus discolor var. microphyllus (Rydb.) Jeps.
Salix taxifolia Kunth
Acacia verticillata (L'Hér.) Willd.
Arctostaphylos sensitiva Jeps.
Dryopetalon runcinatum A.Gray
Lotus pedunculatus Cav.
Argemone ochroleuca Sweet
Linum perenne L.
Acmispon decumbens var. davidsonii (Greene) Govaerts
Penstemon pachyphyllus A.Gray ex Rydb.
Penstemon rydbergii A.Nelson
Penstemon cyananthus Hook.
Carex senta Boott
Calyptocarpus vialis Less.
Acmispon maritimus var. brevivexillus (Ottley) Brouillet
Dichelostemma ida-maia (Alph.Wood) Greene
Lathyrus sphaericus Retz.
Sphaeralcea fendleri var. venusta (Kearney) Kearney
Jacquemontia pringlei A.Gray
Erodium texanum A.Gray
Saltugilia australis (H.Mason & A.D.Grant) L.A.Johnson
Ligustrum vulgare L.
Vaccinium scoparium Leiberg
Stephanomeria diegensis Gottlieb
Aconitum delphiniifolium Hort.Prag. ex Steud.
Eriogonum alatum Torr.
Acamptopappus sphaerocephalus (Harv. & Gray) A.Gray
Stenotus acaulis (Nutt.) Nutt.
Cosmos parviflorus (Jacq.) Pers.
Diospyros intricata (A.Gray) Standl.
Astragalus douglasii (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Crepis bursifolia L.
Allium cratericola Eastw.
Downingia bella Hoover
Brodiaea leptandra (Greene) Baker
Crassula multicava Lem.
Lupinus longifolius (S.Watson) Abrams
Spiranthes porrifolia Lindl.
Pelargonium peltatum (L.) L'Hér.
Camissonia contorta (Douglas) Kearney
Gomphocarpus physocarpus E.Mey.
Dryas hookeriana Juz.
Cistus salviifolius L.
Linum grandiflorum Desf.
Calystegia subacaulis Hook. & Arn.
Ericameria cuneata var. macrocephala Urbatsch
Honckenya peploides (L.) Ehrh.
Prunus lusitanica L.
Euphorbia indivisa (Engelm.) Tidestr.
Cylindropuntia alcahes (F.A.C.Weber) F.M.Knuth
Aquilegia pubescens Coville
Fouquieria columnaris Kellogg ex Curran
Sidalcea oregana (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Gray
Oxalis trilliifolia Hook.
Rumex salicifolius Weinm.
Agonis flexuosa (Muhl. ex Willd.) Sweet
Triteleia montana Hoover
Phoenix dactylifera L.
Polemonium occidentale Greene
Hydrocotyle umbellata L.
Arenaria paludicola Rob.
Ericameria parryi var. aspera (Greene) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Astragalus amphioxys var. vespertinus (E.Sheld.) M.E.Jones
Leucophyllum frutescens (Berl.) I.M.Johnst.
Silene flos-cuculi (L.) Greuter & Burdet
Dodonaea viscosa (L.) Jacq.
Euphorbia eriantha Benth.
Hosackia pinnata (Hook.) Abrams
Monarda citriodora var. austromontana (Epling) B.L.Turner
Papaver somniferum L.
Delphinium menziesii DC.
Lysimachia thyrsiflora L.
Daphne mezereum L.
Clematis ligusticifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Cylindropuntia chuckwallensis M.A.Baker & Cloud-H.
Madia glomerata Hook.
Verbena macdougalii A.Heller
Ranunculus lobbii (Hiern) A.Gray
Astragalus bernardinus M.E.Jones
Eriogonum thurberi Torr.
Lewisia leeana (Porter) B.L.Rob.
Nemacladus rubescens Greene
Lupinus argenteus var. palmeri (S.Watson) Barneby
Sanicula graveolens Poepp. ex DC.
Sedum hispanicum L.
Malacothrix floccifera (DC.) S.F.Blake
Asparagus aethiopicus L.
Eremothera refracta (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Artemisia suksdorfii Piper
Sanvitalia abertii A.Gray
Castilleja nelsonii Eastw.
Tulipa bifloriformis Vved.
Carpobrotus edulis subsp. edulis
Ipomopsis tenuifolia (A.Gray) V.E.Grant
Cercocarpus betuloides var. blancheae (C.K.Schneid.) Little
Pedicularis dudleyi Elmer
Trifolium Tourn. ex L.
Symphyotrichum ericoides (L.) G.L.Nesom
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. albidus (Greene) Al-Shehbaz, M.S.Mayer & D.W.Taylor
Hedera colchica (K.Koch) K.Koch
Rosa rubiginosa L.
Eremothera chamaenerioides (A.Gray) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Pistia stratiotes L.
Fritillaria biflora var. biflora
Schoenoplectus acutus var. occidentalis (S.Watson) S.G.Sm.
Linanthus watsonii (A.Gray) Wherry
Datura stramonium L.
Trifolium productum Greene
Opuntia robusta H.L.Wendl.
Hymenoxys hoopesii (A.Gray) Bierner
Mammillaria brandegeei subsp. gabbii (J.M.Coult.) D.R.Hunt
Clarkia modesta Jeps.
Spergularia macrotheca (Hornem. ex Cham. & Schltdl.) Heynh.
Opuntia basilaris var. brachyclada (Griffiths) Munz
Calystegia malacophylla (Greene) Munz
Trautvetteria caroliniensis (Walter) Vail
Oenothera lindheimeri (Engelm. & A.Gray) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Sphaeralcea coccinea var. coccinea
Cortaderia jubata (Lemoine) Stapf
Hesperevax sparsiflora (A.Gray) Greene
Viola sheltonii Torr.
Mertensia oblongifolia (Nutt.) G.Don
Horkelia marinensis (Elmer) Crum ex D.D.Keck
Encelia resinifera C.Clark
Calystegia collina subsp. venusta Brummitt
Osmorhiza occidentalis (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) Torr.
Silene laciniata subsp. laciniata
Coriandrum sativum L.
Myosotis asiatica (Vestergr.) Schischk. & Serg.
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. albula (Wooton) D.D.Keck
Lysimachia arvensis var. caerulea (L.) Turland & Bergmeier
Castilleja affinis var. affinis
Apiastrum angustifolium Nutt.
Platanthera dilatata var. albiflora (Cham.) Ledeb.
Diplacus fremontii (Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Arctostaphylos edmundsii Howell
Cylindropuntia fulgida var. mamillata (Schott) Backeb.
Atrichoseris platyphylla (A.Gray) A.Gray
Cirsium fontinale (Greene) Jeps.
Festuca rubra L.
Oreocarya flavoculata A.Nelson
Thymophylla acerosa (DC.) Strother
Downingia cuspidata (Greene) Rattan
Perityle crassifolia var. robusta (Rydb.) Everly
Eschscholzia ramosa (Greene) Greene
Bromus madritensis L.
Juncus amuricus (Maxim.) V.I.Krecz. & Gontsch.
Euphorbia glyptosperma Engelm.
Asparagus setaceus (Kunth) Jessop
Armeria maritima subsp. californica (Boiss.) A.E.Porsild
Petalonyx nitidus S.Watson
Leptosiphon chrysanthus subsp. decorus (A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Prosopis pubescens Benth.
Enceliopsis nudicaulis var. corrugata Cronquist
Astragalus calycosus var. calycosus
Calystegia sepium (L.) R.Br.
Pittosporum eugenioides A.Cunn.
Thysanocarpus curvipes subsp. curvipes
Sisyrinchium demissum Greene
Brachypodium sylvaticum (Huds.) P.Beauv.
Lilium rubescens S.Watson
Polemonium elegans Greene
Boechera parishii (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. glandulosa
Rosa minutifolia Parry
Camassia quamash subsp. maxima Gould
Arctostaphylos montaraensis Roof
Dudleya virens subsp. insularis (Rose) Moran
Downingia pusilla (G.Don ex A.DC.) Torr.
Townsendia exscapa (Richards.) Porter
Artemisia tripartita Rydb.
Abronia fragrans Nutt. ex Hook.
Ribes pinetorum Greene
Argemone pleiacantha Greene
Euphorbia ocellata subsp. arenicola (Parish) Oudejans
Erigeron caespitosus Nutt.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. nigricalycis M.E.Jones
Tecoma stans (L.) Juss. ex Kunth
Delphinium bicolor Nutt.
Campanula persicifolia L.
Rhus L.
Mirabilis alipes (S.Watson) Pilz
Packera clevelandii (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Pseudostellaria jamesiana (Torr.) W.A.Weber & R.L.Hartm.
Ericameria parishii var. parishii
Pistacia chinensis Bunge
Ambrosia carduacea (Greene) Payne
Penstemon cardwellii Howell
Pseudoroegneria spicata (Pursh) Á.Löve
Lemna minor L.
Solidago velutina DC.
Lepidium virginicum L.
Cercocarpus Kunth
Artemisia cana Pursh
Thalictrum sparsiflorum Turcz. ex Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Castilleja pilosa (S.Watson) Rydb.
Populus deltoides W.Bartram ex Marshall
Erigeron nivalis Nutt.
Rhinotropis cornuta (Kellogg) J.R.Abbott
Hesperolinon breweri (A.Gray) Small
Acmispon argophyllus var. argenteus (Dunkle) Brouillet
Navarretia mitracarpa Greene
Neogaerrhinum strictum (Hook. & Arn.) Rothm.
Astragalus gruinus Barneby
Sairocarpus pusillus (Brandegee) D.A.Sutton
Cotoneaster rehderi Pojark.
Holocarpha virgata subsp. virgata
Dimorphotheca fruticosa (L.) Less., 1832
Fritillaria falcata (Jeps.) D.E.Beetle
Oenothera villosa Thunb.
Salvia tortuosa Kunth
Astragalus lentiginosus var. fremontii (A.Gray ex Torr.) S.Watson
Lupinus nanus Douglas ex Benth.
Plagiobothrys glomeratus A.Gray
Dianthus barbatus L.
Moehringia lateriflora (L.) Fenzl
Senecio eremophilus Richards.
Melica imperfecta Trin.
Draba oligosperma Hook.
Allium vineale L.
Acacia melanoxylon R.Br.
Solidago spathulata DC.
Silene vulgaris (Moench) Garcke
Hieracium murorum L.
Asclepias tuberosa subsp. interior Woodson
Streptopus lanceolatus (Aiton) Reveal
Astragalus magdalenae Greene
Hazardia detonsa (Greene) Greene
Pentachaeta lyonii A.Gray
Potentilla flabellifolia Hook. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Acmispon oroboides (Kunth) Brouillet
Parietaria pensylvanica Muhl. ex Willd.
Arctostaphylos pringlei Parry
Salvia pachyphylla subsp. meridionalis R.M.Taylor
Amaranthus cruentus L.
Mollugo verticillata L.
Kallstroemia californica (S.Watson) Vail
Pombalia verticillata (Ortega) Paula-Souza
Sarcobatus baileyi Coville
Petasites hybridus (L.) G.Gaertn., B.Mey. & Scherb.
Convolvulus simulans Perry
Eriastrum densifolium (Benth.) Mason
Acer griseum (Franch.) Pax
Catalpa bignonioides Walter
Erythranthe floribunda (Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Calochortus macrocarpus var. maculosus (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Asclepias hypoleuca (A.Gray) Woodson
Pereskiopsis porteri (Brandegee ex F.A.C.Weber) Britton & Rose
Geranium rotundifolium L.
Proboscidea parviflora (Wooton) Wooton & Standl.
Oxalis decaphylla Kunth
Arum maculatum L.
Lomatium howellii (S.Watson) Jeps.
Glehnia littoralis subsp. leiocarpa (Mathias) Hultén
Phemeranthus brevifolius (Torr.) Hershk.
Sidalcea robusta A.Heller
Acorus americanus (Raf.) Raf.
Carex canescens L.
Ribes viscosissimum Pursh
Cucurbita digitata A.Gray
Matthiola incana (L.) W.T.Aiton
Navarretia intertexta subsp. propinqua (Suksd.) A.G.Day
Myosotis scorpioides L.
Eryngium aristulatum subsp. parishii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) R.M.Beauch.
Oreocarya nubigena Greene
Asclepias cryptoceras subsp. cryptoceras
Salix hookeriana Barratt
Castilleja rhexifolia Rydb.
Pseudognaphalium ramosissimum (Nutt.) Anderb.
Arctostaphylos andersonii A.Gray
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa subsp. acanthocarpa
Lupinus benthamii A.Heller
Eriastrum eremicum subsp. yageri (M.E.Jones) Mason
Nothoscordum borbonicum Kunth
Oreocarya suffruticosa (Torr.) Greene
Limnanthes douglasii subsp. rosea (Benth.) C.T.Mason
Origanum vulgare L.
Allophyllum gilioides (Benth.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Potamogeton natans L.
Salix scouleriana Barratt
Malacothamnus fasciculatus var. nuttallii (Abrams) Kearney
Castilleja miniata var. oblongifolia (A.Gray) Munz
Solanum tuberosum L.
Cologania obovata Schltdl.
Silene sargentii S.Watson
Echinocereus bonkerae subsp. apachensis (W.Blum & Rutow) A.D.Zimmerman
Berberis L.
Stenotus armerioides Nutt.
Monolopia major DC.
Allium lacunosum S.Watson
Quercus arizonica Sarg.
Gilia transmontana (Mason & A.D.Grant) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Antennaria howellii Greene
Lysimachia nummularia L.
Rhynchospora alba (L.) Vahl
Myosotis laxa Lehm.
Castilleja campestris (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Astragalus jejunus S.Watson
Mammillaria blossfeldiana Boed.
Eriogonum luteolum Greene
Eriogonum compositum var. compositum
Cologania angustifolia Kunth
Saxifraga bronchialis subsp. austromontana (Wiegand) Piper
Cleomella parviflora A.Gray
Allium fimbriatum S.Watson
Drosera anglica Huds.
Senna armata (S.Watson) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Cyperus squarrosus L.
Trillium ovatum var. ovatum
Penstemon sepalulus A.Nelson
Erythranthe verbenacea (Greene) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Purshia glandulosa Curran
Buglossoides arvensis (L.) I.M.Johnst.
Frasera fastigiata (Pursh) A.Heller
Penstemon triphyllus Douglas
Tidestromia lanuginosa (Nutt.) Standl.
Juncus xiphioides E.Mey.
Lagurus ovatus L.
Lessingia glandulifera var. glandulifera
Echinocereus engelmannii (Parry) Lem. ex Rümpler
Dudleya abramsii subsp. murina (Eastw.) Moran
Chamaerops humilis L.
Lastarriaea coriacea (Goodman) Hoover
Kalmiopsis leachiana (L.F.Hend.) Rehder
Mentzelia albicaulis (Douglas ex Hook.) Douglas ex Torr. & A.Gray
Fritillaria gentneri Gilkey
Solanum furcatum Dunal
Astragalus nyensis Barneby
Eriogonum elatum Douglas ex Benth.
Ceanothus papillosus var. papillosus
Balsamorhiza deltoidea Nutt.
Polemonium carneum A.Gray
Sporobolus wrightii Scribn.
Cornus capitata Wall.
Anisocoma acaulis Torr. & A.Gray
Tradescantia pallida (Rose) D.R.Hunt
Streptanthus cordatus var. cordatus
Triglochin scilloides (Poir.) Mering & Kadereit
Oenothera californica subsp. avita W.M.Klein
Plumbago auriculata Lam.
Fuchsia magellanica Lam.
Ericameria cooperi (A.Gray) Hall
Centromadia fitchii (A.Gray) Greene
Ipheion uniflorum (Lindl.) Raf.
Gilia leptantha subsp. purpusii (Milliken) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Primula suffrutescens A.Gray
Ericameria parishii (Greene) H.M.Hall
Hedysarum boreale Nutt.
Allium howellii var. howellii
Galeopsis tetrahit L.
Eriogonum nudum var. pauciflorum S.Watson
Erythronium revolutum Sm.
Eremothera boothii (Douglas) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Stachys pycnantha Benth.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. variabilis Barneby
Oxalis alpina (Rose) Rose ex Knuth
Hydrocotyle tribotrys Ruiz & Pav.
Hymenopappus filifolius Hook.
Hedysarum sulphurescens Rydb.
Scutellaria antirrhinoides Benth.
Stegnosperma halimifolium Benth.
Mertensia macdougalii A.Heller
Gmelina arborea Roxb. ex Sm.
Pittosporum undulatum Vent.
Salix exigua subsp. exigua
Mentzelia oreophila J.Darl.
Lythrum californicum Torr. & A.Gray
Collomia debilis var. camporum Payson
Layia carnosa (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Lupinus hyacinthinus Greene
Senna pallida (Vahl) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Quercus durata var. durata
Hoffmannseggia glauca (Ortega) Eifert
Allionia incarnata var. incarnata
Trifolium albopurpureum Torr. & A.Gray
Cylindropuntia wolfii (L.D.Benson) M.A.Baker
Dudleya anthonyi Rose ex Britton & Rose
Erythranthe rubella (A.Gray) N.S.Fraga
Vicia tetrasperma (L.) Schreb.
Viola pinetorum Greene
Pectis filipes Harv. & Gray
Dudleya brevifolia (Moran) Moran
Aquilegia micrantha Eastw.
Ferocactus gracilis subsp. gracilis
Brodiaea terrestris subsp. terrestris
Platanthera huronensis Lindl.
Cylindropuntia bernardina
Phlox albomarginata M.E.Jones
Aconitum columbianum var. columbianum
Psorothamnus emoryi var. emoryi
Shepherdia argentea (Pursh) Nutt.
Symphoricarpos albus var. laevigatus (Fernald) S.F.Blake
Limnanthes alba subsp. parishii (Jeps.) Morin
Viburnum ×burkwoodii Burkwood & Skipwith
Tetracoccus dioicus Parry
Erythranthe tilingii (Regel) G.L.Nesom
Menodora spinescens A.Gray
Camissoniopsis pallida subsp. pallida
Typha angustifolia L.
Viola pinetorum subsp. pinetorum
Silene antirrhina L.
Eriogonum elongatum var. elongatum
Festuca campestris Rydb.
Gnaphalium uliginosum L.
Veronica wyomingensis (A.Nelson) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Psorothamnus polydenius (Torr.) Rydb.
Erythranthe breweri (Greene) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Clarkia speciosa F.H. & M.E.Lewis
Anemone tuberosa Rydb.
Triteleia lilacina Greene
Leonurus cardiaca L.
Camissoniopsis micrantha (Hornem. ex Spreng.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Lomatium geyeri (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Agave chrysantha Peebles
Carex tenuiflora Wahlenb.
Comarostaphylis diversifolia (Parry) Greene
Peniocereus striatus (Brandegee) Buxb.
Pectocarya pusilla (A.DC.) A.Gray
Veronica hederifolia L.
Carduus pycnocephalus subsp. pycnocephalus
Achillea millefolium var. alpicola (Rydb.) Garrett
Phemeranthus sediformis (Poelln.) Kiger
Lolium arundinaceum (Schreb.) Darbysh.
Lobelia erinus L.
Lithospermum californicum A.Gray
Ornithostaphylos oppositifolia (Parry) Small
Penstemon leonardii var. leonardii
Bouteloua barbata Lag.
Phyllospadix scouleri Hook.
Poa secunda subsp. juncifolia (Scribn.) Soreng
Aquilegia vulgaris L.
Rigiopappus leptocladus A.Gray
Ericameria teretifolia (Durand & Hilg.) Jeps.
Opuntia leucotricha DC.
Funastrum arenarium (Decne. ex Benth.) Liede
Platanthera unalascensis (Spreng.) Kurtz
Eriocoma coronata (Thurb.) Romasch.
Gaultheria ovatifolia A.Gray
Galium angustifolium subsp. angustifolium
Homalocephala polycephala subsp. xeranthemoides (J.M.Coult.) Vargas & Bárcenas
Persicaria lapathifolia (L.) Gray
Ambrosia confertiflora DC.
Astragalus magdalenae var. magdalenae
Penstemon newberryi var. newberryi
Antennaria corymbosa E.E.Nelson
Geranium sanguineum L.
Malva subovata (DC.) Molero & J.M.Monts.
Fritillaria micrantha A.Heller
Senecio flaccidus var. flaccidus
Allium crispum Greene
Baccharis pteronioides DC.
Euphorbia ophthalmica Pers.
Atocion armeria (L.) Fourr.
Cerastium tomentosum L.
Asclepias brachystephana Engelm. ex Torr.
Carex utriculata Boott
Astragalus agnicidus Barneby
Cymopterus aboriginum M.E.Jones
Erigeron utahensis A.Gray
Meconella oregana Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Asclepias asperula subsp. asperula
Actaea rubra f. neglecta (Gillmann) B.L.Rob.
Astragalus deanei (Rydb.) Barneby
Lupinus caudatus subsp. caudatus
Eriogonum grande var. grande
Quercus acutidens Torr.
Opuntia pottsii Salm-Dyck
Kallstroemia parviflora Norton
Bloomeria clevelandii S.Watson
Stachys ajugoides Benth.
Commelina benghalensis L.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. hypoleium (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Silene menziesii Hook.
Claytonia umbellata S.Watson
Isatis tinctoria L.
Hymenothrix wrightii A.Gray
Camissoniopsis lewisii (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Perityle californica Benth.
Lippia palmeri S.Watson
Monarda humilis (Torr.) Prather & J.A.Keith
Aquilegia coerulea var. pinetorum (Tidestr.) Payson ex Kearney & Peebles
Cenchrus palmeri Vasey
Aubrieta deltoidea (L.) DC.
Arctostaphylos pallida Eastw.
Psathyrotes ramosissima (Torr.) A.Gray
Asclepias asperula (Decne.) Woodson
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. foliolosum (Nutt.) S.Stokes ex Abrams
Arctostaphylos crustacea subsp. crinita (J.E.Adams) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Rumex pulcher L.
Impatiens bicolor Royle
Ammophila breviligulata Fernald
Balsamorhiza lanata (W.M.Sharp) W.A.Weber
Trifolium depauperatum var. truncatum (Greene) J.S.Martin ex Isely
Platanthera michaelii (Greene) R.M.Bateman
Prunus amygdalus (L.) Batsch
Erythronium purpurascens S.Watson
Mentzelia leucophylla Brandegee
Calliandra californica Benth.
Dalea grayi (Vail) L.O.Williams
Eschscholzia lobbii Greene
Adenophyllum wrightii A.Gray
Leptosyne californica Nutt.
Gentiana affinis var. ovata A.Gray
Penstemon strictus Benth.
Scutellaria nana A.Gray
Senecio integerrimus var. ochroleucus (A.Gray) Cronquist
Eriogonum elegans Greene
Calandrinia breweri S.Watson
Psathyrotes annua (Nutt.) A.Gray
Trollius laxus Salisb.
Lathyrus tingitanus L.
Erysimum menziesii (Benth. & Hook.f.) Wettst.
Penstemon laetus A.Gray
Viburnum opulus L.
Acmispon junceus var. biolettii (Greene) Brouillet
Scutellaria californica A.Gray
Iva axillaris Pursh
Epilobium parviflorum Schreb.
Berberis wilcoxii Kearney
Encelia Adans.
Cirsium arizonicum var. arizonicum
Opuntia macrocentra Engelm.
Lupinus peirsonii H.Mason
Corallorhiza wisteriana Conrad
Eriogonum deserticola S.Watson
Penstemon bicolor subsp. roseus Clokey & D.D.Keck
Actaea elata (Nutt.) Prantl
Juncus parryi Engelm.
Penstemon richardsonii Douglas
Scrophularia lanceolata Pursh
Spergularia canadensis (Pers.) G.Don
Potentilla glaucophylla Lehm.
Rubus nivalis Douglas ex Hook.
Orthocarpus luteus Nutt.
Lepidium densiflorum Schrad.
Oxalis stricta L.
Trichostema laxum A.Gray
Arctostaphylos nissenana Merriam
Amelanchier cusickii Fernald
Eriogonum viridescens A.Heller
Githopsis specularioides Nutt.
Orthocarpus barbatus J.S.Cotton
Lomatium parryi (S.Watson) J.F.Macbr.
Eriogonum wrightii var. nodosum (Small) Reveal
Downingia ornatissima Greene
Boeberastrum anthemidifolium (Benth.) Rydb.
Trisetum spicatum (L.) K.Richt.
Asclepias eastwoodiana Barneby
Erigeron philadelphicus L.
Lupinus andersonii S.Watson
Symphyotrichum greatae (Parish) G.L.Nesom
Iris fernaldii R.C.Foster
Lycium parishii A.Gray
Picradeniopsis woodhousei (A.Gray) Rydb.
Schoenoplectus acutus (Muhl. ex Bigelow) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Astragalus monoensis Barneby
Allium obtusum Lemmon
Sagittaria latifolia Willd.
Brassica rapa L.
Salpiglossis sinuata Ruiz & Pav.
Monardella palmeri A.Gray
Maytenus phyllanthoides Benth.
Castilleja arachnoidea Greenm.
Gilia capitata subsp. abrotanifolia (Nutt. ex Greene) V.E.Grant
Lupinus odoratus A.Heller
Trifolium andersonii A.Gray
Saxifraga oppositifolia subsp. oppositifolia
Asclepias elata Benth.
Stellaria longipes Goldie
Carphochaete bigelovii A.Gray
Aquilegia scopulorum Tidestr.
Carya illinoinensis (Wangenh.) K.Koch
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. cushingiana (Eastw.) J.E.Keeley, M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Lomatium brandegeei (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.F.Macbr.
Hesperolinon tehamense H.Sharsm.
Erigeron foliosus var. foliosus
Cirsium arizonicum var. tenuisectum D.J.Keil
Monnina wrightii A.Gray
Linanthus filiformis (Parry ex A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Limonium californicum (Boiss.) A.Heller
Allium tolmiei Baker
Hackelia nervosa (Kellogg) I.M.Johnst.
Eritrichium argenteum W.Wight
Balsamorhiza hookeri (Hook.) Nutt.
Stenocereus montanus (Britton & Rose) Buxb.
Lithospermum macromeria J.I.Cohen
Platanus occidentalis L.
Astragalus iselyi S.L.Welsh
Androsace septentrionalis L.
Monardella nana A.Gray
Rhizophora mangle L.
Gomphrena nitida Rothr.
Castilleja suksdorfii A.Gray
Gayophytum eriospermum Coville
Calycadenia mollis A.Gray
Medicago falcata L.
Solidago elongata Nutt.
Eriogonum wrightii var. oresbium Reveal
Veronica scutellata L.
Hydrocotyle ranunculoides L.fil.
Tagetes micrantha Cav.
Eriogonum pyrolifolium Hook. ex A.E.Murray
Amaranthus palmeri S.Watson
Chamaenerion angustifolium subsp. circumvagum (Mosquin) Moldenke
Marah watsonii (Cogn.) Greene
Packera macounii (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Digitaria californica (Benth.) Henrard
Gilia achilleifolia subsp. achilleifolia
Streptanthus carinatus C.Wright
Calochortus gunnisonii S.Watson
Sedum praealtum A.DC.
Astragalus flavus Nutt.
Myosurus minimus L.
Sedum albomarginatum R.T.Clausen
Triglochin maritima L.
Bromus inermis Leyss.
Sporobolus schoenoides (L.) P.M.Peterson
Monardella australis subsp. cinerea (Abrams) A.C.Sanders & Elvin
Yucca baileyi Wooton & Standl.
Distichlis littoralis (Engelm.) H.L.Bell & Columbus
Vaccinium vitis-idaea L.
Hypericum calycinum L.
Cirsium douglasii var. douglasii
Secale cereale L.
Cucurbita ficifolia Bouché
Sidalcea virgata Howell
Castilleja martini var. clokeyi (Pennell) Holmgren
Astragalus lentiginosus var. micans Barneby
Anthurium andraeanum Linden ex André
Castilleja martinii var. martinii
Silene verecunda subsp. verecunda
Phlox adsurgens Torr. ex A.Gray
Eriogonum alexanderae (Reveal) Grady & Reveal
Salix orestera C.K.Schneid.
Ribes nevadense Kellogg
Nemacladus glanduliferus Jeps.
Crepis atribarba A.Heller
Astragalus beckwithii Torr. & A.Gray
Euphorbia hirta L.
Visnaga daucoides Gaertn.
Delphinium ×occidentale S.Watson ex Coult.
Trifolium tomentosum L.
Tamarix chinensis Lour.
Nicandra physalodes (L.) Gaertn.
Leucaena leucocephala (Lam.) de Wit
Baccharis L.
Lewisia rediviva var. minor (Rydb.) Munz
Chaenomeles lagenaria (Loisel.) Koidz.
Symphoricarpos mollis var. hesperius (G.N.Jones) Cronquist
Opuntia gosseliniana F.A.C.Weber
Platanthera orbiculata (Pursh) Lindl.
Calochortus dunnii Purdy
Ranunculus suksdorfii A.Gray
Erythronium citrinum S.Watson
Allium dichlamydeum Greene
Nymphaea odorata Sol. ex Aiton
Penstemon labrosus (A.Gray) Mast. ex Hook.fil.
Dichondra micrantha Urb.
Quercus eplingii C.H.Mull.
Monardella purpurea Howell
Ranunculus occidentalis var. occidentalis
Pedicularis sudetica Willd.
Lomatium triternatum var. brevifolium (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Lepidium heterophyllum Benth.
Populus balsamifera L.
Ambrosia pumila (Nutt.) A.Gray
Navarretia breweri (A.Gray) Greene
Penstemon parryi A.Gray
Baccharis pilularis subsp. pilularis
Saxifraga mertensiana Bong.
Oreocarya glomerata (Pursh) Greene
Jatropha cuneata Wiggins & Rollins
Arctostaphylos crustacea subsp. rosei (Eastw.) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Papaver rhoeas L.
Lupinus sericeus Pursh
Solanum rostratum Dunal
Astragalus sclerocarpus A.Gray
Chaetopappa ericoides (Torr.) G.L.Nesom
Poa macrantha Vasey
Rhododendron ×hybridum Ker Gawl.
Erysimum capitatum var. purshii (Durand) R.C.Rollins
Polygonum bidwelliae S.Watson
Polygonum minimum S.Watson
Boykinia major A.Gray
Ivesia jaegeri Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Leptosiphon ambiguus (Rattan) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Paraserianthes lophantha (Willd.) I.C.Nielsen
Mammillaria mainiae K.Brandegee
Allium falcifolium Hook. & Arn.
Alchemilla mollis (Buser) Rothm.
Euphorbia vallis-mortae (Millsp.) J.T.Howell
Trifolium plumosum var. amplifolium J.S.Martin
Opuntia mojavensis Engelm. & Bigelow
Ceanothus ×otayensis Mc Minn
Rhamnus pilosa (Trel.) Abrams
Ambrosia bryantii (Curran) Payne
Eriogonum panguicense (M.E.Jones) Reveal
Hopia obtusa (Kunth) Zuloaga & Morrone
Agoseris retrorsa (Benth.) Greene
Cirsium neomexicanum A.Gray
Carex spectabilis Dewey
Phaseolus filiformis Benth.
Brodiaea terrestris subsp. kernensis (Hoover) Niehaus
Reynoutria ×bohemica Chrtek & Chrtková
Lupinus uncialis S.Watson
Lupinus densiflorus var. densiflorus
Alisma triviale Pursh
Linum puberulum (Engelm.) Heller
Eriogonum heracleoides var. heracleoides
Dalea bicolor Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Hazardia squarrosa var. squarrosa
Iris domestica (L.) Goldblatt & Mabb.
Coreopsis verticillata L.
Veronica serpyllifolia subsp. humifusa (Dicks.) Syme
Rhagadiolus stellatus (L.) Gaertn.
Philadelphus microphyllus A.Gray
Camissoniopsis cheiranthifolia subsp. cheiranthifolia
Chamaesaracha sordida (Dunal) A.Gray
Astragalus douglasii var. parishii (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Danthonia unispicata (Thurb.) Munro ex Macoun
Tetradymia tetrameres (S.F.Blake) Strother
Penstemon humilis Nutt. ex A.Gray
Oreocarya confertiflora Greene
Pectis papposa Harv. & Gray
Sabulina nuttallii (Pax) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Eragrostis echinochloidea Stapf
Melochia tomentosa L.
Linaria purpurea (L.) Mill.
Monardella villosa subsp. villosa
Lewisia brachycalyx Engelm. ex A.Gray
Gentiana newberryi var. newberryi
Penstemon clevelandii var. mohavensis (D.D.Keck) Mc Minn
Abutilon palmeri A.Gray
Crataegus rivularis Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Silene parryi (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Fritillaria eastwoodiae R.M.Macfarl.
Boerhavia coulteri var. palmeri (S.Watson) Spellenb.
Lathyrus sylvestris L.
Wyethia amplexicaulis (Nutt.) Nutt.
Dudleya candida Britton ex Britton & Rose
Fritillaria pinetorum Davidson
Chylismia scapoidea subsp. scapoidea
Boechera perennans (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Hyacinthoides hispanica (Mill.) Rothm.
Ivesia lycopodioides var. scandularis (Rydb.) Ertter & Reveal
Wahlenbergia marginata (Thunb.) A.DC.
Hosackia oblongifolia Benth.
Boechera pulchra (M.E.Jones ex S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Eriogonum molestum S.Watson
Drymocallis glandulosa var. reflexa (Greene) Ertter
Polemonium eximium Greene
Caulanthus californicus (S.Watson) Payson
Psilostrophe tagetina (Nutt.) Greene
Samolus ebracteatus Kunth
Viola trinervata (Howell) Howell ex A.Gray
Cirsium hydrophilum var. hydrophilum
Lewisia glandulosa (Rydb.) Clay
Mammillaria hutchisoniana subsp. hutchisoniana
Athysanus pusillus (Hook.) Greene
Boerhavia erecta L.
Jatropha cardiophylla (Torr.) Müll.Arg.
Celtis reticulata Boorsma, 1907
Penstemon subglaber Rydb.
Penstemon acuminatus Douglas
Angelica breweri A.Gray
Boechera holboellii (Hornem.) A.Löve & D.Löve
Bensoniella oregona (Abrams & Bacig.) Morton
Crassula decumbens Thunb.
Frasera tubulosa Coville
Sisyrinchium californicum (Ker Gawl.) Dryand.
Arctostaphylos auriculata Eastw.
Camissoniopsis pallida (Abrams) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Coreopsis lanceolata L.
Mimosa aculeaticarpa Ortega
Agave parryi var. couesii (Engelm. ex Trel.) Kearney & Peebles
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. bracteosa (DC.) J.E.Adams
Polemonium micranthum Benth.
Logfia arizonica (A.Gray) Holub
Gilia cana subsp. triceps (Brand) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Rubus bartonianus Peck
Camissonia sierrae subsp. sierrae
Xanthocephalum gymnospermoides (A.Gray) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Arctostaphylos imbricata Eastw.
Heuchera parvifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Peritoma luteum (Hook.) Raf.
Dalea ornata (Douglas ex Hook.) Eaton & Wright
Bryonia alba L.
Lobelia cardinalis L.
Castanea sativa Mill.
Amsinckia spectabilis Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Galium hypotrichium subsp. hypotrichium
Melaleuca nesophila F.Muell.
Corynopuntia parishii (Orcutt) F.M.Knuth
Streptanthus morrisonii F.W.Hoffm.
Mentha spicata L.
Limnanthes alba Hartw. ex Benth.
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum Douglas ex Benth.
Hymenoxys richardsonii (Hook.) Cockerell
Microseris borealis (Bong.) Sch.Bip.
Erythranthe microphylla (Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Viola cuneata S.Watson
Streptanthus polygaloides A.Gray
Pedicularis parryi subsp. parryi
Euchiton sphaericus (Willd.) Holub
Rhus lentii Kellogg
Pectocarya linearis subsp. ferocula (I.M.Johnst.) Thorne
Calochortus fimbriatus H.P.McDonald
Salvia dorrii subsp. dorrii
Oenothera deltoides subsp. cognata (Jeps.) W.M.Klein
Grindelia stricta var. angustifolia (A.Gray) M.A.Lane
Stachys stebbinsii G.A.Mulligan & D.B.Munro
Crepis intermedia A.Gray
Streptanthus campestris S.Watson
Castilleja minor var. stenantha (A.Gray) J.M.Egger
Claytonia gypsophiloides Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Layia septentrionalis D.D.Keck
Polystemma cordifolium (A.Gray) Mc Donnell & Fishbein
Eriogonum giganteum S.Watson
Cymopterus globosus (S.Watson) S.Watson
Erigeron peregrinus (Pursh) Greene
Spergularia macrotheca var. longistyla R.Rossbach
Cordylanthus tenuis subsp. brunneus (Jeps.) Munz
Tetradymia stenolepis Greene
Avicennia germinans (L.) L.
Escallonia rubra (Ruiz & Pav.) Pers.
Oenothera drummondii (Brandegee) W.Dietr. & W.L.Wagner
Eleocharis palustris (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Micranthes odontoloma (Piper) A.Heller
Astragalus nothoxys A.Gray
Euphorbia cyparissias L.
Sabulina californica (A.Gray) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Ipomopsis rubra (L.) Wherry
Tidestromia suffruticosa var. oblongifolia (S.Watson) Sánch.Pino & Flores Olv.
Gomphrena sonorae Torr.
Vesper multinervatus (J.M.Coult. & Rose) R.L.Hartm. & G.L.Nesom
Fragaria virginiana subsp. platypetala (Rydb.) A.E.Murray
Dyssodia papposa (Vent.) Hitchc.
Rhamnus insula Kellogg
Allium brevistylum S.Watson
Allium sativum L.
Symphyotrichum subspicatum (Nees) G.L.Nesom
Asclepias linaria Cav.
Penstemon heterodoxus var. heterodoxus
Hesperolinon californicum (Benth.) Small
Mitella ovalis Greene
Allium peninsulare Lemmon ex Greene
Heuchera hirsutissima Rosend. & Lakela
Ranunculus aquatilis L.
Sinapis arvensis L.
Lepechinia cardiophylla Epling
Turritis glabra L.
Ranunculus trichophyllus Chaix
Oenothera xylocarpa Coville
Diplacus bolanderi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Geranium solanderi Carolin
Oryzopsis asperifolia Michx.
Galium wrightii A.Gray
Fagonia pachyacantha Rydb.
Thysanocarpus radians Benth.
Clarkia lassenensis (Eastw.) H. & Lewis
Keckiella antirrhinoides var. antirrhinoides
Elmera racemosa (S.Watson) Rydb.
Acmispon dendroideus var. dendroideus
Petasites japonicus (Siebold & Zucc.) Maxim.
Draba novolympica Payson & H.St.John
Solidago lepida DC.
Erigeron arenarioides (D.C.Eaton ex A.Gray) Rydb.
Pyrus calleryana Decne.
Leptosiphon septentrionalis (H.Mason) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Porterella carnosula (Hook. & Arn.) Torr.
Ranunculus alismifolius Geyer ex Benth.
Quercus grisea Liebm.
Navarretia viscidula Benth.
Encelia asperifolia (S.F.Blake) C.Clark & Kyhos
Menodora scabra Engelm. ex A.Gray
Salvia subincisa Benth.
Laburnum anagyroides Medik.
Ribes menziesii var. menziesii
Lonicera involucrata var. ledebourii (Eschsch.) Jeps.
Galium L.
Caulanthus pilosus S.Watson
Danthonia californica Bol.
Juncus occidentalis Wiegand
Claytonia parviflora subsp. viridis (Davidson) J.M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Impatiens sodenii Engl. & Warb. ex Engl.
Calochortus aureus S.Watson
Xanthium spinosum L.
Ribes lobbii A.Gray
Clarkia concinna subsp. automixa R.N.Bowman
Atriplex watsonii A.Nelson ex Abrams
Pleurocoronis laphamioides (Rose) R.King & H.Rob.
Hydrocotyle moschata G.Forst.
Dactylorhiza viridis (L.) R.M.Bateman, Pridgeon & M.W.Chase
Haplophyton crooksii (L.D.Benson) L.D.Benson
Triodanis perfoliata (L.) Nieuwl.
Plagiobothrys arizonicus (A.Gray) Greene ex A.Gray
Quercus oblongifolia Torr.
Downingia yina Applegate
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. laevigata (Eastw.) Munz
Marah horrida (Congdon) Dunn
Ligusticum grayi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Balsamorhiza macrophylla Nutt.
Kniphofia uvaria (L.) Oken
Lessingia micradenia var. glabrata (D.D.Keck) Ferris
Piptatheropsis exigua (Thurb.) Romasch., P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Carex luzulina Olney
Acourtia wrightii (A.Gray) Reveal & R.M.King
Oxytropis parryi A.Gray
Castilleja pulchella Rydb.
Cornus alba L.
Heuchera ovalifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Lactuca sativa L.
Juncus alpinus Vill.
Oenothera caespitosa var. longiflora (A.Heller) Munz
Zigadenus venenosus S.Watson
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. albicaulis (Nutt.) Rydb.
Acer negundo var. latifolium Pax
Myriophyllum propinquum A.Cunn.
Artemisia tridentata Nutt.
Boykinia elata (Nutt.) Greene
Mimulus guttatus Fisch. ex DC.
Ditaxis brandegeei var. brandegeei
Gramineae
Lotus scoparius (Torr. & A.Gray) Ottley
Sebastiania bilocularis S.Watson
Claytonia perfoliata Donn ex Willd.
Valeriana occidentalis A.Heller
Paspalum distichum L.
Lupinus bicolor subsp. umbellatus (Greene) D.B.Dunn
Lactuca pulchella (Pursh) DC.
Streptopus brevipes Baker
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. arizonicus (S.Watson) C.P.Sm.
Erigeron radicatus Hook.
Juncus tracyi Rydb.
Scirpus acutus Muhl. ex Bigelow
Bromus anomalus Rupr.
Lupinus horizontalis A.Heller
Smelowskia calycina var. americana (Regel & Herder) W.H.Drury & Rollins
Carex microptera Mack.
Colubrina viridis (M.E.Jones) M.C.Johnst.
Amsonia jonesii Woodson
Grindelia latifolia Kellogg
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. mohavense (T.T.Craig) H.Mason
Lupinus spectabilis Hoover
Petradoria pumila var. pumila
Eastwoodia elegans Brandegee
Eleocharis macrostachya Britton
Columbiadoria hallii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Erigeron inornatus var. inornatus
Eucephalus glabratus (Greene) Greene
Solidago elongata Pépin, 1833
Rudbeckia montana A.Gray
Eriophyllum ambiguum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Lorandersonia linifolia (Greene) Urbatsch
Erigeron flagellaris A.Gray
Carex vallicola Dewey
Senecio serra Hook.
Ericameria nauseosa var. speciosa (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Brickellia greenei A.Gray
Ericameria nauseosa var. oreophila (A.Nelson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Ericameria zionis (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom
Chrysothamnus albidus (M.E.Jones ex A.Gray) Greene
Suaeda moquinii (Torr.) Greene
Mertensia franciscana A.Heller
Physocarpus monogynus (Torr.) J.M.Coult.
Ericameria nana Nutt.
Ericameria nauseosa var. graveolens (Nutt.) Reveal & Schuyler
Schoenoplectus pungens (Vahl) Palla
Ericameria parryi var. attenuata (M.E.Jones) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Petradoria pumila (Nutt.) Greene
Erigeron speciosus (Lindl.) DC.
Symphyotrichum spathulatum (Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Potamogeton epihydrus Raf.
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. viscidiflorus
Chrysothamnus greenei (A.Gray) Greene
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. puberulus (D.C.Eaton) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Arnica chamissonis subsp. foliosa (Nutt.) Maguire
Ranunculus glaberrimus var. glaberrimus
Sphaeralcea A.St.-Hil.
Euphorbia leucophylla subsp. comcaacorum V.W.Steinm. & Felger
Eleocharis erythropoda Steud.
Ericameria albida (M.E.Jones ex A.Gray) L.C.Anderson
Mentzelia veatchiana Kellogg
Isocoma menziesii var. vernonioides (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Stuckenia pectinata (L.) Börner
Ericameria crispa (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom
Epipactis royleana Lindl.
Sapindus drummondii Hook. & Arn.
Calystegia vanzuukiae Brummitt & Namoff
Iris californica Leichtlin
Arctostaphylos hookeri G.Don
Iris bracteata S.Watson
Acacia Mill.
Linanthus bicolor (Nutt.) Greene
Castilleja cervina Greenm.
Lithocarpus densiflorus (Hook. & Arn.) Rehder
Lycium gracilipes A.Gray
Paeonia brownii Douglas ex Hook.
Astragalus didymocarpus Hook. & Arn.
Salix lasiandra Benth.
Distichlis stricta (Torr.) Rydb.
Citrus medica L.
Carex media R.Br. ex Richardson
Carex cyrtostachya Janeway & Zika
Brodiaea grandiflora Sm.
Carica papaya L.
Carex disperma Dewey
Catharanthus roseus (L.) G.Don
Anthericum torreyi Baker
Castanopsis chrysophylla (Douglas ex Hook.) A.DC.
Triticum aestivum L.
Dulichium arundinaceum (L.) Britton
Rhododendron glandulosum (Standl. ex Small) Millais
Asclepias asperula subsp. capricornu (Woodson) Woodson
Barkleyanthus salicifolius (Kunth) H.Rob. & Brettell
Yucca schottii Engelm.
Camissonia bistorta (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Genista L.
Dalea L.
Mimulus L.
Echinocereus maritimus (M.E.Jones) K.Schum.
Opuntia acanthocarpa Engelm. & Bigelow
Arenaria capillaris Poir.
Larrea tridentata (DC.) Coville
Opuntia fulgida Engelm.
Agave ocahui Gentry
Opuntia engelmannii Salm-Dyck ex Engelm.
Acacia constricta Benth.
Cowania mexicana var. stansburyana (Torr.) Jeps.
Quercus L.
Populus trichocarpa Torr. & A.Gray ex Hook.
Echinocereus fasciculatus (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Andropogon gerardii Vitman
Mahonia nervosa (Pursh) Nutt.
Pilosocereus alensis (F.A.C.Weber ex Gosselin) Byles & G.D.Rowley
Rubus parviflorus Nutt.
Polygonum bistortoides Pursh
Opuntia leptocaulis DC.
Cornus L.
Agave vilmoriniana A.Berger
Opuntia clavata Engelm.
Ericameria nauseosa subsp. nauseosa
Oxalis oregana Nutt.
Mahonia aquifolium (Pursh) Nutt.
Opuntia engelmannii var. linguiformis (Griffiths) B.D.Parfitt & Pinkava
Pachycereus (A.Berger) Britton & Rose
Dasylirion wheeleri S.Watson
Acacia greggii A.Gray
Acacia neovernicosa Isely
Amelanchier alnifolia (Nutt.) Nutt. ex M.Roem.
Achnatherum occidentale subsp. occidentale
Opuntia bigelovii Engelm.
Opuntia spinosior (Engelm.) Toumey
Acacia angustissima (Mill.) Kuntze
Pseudoroegneria spicata subsp. spicata
Berberis haematocarpa Wooton
Stenocereus eruca (Brandegee) A.C.Gibson & K.E.Horak
Opuntia arbuscula Engelm.
Ceanothus velutinus Douglas ex Hook.
Epilobium angustifolium L.
Commelina dianthifolia Delile
Digitaria ischaemum (Schreb.) Muhl.
Plagiobothrys leptocladus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Epilobium halleanum Hausskn.
Baccharis vanessae R.M.Beauch.
Ammi majus L.
Coleanthus subtilis (Tratt.) Seidel ex Roem. & Schult.
Lobelia inflata L.
Hesperevax acaulis var. ambusticola Morefield
Calandrinia ciliata (Ruiz & Pav.) DC.
Physalis philadelphica Lam.
Centaurea calcitrapa L.
Crataegus L.
Eustoma exaltatum subsp. exaltatum
Lythrum portula (L.) D.A.Webb
Petunia parviflora Juss.
Atriplex serenana var. serenana
Phyllospadix Hook.
Listera caurina Piper
Chusquea Kunth
Plantago virginica L.
Sagittaria lancifolia subsp. media (Micheli) Bogin
Puccinellia distans (Jacq.) Parl.
Anchusa officinalis L.
Potamogeton foliosus subsp. foliosus
Ranunculus hebecarpus Hook. & Arn.
Crataegus suksdorfii (Sarg.) Kruschke
Chamaesyce maculata (L.) Small
Epilobium minutum Lindl.
Plantago arenaria Waldst. & Kit.
Apera interrupta (L.) P.Beauv.
Citrullus lanatus var. citroides (L.H.Bailey) Mansf.
Salicornia depressa Standl.
Aponogeton distachyos L.f.
Ludwigia peploides subsp. peploides
Nemacaulis denudata var. gracilis Goodman & L.D.Benson
Carex phaeocephala Piper
Crataegus okennonii J.B.Phipps
Apocynum ×floribundum Greene
Ambrosia artemisiifolia L.
Dryas drummondii Richardson ex Hook.
Silene parishii S.Watson
Lemna turionifera Landolt
Poterium sanguisorba L.
Spergularia villosa (Pers.) Cambess.
Thalictrum fendleri var. fendleri
Gayophytum oligospermum F.H.Lewis & Szweyk.
Cotoneaster dielsianus E.Pritz.
Crataegus ursopedensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Plectritis congesta subsp. brachystemon (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Morey
Draba cuneifolia var. cuneifolia
Juncus rugulosus Engelm.
Viola nephrophylla Greene
Calamagrostis purpurea (Trin.) Trin.
Johnstonella costata (Brandegee) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Hackelia ciliata (Douglas ex Lehm.) I.M.Johnst.
Casuarina equisetifolia L.
Crepis vesicaria subsp. haenseleri (Boiss. ex DC.) P.D.Sell
Centaurea stoebe subsp. micranthos (S.G.Gmel. ex Gugler) Hayek
Allium haematochiton S.Watson
Cuscuta campestris Yunck.
Kallstroemia Scop.
Oxybasis glauca (L.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Cryptantha utahensis (A.Gray) Greene
Monardella hypoleuca subsp. lanata (Abrams) Munz
Eragrostis mexicana subsp. mexicana
Sorghum bicolor var. bicolor
Chusquea circinata Soderstr. & C.E.Calderón
Erodium malacoides (L.) L'Hér.
Senecio aphanactis Greene
Symphyotrichum foliaceum (DC.) G.L.Nesom
Potentilla anserina Jeps.
Melaleuca quinquenervia (Cav.) S.T.Blake
Scribneria bolanderi (Thurb.) Hack.
Crataegus sheila-phippsiae var. sheila-phippsiae
Festuca occidentalis Hook.
Alternanthera caracasana Kunth
Carex lenticularis var. limnophila (Holm) Cronquist
Claytonia rubra subsp. rubra
Brachypodium distachyon (L.) P.Beauv.
Gayophytum humile Juss.
Brickellia knappiana Drew
Zostera L.
Cornus stolonifera Michx.
Mentha rotundifolia (L.) Huds.
Carex flava L.
Gayophytum diffusum subsp. parviflorum Lewis & Szweyk.
Stipa occidentalis var. pubescens (Vasey) J.R.Maze, Roy L.Taylor & MacBryde
Stipa occidentalis var. californica (Merr. & Burtt Davy) C.L.Hitchc.
Matricaria occidentalis Greene
Stipa pulchra Hitchc.
Dieteria canescens var. leucanthemifolia (Greene) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Miscanthus sinensis Andersson
Stellaria neglecta Weihe
Juncus regelii Buchenau
Githopsis diffusa subsp. filicaulis (Ewan) Morin
Haplopappus pluriflorus (Torr. & A.Gray) Hall
Eriogonum vimineum subsp. gracile (Benth.) S.Stokes
Hemizonia pallida D.D.Keck
Lycium chinense Mill.
Astragalus nuttallii var. nuttallii
Carex californica L.H.Bailey
Carex alma L.H.Bailey
Salix hindsiana Benth.
Carex feta L.H.Bailey
Lavatera assurgentiflora subsp. glabra Philbrick
Hosackia prostrata Nutt.
Gentiana setigera A.Gray
Psilocarphus globiferus Nutt.
Juncus oxymeris Engelm.
Erodium macrophyllum Hook. & Arn.
Eriogonum douglasii var. meridionale Reveal
Krameria grayi Rose & Painter
Pogogyne zizyphoroides Benth.
Cirsium breweri (A.Gray) Jeps.
Juncus trilocularis Zika
Eriogonum umbellatum var. stellatum (Benth.) M.E.Jones
Hudsonia L.
Hosackia strigosa Nutt.
Atriplex parishii S.Watson
Chorizanthe pungens var. diffusa (Benth.) Parry
Lathyrus strictus Nutt.
Lomatium caruifolium (Hook. & Arn.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Seutera palmeri (S.Watson) Fishbein & W.D.Stevens
Dictyanthus altatensis (Brandegee) W.D.Stevens
Cryptostegia grandiflora (Roxb.) R.Br.
Chaenactis parishii A.Gray
Clarkia gracilis (Piper) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Arctostaphylos nummularia subsp. mendocinoensis (P.V.Wells) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Gentianopsis thermalis (Kuntze) Iltis
Potentilla norvegica L.
Ipomoea capillacea (Kunth) G.Don
Frangula betulifolia (Greene) Grubov
Lamium purpureum var. purpureum
Holocarpha virgata subsp. elongata D.D.Keck
Bouteloua hirsuta Lag.
Ipomoea cairica (L.) Sweet
Quercus cedrosensis C.H.Mull.
Keckiella lemmonii (A.Gray) Straw
Persicaria amphibia var. emersa (Michx.) J.C.Hickman
Lewisia cotyledon (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Poa keckii Soreng
Eriogonum brachypodum Torr. & A.Gray
Muhlenbergia microsperma (DC.) Kunth
Albizia julibrissin Durazz.
Quercus agrifolia var. oxyadenia (Torr.) J.T.Howell
Pseudognaphalium leucocephalum (A.Gray) Anderb.
Erythronium L.
Polemonium occidentale subsp. occidentale
Constancea nevinii (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Caragana pygmaea (L.) DC.
Psilocarphus brevissimus Nutt.
Ptelea aptera Parry
Gnaphalium palustre Nutt.
Eriogonum giganteum var. formosum K.Brandegee
Mentzelia torreyi A.Gray
Lupinus malacophyllus Greene
Echinocereus pacificus (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Modiola caroliniana (L.) G.Don
Schismus barbatus (L.) Thell.
Prunus mahaleb L.
Arthroceras subterminale (Parish) Piirainen & G.Kadereit
Tragia nepetifolia Cav.
Comarostaphylis diversifolia subsp. diversifolia
Micranthes oregana (Howell) Small
Atriplex canescens var. canescens
Viola douglasii Steud.
Ruellia simplex Wright
Frasera albomarginata S.Watson
Crocosmia Planch.
Echinocereus coccineus subsp. coccineus
Acer negundo var. interius (Britton) Sarg.
Phalaris californica Hook. & Arn.
Tonestus lyallii (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Penstemon fasciculatus A.Gray
Ipomopsis aggregata subsp. formosissima (Greene) Wherry
Calystegia longipes (S.Watson) Brummitt
Astragalus pectinatus (Hook.) Douglas ex G.Don
Ipomopsis macombii (Torr.) V.E.Grant
Veronica missurica Raf.
Melica torreyana Scribn.
Leontodon L.
Aloe maculata All.
Euphorbia parryi Engelm.
Chorizanthe cuspidata var. villosa (Eastw.) Munz
Lonicera tatarica L.
Oenothera nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Senna multiglandulosa (Jacq.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Dalea searlsiae (A.Gray) Barneby
Trifolium depauperatum var. depauperatum
Limniris (Tausch) Rchb.
Callitriche stagnalis Scop.
Hemizonia congesta subsp. luzulifolia (DC.) Babc. & H.M.Hall
Guaiacum coulteri A.Gray
Stachys rigida subsp. rigida
Tragopogon pratensis L.
Sedum radiatum S.Watson
Strigosella africana (L.) Botsch.
Astragalus miguelensis Greene
Phlox stansburyi (Torr.) A.Heller
Lycium cooperi A.Gray
Castilleja cusickii Greenm.
Castilleja lassenensis Eastw.
Senecio hydrophilus Nutt.
Silene nelsonii Mesler, M.S.Mayer & Carothers
Viola palustris L.
Leptosiphon chrysanthus J.M.Porter
Koenigia davisiae (W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray) T.M.Schust. & Reveal
Sabulina austromontana (S.J.Wolf & Packer) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Viola orbiculata Geyer ex A.Gray
Bromus sitchensis Trin.
Carex pansa L.H.Bailey
Cardamine corymbosa Hook.f.
Helichrysum petiolare Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Oenothera lavandulifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Torilis nodosa (L.) Gaertn.
Opuntia Mill.
Artemisia nova A.Nelson
Veronica biloba Schreb.
Malva multiflora (Cav.) Soldano, Banfi & Galasso
Gentianella amarella subsp. acuta (Michx.) Gillett
Wyethia helianthoides Nutt.
Erythranthe calcicola N.S.Fraga & D.A.York
Brodiaea jolonensis Eastw.
Crotalaria pumila Ortega
Leymus mollis subsp. mollis
Rumex dentatus L.
Waltheria indica L.
Humulus lupulus L.
Hedeoma hyssopifolia A.Gray
Aphanisma blitoides Nutt. ex Moq.
Castilleja lemmonii A.Gray
Carthamus lanatus L.
Ruellia californica subsp. californica
Bidens laevis (L.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Senecio bigelovii A.Gray
Bursera laxiflora S.Watson
Carex stipata Muhl. ex Willd.
Mammillaria brandegeei (Coult.) Engelm. ex K.Brandegee
Penstemon thompsoniae (Gray) Rydb.
Rudbeckia californica A.Gray
Clarkia dudleyana (Abrams) J.F.Macbr.
Triteleia clementina Hoover
Penstemon pumilus Nutt.
Nestotus stenophyllus (A.Gray) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Amphipappus fremontii Torr. & A.Gray
Agrostis scabra Willd.
Stephanomeria virgata Benth.
Erythranthe barbata (Greene) N.S.Fraga
Eurybia integrifolia (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Dicentra formosa subsp. formosa
Horkelia rydbergii Elmer
Astragalus praelongus E.Sheld.
Trifolium andersonii subsp. beatleyae J.M.Gillett
Carex amplifolia Boott
Solanum umbelliferum var. umbelliferum
Chorizanthe pungens Benth.
Calochortus clavatus var. gracilis Ownbey
Plumbago zeylanica L.
Cirsium eatonii var. peckii (L.F.Hend.) D.J.Keil
Mertensia brevistyla S.Watson
Glandularia lilacina (Greene) Umber
Viola purpurea var. integrifolia (Baker & Clausen) J.T.Howell
Astragalus kentrophyta var. tegetarius (S.Watson) Dorn
Euphorbia tomentulosa S.Watson
Eriogonum shockleyi S.Watson
Pleradenophora bilocularis (S.Watson) Esser & A.L.Melo
Eucephalus ledophyllus (A.Gray) Greene
Drymocallis arguta (Pursh) Rydb.
Leptosyne calliopsidea (DC.) A.Gray
Dudleya abramsii subsp. affinis K.M.Nakai
Abutilon theophrasti Medik.
Jatropha cordata (Ortega) Müll.Arg.
Brickellia grandiflora (Hook.) Nutt.
Dithyrea maritima (Davidson ex B.L.Rob.) Davidson
Cistus ladanifer L.
Koelreuteria bipinnata Franch.
Sorbus californica Greene
Collinsia linearis A.Gray
Salvia nemorosa L.
Carex pachystachya Cham. ex Steud.
Trifolium bifidum A.Gray
Matthiola longipetala (Vent.) DC.
Arnica angustifolia subsp. tomentosa (Macoun) G.W.Douglas & Ruyle-Douglas
Ambrosia chenopodiifolia (Benth.) Payne
Blennosperma nanum (Hook.) S.F.Blake
Phlox pulvinata (Wherry) Cronquist
Micropuntia pulchella (Engelm.) P.C.Holland
Erythronium helenae Applegate
Aphyllon cooperi subsp. cooperi
Arnica chamissonis Less.
Arctostaphylos peninsularis P.V.Wells
Calochortus persistens Ownbey
Lupinus agardhianus A.Heller
Rumex spinosus L.
Arctotheca prostrata (Salisb.) Britten
Koelreuteria paniculata Laxm.
Lupinus guadalupensis Greene
Agrostis gigantea Roth
Plumeria rubra L.
Potentilla pulcherrima Lehm.
Mammillaria craigii G.E.Linds.
Penstemon acuminatus var. latebracteatus Holmgren
Carex douglasii Boott
Eriogonum thomasii Torr.
Hulsea nana A.Gray
Perityle cochisensis (Niles) A.M.Powell
Melampyrum lineare Desr.
Erythrostemon palmeri (S.Watson) Gagnon & G.P.Lewis
Dicliptera resupinata (Vahl) Juss.
Clinopodium menthifolium subsp. ascendens (Jord.) Govaerts
Ceanothus foliosus var. foliosus
Lessingia micradenia var. micradenia
Mitella nuda L.
Bouteloua reflexa Swallen
Solidago velutina subsp. sparsiflora (A.Gray) Semple
Sabulina rubella (Wahlenb.) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Passiflora manicata (A.Juss.) Pers.
Grindelia fraxinipratensis Reveal & Barneby
Ranunculus flammula L.
Cercidiphyllum japonicum Siebold & Zucc.
Raillardella pringlei Greene
Astragalus remotus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Stellaria littoralis Torr.
Eriogonum clavatum Small
Distimake aureus (Kellogg) A.R.Simões & Staples
Potentilla pensylvanica L.
Arctostaphylos crustacea subsp. crustacea
Teucrium cubense Jacq.
Oenothera howardii (A.Nelson) W.L.Wagner
Astragalus lentiginosus var. sierrae M.E.Jones
Dudleya cymosa subsp. crebrifolia K.M.Nakai & Verity
Ficus insipida Willd.
Ranunculus andersonii A.Gray
Chaenactis carphoclinia A.Gray
Atriplex elegans (Moq.) D.Dietr.
Orobanche minor Sm.
Ribes californicum var. hesperium (Mc Clatchie) Jeps.
Coryphantha robustispina subsp. uncinata (L.D.Benson) N.P.Taylor
Aegonychon purpurocaeruleum (L.) Holub
Munzothamnus blairii (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Raven
Peritoma arborea var. globosa (Coville) Iltis
Stylocline micropoides A.Gray
Castilleja chrysantha Greenm.
Hoita orbicularis (Lindl.) Rydb.
Castilleja affinis var. neglecta (Zeile) J.M.Egger
Castilleja pruinosa Fernald
Astragalus bolanderi A.Gray
Amaranthus albus L.
Ribes inerme var. inerme
Calliandra humilis Benth.
Caulanthus crassicaulis (Torr.) S.Watson
Plantago ovata var. fastigiata (E.Morris) S.C.Meyers & Liston
Sedella pumila (Benth.) Britton & Rose
Peteria thompsoniae S.Watson
Arctium lappa L.
Dalea formosa Torr.
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. incompta (Nutt.) D.D.Keck
Astragalus serenoi var. shockleyi (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Chorizanthe howellii Goodman
Streptanthus hispidus A.Gray
Cardamine bellidifolia var. pachyphylla Coville & Leiberg
Physalis grisea (Waterf.) M.Martínez
Cusickiella douglasii (A.Gray) Rollins
Allophyllum divaricatum (Nutt.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Encelia halimifolia Cav.
Carex inops L.H.Bailey
Calyptridium quadripetalum S.Watson
Lilium kelloggii Purdy
Erigeron decumbens Nutt.
Salix cascadensis Cockerell
Dysphania graveolens (Willd.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Euphorbia leucophylla Benth.
Sisyrinchium idahoense E.P.Bicknell
Drymocallis lactea (Greene) Rydb.
Viscainoa geniculata (Kellogg) Greene
Penstemon thurberi Torr.
Quincula lobata (Torr.) Raf.
Thinopyrum intermedium subsp. intermedium
Pleuricospora fimbriolata A.Gray
Eriogonum vimineum Douglas ex Benth.
Ceanothus arboreus Greene
Brodiaea pallida Hoover
Pyrola minor L.
Penstemon azureus var. azureus
Lithophragma tenellum Nutt.
Ipomopsis aggregata subsp. aggregata
Hieracium scouleri Hook.
Ipomopsis effusa (A.Gray) Moran
Lewisia rediviva var. rediviva
Castilleja densiflora var. densiflora
Polemonium eddyense Stubbs
Eriogonum heermannii var. floccosum Munz
Ranunculus eschscholtzii Schltdl.
Ornithopus compressus L.
Frasera umpquaensis M.Peck & Applegate
Agrostis capillaris L.
Brodiaea californica Lindl. ex Lem.
Antigonon leptopus Hook. & Arn.
Erythranthe cinnabarina G.L.Nesom
Asclepias rusbyi (Vail) Woodson
Fatoua villosa (Thunb.) Nakai
Condalia warnockii M.C.Johnst.
Ivesia muirii A.Gray
Acourtia thurberi (A.Gray) Reveal & R.M.King
Vicia faba L.
Townsendia parryi Eaton
Dichondra argentea Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Astragalus tricarinatus A.Gray
Eriogonum elatum var. elatum
Ebenopsis confinis (Standl.) Britton & Rose
Astragalus cusickii A.Gray
Cercocarpus breviflorus S.Watson
Quercus ganderi C.B.Wolf
Ericameria cuneata var. cuneata
Acaena pinnatifida Ruiz & Pav.
Lomatium austiniae (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Calyptridium parryi var. hesseae J.H.Thomas
Eriastrum rosamondense D.Gowen
Eryngium petiolatum Hook.
Galium palustre L.
Rhinotropis cornuta var. fishiae (Parry) J.R.Abbott, 2011
Plagiobothrys reticulatus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Arbutus unedo L.
Echinocereus engelmannii subsp. magnursensis Berresf. & M.Terry
Kickxia spuria (L.) Dumort.
Sphaeralcea angustifolia (Cav.) G.Don
Urtica gracilis subsp. gracilis
Hazardia brickellioides (S.F.Blake) W.D.Clark
Lathyrus nevadensis S.Watson
Asclepias ruthiae Maguire
Brickellia frutescens A.Gray
Asclepias californica subsp. californica
Antennaria marginata Greene
Lomatium marginatum (Benth.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Erigeron aureus Greene
Juncus effusus subsp. pacificus (Fernald & Wiegand) Piper & Beattie
Ivesia kingii S.Watson
Epilobium canum subsp. canum
Myoporum parvifolium R.Br.
Cardamine angulata Hook.
Chaenactis douglasii var. alpina A.Gray
Ericameria palmeri var. pachylepis (H.M.Hall) G.L.Nesom ex M.A.Lane & R.L.Hartm.
Palmerella debilis A.Gray
Muilla transmontana Greene
Erigeron clokeyi var. pinzliae G.L.Nesom
Viguiera dentata (Cavanilles) Spreng.
Mentzelia decapetala (Pursh) Urb. & Gilg
Echeveria craigiana Walther
Carthamus tinctorius L.
Epilobium canum subsp. garrettii (A.Nelson) P.H.Raven
Knautia arvensis (L.) Coult.
Penstemon ambiguus subsp. laevissimus D.D.Keck
Cymopterus cinerarius A.Gray
Caulanthus cooperi (S.Watson) Payson
Blennosperma bakeri Heiser
Lewisia columbiana (Howell ex A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Sidalcea hendersonii S.Watson
Holodiscus discolor var. cedrorum (Raiche & Reveal) D.Potter & Raiche
Hazardia berberidis (A.Gray) Greene
Leptosyne bigelovii (A.Gray) A.Gray
Trichostema arizonicum A.Gray
Diplacus clevelandii (Brandegee) Greene
Atriplex rosea L.
Astragalus vexilliflexus E.Sheld.
Boerhavia coulteri (Hook.fil.) S.Watson
Leptosiphon filipes (Benth.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Sedum oblanceolatum R.T.Clausen
Lilium washingtonianum subsp. purpurascens (Stearn) M.W.Skinner
Trifolium microdon Hook. & Arn.
Erigeron howellii (A.Gray) A.Gray
Centaurea benedicta (L.) L.
Mammillaria armillata K.Brandegee
Opuntia clarkiorum Rebman
Chorizanthe diffusa Benth.
Sorbus sitchensis var. sitchensis
Pleuropogon californicus (Nees) Benth. ex Vasey
Lonicera subspicata var. subspicata
Leucanthemum maximum (Ramond) DC.
Linnaea borealis var. longiflora Torr.
Castilleja parviflora var. oreopola (Greenm.) Ownbey
Chorizanthe pungens var. hartwegiana Reveal & Hardham
Eriogonum incanum Torr. & A.Gray
Penstemon Schmidel
Ericameria pinifolia (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Penstemon wilcoxii Rydb.
Castilleja pilosa var. longispica (A.Nelson) Holmgren
Tidestromia suffruticosa (Torr.) Standl.
Claytonia saxosa Brandegee
Eremalche parryi (Greene) Greene
Hechtia montana Brandegee
Stenocereus alamosensis (Coult.) A.C.Gibson & K.E.Horak
Heterotheca excelsior G.L.Nesom
Eriogonum douglasii Benth.
Gaultheria hispidula (L.) Muhl. ex Bigelow
Thalictrum fendleri var. polycarpum Torr.
Lupinus formosus var. formosus
Rabelera holostea (L.) M.T.Sharples & E.A.Tripp
Garrya veatchii Kellogg
Euphorbia graminea Jacq.
Cypripedium parviflorum Salisb.
Trillium chloropetalum var. chloropetalum
Cymopterus lemmonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Dorn
Pedicularis ornithorhynchos Benth.
Penstemon eriantherus Pursh
Dalea albiflora A.Gray
Tecomaria capensis (Thunb.) Spach
Noccaea fendleri (A.Gray) Holub
Cytisus striatus (Hill) Rothm.
Cirsium fontinale var. campylon (H.Sharsm.) Pilz ex D.J.Keil & C.E.Turner
Verbesina dissita A.Gray
Conioselinum gmelinii (Cham. & Schltdl.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Astragalus calycosus Torr. ex S.Watson
Castilleja campestris var. campestris
Hedera L.
Cymopterus terebinthinus (Hook.) Torr. & Gray
Opuntia microdasys (Lehm.) Pfeiff.
Carex fracta Mack.
Eucalyptus viminalis Labill.
Arrhenatherum elatius (L.) P.Beauv. ex J.Presl & C.Presl.
Cornus glabrata Benth.
Acacia baileyana F.Muell.
Triteleia ixioides subsp. scabra (Greene) L.W.Lenz
Oreocarya flava A.Nelson
Primula clevelandii var. clevelandii
Camelina microcarpa Andrz. ex DC.
Syntrichopappus fremontii A.Gray
Plecostachys serpyllifolia (P.J.Bergius) Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Echinocereus ferreiranus H.E.Gates, 1953
Physaria lepidota subsp. lepidota
Nicolletia trifida Rydb.
Camissoniopsis guadalupensis subsp. clementina (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Zeltnera muehlenbergii (Griseb.) G.Mans.
Adenostoma fasciculatum var. fasciculatum
Castilleja hololeuca Greene
Limnanthes douglasii subsp. nivea (C.T.Mason) C.T.Mason
Sedum laxum (Britton) Berger
Aristida californica var. californica
Chylismia claviformis subsp. integrior (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Cryptantha maritima var. maritima
Quercus palustris Münchh.
Phaseolus maculatus Scheele
Eriogonum heermannii var. humilius (S.Stokes) Reveal
Primula clevelandii var. patula (Greene) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Ambrosia L.
Heuchera merriamii Eastw.
Arctostaphylos myrtifolia Parry
Salix glauca L.
Castilleja subinclusa var. jepsonii (Bacig. & Heckard) J.M.Egger
Clarkia breweri (Gray) Greene
Calystegia purpurata (Greene) Brummitt
Logfia depressa (A.Gray) Holub
Viola lobata subsp. lobata
Arctostaphylos morroensis Wiesl. & Schreib.
Astragalus obscurus S.Watson
Urtica gracilis subsp. holosericea (Nutt.) Weigend
Scirpus cyperinus (L.) Kunth
Cevallia sinuata Lag.
Cleomella obtusifolia Torr. & Frém.
Mammillaria pondii subsp. pondii
Anthemis arvensis L.
Lysimachia vulgaris L.
Berberis dictyota Jeps.
Astragalus zionis M.E.Jones
Opuntia dulcis Engelm.
Astragalus accidens S.Watson
Cirsium remotifolium (Hook.) DC.
Camissonia campestris subsp. campestris
Eucalyptus cladocalyx F.Muell.
Eriogonum deflexum var. deflexum
Mammillaria mazatlanensis subsp. mazatlanensis
Berberis nevinii A.Gray ex A.Gray & S.Watson
Psacalium decompositum (A.Gray) H.Rob. & Brettell
Euphorbia serpillifolia subsp. hirtula (Engelm. ex S.Watson) Oudejans
Erythranthe trinitiensis G.L.Nesom
Harpagonella palmeri A.Gray
Oenothera hartwegii Benth.
Elymus multisetus (J.G.Sm.) Burtt Davy
Astragalus flavus var. argillosus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Perityle lemmonii (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Pelargonium capitatum (L.) L'Hér.
Lathyrus nevadensis subsp. nevadensis
Pyrrocoma apargioides (A.Gray) Greene
Streptanthus barbiger Greene
Searsia lancea (L.fil.) F.A.Barkley
Ammophila Host
Agastache wrightii (Greenm.) Wooton & Standl.
Mirabilis linearis (Pursh) Heimerl
Saxifraga cernua L.
Lonicera periclymenum L.
Rubus L.
Navarretia hamata subsp. parviloba A.G.Day
Comarostaphylis diversifolia subsp. planifolia (Jeps.) G.D.Wallace
Dendromecon harfordii Kellogg
Arctostaphylos obispoensis Eastw.
Corydalis aurea Willd.
Eriogonum grande Greene
Physalis crassifolia var. crassifolia
Erigeron glacialis var. glacialis
Leptosiphon floribundus subsp. floribundus
Streptanthus brachiatus F.W.Hoffm.
Penstemon subulatus M.E.Jones
Castilleja pallescens var. pallescens
Ficus petiolaris subsp. palmeri (S.Watson) Felger
Phlox multiflora A.Nelson
Lupinus albicaulis Douglas
Cirsium rhothophilum S.F.Blake
Chorizanthe spinosa S.Watson
Cactaceae
Triteleia lemmoniae (S.Watson) Greene
Navarretia divaricata (Torr. ex Gray) Greene
Anthoxanthum occidentale (Buckley) Veldkamp
Acaciella angustissima (Mill.) Britton & Rose
Erigeron pumilus Nutt.
Ivesia argyrocoma (Rydb.) Rydb.
Astragalus austiniae A.Gray ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Navarretia mellita (Greene) Greene
Crepis occidentalis Nutt.
Sericocarpus rigidus Lindl.
Physalis peruviana L.
Havardia mexicana (Rose) Britton & Rose
Lupinus latifolius subsp. wigginsii (C.P.Sm.) Kenny & D.B.Dunn
Gilia tenuiflora subsp. amplifaucalis A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Galium mexicanum Kunth
Chromolaena sagittata (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Primula specuicola Rydb.
Eriastrum filifolium (Nutt.) Wooton & Standl.
Erigeron flettii G.N.Jones
Bidens cernua L.
Lygodesmia grandiflora (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Atriplex corrugata S.Watson
Navarretia prostrata (A.Gray) Greene
Calamagrostis canadensis (Michx.) P.Beauv.
Lilium pardalinum subsp. wigginsii (Beane & Vollmer) M.W.Skinner
Hastingsia alba (Durand) S.Watson
Elymus glaucus subsp. glaucus
Bursera hindsiana (Benth.) Engl.
Lycianthes rantonnetii (Carrière ex Lesc.) Bitter
Calycoseris parryi A.Gray
Lupinus duranii Eastw.
Scrophularia desertorum (Munz) R.J.Shaw
Lysimachia europaea subsp. arctica (Fisch.)
Portulaca umbraticola Kunth
Viola clauseniana Baker
Boechera formosa (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Acmispon argyraeus var. argyraeus
Agave sebastiana Greene
Phlox nana Nutt.
Raphanus sativus var. longipinnatus L.H.Bailey
Townsendia scapigera Eaton
Astragalus newberryi A.Gray
Ibervillea sonorae (S.Watson) Greene
Schoenoplectus tabernaemontani (C.C.Gmel.) Palla
Acmispon dendroideus (Greene) Brouillet
Salsola soda L.
Diplacus nanus (Hook. & Arn.) G.L.Nesom
Streptanthus tortuosus var. orbiculatus H.M.Hall
Atriplex suberecta Verdoorn
Lotus L.
Primula cusickiana (A.Gray) Gray
Ipomopsis gunnisonii (Torr. & A.Gray) V.E.Grant
Argemone corymbosa Greene
Astragalus gibbsii Kellogg
Lithophragma campanulatum Howell
Scleranthus annuus L.
Penstemon caespitosus Nutt. ex A.Gray
Fragaria chiloensis subsp. pacifica Staudt
Mariosousa willardiana (Rose) Seigler & Ebinger
Marina orcuttii var. orcuttii
Fritillaria brandegeei Eastw.
Cryptantha barbigera var. barbigera
Trichostema ovatum Curran
Eriogonum giganteum var. compactum Dunkle
Oreostemma alpigenum var. andersonii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Quercus durata var. gabrielensis Nixon & C.H.Müll.
Enceliopsis nudicaulis (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Gilia capitata subsp. capitata
Tridens muticus var. muticus
Boerhavia xanti S.Watson
Malacothamnus aboriginum (B.L.Rob.) Greene
Fritillaria striata Eastw.
Astragalus oophorus S.Watson
Hulsea vestita subsp. gabrielensis Wilken
Plagiobothrys humistratus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum lemmonii S.Watson
Cirsium scariosum var. congdonii (R.J.Moore & Frankton) D.J.Keil
Passiflora pallida L.
Euphorbia schizoloba Engelm.
Hesperidanthus linearifolius (A.Gray) Rydb.
Townsendia florifera (Hook.) A.Gray
Pedicularis parryi A.Gray
Calochortus clavatus var. pallidus (Hoover) P.L.Fiedl. & Zebell
Penstemon rattanii var. kleei (Green) A.Gray
Carex limosa L.
Stebbinsoseris heterocarpa (Nutt.) K.L.Chambers
Linanthus demissus (A.Gray) Greene
Delphinium parryi subsp. parryi
Lobelia anatina E.Wimm.
Psorothamnus arborescens var. minutifolius (Parish) Barneby
Agrimonia striata Michx.
Perityle leptoglossa Harv.Gray ex A.Gray
Downingia bacigalupii Weiler
Rheum rhabarbarum L.
Stenotis greenei (A.Gray) Terrell & H.Rob.
Cyperus papyrus L.
Diplacus parviflorus Greene
Galium verum L.
Packera indecora (Greenm.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Lessingia germanorum Cham.
Castilleja gleasoni Elmer
Oxytropis splendens Douglas
Eschscholzia californica subsp. californica
Triteleia ixioides subsp. ixioides
Linum lewisii var. lewisii
Cirsium wheeleri (A.Gray) Petr.
Delphinium nuttallii A.Gray
Nemacladus Nutt.
Gilia clokeyi Mason
Astragalus andersonii A.Gray
Cerastium texanum Britton
Viola praemorsa subsp. linguifolia (Nutt.) M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen ex M.Peck
Penstemon barbatus var. barbatus
Juncus gerardii Loisel.
Delphinium decorum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Sphaeralcea laxa Wooton & Standl.
Wolffia columbiana H.Karst.
Quercus palmeri Engelm.
Zephyranthes Herb.
Heuchera micrantha var. diversifolia (Rydb.) Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Ribes triste Pall.
Agave sobria Brandegee
Acourtia nana (A.Gray) Reveal & R.M.King
Holcus mollis L.
Pectocarya penicillata (Hook. & Arn.) A.DC.
Eriogonum heermannii var. argense (M.E.Jones) Munz
Mentzelia multiflora (Nutt.) Gray
Atriplex pacifica A.Nelson
Chlorogalum grandiflorum Hoover
Prunus L.
Eriocoma lemmonii subsp. lemmonii
Geranium ×cantabrigiense P.F.Yeo
Plagiobothrys jonesii A.Gray
Mimosa aculeaticarpa var. biuncifera (Benth.) Barneby
Eriogonum androsaceum Benth.
Hedeoma drummondii Benth.
Cirsium hydrophilum var. vaseyi (A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Yucca angustissima var. angustissima
Lathyrus vestitus var. vestitus
Gentiana douglasiana Bong.
Aliciella monoensis J.M.Porter & A.G.Day
Najas guadalupensis (Spreng.) Magnus
Penstemon clevelandii var. connatus Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Penstemon albidus Nutt.
Lappula redowskii var. redowskii
Gentiana newberryi subsp. tiogana (A.Heller) Halda
Sidalcea hickmanii subsp. parishii (B.L.Rob.) C.L.Hitchc.
Liriodendron tulipifera L.
Malacothamnus clementinus (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Kearney
Lithophragma bolanderi A.Gray
Layia leucopappa D.D.Keck
Hoita strobilina (Hook. & Arn.) Rydb.
Opuntia charlestonensis Clokey
Astragalus phoenix Barneby
Ornithopus pinnatus (Mill.) Druce
Muscari neglectum Ten.
Cardamine constancei Detling
Symphyotrichum expansum (Poepp. ex Spreng.) G.L.Nesom
Oxalis debilis Kunth
Euphorbia davidii Subils
Sparganium emersum Rehmann
Dudleya viscida (S.Watson) Moran
Echinocereus arizonicus Rose ex Orcutt
Diplacus Nutt.
Sesbania punicea (Cav.) Benth.
Rubus pubescens Raf.
Brickellia microphylla (Nutt.) A.Gray
Juncus drummondii E.Mey.
Geranium carolinianum L.
Carex raynoldsii Dewey
Acmispon argophyllus var. niveus (Greene) Brouillet
Lomatium grayi (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Lupinus obtusilobus A.Heller
Lewisia cantelovii Howell
Agastache occidentalis (Piper) A.Heller
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. ovalifolium
Claytonia perfoliata subsp. perfoliata
Allium atrorubens var. cristatum (S.Watson) McNeal
Cistus ×purpureus Lam.
Ranunculus hydrocharoides A.Gray
Tauschia stricklandii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Penstemon immanifestus N.H.Holmgren
Amelanchier alnifolia var. semiintegrifolia (Hook.) C.L.Hitchc.
Moringa oleifera Lam.
Eriogonum brevicaule var. laxifolium (Torr. & A.Gray) Reveal
Oenothera albicaulis Fras.
Cryptantha muricata (Hook. & Arn.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Micranthes rufidula Small
Ferocactus gracilis subsp. coloratus (H.E.Gates) N.P.Taylor
Gambelia juncea (Benth.) D.A.Sutton
Astragalus didymocarpus var. dispermus (A.Gray) Jeps.
Eucalyptus camaldulensis Dehnh.
Valeriana sitchensis subsp. scouleri (Rydb.) F.G.Mey.
Potentilla jepsonii var. kluanensis Ertter
Calochortus ciscoensis S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Platanthera limosa Lindl.
Deschampsia danthonioides (Trin.) Benth.
Arctostaphylos montana subsp. ravenii (P.V.Wells) V.T.Parker et al.
Angelica californica Jeps.
Hippophae rhamnoides L.
Forsythia intermedia Zabel
Astragalus purshii var. lectulus (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Heuchera glabra Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Allium peninsulare var. peninsulare
Cryptantha clevelandii Greene
Acanthomintha obovata subsp. cordata Jokerst
Stillingia spinulosa Torr.
Zeltnera davyi (Jeps.) G.Mans.
Lithophragma cymbalaria Torr. & A.Gray
Pediomelum pariense (R.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) J.W.Grimes
Eriogonum mensicola S.Stokes
Castilleja affinis var. contentiosa (J.F.Macbr.) Bacig.
Mimetanthe pilosa (Benth.) Greene
Boykinia rotundifolia Parry ex A.Gray
Carex heteroneura S.Watson
Salicornia bigelovii Torr.
Calycadenia pauciflora A.Gray
Triphysaria versicolor subsp. versicolor
Roldana petasitis (Sims) H.Rob. & Brettell
Arum italicum subsp. neglectum (F.Towns.) Prime
Encelia frutescens (A.Gray) A.Gray
Brodiaea sierrae R.E.Preston
Hulsea vestita subsp. callicarpha (Hall) Wilken
Hesperevax acaulis (Kellogg) Greene
Platanthera aquilonis Sheviak
Acanthoscyphus parishii var. cienegensis (Ertter) Reveal
Eysenhardtia orthocarpa (A.Gray) S.Watson
Penstemon pachyphyllus var. congestus (M.E.Jones) N.H.Holmgren
Soleirolia soleirolii (Req.) Dandy
Eleocharis rostellata (Torr.) Torr.
Ipomopsis polycladon (Torr.) V.E.Grant
Erythronium hendersonii S.Watson
Lilium washingtonianum subsp. washingtonianum
Yucca baccata var. baccata
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. lanosa (DC.) Hall
Sanicula crassicaulis var. crassicaulis
Leucojum aestivum subsp. aestivum
Bastardiastrum cinctum (Brandegee) D.M.Bates
Eleocharis obtusa (Willd.) Schult.
Lithophragma parviflorum var. parviflorum
Echinocereus relictus Wellard
Morus microphylla Buckley
Utricularia gibba L.
Erigeron clokeyi var. clokeyi
Opuntia aurea E.M.Baxter
Trifolium ciliolatum Benth.
Eriogonum deflexum var. nevadense Reveal
Atriplex torreyi (S.Watson) S.Watson
Castilleja peckiana Pennell
Oreocarya celosioides Eastw.
Chaenactis santolinoides Greene
Acmispon wrightii (A.Gray) Brouillet
Leptosiphon melingii (Wiggins) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Frangula californica subsp. californica
Rosa pisocarpa A.Gray
Fritillaria viridea Kellogg
Eucephalus ledophyllus var. covillei (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Petasites frigidus var. frigidus
Drymaria holosteoides Benth.
Silene hookeri Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus alpinus L.
Sarcomphalus obtusifolius (Hook. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Hauenschild
Glandularia latilobata (L.M.Perry) G.L.Nesom
Lepidium nanum S.Watson
Euonymus fortunei (Turcz.) Hand.-Mazz.
Opuntia polyacantha var. polyacantha
Jepsonia malvifolia (Greene) Small
Boechera stricta (Graham) Al-Shehbaz
Suksdorfia ranunculifolia (Hook.) Engl.
Acmispon argophyllus var. adsurgens (Dunkle) Brouillet
Petalonyx thurberi subsp. thurberi
Crupina vulgaris (Pers.) Cass.
Pogogyne abramsii Howell
Pediocactus paradinei B.W.Benson
Ceanothus cuneatus var. ramulosus Greene
Acacia cultriformis A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Oenothera biennis L.
Packera neomexicana var. neomexicana
Sphaeralcea grossulariifolia (Hook. & Arn.) Rydb.
Bursera littoralis León de la Luz & Pérez Navarro
Phaseolus angustissimus A.Gray
Fremontodendron decumbens R.M.Lloyd
Campanula californica (Kellogg) A.Heller
Dimorphotheca Vaill.
Eriogonum wrightii var. trachygonum (Torr. ex Benth.) Jeps.
Bajacalia crassifolia (S.Watson) Loockerman, B.L.Turner & R.K.Jansen
Watsonia meriana (L.) Mill.
Torilis japonica (Houtt.) DC.
Cyperus alternifolius L.
Diplacus pulchellus (Drew ex Greene) G.L.Nesom
Eriogonum pharnaceoides Torr.
Trifolium vesiculosum Savi
Utricularia minor L.
Monarda pectinata Nutt.
Tetradymia axillaris var. longispina (M.E.Jones) Strother
Conocarpus erectus L.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. polyanthum (Benth.) M.E.Jones
Houstonia wrightii A.Gray
Coprosma repens A.Rich.
Potentilla jepsonii var. jepsonii
Eremalche parryi subsp. kernensis (C.B.Wolf) D.M.Bates
Astragalus lentiginosus var. chartaceus M.E.Jones
Mitracarpus floribundus Borhidi & Lozada-Pérez
Abronia angustifolia Greene
Eriastrum wilcoxii (A.Nelson) Mason
Micranthes nidifica (Greene) Small
Sporobolus cryptandrus (Torr.) A.Gray
Delphinium recurvatum Greene
Artemisia constricta Sòn.Garcia, Garnatje, Mc Arthur, Pellicer, S.C.Sand. & Vallès-Xirau
Fragaria ×ananassa (Weston) Rozier
Monarda fistulosa var. menthifolia (Graham) Fernald
Monarda citriodora Cerv. ex Lag.
Lupinus rivularis Douglas ex Lindl.
Loeseliastrum schottii (Torr.) Timbrook
Cassiope mertensiana subsp. californica Piper
Arctostaphylos viscida subsp. pulchella (Howell) P.V.Wells
Potentilla gracilis var. gracilis
Horkelia bolanderi A.Gray
Psorothamnus polydenius var. polydenius
Echinocereus grandis Britton & Rose
Dicoria canescens subsp. brandegeei (A.Gray) Kartesz
Townsendia hookeri Beaman
Langloisia setosissima (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Hieracium umbellatum L.
Ptelea trifoliata L.
Cardamine pensylvanica Muhl.
Castilleja exserta var. latifolia (S.Watson) J.M.Egger
Betula pubescens Ehrh.
Eucephalus breweri (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Clarkia cylindrica (Jeps.) H. & Lewis
Astragalus aequalis Clokey
Monardella viminea Greene
Ipomopsis multiflora (Nutt.) V.E.Grant
Spermolepis infernensis G.L.Nesom
Bonellia macrocarpa subsp. pungens (A.Gray) B.Ståhl & Källersjö
Pogogyne serpylloides (Torr.) A.Gray
Trollius laxus subsp. albiflorus (A.Gray) Á.Löve, D.Löve & B.M.Kapoor
Astragalus tephrodes A.Gray
Boechera breweri (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz
Hulsea vestita A.Gray
Lyrocarpa coulteri Hook. & Harv.
Sphaeralcea fulva Greene
Ivesia webberi A.Gray
Chorizanthe corrugata (Torr.) Torr. & A.Gray
Pectocarya platycarpa (Munz & Johnst.) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Astragalus gambelianus E.Sheld.
Orthocarpus tolmiei Hook. & Arn.
Hoffmannseggia peninsularis (Britton) Wiggins
Dudleya hendrixii S.Mc Cabe & Dodero
Krameria lanceolata Torr.
Asarum marmoratum Piper
Lomatium hooveri (Mathias & Constance) Constance & Ertter
Ribes californicum var. californicum
Arenaria lanuginosa var. saxosa (A.Gray) Zarucchi
Geum macrophyllum var. macrophyllum
Eriogonum ordii S.Watson
Delphinium hesperium subsp. hesperium
Camissoniopsis ignota (Jeps.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Mentha suaveolens Ehrh.
Erigeron clokeyi Cronquist
Erodium brachycarpum (Godr.) Thell.
Echinocereus bonkerae subsp. bonkerae
Astragalus convallarius Greene
Hedysarum occidentale Greene
Impatiens scabrida DC.
Astragalus magdalenae var. peirsonii (Munz & McBurney) Barneby
Johnstonella holoptera (A.Gray) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Coreocarpus sonoranus Sherff
Artemisia vulgaris L.
Arctostaphylos regismontana Eastw.
Festuca idahoensis Elmer
Vicia sativa subsp. sativa
Cirsium eatonii var. clokeyi (S.F.Blake) D.J.Keil
Agoseris heterophylla var. cryptopleura Greene
Prunus emarginata var. emarginata
Dudleya abramsii subsp. setchellii (Jeps.) Moran
Phaseolus grayanus Wooton & Standl.
Poa secunda J.Presl
Hedeoma diffusa Greene
Horkelia californica Cham. & Schltdl.
Saltugilia caruifolia (Abrams) L.A.Johnson
Eriogonum apiculatum S.Watson
Spergularia bocconei (Scheele) Graebn.
Mammillaria dioica subsp. angelensis (R.T.Craig) D.R.Hunt
Brachystigma wrightii (Gray) Pennell
Abutilon mollicomum (Willd.) Sweet
Dimeresia howellii A.Gray
Diplacus cusickioides G.L.Nesom
Arctostaphylos luciana P.V.Wells
Hackelia mundula (Jeps.) Ferris
Linanthus bigelovii subsp. johnsonii J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Penstemon gairdneri var. gairdneri
Berula erecta var. incisa (Torr.) Cronquist
Salvia brandegeei Munz
Meconella denticulata Greene
Castilleja ambigua var. ambigua
Brickellia incana A.Gray
Festuca kingii (S.Watson) Cassidy
Tulbaghia violacea Harv.
Bidens frondosa L.
Asclepias latifolia (Torr.) Raf.
Ammannia coccinea Rottb.
Townsendia jonesii var. tumulosa Reveal
Ceanothus megacarpus var. megacarpus
Chaenactis nevadensis (Kellogg) A.Gray
Hymenopappus flavescens A.Gray
Erythronium shastense D.A.York, J.K.Nelson & D.W.Taylor
Hedeoma nana (Torr.) Briq.
Gentiana algida Pall.
Chloropyron palmatum (Ferris) Tank & J.M.Egger
Chorizanthe fimbriata var. fimbriata
Lysimachia terrestris (L.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Erigeron lonchophyllus Hook.
Lomatium dissectum var. dissectum
Calluna vulgaris (L.) Hull
Arctostaphylos viscida subsp. mariposa (Dudley) P.V.Wells
Carex pellita Muhl. ex Willd.
Mammillaria albicans subsp. albicans
Eulobus crassifolius (Greene) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Astragalus columbianus Barneby
Zizia aptera (A.Gray) Fernald
Claytonia exigua subsp. exigua
Pyrola asarifolia subsp. bracteata (Hook.) Haber
Impatiens balfourii Hook.fil.
Bromus laevipes Shear
Ravenella M.R.Morin, 2020
Gilia nevinii A.Gray ex Lyon
Vicia pulchella Kunth
Abrus precatorius L.
Balsamorhiza incana Nutt.
Ranunculus L.
Tragia laciniata (Torr.) Müll.Arg.
Thamnosma texana (Gray) Torr.
Vahlodea atropurpurea (Wahlenb.) Fr.
Jatropha cinerea (Ortega) Müll.Arg.
Astragalus congdonii S.Watson
Perityle stansburii (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Jacquemontia abutiloides Benth.
Allium schoenoprasum L.
Collinsia heterophylla var. heterophylla
Senecio fremontii var. occidentalis Gray
Prunella vulgaris subsp. lanceolata (W.P.C.Barton) Piper & Beattie
Cistus creticus subsp. creticus
Muscari botryoides (L.) Mill.
Mentzelia nitens Greene
Artemisia filifolia Torr.
Echinochloa colona (L.) Link
Lupinus excubitus var. medius (Jeps.) Munz
Glyceria occidentalis (Piper) J.C.Nelson
Sclerocactus polyancistrus (Engelm. & Bigelow) Britton & Rose
Delphinium gypsophilum Ewan
Cylindropuntia lindsayi (Rebman) Rebman
Dichromanthus aurantiacus (Lex.) Salazar & Soto Arenas
Leptosiphon grandiflorus Benth.
Hintonia latiflora (Sessé & Moc. ex DC.) Bullock
Lomatium thompsonii (Mathias) Cronquist
Astragalus mohavensis S.Watson
Trillium kurabayashii J.D.Freeman
Asclepias angustifolia Schweig.
Angelica tomentosa S.Watson
Antennaria lanata (Hook.) Greene
Erythranthe parishii (Greene) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Brodiaea santarosae T.J.Chester, W.P.Armstr. & Madore
Ageratina herbacea (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Lathyrus sulphureus W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray
Calycadenia fremontii A.Gray
Zostera japonica Asch. & Graebn.
Castilleja brevistyla (Hoover) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Heuchera chlorantha Piper
Lappula squarrosa (Retz.) Dumort.
Blitum capitatum L.
Physaria kingii subsp. kingii
Tropidocarpum gracile Hook.
Iris munzii R.C.Foster
Frasera albicaulis Douglas ex Griseb.
Trifolium cernuum Brot.
Carex lyngbyei Hornem.
Senecio lemmonii A.Gray
Carex kelloggii var. kelloggii
Abronia gracilis Benth.
Microsteris gracilis var. humilior (Hook.) Cronquist
Boerhavia triquetra var. intermedia (M.E.Jones) Spellenb.
Euphorbia tirucalli L.
Arnica nevadensis A.Gray
Garrya fremontii Torr.
Viburnum davidii Franch.
Cytisus multiflorus (L'Hér.) Sweet
Aphyllon californicum (Cham. & Schltdl.) Gray
Astragalus canadensis L.
Salsola L.
Eremogone kingii (S.Watson) Ikonn.
Artemisia cana subsp. bolanderi (A.Gray) G.H.Ward
Ribes cereum var. cereum
Viola primulifolia var. occidentalis A.Gray
Calochortus elegans var. nanus Alph.Wood
Saltugilia splendens subsp. grantii (Brand) L.A.Johnson
Helianthus exilis Gray
Arctostaphylos insularis Greene & Parry
Penstemon arenarius Greene
Castilleja litoralis Pennell
Lycium exsertum A.Gray
Stellaria nitens Nutt.
Gilia scopulorum M.E.Jones
Utricularia macrorhiza Leconte
Hordeum pusillum Nutt.
Aphyllon pinorum (Geyer ex Hook.) A.Gray
Malacothamnus hallii (Eastw.) Kearney
Saussurea americana D.C.Eaton
Acanthomintha lanceolata Curran
Gilia capitata subsp. chamissonis (Greene) V.E.Grant
Salpichroa origanifolia (Lam.) Baill.
Castilleja schizotricha Greenm.
Rudbeckia glaucescens Eastw.
Penstemon watsonii A.Gray
Asclepias californica subsp. greenei Woodson
Platanthera cooperi (S.Watson) R.M.Bateman
Potentilla luteosericea Rydb.
Calochortus kennedyi var. munzii Jeps.
Arctostaphylos ×media Greene
Petrophytum caespitosum subsp. caespitosum
Mangifera indica L.
Gilia tenuiflora subsp. arenaria (Benth.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Lupinus breweri A.Gray
Monolopia gracilens A.Gray
Penstemon arenicola A.Nelson
Carissa macrocarpa (Eckl.) A.DC.
Malperia tenuis S.Watson
Penstemon palmeri var. palmeri
Agave utahensis subsp. kaibabensis (McKelvey) Gentry
Berberis julianae C.K.Schneid.
Lomatium hallii (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Berula erecta (Huds.) Coville
Delphinium leucophaeum Greene
Dasiphora fruticosa subsp. floribunda (Pursh) Kartesz
Lomatium rigidum (M.E.Jones) Jeps.
Hosackia stipularis Benth.
Aristida ternipes Cav.
Ivesia arizonica var. saxosa (Brandegee) Ertter
Symphyotrichum defoliatum (Parish) G.L.Nesom
Stephanomeria exigua subsp. exigua
Polycarpon tetraphyllum var. tetraphyllum
Caulanthus amplexicaulis S.Watson
Lomatium insulare (Eastw.) Munz
Brodiaea stellaris S.Watson
Portulaca suffrutescens Engelm.
Psorothamnus fremontii var. attenuatus Barneby
Spiraea japonica L.fil.
Lessingia micradenia Greene
Eriogonum tiehmii Reveal
Allium monticola Davidson
Lagophylla minor (D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck
Rosa L.
Astragalus whitneyi var. whitneyi
Limnanthes bakeri Howell
Acamptopappus sphaerocephalus var. hirtellus S.F.Blake
Rudbeckia hirta L.
Chlorogalum pomeridianum var. divaricatum (Lindl.) Hoover
Calochortus excavatus Greene
Diplacus calycinus Eastw.
Atriplex lindleyi Moq.
Betula glandulosa Michx.
Isocoma tenuisecta Greene
Collinsia callosa Parish
Malva subovata subsp. bicolor (Rouy) Iamonico
Erigeron inornatus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Mentzelia longiloba J.Darl.
Ceanothus incanus Torr. & A.Gray
Heterotheca polothrix G.L.Nesom
Streptanthus diversifolius S.Watson
Acaena pinnatifida var. californica (Bitter) Jeps.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. crassifolia (Jeps.) P.V.Wells
Passiflora caerulea L.
Erythrostemon pannosus (Brandegee) Gagnon & G.P.Lewis
Trautvetteria caroliniensis var. occidentalis (A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Artemisia campestris subsp. pacifica (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Calochortus Pursh
Helianthus L.
Celtis iguanaea (Jacq.) Sarg.
Pyrrocoma racemosa var. sessiliflora (Greene) Mayes ex G.K.Br. & D.J.Keil
Poa wheeleri Vasey
Laburnum ×watereri (A.C.Rosenthal & Bermann) Dippel
Malacothrix saxatilis var. saxatilis
Packera pauciflora (Pursh) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Oxalis triangularis A.St.-Hil.
Galactia wrightii A.Gray
Persicaria amphibia var. stipulacea (N.Coleman) H.Hara
Helianthella uniflora (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Ferocactus gracilis subsp. tortulispinus (H.E.Gates) Lodé
Euphorbia gracillima S.Watson
Justicia candicans (Nees) L.D.Benson
Euphrasia nemorosa (Pers.) Wallr.
Viola tricolor L.
Arctostaphylos pacifica Roof
Passiflora tarminiana Coppens & V.E.Barney
Asteraceae
Eriogonum deflexum var. baratum (Elmer) Reveal
Kolkwitzia amabilis Graebn.
Calochortus longibarbatus S.Watson
Montia howellii S.Watson
Lesquerella arizonica S.Watson
Swertia utahensis (M.E.Jones) H.St.John
Ipomopsis aggregata var. arizonica (Greene) S.L.Welsh
Petalostemon candidus (Willd.) Michx.
Robinia neomexicana var. subvelutina (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Lupinus hillii Greene
Lupinus kingii S.Watson
Lupinus barbiger S.Watson
Castilleja miniata Douglas ex Hook.
Gaillardia spathulata A.Gray
Astragalus preussii A.Gray
Gilia tenuiflora Benth.
Ipomopsis aggregata var. macrosiphon (Kearney & Peebles) Dorn
Fallugia paradoxa (D.Don) Endl. ex Torr.
Penstemon comarrhenus A.Gray
Argemone intermedia Sweet
Asclepias capricornu subsp. occidentalis Woodson
Physalis fendleri Gray
Ranunculaceae
Populus balsamifera subsp. trichocarpa (Torr. & A.Gray) Brayshaw
Aloe saponaria (Aiton) Haw.
Gentianopsis simplex (A.Gray) Iltis
Mahonia repens (Lindl.) G.Don
Gayophytum decipiens F.H.Lewis & Szweyk.
Poa stenantha Trin.
Hazardia vernicosa (Brandegee) W.D.Clark
Tonestus graniticus (Tiehm & L.M.Shultz) G.L.Nesom & D.R.Morgan
Menodora glabrescens Chumley
Gayophytum ramosissimum Torr. & A.Gray
Syrmatium argophyllum (A.Gray) Greene
Franseria arborescens (Mill.) Brandegee
Conyza coulteri A.Gray
Muhlenbergia straminea Hitchc.
Potentilla viscidula Rydb.
Heterosperma xanti A.Gray
Oenothera cespitosa subsp. navajoensis W.L.Wagner, Stockh. & W.M.Klein
Cinna latifolia (Trevir.) Griseb.
Loeselia involucrata G.Don
Chorizanthe interposita Goodman
Pelucha trifida S.Watson
Senecio sylvaticus L.
Eriogonum preclarum Reveal
Malacothrix californica DC.
Eriogonum cedrorum Reveal & Raiche
Rhus laurina Nutt.
Gonolobus gonoloboides (Greenm.) Woodson
Swertia radiata (Kellogg) Kuntze
Eryngium alismifolium Greene
Hesperolinon micranthum (A.Gray) Small
Asclepias subaphylla Woodson
Epilobium ciliatum subsp. ciliatum
Purshia mexicana (D.Don) S.L.Welsh
Oenothera hartwegii subsp. fendleri (A.Gray) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Trachypogon secundus (J.Presl) Scribn.
Achnatherum thurberianum (Piper) Barkworth
Machaeranthera tanacetifolia (Kunth) Nees
Achnatherum P.Beauv.
Machaeranthera canescens (Pursh) A.Gray
Monolepis nuttalliana (Roem. & Schult.) Greene
Penstemon anguineus Eastw.
Koenigia L.
Oenothera brachycarpa A.Gray
Coreocarpus parthenioides Benth.
Poa secunda subsp. secunda
Alopecurus L.
Orthocarpus purpurascens Benth.
Eragrostis cilianensis (All.) Janch.
Eriogonum polifolium Benth.
Orobanche multicaulis subsp. multicaulis
Eulobus californicus Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Cenchrus multiflorus J.Presl
Heteropogon contortus (L.) P.Beauv. ex Roem. & Schult.
Dryopetalon palmeri (S.Watson) O.E.Schulz
Muhlenbergia sinuosa Swallen
Boerhavia intermedia M.E.Jones
Achnatherum pinetorum (M.E.Jones) Barkworth
Panicum bulbosum Kunth
Elymus arizonicus (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Gould
Brickellia peninsularis Brandegee
Aster foliaceus var. apricus Gray
Andropogon barbinodis Lag.
Phalaris angusta Nees ex Trin.
Cryptantha pterocarya var. purpusii Jeps.
Pseudognaphalium luteoalbum (L.) Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Verbena robusta Greene
Clinopodium ganderi (Epling) Govaerts
Lloydia serotina (L.) Rchb.
Blepharoneuron shepherdii (Vasey) P.M.Peterson & Annable
Chaenactis cusickii A.Gray
Achnatherum hymenoides (Roem. & Schult.) Barkworth
Jacquinia macrocarpa subsp. pungens (A.Gray) B.Ståhl
Ericameria nauseosa var. bernardina (H.M.Hall) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Brachiaria mutica (Forssk.) Stapf
Allium californicum Rose
Aster adscendens Lindl.
Conyza canadensis var. glabrata (A.Gray) Cronquist
Astragalus oxyphysopsis Barneby
Carex aequalis Notø
Achillea borealis Bong.
Sarcostemma arenarium Benth.
Oenothera cespitosa subsp. marginata (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) Munz
Muhlenbergia arsenei Hitchc.
Pisonia flavescens Standl.
Muhlenbergia arizonica Scribn.
Piptochaetium fimbriatum (Kunth) Hitchc.
Allocarya glabra (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Cleome platycarpa Torr.
Penstemon pratensis Greene
Festuca octoflora Walter
Pleurocoronis gentryi (Wiggins) R.King & H.Rob.
Rhus schiedeana Schltdl.
Polygonum viviparum L.
Muhlenbergia dubia E.Fourn.
Sporobolus contractus Hitchc.
Astragalus nuttallianus var. cedrosensis M.E.Jones
Galium californicum Hook. & Arn.
Penstemon platyphyllus Rydb.
Bromus berteroanus Colla
Salvia cedrosensis Greene
Betula occidentalis var. fecunda Fernald
Eriogonum elongatum var. areorivum Reveal
Bouteloua radicosa (E.Fourn.) Griffiths
Penstemon ellipticus Greene
Aphanosperma sinaloensis (Leonard & Gentry) T.F.Daniel
Poa leptocoma Trin.
Muhlenbergia montana (Nutt.) Hitchc.
Packera neomexicana W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Festuca Tourn. ex L.
Mimosa purpurascens B.L.Rob.
Panicum dichotomiflorum Michx.
Leptochloa panicea subsp. brachiata (Steud.) N.Snow
Sphaeralcea parvifolia A.Nelson
Aristida californica Thurb.
Brahea brandegeei (Purpus) H.E.Moore
Vulpia C.C.Gmel.
Eriogonum capillare Small
Lepidium alyssoides var. eastwoodiae (Wooton) Rollins
Fimbristylis autumnalis (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Cleome serrulata Pursh
Panicum hirticaule J.Presl
Forestiera phillyreoides (Benth.) Torr.
Coulterella capitata Vasey & Rose
Mahonia Nutt.
Poa secunda var. scabrella (Thurb.) Soreng
Sabal uresana Trel.
Oenothera pallida subsp. trichocalyx (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Munz & W.M.Klein
Cynanchum watsonianum Woodson
Poa secunda var. nevadensis (Vasey) Soreng
Aristida adscensionis var. decolorata (E.Fourn.) Beetle
Poa fendleriana subsp. longiligula (Scribn. & T.A.Williams) Soreng
Panicum hallii Vasey
Erigeron compositus var. glabratus Macoun
Phalaris caroliniana Walter
Ottleya nivea (S.Watson) D.D.Sokoloff
Muhlenbergia glauca (Nees) Mez
Vallesia glabra (Cav.) Link
Frankenia palmeri S.Watson
Pennisetum Rich.
Adenophyllum speciosum (A.Gray) Strother
Baccharis glutinosa Pers.
Oryzopsis hymenoides (Roem. & Schult.) Ricker
Viola vallicola A.Nelson
Poa cusickii subsp. epilis (Scribn.) W.A.Weber
Coreocarpus involutus Greene
Ligusticum apiifolium (Nutt.) A.Gray
Aster occidentalis (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Brickellia megaphylla M.E.Jones ex M.E.Jones, 1933
Syrmatium nudatum Greene
Cathestecum brevifolium Swallen
Brachiaria arizonica (Scribn. & Merr.) S.T.Blake
Bouteloua hirsuta var. hirsuta
Poa glauca Vahl
Cleome lutea Hook.
Aira L.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. smallianum (A.Heller) S.Stokes
Boechera rectissima (Greene) Al-Shehbaz
Aristida peninsularis Hitchc.
Muhlenbergia texana Buckley
Panicum alatum var. minus (Andersson) Zuloaga & Morrone
Forestiera neomexicana A.Gray
Aristida purpurea var. nealleyi (Vasey) Allred
Monardella odoratissima var. discolor (Greene) H.St.John
Bromus richardsonii Link
Aristida sorzogonensis J.Presl
Psorothamnus fremontii var. fremontii
Oenothera kunthiana (Spach) Munz
Eragrostis Wolf
Poa pringlei Scribn.
Stipa L.
Carex bolanderi Olney
Camissoniopsis confusa (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Prunus ×pugetensis Jacobson & Zika
Polanisia dodecandra subsp. uniglandulosa (Cav.) Iltis
Muhlenbergia alopecuroides (Griseb.) P.M.Peterson & Columbus
Sibara angelorum (S.Watson) Greene
Crepis nana Richards.
Calyptridium parryi A.Gray
Sisyrinchium douglasii A.Dietr.
Arenaria rubella (Wahlenb.) Sm.
Mimulus aurantiacus Renjifo
Carex incurviformis Mack.
Idria columnaris (Kellogg) Kellogg
Nassella formicarum (Delile) Barkworth
Eleusine indica (L.) Gaertn.
Deinandra greeneana (Rose) B.G.Baldwin
Hesperochloa kingii (S.Watson) Rydb.
Diplachne fusca subsp. uninervia (J.Presl) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Echinopepon minimus (S.Watson) S.Watson
Eragrostis intermedia Hitchc.
Mimosopsis moniliformis Britton & Rose
Brachiaria fasciculata var. reticulata (Torr.) Beetle
Blepharoneuron tricholepis (Torr.) Nash
Poa fendleriana subsp. fendleriana
Aristida L.
Hedera algeriensis Hibberd
Poa pratensis subsp. agassizensis (B.Boivin & D.Löve) Roy L.Taylor & MacBryde
Asclepias cryptoceras S.Watson
Oenothera primiveris A.Gray
Adenophyllum cooperi (A.Gray) Strother
Poa palustris L.
Panicum capillare L.
Setaria leucopila (Scribn. & Merr.) K.Schum.
Silene oregana S.Watson
Tridens muticus (Torr.) Nash
Stipa occidentalis Thurb. ex S.Watson
Madia gracilis subsp. gracilis
Schaefferia pilosa Standl.
Sphaeralcea orcuttii Rose
Penstemon scariosus var. scariosus
Eleocharis montevidensis Kunth
Tephrosia palmeri S.Watson
Poa cusickii subsp. pallida Soreng
Trifolium grayi Lojac.
Calacanthus T.Anderson ex Benth. & Hook.fil.
Malvastrum bicuspidatum (S.Watson) Rose
Lactuca L.
Poa reflexa Vasey & Scribn.
Agrostis L.
Haplopappus foliosus DC.
Streptanthella longirostris (S.Watson) Rydb.
Vernonia palmeri Rose
Argythamnia brandegeei Millsp.
Thysanocarpus curvipes var. eradiatus Jeps.
Heteropogon melanocarpus (Elliott) Benth.
Iresine angustifolia Euphrasén
Torreyochloa pallida var. pauciflora (J.Presl) J.I.Davis
Penstemon deustus Douglas ex Lindl.
Elionurus muticus (Spreng.) Kuntze
Ottleya grandiflora (Benth.) D.D.Sokoloff
Isocoma menziesii var. menziesii
Oenothera cespitosa subsp. crinita (Munz) Munz
Scirpus Tourn. ex L.
Ericameria martirensis Wiggins
Aristida adscensionis var. modesta Hack.
Parkinsonia florida subsp. peninsulare (Rose) J.E.Hawkins & Felger
Lepidium virginicum var. pubescens (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Amsinckia tessellata var. tessellata
Oxytheca trilobata A.Gray
Coreocarpus dissectus (Benth.) S.F.Blake
Cardamine umbellata Greene
Jacquemontia eastwoodiana I.M.Johnst.
Randia megacarpa Brandegee
Poa alpina subsp. alpina
Anemone globosa (Torrey & A.Gray) Nuttall ex A.Heller
Deschampsia danthonioides (Trinius) Munro
Poa stenantha var. stenantha
Guilleminea densa (Willd.) Moq.
Eriogonum crosbyae Reveal
Eryngium nasturtiifolium Juss. ex F.Delaroche
Clematis ligusticifolia Nutt.
Panicum plenum Hitchc. & Chase
Poa iconia Azn.
Setaria liebmannii E.Fourn.
Bernardia viridis Millsp.
Parthenice mollis A.Gray
Cenchrus myosuroides Kunth
Oenothera podocarpa (Wooton & Standl.) Krakos & W.L.Wagner
Lithophragma parviflorum (Hook.) Nutt.
Gayophytum heterozygum F.H.Lewis & Szweyk.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. ceruminosus H.M.Hall & Clem.
Cucurbita pepo L.
Eriochloa aristata Vasey
Aldama cordifolia (A.Gray) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Poa limosa Scribn. & T.A.Williams
Chorizanthe pulchella Brandegee
Linanthus lemmonii (A.Gray) Greene
Aristida hamulosa Henrard
Muhlenbergia longiligula Hitchc.
Eremothera boothii subsp. decorticans (Hook. & Arn.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Muhlenbergia pungens Thurb. ex A.Gray
Populus angustifolia James
Franseria ambrosioides Cav.
Bouteloua rothrockii Vasey
Digitaria ciliaris (Retz.) Koeler
Luzula parviflora subsp. parviflora
Leontodon saxatilis subsp. longirostris (Finch & P.D.Sell) P.Silva
Ziziphus amole (Sessé & Moc.) M.C.Johnst.
Dodecatheon clevelandii var. gracile (Greene) Reveal
Lepidium montanum Nutt.
Dyssodia acerosa DC.
Chylismia multijuga Small
Hordeum depressum (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Rydb.
Podagrostis thurberiana (Hitchc.) Hultén
Oenothera villosa subsp. strigosa (Rydb.) W.Dietr. & Raven
Lotus purshianus var. purshianus
Ipomopsis pringlei (Gray) W.C.Martin & C.R.Hutchins
Elytraria imbricata (Vahl) Pers.
Setaria grisebachii E.Fourn.
Muhlenbergia wrightii Vasey ex J.M.Coult.
Aster alpigenus (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Lupinus pusillus subsp. intermontanus (A.Heller) D.B.Dunn
Epilobium hallianum Hausskn.
Encelia stenophylla Greene
Eragrostis mexicana (Hornem.) Link
Sagittaria longiloba Engelm. ex J.G.Sm.
Pappostipa speciosa (Trin. & Rupr.) Romasch.
Oenothera pallida subsp. pallida
Abutilon dugesii S.Wats
Hofmeisteria fasciculata var. pubescens B.L.Rob.
Leptodactylon pungens subsp. hallii (Parish) H.Mason
Stephanomeria lactucina A.Gray
Acalypha comonduana Millsp.
Distichlis spicata subsp. spicata
Brickellia arguta B.L.Rob.
Chloris virgata Sw.
Bouteloua breviseta Vasey
Setaria macrostachya Kunth
Orobanche cooperi Beck, 1890
Antennaria Gaertn.
Hordeum murinum subsp. glaucum (Steud.) Tzvelev
Arabis perennans S.Watson
Eysenhardtia polystachya (Ortega) Sarg.
Crypsis schoenoides (L.) Lam.
Plantago wrightiana Decne.
Thermopsis macrophylla Hook. & Arn.
Delphinium ×occidentale (S.Watson) S.Watson
Perityle lobata (Rydb.) I.M.Johnst.
Elymus L.
Cornus sessilis Torr. ex Durand
Calamagrostis neglecta subsp. inexpansa (A.Gray) Tzvelev
Cenchrus echinatus L.
Quercus tuberculata Liebm.
Saxifraga hyperborea R.Br.
Koeleria micrathera (É.Desv.) Griseb.
Glandularia pulchella (Sweet) Tronc.
Arctostaphylos bicolor (Nutt.) A.Gray
Pennisetum setaceum (Forssk.) Chiov.
Acacia constricta A.Gray
Prosopis juliflora (Sw.) DC.
Amsinckia eastwoodiae J.F.Macbr.
Syrmatium glabrum Vogel
Glandularia bipinnatifida var. ciliata (Benth.) B.L.Turner
Strelitzia nicolai Regel & Körn.
Amauria rotundifolia Benth.
Eucalyptus lehmannii (Schauer) Benth.
Cuscuta veatchii Brandegee
Veronica catenata Pennell
Xanthisma gracile (Nutt.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Castilleja angustifolia var. dubia A.Nelson
Potentilla palustris (L.) Scop.
Caesalpinia Plum. ex L.
Anagallis arvensis L.
Narcissus tazetta L.
Viguiera laciniata A.Gray
Datura innoxia Mill.
Trientalis latifolia Hook.
Scopolia Jacq.
Abronia nana var. nana
Mammillaria wrightii subsp. wilcoxii (Toumey ex K.Schum.) D.R.Hunt
Sidalcea oregana subsp. oregana
Potentilla pseudosericea Rydb.
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa var. major (Engelm.) Pinkava
Ipomopsis spicata subsp. tridactyla (Rydb.) Wilken & R.L.Hartm.
Zea mays L.
Calochortus greenei S.Watson
Penstemon roezlii Regel
Lomatium suksdorfii (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Proboscidea louisianica (Mill.) Thell.
Carex stipata var. stipata
Astragalus douglasii var. perstrictus (Rydb.) Munz
Astragalus asclepiadoides M.E.Jones
Phlox dolichantha A.Gray
Physaria tenella (A.Nelson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Eleocharis geniculata (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Allophyllum gilioides subsp. gilioides
Carex brunnescens (Pers.) Poir.
Aira praecox L.
Cicendia quadrangularis (Lam.) Griseb.
Cryptantha pterocarya f. pseudocycloptera M.E.Mabry & M.G.Simpson
Prunus tomentosa Thunb.
Stellaria crispa Cham. & Schltdl.
Sanicula hoffmannii (R.H.Shan & Constance) Bell
Narcissus papyraceus Ker Gawl.
Portulaca grandiflora Hook.
Valeriana sitchensis subsp. sitchensis
Micranthes occidentalis (S.Watson) Small
Iris hartwegii subsp. pinetorum (Eastw.) L.W.Lenz
Chorizanthe procumbens Nutt.
Crassula swaziensis Schönl.
Aphyllon parishii subsp. parishii
Juncus balticus subsp. ater (Rydb.) Snogerup
Boerhavia spicata Choisy
Agave ajoensis W.C.Hodgs.
Viola lobata var. integrifolia S.Watson
Bromus briziformis Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Astragalus trichopodus var. antisellii (A.Gray) Jeps.
Ranunculus bonariensis var. trisepalus (Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.) Lourteig
Asclepias cutleri Woodson
Juncus longistylis Torr.
Antennaria rosulata Rydb.
Bloomeria crocea var. aurea (Kellogg) Ingram
Euphorbia xanti Engelm. ex Boiss.
Fumaria officinalis L.
Sidalcea campestris Greene
Vicia villosa subsp. varia (Host) Corb.
Aphyllon corymbosum (Rydb.) A.C.Schneid.
Idahoa scapigera (Hook.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Pediomelum rhombifolium (Torr. & A.Gray) Rydb.
Penstemon heterophyllus var. australis Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Sidalcea malachroides (Hook. & Arn.) Gray
Ferocactus fordii subsp. fordii
Juncus breweri Engelm.
Bromus sterilis L.
Zannichellia palustris L.
Glyptopleura setulosa A.Gray
Clarkia gracilis subsp. tracyi (Jeps.) Abdul Hameed & R.Snow
Dudleya crassifolia Dodero & M.G.Simpson
Castilleja angustifolia var. flavescens (Pennell ex Edwin) Holmgren
Mammillaria bocensis R.T.Craig
Castilleja cinerea A.Gray
Calochortus coxii M.R.Godfrey & Callahan
Abronia ammophila Greene
Sambucus nigra L.
Malacothrix foliosa subsp. philbrickii W.S.Davis
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. sonomensis (Kruckeb.) M.S.Mayer & D.W.Taylor
Streptanthus carinatus subsp. arizonicus (S.Watson) Kruckeb., Rodman & Worth.
Clematis ligusticifolia var. ligusticifolia
Ranunculus canus Benth.
Agave polianthiflora Gentry
Coryphantha recurvata (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Lepechinia fragrans (Greene) Epling
Astragalus purshii var. tinctus M.E.Jones
Penstemon pseudoputus (Crosswh.) N.H.Holmgren
Juncus articulatus L.
Erysimum capitatum var. angustatum (Greene) Rossbach
Astragalus arizonicus A.Gray
Ulmus parvifolia Jacq.
Galium martirense Dempster & Stebbins
Youngia japonica (L.) DC.
Eriogonum alpinum Engelm.
Reynoutria sachalinensis (F.Schmidt) Nakai
Veronica canbyi (Pennell) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Loeflingia squarrosa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Coryphantha recurvata subsp. recurvata
Lathyrus brachycalyx Rydb.
Deinandra lobbii (Greene) Greene
Cirsium douglasii DC.
Pseudognaphalium beneolens (A.Davidson) Anderb.
Phellodendron amurense Rupr.
Calochortus westonii Eastw.
Ceanothus martinii M.E.Jones
Bouteloua chondrosioides (Kunth) Benth. ex S.Watson
Eriogonum brachyanthum Coville
Cyperus sphaerolepis Boeckeler
Ayenia filiformis S.Watson
Beta vulgaris L.
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. congesta
Cerastium fontanum Baumg.
Petroselinum crispum (Mill.) Fuss
Trifolium cyathiferum Lindl.
Wyethia ×cusickii Piper
Gilia ochroleuca M.E.Jones
Cylindropuntia ganderi subsp. catavinensis (Rebman) U.Guzmán
Bletia Ruiz & Pav.
Garrya buxifolia A.Gray
Pandorea jasminoides (Lindl.) Schumann
Arenaria serpyllifolia L.
Pedicularis bracteosa var. latifolia (Pennell) Cronquist
Solanum lumholtzianum B.L.Rob.
Muscari armeniacum H.J.Veitch
Vachellia farnesiana (L.) Wight & Arn.
Calliandra haematocephala Hassk.
Eriogonum flavum var. piperi (Greene) M.E.Jones
Kalmia procumbens (L.) Gift, Kron & P.F.Stevens
Stephanomeria virgata subsp. pleurocarpa (Greene) Gottlieb
Impatiens noli-tangere L.
Malacothrix foliosa A.Gray ex Lyon
Sarracenia purpurea L.
Penstemon humilis var. obtusifolius (Pennell) Reveal
Cylindropuntia davisii (Engelm. & Bigelow) F.M.Knuth
Argemone albiflora Hornem.
Gilia brecciarum M.E.Jones
Polemonium foliosissimum var. foliosissimum
Mentzelia hirsutissima S.Watson
Commelina diffusa Burm.f.
Coreopsis tinctoria Nutt.
Macroptilium gibbosifolium (Ortega) A.Delgado
Cynosurus cristatus L.
Mentzelia isolata Gentry
Petasites frigidus var. sagittatus (Banks ex Pursh) Chern.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. malviflora
Grusonia emoryi (Engelm.) Pinkava
Sorghum bicolor (L.) Moench
Eriastrum signatum D.Gowen
Populus nigra L.
Sonchus asper subsp. asper
Delphinium hesperium A.Gray
Astragalus leucolobus Parry ex M.E.Jones
Prunus ilicifolia subsp. lyonii (Eastw.) P.H.Raven
Lobelia pedunculata R.Br.
Brickellia oblongifolia var. linifolia (D.C.Eaton) B.L.Rob.
Phlox viscida E.Nelson
Astragalus coltonii M.E.Jones
Astragalus whitneyi var. siskiyouensis (Rydb.) Barneby
Mortonia scabrella A.Gray
Imperata brevifolia Vasey
Eriogonum bicolor M.E.Jones
Eriogonum nudum var. westonii (S.Stokes) J.T.Howell
Verbesina longifolia (A.Gray) A.Gray
Delphinium patens subsp. patens
Diplacus cusickii (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Penstemon bicolor (Brandegee) Clokey & D.D.Keck
Papaver cambricum L.
Populus fremontii subsp. fremontii
Veronica schizantha (Piper) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Echium plantagineum L.
Gaultheria humifusa (Graham) Rydb.
Diplacus vandenbergensis (D.M.Thomps.) G.L.Nesom
Hieracium fendleri Sch.Bip.
Cicuta maculata var. bolanderi (S.Watson) G.A.Mulligan
Salvia elegans Vahl
Allium scilloides Douglas ex S.Watson
Salicornia rubra A.Nelson
Tetrapanax papyrifer (Hook.) K.Koch
Senna confinis (Greene) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Carpobrotus N.E.Br.
Arctostaphylos purissima subsp. globosa V.T.Parker & M.C.Vasey
Hyacinthoides non-scripta (L.) Chouard ex Rothm.
Castilleja parviflora var. olympica (G.N.Jones) Ownbey
Tolmiea diplomenziesii Judd, Soltis & P.S.Soltis
Asclepias incarnata L.
Asclepias leptopus I.M.Johnst.
Deinandra conjugens (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Lonicera hispidula var. vacillans (Benth.) A.Gray
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. ludoviciana
Ribes marshallii Greene
Antennaria anaphaloides Rydb.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus var. rigidus Munz
Lepidium thurberi Wooton
Eriogonum jamesii Benth.
Hofmeisteria fasciculata (Benth.) Walp.
Aira caryophyllea var. caryophyllea
Berberis higginsiae Munz
Eurybia conspicua (Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Galium andrewsii subsp. gatense (Dempster) Dempster & Stebbins
Viola charlestonensis M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Silene campanulata subsp. glandulosa C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Castilleja parviflora var. albida (Pennell) Ownbey
Pilosella arguta (Nutt.) Sch.Bip
Agave deserti subsp. pringlei (Engelm. ex Baker) Gentry
Lagascea decipiens Hemsl.
Cydonia oblonga Mill.
Penstemon cyananthus var. subglaber (A.Gray) N.H.Holmgren
Euphorbia ocellata Durand & Hilg.
Holocarpha macradenia (DC.) Greene
Argemone munita subsp. rotundata (Rydb.) G.B.Ownbey
Ceanothus cuneatus var. cuneatus
Camissonia kernensis subsp. gilmanii (Munz) P.H.Raven
Luzula subsessilis (S.Watson) Buchenau
Calamagrostis stricta (Timm) Koeler
Castilleja praeterita Heckard & Bacig.
Boechera californica (Rollins) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Carex capitata Sol.
Frangula rubra (Greene) Grubov
Polygonum arenastrum Boreau
Clarkia concinna subsp. concinna
Trifolium monanthum A.Gray
Evolvulus nuttallianus Roem. & Schult.
Cardamine nuttallii var. gemmata (Greene) Rollins
Eucalyptus cinerea F.Muell. ex Benth.
Cottsia linearis (Wiggins) W.R.Anderson & C.Davis
Penstemon spectabilis subsp. subinteger D.D.Keck
Ficus petiolaris Kunth
Eremogone aculeata (S.Watson) Ikonn.
Penstemon gairdneri Hook.
Trichostema micranthum A.Gray
Carex idahoa L.H.Bailey
Erigeron concinnus (Hook. & Arn.) Torr. & A.Gray
Arctostaphylos patula subsp. gankinii M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Physalis longifolia Nutt.
Acmispon distichus (Greene) Brouillet
Pinguicula macroceras Pall. ex Link
Packera flettii (Wiegand) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Acacia paradoxa DC.
Perityle megalocephala var. megalocephala
Ranunculus bulbosus L.
Parapholis incurva (L.) C.E.Hubb.
Hosackia incana Torr.
Cocos nucifera L.
Frasera neglecta H.M.Hall
Cordylanthus nevinii A.Gray
Astragalus insularis var. harwoodii Munz & McBurney
Aristida adscensionis L.
Cirsium ochrocentrum var. martinii (Barlow-Irick) D.J.Keil
Erythranthe scouleri (Hook.) G.L.Nesom
Cirsium scariosum var. coloradense (Rydb.) D.J.Keil
Stanleya pinnata var. pinnata
Helianthus californicus DC.
Helianthus niveus subsp. niveus
Penstemon leonardii var. higginsii Neese
Hymenoxys bigelovii (A.Gray) K.F.Parker
Penstemon longiflorus (Pennell) S.L.Clark
Astragalus flavus var. flavus
Malacothrix sonchoides (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Epilobium siskiyouense (Munz) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Pseudobahia heermannii (Durand) Rydb.
Centaurea diluta Aiton
Physaria purpurea (A.Gray) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Lomatium columbianum Mathias & Constance
Clinopodium menthifolium (Host) Stace
Calochortus elegans var. selwayensis (H.St.John) Ownbey
Physaria ludoviciana (Nutt.) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Ligustrum japonicum Thunb.
Diplacus ovatus (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Horkelia tridentata Torr.
Phlox hoodii subsp. canescens (Torr. & A.Gray) Wherry
Ipomopsis roseata (Rydb.) V.E.Grant
Aronia melanocarpa (Michx.) Elliott
Draba pedicellata var. pedicellata
Deinandra pentactis (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Carex leptopoda Mack.
Arctotheca calendula (L.) Levyns
Isocoma acradenia var. eremophila (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Cryptantha barbigera var. fergusoniae J.F.Macbr.
Eriogonum palmerianum Reveal
Calyptridium roseum S.Watson
Monardella linoides A.Gray
Eriogonum microtheca var. laxiflorum Hook.
Chaenactis thompsonii Cronquist
Symphoricarpos albus var. albus
Juncus cooperi Engelm.
Veronica peregrina L.
Bromus japonicus Houtt.
Linanthus maculatus subsp. emaculatus J.M.Porter, D.S.Bell & R.Patt.
Bursera simaruba (L.) Sarg.
Acer palmatum Thunb.
Primula austrofrigida (K.L.Chambers) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Spirodela polyrhiza (L.) Schleid.
Astragalus iodanthus var. iodanthus
Erythronium pluriflorum Shevock, Bartel & G.A.Allen
Choisya arizonica Standl.
Cuscuta tuberculata Brandegee
Utricularia intermedia Hayne
Delphinium patens subsp. hepaticoideum Ewan
Hazardia whitneyi (A.Gray) Greene
Chrysosplenium glechomifolium Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Ipomoea plummerae A.Gray
Lonicera sempervirens L.
Viola hallii A.Gray
Astragalus geyeri var. geyeri
Cotoneaster divaricatus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Muehlenbeckia complexa (A.Cunn.) Meisn.
Astragalus californicus (A.Gray) Greene
Funastrum clausum (Jacq.) Schltr.
Suaeda esteroa Ferren & S.A.Whitmore
Justicia longii Hilsenb.
Lomatium ambiguum (Nutt.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Penstemon humilis var. humilis
Lathyrus graminifolius (S.Watson) T.G.White
Condalia globosa I.M.Johnst.
Chorizanthe cuspidata S.Watson
Lathyrus pauciflorus Fernald
Goodyera repens (L.) R.Br.
Berberis vulgaris L.
Eriocoma webberi Thurb.
Erythranthe glaucescens (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Hesperevax sparsiflora var. sparsiflora
Astragalus oophorus var. lavinii Barneby
Filipendula occidentalis (S.Watson) Howell
Comastoma tenellum (Rottb.) Toyok.
Ruellia californica (Rose) I.M.Johnst.
Gilia achilleifolia subsp. multicaulis (Benth.) V.E.Grant & A.D.Grant
Pleuropogon refractus (A.Gray) Benth. ex Vasey
Penstemon fruticosus var. fruticosus
Allophyllum integrifolium (Brand) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Phlox longifolia subsp. longifolia
Pectocarya linearis (Ruiz & Pav.) DC.
Stevia serrata Cav.
Deschampsia elongata (Hook.) Munro
Geranium pusillum L.
Boechera breweri subsp. shastaensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Lomatium serpentinum (M.E.Jones) Mathias
Hemizonia congesta subsp. congesta
Euphorbia pediculifera var. pediculifera
Kumlienia hystricula (A.Gray) Greene
Lomatium junceum Barneby & N.H.Holmgren
Malaxis macrostachya (Lex.) Kuntze
Gypsophila paniculata L.
Agave sobria subsp. roseana (Trel.) Gentry
Astragalus drummondii Douglas ex Hook.
Grindelia stricta var. platyphylla (Greene) M.A.Lane
Ribes inerme Rydb.
Penstemon dolius var. dolius
Erythrostemon placidus (Brandegee) Gagnon & G.P.Lewis
Deinandra minthornii (Jeps.) B.G.Baldwin
Astragalus curtipes A.Gray
Heterotheca villosa var. foliosa (Nutt.) Harms
Fraxinus gooddingii Little
Chamaechaenactis scaposa (Eastw.) Rydb.
Raillardella argentea (A.Gray) A.Gray
Sagina saginoides (L.) Karst.
Lessingia nemaclada Greene
Lycium shockleyi A.Gray
Oxytropis oreophila A.Gray
Arctomecon humilis Coville
Erigeron blochmaniae Greene
Cylindropuntia molesta (Brandegee) F.M.Knuth
Pedicularis procera A.Gray
Carex filifolia var. erostrata Kük.
Penstemon floridus var. floridus
Trachelospermum jasminoides (Lindl.) Lem.
Hymenothrix wislizenii A.Gray
Ceratonia siliqua L.
Medicago truncatula Gaertn.
Arctostaphylos crustacea subsp. eastwoodiana (P.V.Wells) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Malva assurgentiflora subsp. glabra (Philbrick) Guilliams
Quercus ilex L.
Carex echinata subsp. echinata
Acmispon decumbens (Benth.) Govaerts
Baccharis plummerae subsp. plummerae
Frasera montana Mulford
Ipomopsis pumila (Nutt.) V.E.Grant
Santolina chamaecyparissus L.
Euphorbia polycarpa var. polycarpa
Agave cerulata Trel.
Rubus allegheniensis Porter
Antirrhinum majus L.
Glossopetalon spinescens var. aridum M.E.Jones
Astragalus collinus (Hook.) Douglas ex G.Don
Ipomoea barbatisepala A.Gray
Astragalus preussii var. preussii
Sanicula saxatilis Greene
Ranunculus aquatilis var. aquatilis
Aphyllon vallicolum (Jeps.) A.C.Schneid.
Anemone parviflora Michx.
Trichostema oblongum Benth.
Lamium hybridum Vill.
Scrophularia villosa Pennell ex Millsp. & Nutt.
Chloropyron maritimum (Nutt. ex Benth.) A.Heller
Drosera obovata Mert. & Koch
Delphinium andersonii A.Gray
Cryptantha microstachys (Greene ex A.Gray) Greene
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. mexicana (Willd.) D.D.Keck
Diplacus johnstonii (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Grusonia reflexispina (Wiggins & Rollins) E.F.Anderson
Amsonia palmeri A.Gray
Eriogonum inflatum var. inflatum
Olsynium douglasii var. douglasii
Poa mansfieldii Otting & B.L.Wilson
Mammillaria hutchisoniana (H.E.Gates) Boed.
Smelowskia ovalis M.E.Jones
Lomatium ravenii var. paiutense K.M.Carlson & Mansfield
Thelypodium wrightii A.Gray
Potentilla rivalis Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Saussurea nuda Ledeb.
Erythronium grandiflorum subsp. candidum Piper
Eriogonum robustum Greene
Rudbeckia laciniata L.
Eriophyllum multicaule (DC.) A.Gray
Castilleja martini Abrams
Euphorbia radians Benth.
Eriogonum gracile var. gracile
Viola purpurea var. venosa (S.Watson) Brainerd
Sisyrinchium littorale Greene
Dudleya anomala (Davidson) Moran
Lycopus americanus Muhl. ex W.P.C.Barton
Chorizanthe aphanantha K.M.Nelson & D.J.Keil
Arctomecon merriamii Coville
Eriophorum angustifolium Honck.
Lysimachia europaea (L.) U.Manns & Anderb.
Eriogonum hookeri S.Watson
Salvia dorrii var. dorrii
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. nevadensis (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Astragalus scaphoides (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Sedum rosea var. integrifolia (Raf.) Berger
Chenopodium glaucum L.
Bromus secalinus L.
Edwinia macrocalyx Small
Viguiera multiflora (Nutt.) S.F.Blake
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. candicans (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Arabis hirsuta (L.) Scop.
Impatiens aurella Rydb.
Penstemon cyananthus var. cyananthus
Penstemon davidsonii var. menziesii (D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Cordylanthus parviflorus (Ferris) Wiggins
Brickellia glabrata (Rose) B.L.Rob.
Brodiaea californica subsp. californica
Penstemon wardii A.Gray
Cymopterus fendleri A.Gray
Delphinium barbeyi (Huth) Huth
Lupinus argenteus var. argenteus
Keckiella ternata subsp. ternata
Cordylanthus ramosus Nutt. ex Benth
Eriogonum contortum Small
Erigeron speciosus var. speciosus
Talinum confertiflorum Greene
Rhynchosida physocalyx (A.Gray) Fryxell
Potentilla gracilis var. elmeri (Rydb.) Jeps.
Vicia americana var. truncata (Nutt.) W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Veronica serpyllifolia var. humifusa (Dicks.) Vahl
Linanthus campanulatus (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Panicum ferventicola Schmoll
Agrostis perennans (Walter) Tuck.
Poa interior Rydb.
Clematis columbiana var. columbiana
Ipomopsis aggregata var. aggregata
Astragalus lentiginosus var. iodanthus (S.Watson) J.A.Alexander
Elymus elymoides subsp. californicus (J.G.Sm.) Barkworth
Hieracium lemmonii A.Gray
Mentzelia pterosperma Eastw.
Carex leptalea Wahlenb.
Thelypodiopsis ambigua (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz
Chenopodium fremontii S.Watson
Erysimum cheiranthoides L.
Alisma plantago-aquatica var. americanum Schult. & Schult.f.
Salix arctica var. petraea Bebb
Cymopterus bulbosus A.Nelson
Packera streptanthifolia var. streptanthifolia
Dalea versicolor Zucc.
Penstemon eatonii var. undosus M.E.Jones
Arabis puberula Nutt.
Eragrostis pectinacea (Michx.) Nees
Gayophytum racemosum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus multiflorus (Pursh) A.Gray
Linanthus watsonii (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Achnatherum webberi (Thurb.) Barkworth
Gilia inconspicua (Sm.) Sweet
Bupleurum americanum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Atriplex argentea var. hillmanii M.E.Jones
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. platyphyllus A.Gray
Astragalus chamaemeniscus Barneby
Lemaireocereus thurberi (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Hordeum jubatum var. jubatum
Astragalus praelongus var. praelongus
Penstemon virgatus var. virgatus
Thelypodium integrifolium subsp. complanatum Al-Shehbaz
Eschscholzia californica var. mexicana (Greene) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Penstemon cleburni M.E.Jones
Eriogonum corymbosum var. corymbosum
Lactuca perennis L.
Coryphantha vivipara (Nutt.) Britton & Rose
Penstemon confusus M.E.Jones
Solidago spathulata var. spathulata
Lupinus argenteus var. argentatus (Rydb.) Barneby
Helianthella uniflora var. uniflora
Antennaria arcuata Cronquist
Fragaria virginiana var. glauca S.Watson
Penstemon uintahensis Pennell
Euphorbia capitellata var. laxiflora S.Watson
Lomatium graveolens var. graveolens
Symphyotrichum ascendens (Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Astragalus toanus M.E.Jones
Juncus brachycarpus Engelm.
Juncus planifolius R.Br.
Lesquerella multiceps Maguire
Stylocline psilocarphoides M.Peck
Hymenopappus filifolius var. lugens (Greene) Jeps.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. salinus (Howell) Barneby
Viola palustris var. palustris
Celtis reticulata Torr.
Mentzelia integra (M.E.Jones) Tidestr.
Iva xanthifolia Nutt.
Draba oligosperma var. oligosperma
Penstemon crandallii var. crandallii
Plagiobothrys scouleri var. penicillatus (Greene) Cronquist
Erigeron speciosus var. macranthus (Nutt.) Cronquist
Thelypodium crispum Greene ex Payson
Mimulus bigelovii var. cuspidatus A.L.Grant
Potentilla glandulosa Lindl.
Arabis sparsiflora var. subvillosa (S.Watson) Rollins
Penstemon attenuatus var. attenuatus
Astragalus spatulatus E.Sheld.
Lupinus pusillus var. pusillus
Aeonium lindleyi Webb & Berthel.
Penstemon perpulcher A.Nelson
Penstemon globosus (Piper) Pennell & D.D.Keck
Ranunculus aquatilis var. diffusus With.
Spartina foliosa Trin.
Ipomopsis aggregata var. attenuata (A.Gray) Dorn
Caulanthus crassicaulis var. glaber M.E.Jones
Thelypodium sagittatum subsp. sagittatum
Chenopodium pratericola Rydb.
Solanum nitidibaccatum Bitter
Dalea leporina Ait. ex Hemsl.
Hollisteria lanata S.Watson
Hymenoxys richardsonii var. floribunda (A.Gray) Parker
Penstemon cyanocaulis Payson
Franseria leptophylla Rydb.
Schoenocrambe linifolia (Nutt.) Greene
Penstemon attenuatus var. militaris (Greene) Cronquist
Townsendia annua Beaman
Ribes oxyacanthoides subsp. setosum (Lindl.) Q.P.Sinnott
Gayophytum lasiospermum Greene
Aristida ternipes var. ternipes
Schedonnardus paniculatus (Nuttall) Branner & Coville
Salsola paulsenii Litv.
Festuca saximontana var. saximontana
Eriogonum contortum Small ex Rydb., 1906
Saxifraga rhomboidea Greene
Wislizenia refracta Engelm.
Ostrya knowltonii Coville
Mimulus cusickii (Greene) Rattan
Aragallus viscidulus Rydb.
Lupinus lepidus var. confertus (Kellogg) C.P.Sm.
Nymphaea leibergii Morong
Atriplex gardneri var. cuneata (A.Nelson) S.L.Welsh
Fendlerella utahensis (S.Watson) A.Heller
Lathyrus brachycalyx var. brachycalyx
Valeriana acutiloba var. pubicarpa (Rydb.) Cronquist
Cleomella brevipes S.Watson
Astragalus chamaeleuce var. chamaeleuce
Helianthus anomalus S.F.Blake
Eriogonum arcuatum var. arcuatum
Penstemon laetus var. leptosepalus Greene ex A.Gray
Lomatium triternatum var. platycarpum (Torr.) B.Boivin
Lupinus sulphureus var. kincaidii (C.P.Sm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Hutchinsia procumbens (L.) Desv.
Aconitum columbianum subsp. columbianum
Gilia malior Day & V.E.Grant
Juncus laccatus Zika
Eriogonum flexum M.E.Jones
Chamaesyce fendleri (Torr. & A.Gray) Small
Erigeron eatonii var. eatonii
Spartina gracilis Trin.
Chaetadelpha wheeleri A.Gray ex S.Watson
Lepidium davisii Rollins
Cymopterus rosei M.E.Jones
Lappula redowskii var. cupulata (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Oxytropis sericea var. sericea
Astragalus lonchocarpus Torr.
Cryptantha racemosa (S.Watson) Greene
Penstemon ambiguus var. laevissimus (D.D.Keck) N.H.Holmgren
Kuhnia chlorolepis Wooton & Standl.
Cryptantha watsonii (A.Gray) Greene
Potamogeton striatus Ruiz & Pav.
Mentzelia tricuspis A.Gray
Polygonum argyrocoleum Steud. ex Kunze
Bothriochloa barbinodis (Lag.) Herter
Festuca scabrella var. major Vasey
Drymaria fendleri var. perennis M.E.Jones
Mimulus nanus var. mephiticus (Greene) D.M.Thomps.
Penstemon cusickii A.Gray
Cryptantha flaccida (Douglas) Greene
Townsendia florifer (Hook.) A.Gray, 1881
Lathyrus brachycalyx var. zionis (C.L.Hitchc.) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus nuttallianus var. austrinus (Small) Barneby
Muilla maritima (Torr.) S.Watson
Dudleya guadalupensis Moran
Paronychia sessiliflora Nutt.
Berlandiera lyrata Benth.
Arabis platysperma A.Gray
Cryptantha humilis (A.Gray) Payson
Arctostaphylos nummularia A.Gray
Lycium barbarum L.
Alnus incana subsp. tenuifolia (Nutt.) Breitung
Astragalus pinonis var. pinonis
Herrickia glauca (Nutt.) Brouillet
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. lanceolatus (Nutt.) Greene
Bahia dissecta (A.Gray) Britton
Carex tahoensis Smiley
Astragalus sylvaticus S.Watson
Oenothera crassifolia Greene
Lesquerella intermedia (S.Watson) A.Heller
Physaria repanda Rollins
Lupinus tegeticulatus var. duranii (Eastw.) Barneby
Claytonia parviflora subsp. utahensis (Rydb.) John M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Holodiscus microphyllus var. microphyllus
Buddleja utahensis Coville
Heracleum lanatum Michx.
Lomatium dissectum var. multifidum (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) Mathias & Constance
Boechera holboellii var. pinetorum (Tidestr.) Dorn
Comandra umbellata var. pallida (A.DC.) M.E.Jones
Anthriscus scandicinus (Weber) Mansf.
Hedeoma dentata Torr.
Cryptantha flavoculata (A.Nelson) Payson
Penstemon richardsonii var. richardsonii
Eriogonum lonchophyllum A.Gray
Cymopterus newberryi (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Echinocereus mojavensis (Engelm. & Bigelow) Rümpler
Salix scouleriana Barratt ex Hook.
Silene scouleri subsp. hallii (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Argythamnia cyanophylla (Wooton & Standl.) J.W.Ingram
Lupinus leucanthus Rydb.
Delphinium depauperatum Nutt.
Oxytropis oreophila var. oreophila
Malacothrix torreyi Gray
Astragalus kentrophyta var. elatus S.Watson
Lupinus polyphyllus var. polyphyllus
Juncus nevadensis S.Watson
Chorizanthe watsonii A.Gray
Erigeron subtrinervis var. subtrinervis
Gilia inconspicua var. inconspicua
Plagiobothrys kingii (S.Watson) A.Gray
Symphoricarpos oreophilus var. utahensis (Rydb.) A.Nelson
Lupinus leucophyllus subsp. erectus (L.F.Hend.) Harmon
Hieracium gracile Hook.
Carex leporinella Mack.
Symphyotrichum falcatum (Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Anemone multifida var. multifida
Cirsium tracyi (Rydb.) Petr.
Linanthus bigelovii (A.Gray) Greene
Astragalus nidularius Barneby
Mentzelia longiloba var. yavapaiensis J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Rumex paucifolius Nutt.
Festuca rubra subsp. rubra
Psoralidium lanceolatum (Pursh) Rydb.
Acacia shrevei (Britton & Rose) Tidestr.
Salix lasiandra var. caudata (Nutt.) Sudw.
Chenopodium atrovirens Rydb.
Krameria parvifolia var. glandulosa (Rose & J.H.Painter) J.F.Macbr.
Brickellia pringlei A.Gray
Castilleja occidentalis Torr.
Chaenactis douglasii var. glandulosa Cronquist
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. mohavensis (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Penstemon serrulatus Menzies ex Sm.
Camissonia boothii subsp. alyssoides (Hook. & Arn.) P.H.Raven
Purshia tridentata var. tridentata
Cryptantha setosissima (A.Gray) Payson
Oenothera coronopifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Juncus mertensianus Bong.
Saxifraga odontoloma Piper
Dalea candida var. oligophylla (Torr.) Shinners
Epilobium pygmaeum (Speg.) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Antirrhinum kingii S.Watson
Agrostis hyemalis (Walter) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Mammillaria cerralboa Orcutt
Onobrychis viciifolia Scop.
Poa compressa L.
Sophora nuttalliana B.L.Turner
Disporum trachycarpum (S.Watson) Benth. & Hook.f.
Micromonolepis pusilla (Torr.) Ulbr.
Astragalus canadensis var. brevidens (Gand.) Barneby
Penstemon cyaneus Pennell
Muhlenbergia dumosa Scribn. ex Vasey
Mimulus suksdorfii A.Gray
Lomatium minimum (Mathias) Mathias
Eriogonum salicornioides Gand.
Ipomopsis aggregata var. texana (Greene) Shinners
Monardella odoratissima subsp. odoratissima
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. leiospermus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Solidago canadensis var. salebrosa (Piper) M.E.Jones
Atriplex hortensis L.
Lupinus leucophyllus var. belliae C.P.Sm.
Phlox longifolia var. longifolia
Carex praeceptorum Mack.
Chlorogalum angustifolium Kellogg
Neokochia americana (S.Watson) G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.
Artemisia rigida (Nutt.) A.Gray
Erigeron davisii (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom
Eremogone eastwoodiae (Rydb.) Ikonn.
Ranunculus occidentalis var. dissectus L.F.Hend.
Fraxinus anomala var. anomala
Carex elynoides Holm
Alhagi maurorum Medik.
Mentha arvensis L.
Cryptantha torreyana (A.Gray) Greene
Stenogonum salsuginosum Nutt.
Poa bolanderi Vasey
Penstemon radicosus A.Nelson
Castilleja aquariensis N.H.Holmgren
Vaccinium scoparium Leiberg ex Coville
Castilleja flava S.Watson
Hymenopappus filifolius var. cinereus (Rydb.) I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha cinerea var. cinerea
Penstemon linarioides var. linarioides
Salix eriocephala var. mackenzieana (Hook.) Dorn
Stellaria umbellata Turcz.
Potamogeton foliosus var. foliosus
Leucaena lanceolata S.Watson
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. arenarius L.C.Anderson
Solidago missouriensis Nutt.
Machaeranthera kingii var. barnebyana S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Carex myosuroides Vill.
Yucca harrimaniae Trel.
Erigeron pulcherrimus A.Heller
Astragalus terminalis S.Watson
Senecio fuscatus (Jord. & Fourr.) Hayek
Rorippa sphaerocarpa (A.Gray) Britton
Cirsium Mill.
Parthenium ligulatum (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Oxytheca dendroidea subsp. dendroidea
Oenothera elata var. hirsutissima (A.Gray ex S.Watson) Cronquist
Astragalus lentiginosus var. palans (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Streptanthus cordatus Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Cryptantha leucophaea (Douglas) Payson
Silene douglasii var. douglasii
Erigeron asperugineus (D.C.Eaton) A.Gray
Erigeron compositus var. discoideus A.Gray
Dalea pringlei var. multijuga Barneby
Ranunculus acriformis var. acriformis
Calamagrostis montanensis (Scribn.) Scribn.
Antennaria microphylla Rydb.
Machaeranthera canescens var. canescens
Acer glabrum var. diffusum (Greene) Smiley
Mimulus lewisii Pursh
Descurainia richardsonii var. macrosperma O.E.Schulz
Potentilla biennis Greene
Echinochloa muricata var. microstachya Wiegand
Tabernaemontana divaricata (L.) R.Br. ex Roem. & Schult.
Erysimum inconspicuum (S.Watson) MacMill.
Penstemon montanus var. montanus
Arabis holboellii var. retrofracta (Graham) Rydb.
Ptelea jucunda Greene
Crepis L.
Lilium columbianum Hanson
Erigeron bloomeri var. bloomeri
Penstemon fruticosus var. scouleri (Lindl.) Cronquist
Hedysarum boreale var. gremiale (Rollins) Northstrom & S.L.Welsh
Bromus squarrosus L.
Rosa gymnocarpa Nutt.
Physaria rectipes (Wooton & Standl.) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Sidalcea neomexicana A.Gray
Eleocharis engelmannii Steud.
Astragalus oophorus var. caulescens (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Astragalus agrestis Douglas ex G.Don
Eremogone fendleri var. plateauensis (Maguire) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Erigeron mancus Rydb.
Penstemon dolius var. duchesnensis N.H.Holmgren
Trifolium longipes subsp. hansenii (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Menziesia ferruginea var. glabella (A.Gray) M.Peck
Arabis demissa var. demissa
Clematis bigelovii Torr.
Carex hystricina
Fragaria californica var. franciscana Rydb.
Minuartia rubella (Wahlenb.) Hiern
Thelypodium laxiflorum Al-Shehbaz
Ranunculus eschscholtzii var. suksdorfii (A.Gray) L.D.Benson
Lupinus argenteus var. heteranthus (S.Watson) Barneby
Erigeron divergens var. divergens
Madia elegans subsp. densifolia (Greene) D.D.Keck
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. nevadensis (Tidestr.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Hilaria jamesii (Torr.) Benth.
Agoseris glauca var. glauca
Camissonia parvula (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Boechera exilis (A.Nelson) Dorn
Arabis L.
Chaenactis douglasii var. rubricaulis (Rydberg) Ferris
Astragalus amphioxys var. amphioxys
Penstemon confertus Douglas ex Lindl.
Astragalus mollissimus var. thompsonae (S.Watson) Barneby
Erysimum repandum L.
Brickellia microphylla var. watsonii (B.L.Rob.) S.L.Welsh
Juncus torreyi Coville
Juncus confusus Coville
Erigeron watsonii (A.Gray) Cronquist
Rhamnus purshiana (Pursh) DC.
Astragalus tetrapterus A.Gray
Eriophyllum lanatum var. integrifolium (Hook.) Smiley
Erigeron nanus Nutt.
Saxifraga nidifica var. claytoniifolia (Canby ex Small) Elvander
Carex macrochaeta C.A.Mey.
Juncus sphaerocarpus Nees
Penstemon procerus var. procerus
Penstemon linarioides var. sileri A.Gray
Pediomelum mephiticum (S.Watson) Rydb.
Philadelphus microphyllus var. stramineus (Rydb.) Henrickson
Cryptantha confertiflora (Greene) Payson
Carex nebrascensis Dewey
Lepidium montanum var. integrifolium (Nutt.) C.L.Hitchc.
Heterotheca villosa var. minor (Hook.) Semple
Psilocarphus elatior A.Gray
Rhamnus betulifolia Greene
Comarostaphylis discolor (Hook.) Diggs
Lupinus arbustus Lindl.
Nassella viridula (Trin.) Barkworth
Penstemon caespitosus var. caespitosus
Astragalus nudisiliquus A.Nelson
Cryptantha crassisepala (Torr. & Gray) Greene
Psoralidium junceum (Eastw.) Rydb.
Epilobium ciliatum var. ciliatum
Erigeron pumilus var. gracilior Cronquist
Mertensia fusiformis Greene
Erigeron divergens var. cinereus A.Gray
Astragalus wingatanus S.Watson
Orobanche fasciculata Nutt.
Mirabilis linearis var. linearis
Stellaria borealis subsp. sitchana (Steud.) Piper & Beattie
Lupinus leucophyllus var. leucophyllus
Elymus trachycaulus subsp. subsecundus (Link) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Corydalis caseana subsp. cusickii (S.Watson) G.B.Ownbey
Dicoria canescens var. brandegei (A.Gray) Cronquist
Sparganium L.
Allium brandegeei S.Watson
Penstemon janishiae N.H.Holmgren
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. bernardina (Abrams) H.M.Hall
Penstemon elegantulus Pennell
Cryptantha gracilis Osterh.
Astragalus purshii var. concinnus Barneby
Delphinium andersoni var. andersoni
Cymopterus hendersonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Cronquist
Penstemon marcusii (D.D.Keck) N.H.Holmgren
Galium bifolium S.Watson
Clematis columbiana (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Carex olympica Mack.
Potentilla ovina var. decurrens (Watson) S.L.Welsh & B.C.Johnst.
Veronica peregrina var. xalapensis (Kunth) Pennell
Ledum glandulosum var. glandulosum
Osmorhiza depauperata Phil.
Mirabilis californica var. villosa Kellogg
Physaria kingii (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Packera neomexicana var. mutabilis (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Cryptantha Lehm. ex Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Lotus crassifolius (Benth.) Greene
Rorippa sylvestris (L.) Besser
Lomatium foeniculaceum var. macdougalii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Cronquist
Astragalus curvicarpus var. curvicarpus
Helenium hoopesii A.Gray
Dalea flavescens (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh ex Barneby
Potentilla fruticosa L.
Mimulus aurantiacus Curtis
Franseria lancifolia Rydb.
Lithospermum multiflorum Torr. ex A.Gray
Eriogonum panguicense var. panguicense
Antennaria alpina (L.) Gaertn.
Cryptantha kelseyana Greene
Cymopterus duchesnensis M.E.Jones
Chenopodium simplex (Torr.) Raf.
Vulpia microstachys (Nutt.) Munro
Sphaerophysa salsula (Pall.) DC.
Astragalus eastwoodiae M.E.Jones
Salix exigua var. stenophylla (Rydb.) C.K.Schneid.
Cymopterus corrugatus M.E.Jones
Dyssodia pentachaeta var. pentachaeta
Acer capillipes Maxim. ex Miq.
Alisma plantago-aquatica L.
Cryptantha recurvata Coville
Astragalus vexilliflexus var. vexilliflexus
Salix lucida subsp. caudata (Nutt.) Argus
Agrostis blasdalei Hitchc.
Lupinus polyphyllus var. prunophilus (M.E.Jones) L.Ll.Phillips
Packera moranii (T.M.Barkley) C.Jeffrey
Descurainia pinnata var. glabra (Wooton & Standl.) Shinners
Mimulus breviflorus Piper
Polygonum utahense Brenckle & Cottam
Potentilla rivalis var. millegrana (Engelm. ex Lehm.) S.Watson
Draba spectabilis Greene
Minuartia nuttallii var. nuttallii
Phlox woodhousei (A.Gray) E.Nelson
Eriogonum microtheca var. laxiflorum Benth., 1856
Astragalus preussii var. laxiflorus A.Gray
Ebenopsis confinis (Standl.) Barneby & J.W.Grimes
Erigeron pumilus var. concinnoides Cronquist, 1947
Arabis sparsiflora Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Penstemon hesperius M.Peck
Carex prionophylla Holm
Gratiola neglecta Torr.
Penstemon laxus A.Nelson
Lupinus polyphyllus var. saxosus (Howell) Barneby
Floerkea proserpinacoides Willd.
Veronica biloba Schreb. ex L.
Ivesia purpurascens subsp. congdonis (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Carex bella L.H.Bailey
Microseris nutans (Hook.) Sch.Bip.
Cryptantha affinis (A.Gray) Greene
Anemone piperi Rydb.
Claytonia parviflora var. latior Suksd.
Cirsium longistylum J.W.Moore & Frankton
Astragalus platytropis A.Gray
Symphyotrichum spathulatum var. spathulatum
Cynoglossum penicillatum Hook. & Arn.
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. mohavensis (Dziek. & D.B.Dunn) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus calycosus var. scaposus (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Astragalus atratus var. inseptus Barneby
Psorothamnus kingii (S.Watson) Barneby
Carex paysonis Clokey
Delphinium luteum A.Heller
Agrostis exarata Trin.
Osmorhiza chilensis Hook. & Arn.
Astragalus beckwithii var. purpureus M.E.Jones
Plagiobothrys kingii var. harknessii (Greene) Jeps.
Anemone multifida var. tetonensis (Porter) C.L.Hitchc.
Descurainia pinnata subsp. filipes (A.Gray) Detling
Lygodesmia exigua (A.Gray) A.Gray
Neolloydia johnsonii (Parry ex Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Castilleja flava var. rustica (Piper) Holmgren
Lupinus pusillus var. intermontanus (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Astragalus drabelliformis Barneby
Astragalus lentiginosus var. diphysus (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Lupinus albicaulis Douglas ex Hook.
Mahonia fremontii (Torr.) Fedde
Astragalus americanus (Hook.) M.E.Jones
Sporobolus flexuosus (Vasey) Rydb.
Pedicularis bracteosa var. paysoniana (Pennell) Cronquist
Mirabilis oxybaphoides (A.Gray) A.Gray
Trifolium longipes var. longipes
Carex nebrascensis var. ultriformis L.H.Bailey
Heuchera cylindrica Hook.
Camissonia megalantha (Munz) Raven
Astragalus beckwithii var. weiserensis M.E.Jones
Potentilla anserina L.
Brahea dulcis (Kunth) Mart.
Bahia nudicaulis var. ourolepis (S.F.Blake) Cronquist
Thelypodium milleflorum A.Nelson
Psilostrophe sparsiflora (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Agoseris glauca var. dasycephala (Torr. & A.Gray) Jeps.
Penstemon eriantherus var. cleburnei (M.E.Jones) Dorn
Sedum rhodanthum A.Gray
Convolvulus L.
Euphorbia alatocaulis V.W.Steinm. & Felger
Castilleja pallescens (Nutt. ex A.Gray) Greenm.
Astragalus argophyllus var. martini M.E.Jones
Tiarella unifoliata Hook.
Argemone munita var. rotundata (Rydb.) Shinners
Chaenactis ramosa Stockw.
Eremopyrum triticeum (Gaertn.) Nevski
Monardella odoratissima var. neglecta Cronquist
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. frutescens (Rydb.) A.G.Day
Eriogonum umbellatum var. subaridum S.Stokes
Delphinium nuttallianum Pritzel
Physaria subumbellata (Rollins) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Solidago gigantea Aiton
Orthocarpus tenuifolius (Pursh) Benth.
Physaria geyeri var. purpurea Rollins
Lepidium montanum var. jonesii (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus purshii var. glareosus (Douglas) Barneby
Caulanthus glaucus S.Watson
Camissonia cheiranthifolia subsp. suffruticosa (S.Watson) P.H.Raven
Lupinus argenteus var. stenophyllus (Rydb.) Davis
Erigeron rydbergii Cronquist
Rhinotropis subspinosa (S.Watson) J.R.Abbott
Abronia turbinata Torr. ex S.Watson
Oenothera caespitosa subsp. caespitosa
Leptosiphon harknessii (Curran) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Oenothera albicaulis Pursh
Physalis pubescens L.
Elymus canadensis L.
Astragalus yaquianus S.Watson
Coreopsis intermedia Sherff
Chamaedorea tepejilote Liebm. ex Mart.
Astragalus straturensis M.E.Jones
Microseris lindleyi (DC.) A.Gray
Hieracium rusbyi Greene
Lupinus concinnus var. orcuttii (S.Watson) C.P.Sm.
Peraphyllum ramosissimum Nutt.
Astragalus cusickii var. sterilis (Barneby) Barneby
Carex hoodii Boott
Viola adunca f. glabra (Brainerd) G.N.Jones
Cirsium blumeri Petr.
Glyceria striata (Lam.) Hitchc.
Cordylanthus capitatus Nutt. ex Benth.
Erigeron pumilus var. intermedius Cronquist
Sphaeralcea munroana (Douglas ex Lindl.) Spach ex A.Gray
Astragalus miser var. tenuifolius (Nutt.) Barneby
Carex rostrata Stokes
Tumamoca macdougalii Rose
Leymus salina (M.E.Jones) Á.Löve
Potamogeton pectinatus L.
Parietaria obtusa Rydb. ex Small
Scutellaria sapphirina (Barneby) Olmstead
Viola utahensis M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Mimulus guttatus var. decorus A.L.Grant
Desmanthus cooleyi (Eaton) Trel.
Machaeranthera grindelioides var. depressa (Maguire) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Allium textile A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Balsamorhiza serrata A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Astragalus curvicarpus var. subglaber (Rydb.) Barneby
Ranunculus acriformis A.Gray
Polygonum ramosissimum var. ramosissimum
Potentilla brevifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Gaura hexandra subsp. gracilis (Wooton & Standl.) Raven & D.P.Greg.
Juncus falcatus E.Mey.
Glossopetalon spinescens var. microphyllum N.H.Holmgren
Astragalus serenoi var. sordescens Barneby
Cryptantha circumscissa (Hook. & Arn.) I.M.Johnst.
Camissonia boothii subsp. intermedia (Munz) P.H.Raven
Hemizonia fasciculata (DC.) Torr. & A.Gray
Polygonum polygaloides Meisn.
Carex livida (Wahlenb.) Willd.
Alopecurus arundinaceus Poir.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. oreophilus (A.Nelson) H.M.Hall
Symphyotrichum subulatum var. parviflorum (Nees) S.D.Sundb.
Lotus utahensis Ottley
Physaria kingii subsp. latifolia (A.Nelson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Potentilla hookeriana Lehm.
Grindelia fastigiata Greene
Ivesia baileyi var. beneolens (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Ertter
Physaria acutifolia Rydb.
Solanum fendleri A.Gray
Potentilla glandulosa var. pseudorupestris (Rydb.) Breitung
Cardaria pubescens (C.A.Mey.) Jarm.
Pyrrocoma lanceolata var. lanceolata
Astragalus castaneiformis var. castaneiformis
Ranunculus cardiophyllus Hook.
Rudbeckia occidentalis var. occidentalis
Eriogonum soredium Reveal
Carex lanuginosa Michx.
Argemone pleiacantha subsp. ambigua G.B.Ownbey
Draba douglasii A.Gray
Microgilia minutiflora (Benth.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Spraguea umbellata var. caudicifera A.Gray
Artemisia tridentata var. pauciflora Winward & Goodrich
Salix melanopsis Nutt.
Hymenoxys acaulis var. epunctata (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Besseya plantaginea (James) Rydb.
Juncus interior Wiegand
Cymopterus purpureus S.Watson
Solidago spectabilis (D.C.Eaton) A.Gray
Eriogonum brevicaule var. desertorum (Maguire) S.L.Welsh
Descurainia paradisa subsp. nevadensis Rollins
Salix brachycarpa Nutt.
Gentiana menziesii Griseb.
Cryptantha propria (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Payson
Lepidium lasiocarpum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Callitriche verna L.
Galium columbianum Rydb.
Atriplex sabulosa M.E.Jones
Carex occidentalis L.H.Bailey
Salix brachycarpa var. brachycarpa
Allium lemmonii S.Watson
Trixis angustifolia DC.
Lupinus arbustus subsp. calcaratus (Kellogg) D.B.Dunn
Camissonia andina (Nutt.) Raven
Atriplex argentea Nutt.
Hieracium scouleri var. griseum A.Nelson
Urochloa texana (Buckley) R.D.Webster
Atriplex heterosperma Bunge
Eriogonum umbellatum var. modocense (Greene) S.Stokes
Claytonia rubra subsp. depressa (A.Gray) J.M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Cryptantha stricta (Osterh.) Payson
Abronia mellifera var. mellifera
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. affinis (A.Nelson) L.C.Anderson
Arctostaphylos mariposa Dudley
Astragalus humistratus var. humivagans (Rydb.) Barneby
Penstemon venustus Douglas ex Lindl.
Helenium laciniatum A.Gray
Ligusticum filicinum S.Watson
Lomatium bentonitum K.M.Carlson & Mansfield
Astragalus caricinus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Wyethia invenusta (Greene) W.A.Weber
Astragalus scopulorum Porter
Cleome sparsifolia S.Watson
Aliciella lottiae (A.G.Day) J.M.Porter
Aliciella heterostyla (S.Cochrane & A.G.Day) J.M.Porter
Rumex salicifolius var. lacustris (Greene) J.C.Hickman
Chenopodium berlandieri Moq.
Carex holmgreniorum Reznicek & D.F.Murray
Astragalus lackschewitzii Lavin & H.Marriott
Draba cuneifolia var. integrifolia S.Watson
Symphyotrichum eatonii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Rumex stenophyllus Ledeb.
Bromus marginatus Nees ex Steud.
Arabis microphylla Nutt.
Ceanothus greggii A.Gray
Lomatium triternatum var. macrocarpum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Eriogonum umbellatum var. nevadense Gand.
Erigeron ursinus Eaton
Aralia bicrenata Wooton & Standl.
Lomatium knokei Darrach
Astragalus adsurgens var. robustior Hook.
Eriogonum novonudum M.Peck
Galium multiflorum Kellogg
Polyctenium fremontii (S.Watson) Greene
Alopecurus geniculatus L.
Spartina pectinata Bosc ex Link
Eriogonum cernuum Nutt.
Ranunculus andersonii var. andersonii
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. hololeucus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Shoshonea pulvinata Evert & Constance
Astragalus hallii var. fallax (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Acer rubrum L.
Baccharis ptarmicifolia DC.
Salix boothii Dorn
Atriplex garrettii Rydb.
Prunus persica (L.) Batsch
Carex rossii Boott
Humulus lupulus var. neomexicanus A.Nelson & Cockerell
Dodecatheon pulchellum (Raf.) Merr.
Astragalus bisulcatus var. nevadensis (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Cicuta maculata var. angustifolia Hook.
Sphaeralcea subhastata J.M.Coult.
Dalea nana var. carnescens (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Ribes leptanthum A.Gray
Calliandra eriophylla var. eriophylla
Silene petersonii var. minor C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Silene kingii (S.Watson) Bocquet
Festuca brachyphylla Schult. & Schult.f.
Penstemon rydbergii var. aggregatus (Pennell) N.H.Holmgren
Cardamine cordifolia A.Gray
Bouteloua Lag.
Poa arida Vasey
Allium tolmiei var. tolmiei
Physaria chambersii var. chambersii
Castilleja mogollonica Pennell
Eriogonum batemanii M.E.Jones
Cornus nuttallii Audubon
Cotoneaster microphyllus Wall. ex Lindl.
Fragaria virginiana var. platypetala (Rydb.) H.M.Hall
Eriogonum ephedroides Reveal
Carex parryana Dewey
Astragalus subcinereus A.Gray
Stachys caurina Piper
Mentha arvensis var. glabrata (Benth.) Fernald
Penstemon carnosus Pennell
Lomatium nevadense var. nevadense
Lithospermum arvense L.
Penstemon leiophyllus Pennell
Chamaesyce prostrata (Aiton) Small
Acer grandidentatum Nutt.
Astragalus argophyllus var. argophyllus
Oenothera caespitosa var. marginata (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) Munz
Astragalus allochrous A.Gray
Verbena bipinnatifida Nutt.
Lupinus lepidus var. utahensis (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Camissonia breviflora (Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Rumex salicifolius subsp. triangulivalvis Danser
Machaeranthera grindelioides var. grindelioides
Claytonia perfoliata subsp. intermontana J.M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Astragalus serpens M.E.Jones
Cerastium beeringianum Cham. & Schltdl.
Camissonia heterochroma (S.Watson) Raven
Parvisedum pumilum (Benth.) Clausen
Paronychia pulvinata A.Gray
Physaria kingii var. kingii
Collomia debilis var. integra Payson
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Potamogeton pusillus var. pusillus
Frasera albicaulis var. modocensis (H.St.John) Holmgren
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. orthorhynchus
Bigelowia juncea Greene
Cyperus aristatus Rottb.
Verbena wrightii A.Gray
Astragalus aquilonius (Barneby) Barneby
Erigeron engelmannii A.Nelson
Astragalus crassicarpus var. paysonii (E.H.Kelso) Barneby
Lupinus argenteus var. meionanthus (A.Gray) Barneby
Hymenoxys odorata DC.
Festuca ovina L.
Salix bebbiana var. bebbiana
Eriogonum esmeraldense var. esmeraldense
Eremogone hookeri var. hookeri
Lupinus formosus var. bridgesii (S.Watson) Greene
Mentzelia congesta (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Descurainia pinnata var. pinnata
Frasera gypsicola (Barneby) D.M.Post
Carex mendocinensis Olney ex Boott
Penstemon scariosus var. albifluvis (England) Holmgren
Lepidium eastwoodiae Wooton
Frasera speciosa Douglas ex Griseb.
Ranunculus cymbalaria Pursh
Polypogon viridis (Gouan) Breistr.
Allium atrorubens S.Watson
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. curvisiliqua
Penstemon laevis Pennell
Eriogonum microthecum var. lapidicola Reveal
Penstemon petiolatus Brandegee
Arenaria kingii var. glabrescens (S.Watson) Maguire
Agastache cusickii (Greenm.) A.Heller
Borreria lagunensis M.E.Jones
Peucedanum erosum Jeps.
Salix wolfii Bebb
Penstemon ophianthus Pennell
Plantago eriopoda Torr.
Townsendia leptotes (A.Gray) Osterh.
Geum triflorum var. ciliatum (Pursh) Fassett
Almutaster pauciflorus (Nutt.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Castilleja applegatei var. viscida (Rydb.) Ownbey
Perityle tenella (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Cymopterus longipes var. ibapensis (M.E.Jones) Cronquist
Machaeranthera glabriuscula (Nutt.) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Eriogonum scabrellum Reveal
Perideridia parishii subsp. latifolia (A.Gray) T.I.Chuang & Constance
Lupinus lepidus var. aridus (Douglas) Jeps.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. dichrocephalum Gand.
Tripterocalyx carneus var. pedunculatus (M.E.Jones) Spellenb.
Sidalcea oregana var. maxima (M.Peck) C.L.Hitchc.
Potentilla crinita var. crinita
Caulanthus crassicaulis var. crassicaulis
Sphenopholis obtusata (Michx.) Scribn.
Symphyotrichum Nees
Penstemon fruticosus var. serratus (D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Astragalus wootonii var. wootonii
Aphanostephus ramosissimus var. humilis (Benth.) B.L.Turner & Birdsong
Amsinckia retrorsa Suksd.
Salix nigra var. venulosa (Andersson) Bebb
Astragalus miser var. hylophilus (Rydb.) Barneby
Lotus plebeius (Brandegee) Barneby
Marina brevis León de la Luz
Melica bulbosa Porter & J.M.Coult.
Camissonia eastwoodiae (Munz) Raven
Aliciella subnuda (Torr. ex A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Saxifraga rivularis L.
Astragalus alpinus f. alpinus
Astragalus episcopus var. lancearius (A.Gray) Isely
Penstemon moffattii Eastw.
Tetradymia spinosa var. longispina M.E.Jones
Potentilla paradoxa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Fraxinus toumeyi Britton
Eriogonum viridulum Reveal
Glyceria elata (Nash) Hitchc.
Erigeron tweedyi Canby
Aegilops cylindrica Host
Eriogonum watsonii Torr. & A.Gray
Bromus anomalus Rupr. ex E.Fourn.
Odontotrichum decompositum (A.Gray) Rydb.
Agastache micrantha (A.Gray) Wooton & Standl.
Glyceria borealis (Nash) Batch.
Astragalus ceramicus var. ceramicus
Lessingia bicolor Greene
Rosa woodsii var. ultramontana (S.Watson) Jeps.
Castilleja exilis A.Nelson
Sedum debile S.Watson
Argythamnia lanceolata (Benth.) McMinn, 1939
Thlaspi montanum var. montanum
Astragalus argophyllus var. panguicensis (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Heliomeris multiflorus var. hispidus A.Gray, 1852
Solanum physalifolium var. nitidibaccatum (Bitter) Edmonds
Atriplex gardneri var. tridentata (Kuntze) J.F.Macbr.
Rorippa curvipes var. curvipes
Lomatium basalticum Mansfield & M.Stevens
Artemisia campestris var. canadensis (Michx.) S.L.Welsh
Phlox aculeata A.Nelson
Polanisia dodecandra var. trachysperma (Torr. & A.Gray) Iltis
Ranunculus gmelinii DC.
Symphoricarpos oreophilus A.Gray
Hackelia patens var. patens
Arabis holboellii Hornem.
Penstemon salmonensis N.H.Holmgren
Arabis sparsiflora var. sparsiflora
Penstemon pudicus Reveal & Beatley
Eragrostis hypnoides (Lam.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Yucca whipplei Torr.
Ranunculus alismifolius var. hartwegii (Greene) Jeps.
Gilia salticola Eastw.
Achnatherum lemmonii (Vasey) Barkworth
Synthyris pinnatifida var. pinnatifida
Orogenia linearifolia S.Watson
Alyssum alyssoides (L.) L.
Halimolobos jaegeri (Munz) Rollins
Eleocharis parishii Britton
Limosella aquatica L.
Lithophragma affinis A.Gray
Machaeranthera canescens var. leucanthemifolia (Greene) S.L.Welsh
Vaccinium caespitosum Michx.
Descurainia richardsonii subsp. viscosa (Rydb.) Detling
Penstemon scariosus var. cyanomontanus Neese
Astragalus anserinus N.D.Atwood, Goodrich & S.L.Welsh
Synthyris pinnatifida S.Watson
Lonicera ciliosa (Pursh) Poiret ex de Candolle
Viola praemorsa subsp. major (Hook.) M.S.Baker ex M.Peck
Saxifraga rhomboidea var. austrina A.Nelson
Eriogonum fusiforme Small
Thlaspi montanum var. idahoense (Payson) P.K.Holmgren
Eriogonum rubricaule Tidestr.
Hosackia mearnsii Britton
Aliciella leptomeria (A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Mentzelia laevicaulis var. laevicaulis
Monolopia bahiifolia Benth.
Artemisia aromatica A.Nelson
Lepidospartum latisquamum S.Watson
Acacia crinita Brandegee
Erigeron pygmaeus (A.Gray) Greene
Baileya multiradiata Harv. & A.Gray
Parosela megalostachys Rose
Juncus ensifolius var. ensifolius
Aquilegia formosa Fisch. ex DC.
Astragalus atratus var. stenophyllus M.E.Jones
Lathyrus ecirrhosus A.Heller
Rosa anatonensis H.St.John
Astragalus tephrodes var. brachylobus (A.Gray) Barneby
Juncus tiehmii Ertter
Cryptantha pterocarya var. pterocarya
Trifolium lemmonii S.Watson
Cryptantha virginensis Payson
Rosa woodsii var. woodsii
Aragallus besseyi Rydb.
Oenothera pallida subsp. runcinata (Engelm.) Munz & W.M.Klein
Eriastrum sparsiflorum var. wilcoxii (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Erigeron untermannii S.L.Welsh
Lindernia dubia var. rhizomatosa Pennell ex D.Q.Lewis
Lupinus trifidus Torr. ex S.Watson
Thelesperma subnudum var. subnudum
Ivesia rhypara var. rhypara
Hymenoxys acaulis var. lanata (Greene) Cronquist
Lomatium leptocarpum (Torr. & A.Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Descurainia incisa (Engelm. ex A.Gray) Britton
Cryptantha barnebyi I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha micrantha (Torr.) I.M.Johnst.
Ranunculus gmelinii var. purshii (Richardson) H.Hara
Polygonum ramosissimum Michx.
Arabis fendleri (S.Watson) Greene
Salix lutea Nutt.
Oenothera pallida var. latifolia Rydb.
Cryptantha flava (A.Nelson) Payson
Penstemon deustus var. deustus
Potentilla glandulosa var. nevadensis S.Watson
Aquilegia coerulea var. ochroleuca Hook.
Gaura coccinea Nutt. ex Pursh
Penstemon scariosus var. garrettii (Pennell) Holmgren
Erigeron peregrinus var. angustifolius (A.Gray) Cronquist
Perityle megalocephala var. oligophylla A.M.Powell
Bromus ciliatus L.
Chenopodium leptophyllum (Moq.) Nutt. ex S.Watson
Lepidium montanum var. stellae S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Erigeron nauseosus (M.E.Jones) A.Nelson
Astragalus callithrix Barneby
Thelypodium sagittatum subsp. ovalifolium (Rydb.) Al-Shehbaz
Astragalus cymboides M.E.Jones
Amelanchier alnifolia var. cusickii (Fernald) C.L.Hitchc.
Atriplex saccaria var. saccaria
Citrullus lanatus (Thunb.) Matsum. & Nakai
Potentilla pensylvanica var. arida B.Boivin
Bigelowia douglasii var. stenophylla A.Gray
Polygonum kelloggii var. kelloggii
Hilaria mutica (Buckley) Benth.
Hordeum murinum subsp. leporinum (Link) Arcang.
Dodecatheon jeffreyi Van Houtte
Eleocharis pauciflora (Lightf.) Link
Abronia nana S.Watson
Erigeron peregrinus subsp. callianthemus (Greene) Cronquist
Crataegus douglasii var. rivularis (Nutt.) Sarg.
Glyptopleura marginata Eaton
Antennaria howellii subsp. petaloidea (Fernald) R.J.Bayer
Astragalus nuttallianus var. imperfectus (Rydb.) Barneby
Townsendia strigosa Nutt.
Arenaria macradenia S.Watson
Erigeron glabellus var. glabellus
Stenotus latifolius A.Nelson
Cymopterus terebinthinus var. foeniculaceus (Torr. & A.Gray) Cronquist
Agoseris aurantiaca var. purpurea (A.Gray) Cronquist
Lathrocasis tenerrima (A.Gray) L.A.Johnson
Chrysopsis villosa var. viscida A.Gray
Allium L.
Penstemon decurvus Pennell ex Crosswh.
Erigeron spinosus Sch.Bip.
Porophyllum tridentatum Benth.
Sclerochloa dura (L.) P.Beauv.
Penstemon humilis var. brevifolius A.Gray
Astragalus rattanii var. rattanii
Mentzelia lagarosa (K.H.Thorne) J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Astragalus kentrophyta var. coloradoensis M.E.Jones
Oenothera pallida var. trichocalyx (Nutt.) Dorn
Phyllanthus polygonoides Nutt. ex Spreng.
Machaeranthera venusta (M.E.Jones) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Baccharis brachyphylla A.Gray
Carex petasata Dewey
Antennaria luzuloides subsp. luzuloides
Wyethia scabra Hook.
Dasyochloa pulchella (Kunth) Willd. ex Rydb.
Krameria parvifolia var. imparata Macbr.
Pedicularis racemosa var. alba (Pennell) Cronquist
Cryptantha abata I.M.Johnst.
Eleocharis acicularis var. bella Piper
Allium nevadense var. nevadense
Draba paysonii var. treleasii (O.E.Schulz) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex athrostachya Olney
Achnatherum nelsonii (Scribn.) Barkworth
Iva acerosa (Nutt.) R.C.Jacks.
Physaria lepidota var. lepidota
Castilleja lanata A.Gray
Muhlenbergia pungens Thurb.
Galium mexicanum subsp. asperulum (A.Gray) Dempster
Astragalus lentiginosus var. ambiguus Barneby
Aloysia nahuire Gentry & Moldenke
Poa abbreviata subsp. pattersonii (Vasey) Á.Löve, D.Löve & B.M.Kapoor
Salix eriocephala subsp. mackenzieana (Hook.) Dorn
Agoseris heterophylla var. heterophylla
Holodiscus discolor var. dumosus (S.Watson) Dippel
Astragalus fastidius (Kellogg) M.E.Jones
Allium geyeri S.Watson
Chaenactis lacera Greene
Euphorbia cuphosperma (Engelm.) Boiss.
Acalypha polystachya Jacq.
Castilleja sulphurea Rydb.
Astragalus sheldonii (Rydb.) Barneby
Penstemon putus A.Nelson
Carex multicaulis L.H.Bailey
Amelanchier alnifolia var. alnifolia
Penstemon aridus Rydb.
Penstemon speciosus subsp. kennedyi (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Potentilla gracilis var. fastigiata (Nutt.) S.Watson
Cuphea wrightii A.Gray
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. graveolens (Nutt.) Piper, 1906
Lemna trisulca L.
Cyperus fendlerianus var. debilis (Britton) Kük.
Arabis selbyi Rydb.
Lomatium foeniculaceum var. fimbriatum (W.L.Theob.) B.Boivin
Delphinium geraniifolium Rydb.
Penstemon paysoniorum D.D.Keck
Ranunculus inamoenus Greene
Ipomopsis tenuituba subsp. macrosiphon (Kearney & Peebles) V.E.Grant & Wilken
Ranunculus pygmaeus Wahlenb.
Aristida purpurea var. fendleriana (Steud.) Vasey
Bothriochloa springfieldii (Gould) Parodi
Echidiocarya ursina A.Gray
Lathyrus hitchcockianus Barneby & Reveal
Carex duriuscula C.A.Mey.
Cardaria chalepensis (L.) Hand.-Mazz.
Cirsium brevifolium Nutt.
Descurainia pinnata var. osmiarum (Cockerell) Shinners
Draba porsildii var. brevicula (Rollins) Rollins
Astragalus piutensis Barneby & Mabb.
Descurainia paradisa var. paradisa
Ipomopsis spicata (Nutt.) V.E.Grant
Astragalus purshii var. ophiogenes (Barneby) Barneby
Lesquerella rectipes Wooton & Standl.
Perezia wrightii A.Gray
Cleomella hillmanii var. hillmanii
Vahlodea atropurpurea (Wahlenb.) Fr. ex Hartm.
Cerastium arvense subsp. strictum (L.) Gaudin
Chenopodium nevadense Standl.
Lycopus asper Greene
Hesperodoria scopulorum (M.E.Jones) Greene
Dodecatheon cusickii var. album Suksd.
Acer grosseri Pax
Epilobium glandulosum Lehm.
Lesquerella fendleri (A.Gray) S.Watson
Castilleja lacera (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Penstemon barnebyi N.H.Holmgren
Lomatium idahoense Mathias & Constance
Rorippa palustris var. fernaldiana (Butters & Abbe) Stuckey
Alisma gramineum Lej.
Centaurium calycosum (Buckley) Fernald
Eriogonum leptocladon var. leptocladon
Astragalus convallarius var. convallarius
Pyrola L.
Chamaesyce parryi (Engelm.) Rydb.
Astragalus casei A.Gray
Lemna trinervis (Austin) Small
Mimosa biuncifera Benth.
Potentilla breweri S.Watson
Leptosiphon nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Carex breweri Boott
Oenothera deltoides var. piperi Munz
Astragalus L.
Lotus purshianus Clem. & E.G.Clem.
Clarkia rhomboidea Douglas ex Hook.
Muhlenbergia richardsonis (Trin.) Rydb.
Cryptantha bakeri (Greene) Payson
Sidalcea oregana var. procera C.L.Hitchc.
Suaeda calceoliformis (Hook.) Moq.
Eriogonum calcareum (S.Stokes) Grady & Reveal
Aconogonon phytolaccifolium (Meisn. ex Small) Small ex Rydb.
Lupinus luteolus Kellogg
Penstemon fremontii Torr. & Gray
Sambucus mexicana C.Presl ex DC.
Penstemon apateticus subsp. townsendianus Straw
Stenogonum flexum (M.E.Jones) Reveal, J.T.Howell & Brittonia.
Gymnosteris nudicaulis (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Cabomba caroliniana var. caroliniana
Trollius albiflorus (A.Gray) Rydb.
Ranunculus macounii Britton
Erigeron simplex Greene
Lesquerella prostrata A.Nelson
Opuntia megacantha Salm-Dyck
Penstemon procerus var. aberrans (M.E.Jones) A.Nelson
Camissonia pallida (Abrams) Raven
Elymus trachycaulus (Link) Gould ex Shinners
Baccharis alamosana S.F.Blake
Mirabilis comata (Small) Standl.
Eupatorium herbaceum (A.Gray) Greene
Orthocarpus holmgreniorum (T.I.Chuang & Heckard) L.M.Schultz & F.J.Sm.
Eriogonum collinum Stokes ex M.E.Jones
Carex heteroneura W.Boott
Aquilegia formosa var. formosa
Silene conoidea L.
Rhinotropis intermontana (T.Wendt) J.R.Abbott
Astragalus layneae Greene
Salvia pachyphylla subsp. pachyphylla
Linanthus caespitosus (Nutt.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Eriogonum spathulatum A.Gray
Lesquerella ludoviciana (Nutt.) S.Watson
Mirabilis macfarlanei Constance & Rollins
Leucopoa kingii (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Minuartia nuttallii var. fragilis (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) Rabeler & R.L.Hartm.
Euphorbia esula L.
Lupinus nevadensis A.Heller
Draba juniperina Dorn
Ribes montigenum McClatchie
Eriophyllum lanatum var. lanatum
Castilleja pilosa var. pilosa
Arctostaphylos diversifolia (Parry) Parry ex A.Gray
Eriogonum brevicaule var. bannockense (S.Stokes) Reveal
Astragalus ensiformis var. ensiformis
Penstemon flowersii Neese & S.L.Welsh
Lepidium nitidum var. nitidum
Cryptantha pterocarya var. cycloptera (Greene) J.F.Macbr.
Angelica kingii (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Mimosa asperata L.
Viola adunca f. adunca
Carex aurea Nutt.
Carex leptalea subsp. leptalea
Mentzelia dispersa S.Watson
Elymus trachycaulus subsp. trachycaulus
Atriplex parryi S.Watson
Carex interior L.H.Bailey
Oenothera flava (A.Nelson) Garrett
Mimulus moschatus Douglas ex Lindl.
Lomatium scabrum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Claytonia arenicola L.F.Hend.
Penstemon payettensis A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Colutea arborescens L.
Agoseris parviflora (Nutt.) D.Dietr.
Allium bisceptrum var. bisceptrum
Allium nevadense var. cristatum (S.Watson) Ownbey
Mertensia viridis (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Gentianella tortuosa (M.E.Jones) J.M.Gillett
Oxytropis viscida Nutt.
Eriogonum microthecum var. laxiflorum Hook.
Potentilla diversifolia Lehm.
Prenanthes sagittata (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Atriplex gardneri var. falcata (Jones) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus monumentalis var. cottamii (S.L.Welsh) Isely
Drymaria tenella A.Gray
Ligusticum tenuifolium S.Watson
Eriogonum contiguum (Reveal) Reveal
Quercus welshii R.A.Denham
Thelypodium leptosepalum Rydb.
Lomatium foeniculaceum var. foeniculaceum
Penstemon tiehmii N.H.Holmgren
Eriogonum ochrocephalum S.Watson
Muhlenbergia filiformis (Thurb.) Rydb.
Lepidium montanum var. neeseae S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Penstemon subserratus Pennell
Argythamnia lanceolata (Benth.) Müll.Arg.
Trisetum cernuum subsp. canescens (Buckley) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Allium anceps Kellogg
Erigeron peregrinus var. callianthemus (Greene) Cronquist
Lindernia dubia (L.) Pennell
Camissonia minor (A.Nelson) Raven
Eriogonum nutans var. nutans
Phyla lanceolata (Michx.) Greene
Arabis shockleyi Munz
Eriogonum nudum var. oblongifolium S.Watson
Dichanthelium acuminatum var. acuminatum
Linum aristatum Engelm.
Carex subbracteata Mack.
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. palmifrons (Brand) A.G.Day
Jatropha palmeri S.Watson
Delphinium variegatum subsp. variegatum
Astragalus lentiginosus var. araneosus (E.Sheld.) Barneby
Solidago californica Nutt.
Schismus arabicus Nees
Ranunculus eschscholtzii var. eschscholtzii
Erigeron piperianus Cronquist
Eriogonum microthecum var. ambiguum (M.E.Jones) Reveal
Asclepias tuberosa var. interior (Woodson) Shinners
Heterotheca zionensis Semple
Chrysothamnus Nutt.
Alnus oblongifolia Torr.
Solidago nana Nutt.
Sclerocactus whipplei (Engelm. & Bigelow) Britton & Rose
Centaurium exaltatum (Griseb.) W.Wight ex Piper
Psorothamnus thompsonae (Vail) S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Lomatium dissectum var. eatonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Cronquist
Salix geyeriana Andersson
Hymenopappus filifolius var. nanus (Rydb.) B.L.Turner
Dimorphotheca aurantiaca DC.
Trifolium longipes subsp. pendunculatum (Rydb.) J.M.Gillett
Isocoma arguta Greene
Aristida divaricata Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Eatonella nivea (D.C.Eaton) A.Gray
Chamaesyce serpillifolia (Pers.) Small
Coleosanthus chenopodinus Greene
Antennaria stenophylla (A.Gray) A.Gray
Eriogonum giganteum var. giganteum
Dodecatheon redolens (Hall) H.J.Thomps.
Abronia mellifera var. pahoveorum Ertter & Nosratinia
Astragalus lentiginosus var. lentiginosus
Camissonia pterosperma (S.Watson) Raven
Astragalus amphioxys var. modestus Barneby
Dyssodia pentachaeta var. belenidium (DC.) Strother
Potentilla macropetala Rydb.
Penstemon mucronatus N.H.Holmgren
Trifolium longipes var. hansenii (Greene) Jeps.
Senecio atratus Greene
Aliciella stenothyrsa (A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Silene nuda (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Chaenactis macrantha Eaton
Mentzelia L.
Juncus tenuis var. tenuis
Rhus aromatica var. trilobata (Nutt.) A.Gray
Camissonia parryi (S.Watson) Raven
Erigeron acris var. debilis A.Gray
Lupinus sitgreavesii S.Watson
Minuartia obtusiloba (Rydb.) House
Artemisia L.
Sambucus cerulea var. neomexicana (Wooton) Rehder
Eremogone fendleri var. fendleri
Chenopodium glaucum var. salinum (Standl.) B.Boivin
Penstemon eriantherus var. redactus Pennell & D.D.Keck
Viola praemorsa Douglas ex Lindley
Salix eriocephala var. watsonii (Bebb) Dorn
Arabis lignifera A.Nelson
Amsinckia menziesii var. menziesii
Arabis microphylla var. microphylla
Sedum thartii L.P.Hébert
Mimosa dysocarpa A.Gray
Perideridia bolanderi subsp. bolanderi
Salix eriocephala Michx.
Cercis occidentalis Torr.
Holodiscus discolor var. delnortensis F.Ley
Echinomastus intertextus (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Antennaria media Greene
Vicia americana var. linearis (Nutt.) S.Watson
Plagiobothrys campestris Greene
Epilobium alpinum L.
Eriogonum cernuum var. cernuum
Cleomella hillmanii A.Nelson
Agoseris lacera Greene
Aristida purpurea var. longiseta (Steud.) Vasey
Erigeron glabellus Nutt.
Astragalus striatiflorus M.E.Jones
Corispermum pacificum Mosyakin
Cestrum nocturnum L.
Opuntia tenuispina Engelm. & Bigelow
Salix phylicifolia subsp. planifolia (Pursh) Hiitonen
Echinochloa crus-galli var. mitis (Pursh) Peterm.
Lesquerella parvula Greene
Eupatorium occidentale Hook.
Lonicera hispidula Douglas ex Torr. & A.Gray
Campanula garganica Ten.
Castilleja scabrida var. barnebyana (Eastw.) Holmgren
Astragalus salmonis M.E.Jones
Cryptantha caespitosa (A.Nelson) Payson
Astragalus yoder-williamsii Barneby
Allium austiniae M.E.Jones
Carex straminiformis L.H.Bailey
Lomatium vaginatum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Cirsium calcareum (M.E.Jones) Wooton & Standl.
Astragalus panamintensis E.Sheld.
Atriplex phyllostegia (Torr.) S.Watson
Martynia palmeri S.Watson
Hesperostipa neomexicana (Thurb.) Barkworth
Astragalus sanctorum Barneby
Penstemon richardsonii var. dentatus (D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Penstemon patricus N.H.Holmgren
Lepidium densiflorum var. densiflorum
Erigeron tracyi Greene
Erigeron leiomerus A.Gray
Astragalus convallarius var. finitimus Barneby
Isocoma acradenia subsp. eremophila (Greene) R.M.Beauch.
Astragalus lutosus M.E.Jones
Populus ×acuminata Rydb.
Draba subalpina Goodman & C.L.Hitchc.
Lomatium dasycarpum subsp. tomentosum (Benth.) Theob.
Astragalus newberryi var. blyae (Rose) Barneby
Astragalus pardalinus (Rydb.) Barneby
Juncus arcticus subsp. ater (Rydb.) Hultén
Oenothera lavandulifolia var. glandulosa Munz
Thlaspi australe A.Nelson
Euphorbia cyathophora Murray
Scutellaria wrightii A.Gray
Allocarya divergens Piper
Oenothera pallida var. pallida
Carex limnophila F.J.Herm.
Eriogonum alatum var. mogollense S.Stokes ex M.E.Jones
Bromus diandrus var. rigidus (Roth) Sales
Physaria chambersii var. sobolifera S.L.Welsh
Astragalus beckwithii var. beckwithii
Anticlea virescens (Kunth) Rydb.
Vicia americana var. americana
Acer negundo var. interior (Britton) Sarg.
Corylus cornuta var. californica (A.DC.) Sharp.
Eriogonum spergulinum var. reddingianum (M.E.Jones) J.T.Howell
Sidalcea oregana var. oregana
Astragalus mulfordiae M.E.Jones
Trifolium eriocephalum var. cusickii (Piper) J.S.Martin
Lactuca biennis (Moench) Fernald
Juncus arcticus Willd.
Tofieldia glutinosa var. brevistyla (C.L.Hitchc.) C.L.Hitchc.
Erigeron pumilus var. condensatus (D.C.Eaton) Cronquist
Gypsophila scorzonerifolia Ser.
Aquilegia triternata Payson
Thelypodium flexuosum B.L.Rob.
Artemisia scopulorum A.Gray
Viola orbiculata Geyer ex Holz.
Elymus scribneri (Vasey) M.E.Jones
Potentilla brunnescens Rydb.
Arabis nuttallii B.L.Rob.
Juncus ensifolius var. montanus (Engelm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Trifolium gymnocarpon Torr. & A.Gray
Poa nervosa (Hook.) Vasey
Atriplex truncata (Torr.) Gray
Lotus denticulatus Greene
Holodiscus microphyllus var. glabrescens (Greenm.) F.Ley
Festuca rubra subsp. arenaria (Osbeck) Aresch.
Tilia americana L.
Chamerion angustifolium (L.) Holub
Hymenoclea salsola Torr. & A.Gray
Allium geyeri var. geyeri
Symphyotrichum foliaceum var. parryi (D.C.Eaton) G.L.Nesom
Campanula parryi A.Gray
Banksia media R.Br.
Downingia laeta (Greene) Greene
Xanthorrhoea australis R.Br.
Astragalus miser var. oblongifolius (Rydb.) Cronquist
Astragalus acutirostris S.Watson
Descurainia californica (A.Gray) O.E.Schulz
Pectis prostrata var. cylindrica Fernald
Penstemon flavescens Pennell
Eremogone congesta var. congesta
Bursera filicifolia Brandegee
Chaenactis douglasii var. achilleifolia (Hook. & Arn.) A.Nelson, 1909
Stanleya confertiflora (B.L.Rob.) T.J.Howell
Camissonia boothii subsp. desertorum (Munz) P.H.Raven
Trifolium gymnocarpon var. gymnocarpon
Quercus undulata Torr.
Pycnanthemum californicum Torr. ex Durand
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. nevadense Gand.
Agrostis pallens Trin.
Lupinus nanus var. nanus
Packera cynthioides (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Carex L.
Carex chalciolepis Holm
Eremogone congesta var. cephaloidea (Rydb.) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Keckiella rothrockii subsp. rothrockii
Pistacia atlantica Desf.
Penstemon tusharensis N.H.Holmgren
Cryptantha spiculifera (Piper) Payson
Acleisanthes nevadensis (Standl.) B.L.Turner
Chamaesyce glyptosperma (Engelm.) Small
Festuca brachyphylla subsp. coloradensis Fred.
Amaranthus retroflexus L.
Sclerocactus parviflorus var. intermedius (Peebles) Woodruff & Benson
Cryptantha schoolcraftii Tiehm
Astragalus eucosmus B.L.Rob.
Artemisia pygmaea A.Gray
Dyssodia porophylloides A.Gray
Ptelea trifoliata subsp. pallida (Greene) V.L.Bailey
Lactuca serriola var. integrata Farw.
Galium occidentale McClatchie
Aristida arizonica Vasey
Gutierrezia pomariensis (Welsh) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus fucatus Barneby
Erigeron corymbosus Nutt.
Arabis cobrensis M.E.Jones
Hackelia cinerea (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Antennaria rosea subsp. confinis (Greene) R.J.Bayer
Erigeron pumilus subsp. pumilus
Phyla cuneifolia (Torr.) Greene
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. sulcata (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Arabis holboellii var. pinetorum (Tidestr.) Rollins
Peucedanum suksdorfii S.Watson
Penstemon leiophyllus var. francisci-pennellii (Crosswh.) Holmgren
Descurainia pinnata var. nelsonii (Rydb.) M.Peck
Arabis davidsonii Greene
Lotus wrightii (A.Gray) Greene
Atriplex patula L.
Persicaria punctata (Elliott) Small
Horkelia platycalyx Rydb.
Lesquerella rubicundula Rollins
Streptanthus Nutt.
Draba lanceolata Royle
Muhlenbergia andina (Nutt.) Hitchc.
Melilotus officinalis (L.) Pallas
Verbena gooddingii Briq.
Trifolium douglasii House
Pyrus dumosa Fernald
Erigeron formosissimus Greene
Senecio ertterae T.M.Barkley
Lithocarpus densiflorus var. densiflorus
Penstemon laetus var. sagittatus (D.D.Keck) McMinn
Achnatherum occidentale (Thurb. ex S.Watson) Barkworth
Cryptantha sericea (A.Gray) Payson
Scopulophila rixfordii (Brandegee) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Chorizanthe cuspidata var. marginata Goodman
Cymopterus ripleyi Barneby
Pyrrocoma carthamoides var. cusickii (A.Gray) Kartesz & Gandhi
Pseudopanax lessonii (DC.) K.Koch
Bambusa bambos (L.) Voss
Brassica nigra (L.) K.Koch
Potentilla newberryi A.Gray
Penstemon procerus var. tolmiei (Hook.) Cronquist
Gentiana parryi Engelm.
Gilia mexicana A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Hymenosporum flavum (Hook.) F.Muell.
Astragalus oophorus var. lonchocalyx Barneby
Anemone multifida var. saxicola B.Boivin
Symphoricarpos oreophilus var. parishii (Rydb.) Cronquist
Vulpia bromoides (L.) Gray
Sphaeralcea subrhomboidea Rydb.
Frasera albicaulis var. idahoensis (H.St.John) C.L.Hitchc.
Machaeranthera arida B.L.Turner & Horne
Potentilla drummondii Lehm.
Draba nemorosa L.
Dicoria canescens var. canescens
Hackelia micrantha (Eastw.) J.L.Gentry
Penstemon sudans M.E.Jones
Physaria kingii subsp. cobrensis (Rollins & E.A.Shaw) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Carex rupestris All.
Polygonum sawatchense Small
Carex eleocharis L.H.Bailey
Penstemon lemhiensis (D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck & Cronquist
Grindelia laciniata Rydb.
Crataegus annosa Beadle
Lupinus sparsiflorus subsp. sparsiflorus
Calycadenia tenella (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Glyceria lemmonii (Vasey) Vasey
Arabis pulchra var. pallens M.E.Jones
Erigeron pumilus var. subglaber Cronquist
Moluccella laevis L.
Carex crawfordii Fernald
Plagiobothrys kingii var. kingii
Cryptantha fendleri (A.Gray) Greene
Eriogonum leucocladon Benth.
Cryptantha ochroleuca Higgins
Astragalus desperatus var. desperatus
Polygonum californicum Meisn.
Eriogonum gordonii Benth.
Medicago sativa var. sativa
Oreocarya affinis (A.Gray) Greene
Senecio serra var. serra
Cuscuta pentagona Engelm.
Salix farriae C.R.Ball
Lesquerella tenella A.Nelson
Angelica pinnata S.Watson
Cryptantha breviflora (Osterh.) Payson
Delphinium glaucescens Rydb.
Salix nivalis Hook.
Astragalus tegetarioides M.E.Jones
Erioneuron pilosum (Buckley) Nash
Astragalus coltonii var. coltonii
Hedysarum boreale var. boreale
Penstemon washingtonensis D.D.Keck
Erigeron eximius Greene
Heterotheca hispida (Hook.) G.L.Nesom
Sidalcea vitifolia A.Gray
Aliciella hutchinsifolia (Rydb.) J.M.Porter
Muhlenbergia torreyi (Kunth) Hitchc. ex Bush
Oenothera glazioviana Micheli
Saxifraga flagellaris Sternb. & Willd.
Spiraea ×pyramidata Greene
Hackelia ursina (Greene ex A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. zionense (Eastw.) S.L.Welsh
Salix monticola Bebb
Eriogonum subreniforme S.Watson
Echinocereus coccineus subsp. rosei (Wooton & Standl.) W.Blum & Rutow
Penstemon eatonii subsp. exsertus (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Minuartia nuttallii subsp. fragilis (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) McNeill
Machaeranthera pinnatifida (Hook.) Shinners
Salix lucida subsp. lasiandra (Benth.) A.E.Murray
Sidalcea oregana var. nevadensis C.L.Hitchc.
Malacothrix fendleri A.Gray
Abronia mellifera Douglas ex Hook.
Juncus triformis Engelm.
Trifolium breweri S.Watson
Lomatium triternatum var. triternatum
Thermopsis montana var. ovata (B.L.Rob. ex Piper) H.St.John
Matricaria matricarioides (Less.) Porter ex Britton
Calamagrostis koelerioides Vasey
Packera castoreus (S.L.Welsh) Kartesz
Senecio longilobus Benth.
Lomatium bicolor (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Astragalus reventiformis (Rydb.) Barneby
Lasianthaea podocephala (A.Gray) K.M.Becker
Salix drummondiana Barratt ex Hook.
Jonesiella mearnsii Rydb.
Lolium pratense (Huds.) Darbysh.
Guilleminea densa var. aggregata Uline & W.L.Bray
Agrostis stolonifera L.
Marina crenulata var. crenulata
Ipomopsis Michx.
Oenothera caespitosa var. crinita (Rydb.) Munz
Astragalus lentiginosus var. vitreus Barneby
Penstemon concinnus D.D.Keck
Salix rotundifolia Trautv.
Viguiera multiflora var. nevadensis S.F.Blake
Psilostrophe lanata Anon.
Cicuta maculata L.
Besseya rubra (Douglas ex Hook.) Rydb.
Artemisia tridentata subsp. tridentata
Oreostemma alpigenum var. haydenii (Porter) G.L.Nesom
Antirrhinum filipes A.Gray
Ambrosia cordifolia (A.Gray) Payne
Cryptantha angustifolia (Torr.) Greene
Arabis holboellii var. secunda (Howell) Jeps.
Verbena tenuisecta Briq.
Agiabampoa congesta Rose
Lupinus breweri var. clokeyanus C.P.Sm.
Camissonia chamaenerioides (A.Gray ex S.Watson) Raven
Saxifraga oregana var. oregana
Navarretia sinistra (M.E.Jones) L.A.Johnson
Machaeranthera asteroides var. asteroides
Lupinus argenteus var. rubricaulis (Greene) S.L.Welsh
Cerastium arvense var. strictum (Gaudin) W.D.J.Koch
Polygonum shastense W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray
Lotus humistratus Greene
Solidago sparsiflora A.Gray
Astragalus amblytropis Barneby
Sphaeralcea psoraloides S.L.Welsh
Poa trivialis L.
Calliandra grandiflora (L'Hér.) Benth.
Montia dichotoma (Nutt.) Howell
Lappula echinata (L.) Gilib.
Calathea G.Mey.
Collomia debilis (S.Watson) Greene
Platanthera dilatata var. leucostachys (Lindley) Luer
Eriogonum trichopes var. trichopes
Pedicularis contorta var. rubicunda R.N.Reese
Acalypha monostachya Cav.
Baccharis bigelovii A.Gray
Atriplex powellii S.Watson
Amsonia tomentosa var. stenophylla Kearney & Peebles
Astragalus newberryi var. castoreus M.E.Jones
Astragalus wardii A.Gray
Saracha chihuahuensis Bitter
Trifolium montanense Rydb.
Castilleja viscidula A.Gray
Streptanthus arcuatus Nutt.
Vulpia octoflora (Walter) Rydb.
Coreocarpus arizonicus var. pubescens (B.L.Rob. & Fernald) S.F.Blake
Pyrrocoma uniflora var. uniflora
Sphaeromeria potentilloides var. nitrophila (Cronquist) A.H.Holmgren, L.M.Shultz & Lowrey
Poa douglasii Nees
Grayia brandegeei var. plummeri Stutz & S.C.Sand.
Antennaria callilepis Greene
Centaurea maculosa Lam.
Callicoma serratifolia Andr.
Viola praemorsa var. altior Blank.
Rhynchosia senna var. angustifolia (A.Gray) Grear
Euphorbia pionosperma V.W.Steinm. & Felger
Polygonum aviculare subsp. buxiforme (Small) Costea & Tardif
Carex capillaris L.
Astragalus sabulonum A.Gray
Atriplex graciliflora M.E.Jones.
Crepis runcinata var. hispidulosa Howell ex Rydb.
Astragalus inflexus Douglas ex Hook.
Gentianopsis detonsa var. elegans (A.Nelson) Holmgren
Eriogonum umbellatum var. nelsoniorum Reveal
Mimulus primuloides var. primuloides
Evolvulus sericeus Sw.
Ambrosia magdalenae (Brandegee) Payne
Eriogonum mancum Rydb.
Polyctenium fremontii var. fremontii
Euphorbia nutans Lag.
Potentilla concinna var. concinna
Chorizanthe cuspidata var. cuspidata
Valerianella congesta var. trigona Suksd.
Camissonia scapoidea (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Cymopterus glaucus Nutt.
Astragalus cusickii var. cusickii
Zapoteca formosa subsp. rosei (Wiggins) H.M.Hern.
Lupinus caudatus var. caudatus
Thinopyrum elongatum (Host) D.R.Dewey
Senecio douglasii var. monoensis (Greene) Jeps.
Stephanomeria parryi A.Gray
Nevada holmgrenii (Rollins) N.H.Holmgren
Gilia aliquanta subsp. breviloba A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Penstemon angustifolius var. venosus (D.D.Keck) Holmgren
Orobanche corymbosa (Rydb.) Ferris
Astragalus succumbens Douglas ex Hook.
Helianthella microcephala (A.Gray) A.Gray
Parryella filifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Aristida oligantha Michx.
Erigeron goodrichii S.L.Welsh
Horkelia argyrocoma Rydb.
Castilleja L.fil.
Brickellia microphylla var. microphylla
Panicum bulbosum var. minor Vasey
Ribes wolfii Rothr.
Penstemon nanus D.D.Keck
Chlorocrambe hastata (S.Watson) Rydb.
Ranunculus jovis A.Nelson
Pedicularis parryi var. parryi
Erigeron kachinensis S.L.Welsh & M.O.Moore
Isocoma menziesii var. tridentata (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Physaria newberryi A.Gray
Drymocallis Fourr.
Vicia ludoviciana Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Madia gracilis (Sm.) D.D.Keck
Agoseris glauca var. agrestis (Osterh.) Q.Jones
Rumex occidentalis (Michx.) S.Watson
Cogswellia nevadensis var. pseudorientalis M.E.Jones
Thelesperma caespitosum Dorn
Salix geyeriana var. meleina J.K.Henry
Mentzelia argillosa J.Darl.
Salix glauca var. villosa (Hook.) Andersson
Tephrosia tenella A.Gray
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. turbinatus (M.E.Jones) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Astragalus praelongus var. lonchopus Barneby
Eleocharis acicularis (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Carex gigas (Holm) Mack.
Penstemon floridus var. austinii (Eastw.) Holmgren
Juncus hemiendytus var. hemiendytus
Astragalus lentiformis A.Gray
Galium microphyllum A.Gray
Arabis lemmonii var. depauperata (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) Rollins
Sedum kiersteadiae B.L.Wilson & R.E.Brainerd
Lupinus elatus I.M.Johnst.
Carex haydeniana Olney
Crataegus gaylussacia A.Heller
Pectis longipes A.Gray
Brickellia microphylla var. scabra A.Gray
Sarcocornia utahensis (Tidestr.) A.J.Scott
Asclepias labriformis M.E.Jones
Eriogonum umbellatum var. ellipticum (Nutt.) Reveal
Horkelia fusca subsp. parviflora (Nutt.) D.D.Keck
Erigeron platyphyllus Greene
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. lanszwertii
Zuckia arizonica Standl.
Oxytropis lagopus var. conjugans Barneby
Opuntia munzii C.B.Wolf
Sonchus arvensis subsp. arvensis
Pyrrocoma hirta var. hirta
Astragalus ensiformis M.E.Jones
Potentilla ovina var. ovina
Viguiera cordifolia A.Gray
Astragalus lentiginosus var. wilsonii (Greene) Barneby
Cryptantha interrupta (Greene) Payson
Astragalus lentiginosus var. semotus Jeps.
Tetradymia spinosa var. spinosa
Amsonia eastwoodiana Rydb.
Cuscuta denticulata Engelm.
Castilleja christii N.H.Holmgren
Senecio aronicoides DC.
Geum rossii var. turbinatum (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Eriogonum procidum Reveal
Sanguisorba minor Scop.
Cryptantha welshii K.H.Thorne & L.C.Higgins
Mentzelia tiehmii N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Astragalus musiniensis M.E.Jones
Gnaphalium proximum Greene
Festuca trachyphylla (Hack.) Krajina
Glaux maritima L.
Danthonia intermedia Vasey
Erigeron tener (A.Gray) A.Gray
Penstemon breviculus (D.D.Keck) Nisbet & R.C.Jacks.
Astragalus ceramicus var. apus Barneby
Astragalus tener var. tener
Wyethia arizonica A.Gray
Barbarea americana Rydb.
Dicoria brandegeei A.Gray
Balsamorhiza hispidula Sharp
Oenothera caespitosa var. navajoensis (Wagner, Stockh. & Klein) Cronquist
Oenothera longissima Rydb.
Arnica gracilis Rydb.
Senecio amplectens A.Gray
Grayia brandegeei A.Gray
Barbarea vulgaris R.Br.
Amsinckia lycopsoides Lehm.
Cryptantha maritima (Greene) Greene
Camissonia claviformis var. lancifolia (A.Heller) Cronquist
Camissonia pubens (S.Watson) P.H.Raven
Astragalus ensiformis var. gracilior Barneby
Vaccaria hispanica (Mill.) Rauschert
Astragalus bourgovii A.Gray
Prosopis articulata S.Watson
Penstemon pseudospectabilis subsp. connatifolius (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Carex laeviculmis Meinsh.
Potentilla breweri var. breweri
Lonicera albiflora Torr. & Gray
Juncus macrandrus Coville
Tetraclea coulteri A.Gray
Tissa luteola Greene
Palafoxia linearis var. glandulosa B.L.Turner & M.L.Morris
Lonicera dumosa A.Gray
Chaenactis alpigena Sharsm.
Senecio fremontii subsp. fremontii
Cryptantha fulvocanescens (S.Watson) Payson
Limosella acaulis Sessé & Moc.
Festuca minutiflora Rydb.
Lonchocarpus hermannii M.Sousa
Camissonia palmeri (S.Watson) Raven
Lemna minuta Kunth
Arabis lemmonii S.Watson
Aragallus alpicola Rydb.
Erigeron breweri var. breweri
Salix petiolaris Sm.
Cymopterus macdougalii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Tidestr.
Franseria deltoidea Torr.
Valeriana acutiloba var. glabra (Jeps.) Cronquist
Antennaria argentea (A.Gray) Benth.
Carex norvegica Retz.
Ribes petiolare Douglas
Descurainia richardsonii subsp. incisa (Engelm.) Detling
Eriogonum umbellatum var. stragulum Reveal
Luzula campestris (L.) DC.
Mertensia lanceolata (Pursh) A.DC.
Penstemon superbus A.Nelson
Euphorbia sphaerorhiza Benth.
Mimosa grahamii var. grahamii
Penstemon acaulis L.O.Williams
Bidens sambucifolia Cav.
Juncus arcticus subsp. mexicanus
Poa arctica R.Br.
Pectocarya palmeri (A.Gray) Veno
Dodecatheon alpinum (A.Gray) Greene
Gaillardia pringlei Rydb.
Penstemon leiophyllus var. leiophyllus
Ivesia sabulosa (M.E.Jones) D.D.Keck
Lupinus lepidus var. sellulus (Kellogg) Barneby
Populus deltoides var. fremontii (S.Watson) Cronquist
Coloptera jonesii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Viola frank-smithii N.H.Holmgren
Bromus pumpellianus Scribn.
Epilobium saximontanum Hausskn.
Cirsium canovirens (Rydb.) Petr.
Polemonium pulcherrimum var. calycinum (Eastw.) Brand
Oxytropis lagopus Nutt.
Arabis drummondii A.Gray
Rubus parviflorus var. parviflorus
Cordylanthus maritimus subsp. canescens (A.Gray) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Ranunculus sceleratus var. multifidus Nutt.
Stellaria praecox A.Nelson
Lesquerella occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Astragalus serenoi var. serenoi
Trifolium andinum var. andinum
Machaeranthera gracilis (Nutt.) Shinners
Packera hartiana (A.Heller) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Acer buergerianum Miq.
Potentilla L.
Abronia glabrifolia Standl.
Astragalus douglasii var. glaberrimus M.E.Jones
Melica smithii (Porter ex A.Gray) Vasey
Artemisia norvegica Fr.
Scutellaria angustifolia subsp. micrantha Olmstead
Prunus virginiana var. melanocarpa (A.Nelson) Sarg.
Penstemon seorsus (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Potamogeton richardsonii (A.Benn.) Rydb.
Epilobium hornemannii Rchb.
Potentilla rivalis Nutt.
Allocarya charaxata var. debilis Brand
Arabis divaricarpa A.Nelson
Cuscuta occidentalis Millsp.
Cryptantha ambigua (A.Gray) Greene
Penstemon lyalli (A.Gray) A.Gray
Viola flavovirens Pollard
Camissonia claviformis var. cruciformis (Kellogg) Cronquist
Gnaphalium chilense Spreng.
Monardella odoratissima var. glauca (Greene) H.St.John
Juncus L.
Eriogonum thompsoniae var. matthewsiae (Rev.) Reveal
Muhlenbergia minutissima (Steud.) Swallen
Cirsium hallii (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Euphorbia serrata L.
Penstemon gairdneri var. oreganus Gray
Crepis modocensis Greene
Mertensia alpina (Torr.) G.Don
Cyperus L.
Astragalus miser var. praeteritus Barneby
Oenothera hookeri Torr. & A.Gray
Camissonia boothii (Douglas) Raven
Sphaeromeria diversifolia (D.C.Eaton) Rydb.
Trifolium nanum Torr.
Leptochloa fusca subsp. uninervia (J.Presl) N.Snow
Solidago parryi (A.Gray) Greene
Stevia plummerae var. plummerae
Astragalus mohavensis var. hemigyrus (Clokey) Barneby
Packera debilis (Nutt.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Astragalus moencoppensis M.E.Jones
Camissonia tanacetifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Crepis runcinata var. glauca (Nutt.) B.Boivin
Trautvetteria carolinensis (Walter) Britton ex A.Murray & Vail
Mentzelia flumensevera (N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren) J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Lepidium montanum var. montanum
Trifolium gymnocarpon var. plummerae (S.Watson) J.S.Martin
Aquilegia elegantula Greene
Oenothera flava subsp. flava
Agoseris aurantiaca var. aurantiaca
Elymus wawawaiensis J.R.Carlson & Barkworth
Arenaria kingii subsp. plateauensis Maguire
Epilobium torreyi (S.Watson) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Crypsis alopecuroides (Piller & Mitterp.) Schrad.
Machaeranthera rigida Greene
Eriogonum wetherillii Eastw.
Hackelia ibapensis L.M.Shultz & J.S.Shultz
Amelanchier alnifolia var. pumila (Torr. & A.Gray) C.K.Schneid.
Astragalus miser var. decumbens (Nutt.) Cronquist
Pediomelum megalanthum var. megalanthum
Bromus inermis subsp. inermis
Verbesina encelioides subsp. exauriculata (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) J.R.Coleman
Amphipappus fremontii var. fremontii
Potentilla nivea L.
Bolboschoenus maritimus subsp. paludosus (A.Nelson) T.Koyama
Astragalus duchesnensis M.E.Jones
Opuntia californica Engelm.
Thalictrum alpinum L.
Potentilla diversifolia var. diversifolia
Physocarpus alternans (M.E.Jones) J.T.Howell
Lupinus klamathensis Eastw.
Juncus ensifolius var. brunnescens (Rydb.) Cronquist
Erigeron strigosus var. strigosus
Olsynium douglasii var. inflatum (Suksd.) Cholewa & Douglass M.Hend.
Arabis gracilipes Greene
Sisyrinchium halophilum Greene
Collomia gilioides Benth.
Arenaria kingii var. kingii
Lysiloma acapulcense (Kunth) Benth.
Cirsium joannae S.L.Welsh, N.D.Atwood & L.C.Higgins
Brickellia oblongifolia var. oblongifolia
Epilobium canum var. garrettii (A.Nelson) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Potentilla glandulosa var. glandulosa
Packera streptanthifolia (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Horkelia fusca subsp. capitata (Lindl.) D.D.Keck
Adonis aestivalis L.
Eriogonum rixfordii S.Stokes
Astragalus pubentissimus Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus ampullarius S.Watson
Astragalus egglestonii (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Lomatium juniperinum (M.E.Jones) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Juncus effusus subsp. pacificus (Fernald & Wiegand) Zika, 2003
Mimulus cardinalis Douglas ex Benth.
Trifolium kingii var. kingii
Bolboschoenus fluviatilis (Torr.) Soják
Dudleya hallii Rose ex Britton & Rose
Verbena plicata Greene
Amelanchier utahensis var. covillei (Standl.) N.H.Holmgren
Astragalus oniciformis Barneby
Erigeron foliosus var. hartwegii (Greene) Jeps.
Lupinus argenteus var. depressus (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Cymopterus nivalis S.Watson
Erythronium grandiflorum var. grandiflorum
Lomatium triternatum var. anomalum (M.E.Jones ex J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Penstemon eriantherus var. argillosus M.E.Jones
Salix arizonica Dorn
Cryptantha compacta Higgins
Anemone drummondii var. lithophila (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Arabis schistacea Rollins
Cyperus fendlerianus Boeckeler
Erigeron utahensis var. sparsifolius (Eastw.) Cronquist
Pedicularis bracteosa var. canbyi (Gray) Cronquist
Cercocarpus montanus var. montanus
Epilobium L.
Carex jonesii L.H.Bailey
Persicaria coccinea (Muhl. ex Willd.) Greene
Carex arcta Boott
Chrysothamnus paniculatus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Alnus incana var. occidentalis (Dippel) Hitchc.
Symphyotrichum campestre (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Mimulus layneae (Greene) Jeps.
Iris innominata L.F.Hend.
Dalea exigua Barneby
Stanleya pinnata var. integrifolia (E.James) Rollins
Festuca arizonica Vasey
Loeseliastrum depressum (M.E.Jones ex A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Taraxacum ceratophorum (Ledeb.) DC.
Eupatorium maculatum var. bruneri (A.Gray) Breitung
Trifolium greenei House
Samolus parviflorus Raf.
Erigeron inornatus var. biolettii (Greene) Jeps.
Penstemon filiformis (D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck
Townsendia minima Eastw.
Polypogon interruptus Kunth
Bromus lanatipes (Shear) Rydb.
Astragalus flexuosus var. diehlii (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Tissa alsinella Greene
Galium trifidum subsp. subbiflorum (Wiegand) Puff
Lepidium ramosissimum A.Nelson
Eriogonum kennedyi var. purpusii (Brandegee) Reveal
Schedonorus arundinaceus (Schreb.) Dumort.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. latus (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Cryptantha rollinsii I.M.Johnst.
Draba aurea M.Vahl ex Hornem.
Setaria verticillata (L.) P.Beauv.
Clematis lasiantha Nutt.
Stutzia covillei (Standl.) E.H.Zacharias
Helianthus nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Acer campestre L.
Achnatherum speciosum (Trin. & Rupr.) Barkworth
Chamaecrista nictitans var. leptadenia (Greenm.) Gandhi & S.L.Hatch
Cymopterus acaulis var. greeleyorum J.W.Grimes & P.L.Packard
Vulpia octoflora var. hirtella (Piper) Henrard
Dalea bicolor var. orcuttiana Barneby
Arabis oregana Rollins
Eriogonum strictum subsp. proliferum (Torr. & A.Gray) S.Stokes
Eriogonum nutans Torr. & A.Gray
Sedum rosea subsp. integrifolia (Raf.) Hultén
Lemna minima Thuill. ex P.Beauv.
Rumex salicifolius var. triangulivalvis (Danser) J.C.Hickman
Brachychiton Schott & Endl.
Castilleja hispida var. acuta (Pennell) Ownbey
Salvia aethiopis L.
Camissonia walkeri (A.Nelson) Raven
Cleomella plocasperma S.Watson
Suaeda depressa var. erecta S.Watson
Arnica lanceolata subsp. prima (Maguire) Strother & S.J.Wolf
Eucryphia ×nymansensis J.Bausch
Physalis lobata Torr.
Astragalus eremicus E.Sheld.
Astragalus tidestromii (Rydb.) Clokey
Chaenactis alpina (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Linum australe A.Heller
Muhlenbergia depauperata Scribn.
Descurainia incana (Bernh. ex Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Dorn
Draba incerta Payson
Cirsium ochrocentrum A.Gray
Maurandya geniculata Rob. & Fernald
Parrya rydbergii Botsch.
Euphorbia serpillifolia var. hirtula (Engelm. ex S.Watson) L.C.Wheeler
Lupinus pachylobus Greene
Horkelia fusca var. capitata (Lindl.) M.Peck
Viguiera dentata var. lancifolia S.F.Blake
Eriogonum umbellatum var. aureum (Gand.) Reveal
Astragalus lentiginosus var. pohlii S.L.Welsh & Barneby
Cryptantha barbigera (A.Gray) Greene
Portulacaria afra Jacq.
Chenopodium watsonii A.Nelson
Carex divulsa Stokes
Toxicoscordion venenosum var. venenosum
Chorizanthe parryi S.Watson
Horkelia Cham. & Schltdl.
Chenopodium berlandieri var. zschackei (Murr) Murr ex Graebn.
Pseudoroegneria spicata f. inermis (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Barkworth
Penstemon procerus var. formosus (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Manglietia insignis (Wall.) Blume
Cirsium virginense S.L.Welsh
Salix arctica Pall.
Poa howellii var. microsperma Vasey
Mentzelia marginata var. cronquistii (H.J.Thomps. & Prigge) N.H.Holmgren
Desmanthus covillei (Britton & Rose) B.L.Turner
Eucalyptus nitens (H.Deane & Maiden) Maiden
Thalictrum venulosum Trel.
Plagiobothrys tenellus (Nutt. ex Hook.) A.Gray
Opuntia whipplei Engelm. & Bigelow
Iva nevadensis M.E.Jones
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. speciosus (Nutt.) H.M.Hall
Elymus repens (L.) Gould
Pectis uniaristata DC.
Acacia pringlei subsp. californica (Brandegee) Y.S.Lee, D.Seigler & Ebinger
Cordylanthus kingii var. helleri (Ferris) Holmgren
Lotus rigidus (Benth.) Greene
Aquilegia micrantha var. loriae (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Astragalus camptopus Barneby
Phlox opalensis Dorn
Lesquerella carinata Rollins
Epilobium hornemannii var. lactiflorum (Hausskn.) D.Löve
Juncus arcticus subsp. littoralis (Engelm.) Hultén
Salix lemmonii Bebb
Draba zionensis C.L.Hitchc.
Oxytropis deflexa var. deflexa
Aliciella haydenii (A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Xanthium strumarium var. canadense (Mill.) Torr. & A.Gray
Lycium pallidum var. pallidum
Navarretia intertexta var. propinqua (Suksd.) Brand
Penstemon pachyphyllus var. pachyphyllus
Eriogonum divaricatum Hook.
Chaenorhinum minus (L.) Lange
Astragalus thurberi A.Gray
Astragalus collinus var. collinus
Celtis laevigata var. brevipes (S.Watson) Sarg.
Eriochloa acuminata var. acuminata
Melica spectabilis Scribn.
Astragalus newberryi var. newberryi
Eremogone congesta var. subcongesta (S.Watson) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Juncus triglumis L.
Arabis glabra (L.) Bernh.
Corispermum americanum (Nutt.) Nutt.
Camissonia refracta (S.Watson) Raven
Astragalus episcopus var. episcopus
Caltha chionophila Greene
Hedeoma oblongifolia (A.Gray) A.Heller
Persicaria hydropiper (L.) Delarbre
Ipomopsis laxiflora (J.M.Coult.) V.E.Grant
Fragaria platypetala var. quadrifolia Lunell, 1911
Spiranthes stellata P.M.Br., Dueck & K.M.Cameron
Leymus ambiguus (Vasey & Scribn.) D.R.Dewey
Phlox gladiformis (M.E.Jones) E.Nelson
Arnica sororia Greene
Lupinus kingii var. kingii
Carex xerantica L.H.Bailey
Brickellia macromera B.L.Rob.
Carex pyrenaica Wahlenb.
Carex albonigra Mack.
Ericameria resinosa Nutt.
Eragrostis lehmanniana Nees
Ericameria suffruticosa (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Rubus leucodermis (Douglas ex Hook.) Douglas ex Torr. & A.Gray
Aquilegia barnebyi Munz
Helianthella quinquenervis (Hook.) A.Gray
Poa leibergii Scribn.
Gentiana bigelovii Gray
Cymopterus bipinnatus S.Watson
Dalea lanata Spreng.
Dracaena draco (L.) L.
Penstemon eatonii var. eatonii
Solidago wrightii A.Gray
Potentilla thurberi A.Gray
Fimbristylis spadicea (L.) Vahl
Microseris troximoides A.Gray
Machaeranthera tortifolia var. imberbis Cronquist
Alopecurus aequalis Sobol.
Psoralidium tenuiflorum (Pursh) Rydb.
Allium bisceptrum S.Watson
Carex eurycarpa Holm
Elaeagnus philippensis Perr.
Carex scirpoidea subsp. pseudoscirpoidea (Rydb.) Dunlop
Leucaena involucrata Zárate
Melica fugax Bol.
Hymenopappus filifolius var. idahoensis B.L.Turner
Draba subumbellata Rollins & R.A.Price
Castilleja dissitiflora Holmgren
Elymus cinereus Scribn. & Merr.
Chamerion angustifolium subsp. angustifolium
Echinocereus coccineus (Engelm.) Engelm.
Eriogonum exaltatum M.E.Jones
Lupinus argenteus var. utahensis (S.Watson) Barneby
Lepidium flavum var. flavum
Mirabilis multiflora var. multiflora
Beaumontia grandiflora Wall.
Nemacladus rigidus Curran
Machaeranthera asteroides var. glandulosa B.L.Turner
Lithospermum cobrense Greene
Physalis acutifolia (Miers) Sandwith
Mimosa margaritae Rose
Potentilla multisecta (S.Watson) Rydb.
Polygonum amphibium var. emersum Michx.
Mentzelia packardiae Glad
Artemisia ludoviciana var. ludoviciana
Chaptalia runcinata Kunth
Achnatherum swallenii (C.L.Hitchc. & Spellenb.) Barkworth
Rhus rydbergii Small
Viburnum prunifolium L.
Lotus stipularis var. stipularis
Aquilegia rubicunda Tidestr.
Ceratostigma plumbaginoides Bunge
Stephanomeria thurberi A.Gray
Stenotus lanuginosus var. andersonii (Rydb.) C.A.Morse
Sagittaria cuneata E.Sheld.
Penstemon cyananthus var. judyae N.D.Atwood
Viburnum dentatum L.
Brassica kaber (DC.) Wheeler
Viguiera ovalis S.F.Blake
Tetraneuris acaulis var. caespitosa A.Nelson
Erigeron poliospermus A.Gray
Lesquerella gordonii (A.Gray) S.Watson
Potamogeton gramineus L.
Astragalus desperatus var. petrophilus M.E.Jones
Astragalus rattanii var. jepsonianus Barneby
Trifolium latifolium (Hook.) Greene
Silene drummondii Hook.
Epilobium glaberrimum var. fastigiatum (Nutt.) Trel.
Clematis douglasii var. jonesii Kuntze
Senecio eremophilus var. macdougalii (A.Heller) Cronquist
Oxytropis lagopus var. lagopus
Machaeranthera canescens var. incana (Lindl.) A.Gray
Dalea pringlei A.Gray
Machaeranthera commixta Greene
Chylismia claviformis subsp. cruciformis (Kellogg) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Brodiaea palmeri S.Watson
Coryphantha vivipara var. bisbeana (Orcutt) L.D.Benson
Hymenoxys acaulis var. arizonica (Greene) K.F.Parker
Ferocactus gatesii G.E.Linds.
Pyrrocoma racemosa var. paniculata (Nutt.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Antennaria dimorpha var. flagellaris Gray
Stachys pilosa Nutt.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. virgata (Benth.) A.Gray
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. pumilum A.Gray
Plectocephalus americanus (Nutt.) D.Don
Amsinckia congruens Suksd.
Suaeda occidentalis (S.Watson) S.Watson
Lysiloma divaricatum (Jacq.) J.F.Macbr.
Croton martinianus V.W.Steinmann
Calliscirpus brachythrix C.N.Gilmour, J.R.Starr & Naczi
Hymenoxys torreyana (Nutt.) K.F.Parker
Draba albertina Greene
Carex buxbaumii Wahlenb.
Vitis labrusca L.
Parthenocissus vitacea (Knerr) Hitchc.
Lepidium alyssoides var. alyssoides
Oxytropis besseyi var. obnapiformis (Ced.Porter) S.L.Welsh
Calandrinia ambigua (S.Watson) Howell
Antennaria geyeri A.Gray
Carex maritima Gunnerus
Hackelia ophiobia R.L.Carr
Atriplex tridentata Kuntze
Calylophus lavandulifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Apocynum ×medium Greene
Elodea bifoliata H.St.John
Heuchera rubescens var. rubescens
Chamaesaracha nana (A.Gray) A.Gray
Chenopodium californicum (S.Watson) S.Watson
Chrysothamnus linifolius Greene
Gaura coccinea var. parvifolia (Torr.) Rickett
Achnatherum coronatum (Thurb.) Barkworth
Senecio eremophilus var. kingii (Rydb.) Greenm.
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. arizonica (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Stenotus armerioides var. gramineus (Welsh & F.J.Sm.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Mertensia arizonica var. subnuda (J.F.Macbr.) L.O.Williams
Penstemon rydbergii var. rydbergii
Ranunculus hyperboreus Rottb.
Penstemon nudiflorus A.Gray
Carex stenoptila F.J.Herm.
Ranunculus adoneus A.Gray
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. lasiocarpum
Manihot aesculifolia (Kunth) Pohl
Oxytropis oreophila var. jonesii (Barneby) Barneby
Carex egglestonii Mack.
Eriogonum ampullaceum Howell
Dudleya calcicola Bartel & Shevock
Phlox speciosa var. nitida Suksd.
Erigeron engelmannii var. engelmannii
Lomatium canbyi (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Cleomella palmeriana M.E.Jones
Ranunculus alismifolius var. montanus S.Watson
Mentzelia shultziorum Prigge
Hymenoxys acaulis (Pursh) K.F.Parker
Carex sheldonii Mack.
Arnica rydbergii Greene
Dalea versicolor var. sessilis (A.Gray) Barneby
Lomatium foeniculaceum subsp. macdougalii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) W.L.Theob.
Leptochloa fusca subsp. fascicularis (Lam.) N.Snow
Podistera eastwoodiae (Rose ex J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Astragalus coltonii var. moabensis M.E.Jones
Phlox hoodii var. canescens (Torr. & A.Gray) M.Peck
Pediomelum aromaticum (Payson) W.A.Weber
Lotus micranthus (Benth.) Benth.
Oxytropis besseyi var. ventosa (Greene) Barneby
Andropogon glomeratus var. glomeratus
Myosotis verna Nutt.
Tripterocalyx crux-maltae (Kellogg) Standl.
Myosotis alpestris F.W.Schmidt
Paspalum humboldtianum Flüggé
Bergia texana (Hook.) Seub.
Astragalus piscator Barneby & S.L.Welsh
Helianthella uniflora var. douglasii (Torr. & A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Lysiloma auritum (Schltdl.) Benth.
Physaria intermedia (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Rubus strigosus Michx.
Stellaria obtusa Engelm.
Ranunculus flammula var. reptans (L.) E.Mey.
Eriogonum microthecum var. simpsonii (Benth.) Reveal
Macrorhynchus glaucus var. laciniatus D.C.Eaton
Cryptantha tenuis (Eastw.) Payson
Saxifraga subapetala E.Nelson
Bromus porteri (Coult.) Nash
Fallopia baldschuanica (Regel) Holub
Claytonia rosea Rydb.
Lotus crassifolius var. crassifolius
Chorizanthe brevicornu var. brevicornu
Aquilegia coerulea var. coerulea
Astragalus solitarius M.Peck
Artemisia arbuscula Nutt.
Spiraea douglasii var. menziesii (Hook.) C.Presl
Camissonia brevipes (A.Gray) Raven
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum var. sphaerocephalum
Brassica juncea (L.) Czern.
Agrostis microphylla Steud.
Eriogonum howellianum Reveal
Microsteris gracilis var. gracilis
Plectritis macrocera var. grayi (Suksd.) Dyal
Eriogonum intermontanum Reveal
Linnaea borealis var. borealis
Epilobium hornemannii subsp. hornemannii
Dalea versicolor var. calcarata (Gentry) Barneby
Gentiana serrata var. holopetala A.Gray
Eriogonum corymbosum var. orbiculatum (S.Stokes) Reveal & Brotherson
Malcolmia africana (L.) R.Br.
Muhlenbergia pauciflora Buckley
Lupinus latifolius var. columbianus (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Astragalus kentrophyta var. jessiae (M.Peck) Barneby
Cardamine pensylvanica Muhl. ex Willd.
Erigeron bellidiastrum var. bellidiastrum
Eriogonum Michx.
Erigeron sionis Cronquist
Galium tinctorium L.
Carex vesicaria L.
Eremogone capillaris var. americana (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Phlox linearifolia var. longipes M.E.Jones
Erigeron compactus var. consimilis (Cronquist) S.F.Blake
Salvia dorrii var. carnosa (Douglas ex Greene) Abrams
Catabrosa aquatica (L.) P.Beauv.
Bidens heterosperma A.Gray
Astragalus mokiacensis A.Gray
Bambusa tuldoides Munro
Astragalus flexuosus var. greenei (A.Gray) Barneby
Monoptilon bellidiforme Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray
Penstemon linarioides subsp. coloradoensis (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Veratrum viride var. eschscholtzii (A.Gray) Breitung
Viguiera purisimae Brandegee
Jaegeria hirta (Lag.) Less.
Ribes nevadaënse Kellogg
Cardamine oligosperma A.Gray
Mimulus tilingii Regel
Poa cusickii Vasey
Chamaesyce revoluta (Engelm.) Small
Grindelia arizonica A.Gray
Marina evanescens (Brandegee) Barneby
Galium multiflorum var. coloradoense (W.Wight) Cronquist
Galium trifidum subsp. columbianum (Rydb.) Hultén
Dichanthelium oligosanthes (Schult.) Gould
Cryptantha cinerea var. pustulosa (Rydb.) L.C.Higgins
Plectritis brachystemon Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Bowlesia Ruiz & Pav.
Allium jepsonii (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) S.S.Denison & McNeal
Picrothamnus desertorum Nutt.
Astragalus longissimus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Conringia orientalis (L.) Dumort.
Penstemon whitedii subsp. dayanus (Howell) D.D.Keck
Elymus lanceolatus subsp. lanceolatus
Erigeron melanocephalus (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Cirsium subniveum Rydb.
Erigeron poliospermus var. cereus Cronquist
Sambucus racemosa var. melanocarpa (A.Gray) McMinn
Chenopodium chenopodioides (L.) Aellen
Persicaria (L.) Mill.
Polygonum aviculare subsp. depressum (Meisn.) Arcang.
Agoseris agrestis Osterh.
Ziziphus jujuba Mill.
Lepidium virginicum var. medium (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Arabis holboellii var. pendulocarpa (A.Nelson) Rollins
Potentilla atrorubens Rydb.
Thelypodium repandum Rollins
Dalea urceolata var. tripetala (Paul G.Wilson) Barneby
Trientalis arctica Fisch. ex Hook.
Rorippa columbiae (Suksd. ex B.L.Rob.) Suksd. ex Howell
Astragalus humistratus var. hosackiae (Greene) M.E.Jones
Panicum urvilleanum Kunth
Cymopterus petraeus M.E.Jones
Draba lemmonii S.Watson
Gaillardia crassa Rydb.
Trifolium longipes subsp. neurophyllum (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Ericameria watsonii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Pyrrocoma clementis Rydb.
Gentianella tenella (Rottb.) Börner
Eremogone congesta var. wheelerensis (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Mimulus tricolor Hartw. ex Lindl.
Trifolium beckwithii W.H.Brewer ex S.Watson
Astragalus trichopodus var. phoxus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Sidalcea A.Gray ex Benth.
Erysimum capitatum subsp. capitatum
Scutellaria angustifolia subsp. angustifolia
Lathyrus rigidus T.G.White
Trachypogon spicatus (L.f.) Kuntze
Lithophragma tenellum var. ramulosum Suksd.
Potamogeton L.
Barroetea sonorana (B.L.Turner) R.M.King & H.Rob.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. yuccanus M.E.Jones
Trifolium parryi subsp. montanense (Rydb.) J.M.Gillett
Lappula columbiana A.Nelson
Erigeron poliospermus var. poliospermus
Draba globosa Payson
Suaeda diffusa S.Watson
Pyrrocoma carthamoides var. carthamoides
Astragalus desperatus var. neeseae Barneby
Astragalus canadensis var. canadensis
Elymus elymoides subsp. elymoides
Mentzelia argillicola N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Guillenia lasiophylla (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Eriogonum evanidum Reveal
Ribes niveum Lindl.
Bahia neomexicana (A.Gray) A.Gray
Argythamnia neomexicana Müll.Arg.
Eriophyllum watsoni A.Gray
Carex proposita Mack.
Herrickia wasatchensis (M.E.Jones) Brouillet
Salix bonplandiana Kunth
Carex brevicaulis Mack.
Macromeria viridiflora var. viridiflora
Sophia intermedia Rydb.
Rorippa nasturtium-aquaticum (L.) Hayek
Salix irrorata Andersson
Polygonum austiniae Greene
Calamagrostis rubescens Buckley
Packera spellenbergii (T.M.Barkley) C.Jeffrey
Draba cuneifolia var. sonorae (Greene) Parish
Camissonia claviformis subsp. claviformis
Anthoxanthum nitens (Weber) Y.Schouten & Veldkamp
Penstemon caespitosus var. desertipicti (A.Nelson) N.H.Holmgren
Malvastrum fremontii Torr. ex Gray
Astragalus titanophilus Barneby
Lupinus sparsiflorus subsp. mohavensis Dziek. & D.B.Dunn
Baeria palmeri A.Gray
Linum kingii S.Watson
Saxifraga oregana Howell
Melaleuca bracteata F.Muell.
Lupinus polyphyllus var. humicola (A.Nelson) Barneby
Geranium caespitosum var. eremophilum (Wooton & Standl.) W.C.Martin & C.R.Hutchins
Verbena lasiostachys var. lasiostachys
Sphaeralcea janeae (S.L.Welsh) S.L.Welsh
Physaria acutifolia var. acutifolia
Mertensia arizonica var. leonardii (Rydb.) I.M.Johnst.
Camissonia californica (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Ionactis alpina (Nutt.) Greene
Eriogonum kingii Torr. & A.Gray
Lupinus bicolor subsp. marginatus D.B.Dunn
Lupinus arbustus subsp. pseudoparviflorus (Rydb.) D.B.Dunn
Holodiscus microphyllus Rydb.
Ranunculus flammula var. ovalis (Bigelow) L.D.Benson
Thelesperma subnudum A.Gray
Camissonia boothii subsp. boothii
Crusea wrightii A.Gray
Packera malmstenii (S.F.Blake ex Tidestr.) Kartesz
Platanthera obtusata (Banks ex Pursh) Lindl.
Allium hyalinum Curran
Achnatherum aridum (M.E.Jones) Barkworth
Rhamnus californica Eschsch.
Lasthenia glabrata subsp. coulteri (A.Gray) Ornduff
Penstemon neomexicanus Wooton & Standl.
Corydalis aurea subsp. aurea
Lomatium packardiae Cronquist
Fragaria vesca var. bracteata (A.Heller) R.J.Davis
Mimulus parishii Greene
Downingia elegans (Douglas ex Lindl.) Torr.
Gentianella heterosepala (Engelm.) Holub
Salix drummondiana var. subcaerulea (Piper) C.R.Ball
Lilaea scilloides (Poir.) Hauman
Cirsium cymosum (Greene) J.T.Howell
Saxifraga occidentalis var. occidentalis
Solidago missouriensis var. missouriensis
Lygodesmia spinosa Nutt.
Marah major Dunn
Linanthus inyoensis (I.M.Johnst.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Fragaria californica Cham. & Schltdl.
Camissonia gouldii Raven
Erigeron argentatus A.Gray
Arctostaphylos pilosula Jeps. & Wiesl.
Encelia frutescens var. virginensis S.F.Blake
Salix hookeriana Barratt ex Hook.
Physaria stylosa Rollins
Hymenopappus filifolius var. luteus (Nutt.) B.L.Turner
Lupinus hallii Abrams
Astragalus robbinsii var. minor (Hook.) Barneby
Penstemon pruinosus Douglas ex Lindl.
Eriogonum baileyi var. baileyi
Thermopsis californica var. californica
Carex atrata L.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. glabratus (A.Gray) Cronquist
Bromus japonicus Thunb.
Wolffia brasiliensis Wedd.
Porophyllum pausodynum B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Horkelia bolanderi subsp. parryi (S.Watson) D.D.Keck
Opuntia kelvinensis V.E.Grant & K.A.Grant
Ribes hudsonianum var. petiolare (Douglas) Jancz.
Aliciella pinnatifida (Nutt. ex A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Festuca subulata Trin.
Penstemon rattanii A.Gray
Ribes L.
Hymenopappus filifolius var. tomentosus (Rydb.) B.L.Turner
Bebbia atriplicifolia (A.Gray) Greene, 1885
Teucrium depressum Small
Saxifraga eriophora S.Watson
Eriogonum brevicaule Nutt.
Cryptantha elata (Eastw.) Payson
Agoseris leontodon var. pygmaea Rydb.
Astragalus torreyi Rydb.
Cyperus subsquarrosus (Muhl.) Bauters
Rumex maritimus var. fuegina (Phil.) Dusén
Penstemon parvus Pennell
Sanguisorba stipulata Raf.
Silene armeria L.
Senna hirsuta var. glaberrima (M.E.Jones) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Petunia ×hybrida (Hook.fil.) Vilm.
Lepidium dictyotum A.Gray
Sisyrinchium idahoense var. occidentale (E.P.Bicknell) Douglass M.Hend.
Astragalus australis var. glabriusculus (Hook.) Isely
Solanum lumholtzianum Bartlett
Camissonia boothii var. alyssoides (Hook. & Arn.) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Trifolium obtusiflorum Hook.
Bidens leptocephala Sherff
Castilleja scabrida Eastw.
Minuartia filiorum (Maguire) McNeill
Erigeron foliosus var. stenophyllus (Nutt.) A.Gray, 1876
Eriogonum loganum A.Nelson
Sidalcea multifida Greene
Sparganium eurycarpum Engelm.
Centaurea repens L.
Astragalus reventus A.Gray
Scutellaria holmgreniorum Cronquist
Polygonum greenei S.Watson
Carex integra Mack.
Camissonia multijuga (S.Watson) Raven
Persicaria lapathifolia (L.) Delarbre
Mentzelia marginata (Osterh.) H.J.Thomps. & Prigge
Astragalus kaibensis M.E.Jones
Oreocarya insolita J.F.Macbr.
Cymopterus acaulis Raf.
Eriogonum leptocladon var. ramosissimum (Eastw.) Reveal
Lithophragma glabrum Nutt.
Pediocactus simpsonii var. simpsonii
Penstemon linarioides var. coloradoensis (A.Nelson) C.C.Freeman
Dyssodia cooperi A.Gray
Astragalus malacoides Barneby
Perityle deltoidea S.Watson
Chrysothamnus nauseosus (Pall. ex Pursh) Britton & A.Br.
Astragalus chuskanus Barneby & Spellenb.
Hymenoxys richardsonii var. richardsonii
Camissonia claviformis subsp. peeblesii (Munz) P.H.Raven
Heterotheca depressa (Rydb.) Dorn
Penstemon veronicifolius Greene
Physaria australis (Payson) Rollins
Tetradymia filifolia Greene
Penstemon atwoodii S.L.Welsh
Astragalus conjunctus S.Watson
Salix exigua var. tenerrima (L.F.Hend.) C.K.Schneid.
Allium parryi S.Watson
Spiraea salicifolia L.
Ulmus procera Salisb.
Hymenoxys argentea var. ivesiana (Greene) Cronquist
Cordylanthus kingii var. kingii
Linum pratense (Norton) Small
Astragalus geyeri var. triquetrus (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Synthyris missurica (Raf.) Pennell
Gilia pumila Nutt.
Penstemon deaveri Crosswh.
Eriophyllum trifidum Rydb.
Astragalus purshii Douglas
Arnica fulgens Pursh
Lolium L.
Vicia ludoviciana var. ludoviciana
Asclepias macrosperma Eastw. ex Vail
Pedicularis crenulata Benth.
Euphorbia pediculifera var. linearifolia S.Watson
Eriogonum umbellatum var. desereticum Reveal
Thelypodium integrifolium var. integrifolium
Aegopogon cenchroides Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Arnica chamissonis var. jepsoniana Maguire
Acmispon strigosus (Nutt.) Brouillet
Carex lachenalii Schkuhr
Penstemon abietinus Pennell
Erigeron eatonii var. villosus (Cronquist) Cronquist
Eriogonum heermannii var. subspinosum Reveal
Errazurizia megacarpa (S.Watson) I.M.Johnst.
Arenaria macrophylla Hook.
Potamogeton filiformis subsp. filiformis
Astragalus uncialis Barneby
Elymus violaceus (Hornem.) J.Feilberg
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. orientalis Stuckey
Eriogonum tumulosum (Barneby) Reveal
Allium parvum Kellogg
Erigeron formosissimus var. formosissimus
Holodiscus microphyllus var. sericeus F.Ley
Penstemon palmeri var. macranthus (Eastw.) N.H.Holmgren
Hemizonia pungens (Hook. & Arn.) Torr. & A.Gray
Corallorhiza multiflora Nutt.
Carex cusickii Mack.
Salix L.
Artemisia bigelovii A.Gray
Lolium temulentum L.
Physaria kingii subsp. utahensis (Rydb.) O'Kane
Phemeranthus spinescens (Torr.) Hershk.
Astragalus alvordensis M.E.Jones
Machaeranthera canescens var. sessiliflora (Nutt.) B.L.Turner
Aquilegia L.
Orthocarpus olympicus Elmer
Penstemon acuminatus Douglas ex Lindl.
Elymus elymoides subsp. brevifolius (J.G.Sm.) Barkworth
Alnus viridis subsp. sinuata (Regel) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Chamaesyce gracillima (S.Watson) Millsp.
Eriophorum gracile W.D.J.Koch ex Roth
Lupinus polyphyllus var. ammophilus (Greene) Barneby
Carex pensylvanica var. vespertina L.H.Bailey
Mertensia paniculata var. alaskana (Britton) L.O.Williams
Ivesia setosa (S.Watson) Rydb.
Stanleya viridiflora Nutt.
Cymopterus jonesii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Orcuttia californica Vasey
Townsendia montana M.E.Jones
Erioneuron pilosum var. pilosum
Isocoma hartwegii (A.Gray) Greene
Tamarix parviflora DC.
Rorippa teres (Michx.) Stuckey
Camissonia subacaulis (Pursh) Raven
Elymus lanceolatus subsp. riparius (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Barkworth
Saxifraga bronchialis var. austromontana (Wiegand) M.Peck
Lomatium graveolens var. alpinum (S.Watson) Dorn & R.L.Hartm.
Ranunculus glaberrimus var. ellipticus (Greene) Greene
Brodiaea douglasii S.Watson
Reverchonia arenaria A.Gray
Paspalum vaginatum Sw.
Lepidium dictyotum var. acutidens A.Gray
Euphorbia polycarpa var. hirtella Boiss.
Ranunculus reconditus A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Juncus vaseyi Engelm.
Artemisia biennis Willd.
Tidestromia lanuginosa subsp. lanuginosa
Atriplex garrettii var. navajoensis (C.A.Hanson) S.L.Welsh & Crompton
Eriogonum corymbosum var. aureum (M.E.Jones) Reveal
Collomia debilis var. debilis
Cuscuta L.
Potentilla gracilis var. flabelliformis (Lehm.) Nutt.
Eucephalus elegans Nutt.
Boechera demissa var. pendulina (Greene) N.H.Holmgren
Stipa hymenoides Roem. & Schult.
Echinocereus engelmanni Lem.
Machaeranthera juncea (Greene) Shinners
Hebecarpa macradenia (A.Gray) J.R.Abbott
Sarcostemma cynanchoides Decne.
Betula piperi Britton
Glaucocarpum suffrutescens (Rollins) Rollins
Dombeya burgessiae Gerrard ex Harv. & Sond.
Symphyotrichum boreale (Torr. & A.Gray) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Arenaria macradenia subsp. ferrisiae Abrams
Lupinus sericeus var. sericeus
Verbena californica Moldenke
Astragalus bisulcatus var. bisulcatus
Allium atrorubens var. atrorubens
Boykinia jamesii var. heucheriformis (Rydb.) Engl.
Eysenhardtia orthocarpa var. tenuifolia J.M.Lang
Dicoria canescens var. hispidula (Rydb.) Cronquist
Astragalus atratus var. atratus
Penstemon heterodoxus var. shastensis (D.D.Keck) N.H.Holmgren
Salix longifolia Muhl.
Lupinus arizonicus subsp. arizonicus
Lupinus austromontanus A.Heller
Solidago canadensis var. canadensis
Heterocodon rariflorum Nutt.
Micropus amphibolus A.Gray
Penstemon neotericus D.D.Keck
Lesquerella douglasii S.Watson
Sclerocarpus spatulatus Rose
Vepris undulata (Thunb.) Verd. & C.A.Sm.
Crepis atribarba subsp. originalis Babc. & Stebbins
Atriplex subconferta Rydb.
Atriplex gardneri var. gardneri
Muhlenbergia asperifolia (Nees & Meyen ex Trin.) Parodi
Gilia heterodoxa Greene
Mimosa distachya var. distachya
Gaillardia mearnsii Rydb.
Canbya aurea S.Watson
Dichelostemma capitatum subsp. pauciflorum (Torr.) Keator
Euphorbia nephradenia Barneby
Arnica ovata Greene
Setaria setosa (Sw.) P.Beauv.
Senecio bigelovii var. hallii A.Gray
Euphorbia incisa Engelm.
Alyssum parviflorum var. micranthum (C.A.Mey.) Dorn
Euphorbia exstipulata Engelm.
Vicia dissitifolia (Nutt.) Rydb.
Blepharidachne kingii (S.Watson) Hack.
Centaurea squarrosa Roth
Dipsacus sylvestris Huds.
Lepidium palmeri S.Watson
Gaillardia flava Rydb.
Perideridia montana (Blank.) Dorn
Descurainia paradisa var. nevadensis (Rollins) N.H.Holmgren
Antennaria rosea subsp. rosea
Scrophularia glabrata Davidson
Arabis suffrutescens S.Watson
Galium serpenticum subsp. okanoganense Dempster & Ehrend.
Cryptantha multicaulis A.Nelson
Krameria L.
Lepidium campestre (L.) R.Br.
Sophia leptostylis Rydb.
Elymus hansenii Scribn.
Aquilegia atwoodii S.L.Welsh
Conyza schiedeana (Less.) Cronquist
Symphyotrichum hesperium (A.Gray) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Allium gooddingii Ownbey
Muhlenbergia peruviana (P.Beauv.) Steud.
Lesquerella hemiphysaria var. hemiphysaria
Cereus aggregatus Coult.
Stenotus armerioides var. armerioides
Boerhavia torreyana (S.Watson) Standl.
Malvella lepidota (A.Gray) Fryxell
Eriophorum scheuchzeri Hoppe
Vulpia myuros (L.) C.C.Gmel.
Castilleja collegiorum J.M.Egger & Malaby
Lotus argyraeus (Greene) Greene
Navarretia intertexta var. intertexta
Astragalus saurinus Barneby
Amorpha californica var. californica
Arabis pendulina Greene
Agrostis idahoensis Nash
Physalis versicolor Rydb.
Euphorbia setiloba Engelm.
Thelypodium integrifolium var. gracilipes B.L.Rob.
Disporum hookeri var. oreganum (S.Watson) Q.Jones
Astragalus limnocharis Barneby
Pyrrocoma insecticruris (L.F.Hend.) A.Heller
Astragalus miser var. miser
Abronia mellifera Douglas
Astragalus missouriensis var. missouriensis
Oxytheca dendroidea var. dendroidea
Salvia canariensis L.
Atriplex powellii var. powellii
Astragalus pattersonii A.Gray ex Brandegee
Penstemon strictiformis Rydb.
Kuhnia eupatorioides L.
Symphyotrichum hendersonii (Fernald) G.L.Nesom
Senecio amplectens var. holmii (Greene) H.D.Harr.
Abutilon parvulum A.Gray
Croton texensis (Klotzsch) Müll.Arg.
Collinsia stricta Greene
Arabis demissa Greene
Pastinaca sativa L.
Amsinckia carinata A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Hemizonia greeneana Rose
Crataegus columbiana Howell
Pediomelum megalanthum var. retrorsum (Rydb.) J.W.Grimes
Juncus uncialis Greene
Baccharis wrightii A.Gray
Linum neomexicanum Greene
Rheum australe D.Don
Lathyrus eucosmus Butters & H.St.John
Homalobus hylophilus Rydb.
Senna marilandica (L.) Link
Spiraea menziesii Hook.
Stellaria calycantha (Ledeb.) Bong.
Aphora serrata Torr.
Astragalus atropubescens J.M.Coult. & Fisher
Ligusticum porteri J.M.Coult. & Rose
Prunus rufula (Wooton & Standl.) Tidestr.
Viola lithion N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Erigeron chrysopsidis subsp. austinae (Greene) Cronquist
Brodiaea elegans subsp. hooveri Niehaus
Hosackia cytisoides Benth.
Downingia insignis Greene
Microseris nigrescens L.F.Hend.
Cirsium parryi (A.Gray) Petr.
Cardaria draba (L.) Desv.
Dodecatheon dentatum var. dentatum
Artemisia spiciformis Osterh.
Mimosa distachya var. laxiflora (Benth.) Barneby
Cryptantha echinella Greene
Boechera pulchra var. gracilis (M.E.Jones) Dorn
Mentzelia jonesii (Urb. & Gilg) H.J.Thomps. & Roberts
Ficus goldmanii Standl.
Lotus strigosus (Nutt.) Greene
Camissonia atwoodii Cronquist
Astragalus inversus M.E.Jones
Onosmodium thurberi A.Gray
Ribes cruentum Greene
Epilobium canum var. latifolium (Hook.) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Agonis flexuosa Lindl.
Collomia wilkenii L.A.Johnson & R.L.Johnson
Menziesia ferruginea Sm.
Atriplex gardneri (Moq.) D.Dietr.
Sphaeralcea emoryi var. emoryi
Penstemon attenuatus var. pseudoprocerus (Rydb.) Cronquist
Cirsium utahense Petr.
Myosurus apetalus var. montanus (G.R.Campb.) Whittem.
Crepis monticola Coville
Lathyrus lanszwertii Kellogg
Atriplex spatiosa A.Nelson
Lepidium integrifolium Nutt.
Carex simulata Mack.
Monardella angustifolia Elvin, Ertter & Mansfield
Acleisanthes chenopodioides (A.Gray) R.A.Levin
Carex tumulicola Mack.
Saxifraga nidifica Greene
Piptatherum micranthum (Trin. & Rupr.) Barkworth
Viguiera annua (M.E.Jones) S.F.Blake
Mimosa pauli Barneby
Penstemon virgatus subsp. putus (A.Nelson) Crosswh.
Thelypodium integrifolium subsp. integrifolium
Lupinus succulentus var. succulentus
Eriogonum densum Greene
Hieracium horridum Fr.
Mitracarpus breviflorus A.Gray
Ericameria discoidea var. discoidea
Tofieldia glutinosa (Michx.) Pers.
Cryptantha rugulosa (Payson) Payson
Physaria parvula (Greene) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Trifolium longipes var. reflexum A.Nelson
Acacia goldmanii (Britton & Rose) Wiggins
Astragalus atwoodii S.L.Welsh & Thorne
Sarcostemma hirtellum (Gray ex Brewer & S.Watson) R.W.Holm
Astragalus nuttallianus var. trichocarpus Torr. & A.Gray
Stachys palustris L.
Peraphyllum ramosissimum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Aquilegia shockleyi Eastw.
Machaerocarpus californicus (Torr.) Small
Trifolium agrarium L.
Ranunculus andersonii var. tenellus S.Watson
Achnatherum scribneri (Vasey) Barkworth
Oxytenia acerosa Nutt.
Leucosyris carnosa var. intricata (A.Gray) Cronquist
Rumex orthoneurus Rech.fil.
Orthocarpus copelandii var. cryptanthus D.D.Keck
Astragalus nuttallianus var. micranthiformis Barneby
Euphorbia
Argemone munita subsp. munita
Panicum mohavense Reeder
Arenaria fendleri A.Gray
Suaeda linifolia Pall.
Carex xerophila Janeway & Zika
Chrysanthemum leucanthemum L.
Urtica dioica subsp. holosericea (Nutt.) Thorne
Astragalus leucopsis var. lonchus M.E.Jones
Ferocactus cylindraceus subsp. cylindraceus
Aristida havardii Vasey
Chorizanthe parryi var. parryi
Trifolium longipes var. nevadense Jeps.
Ranunculus arvensis L.
Rhus virens var. choriophylla (Wooton & Standl.) L.D.Benson
Juncus jonesii Rydb.
Parrya nudicaulis var. rydbergii (Botsch.) N.H.Holmgren
Heracleum sphondylium L.
Silene scaposa var. lobata C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Erythronium grandiflorum var. pallidum H.St.John
Calamagrostis scopulorum M.E.Jones
Polyctenium fremontii var. confertum Rollins
Thlaspi montanum var. fendleri (A.Gray) P.K.Holmgren
Keckiella breviflora var. glabrisepala (D.D.Keck) Holmgren
Erigeron neomexicanus A.Gray
Lupinus lepidus var. lepidus
Astragalus purshii var. pumilio Barneby
Potentilla crinita A.Gray
Astragalus shultziorum Barneby
Calyptridium umbellatum var. caudiciferum (A.Gray) Jeps.
Sedum rosea (L.) Scop.
Muhlenbergia phleoides (Kunth) Columbus
Arabis pulchra var. munciensis M.E.Jones
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. viscidiflorus
Gaillardia fastigiata Greene
Castilleja brevilobata Piper
Penstemon monoensis A.Heller
Canadanthus modestus (Lindl.) G.L.Nesom
Erigeron breweri var. porphyreticus (M.E.Jones) Cronquist
Ledum glandulosum Nutt.
Eremogone franklinii var. franklinii
Mentzelia nitens var. nitens
Zostera latifolia Morong
Phaca nivea Rydb.
Lesquerella fremontii Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Sida spinosa L.
Lupinus blumeri Greene
Primula incana M.E.Jones
Bouteloua eriopoda (Torr.) Torr.
Astragalus chloodes Barneby
Delphinium megacarpum A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Lycium torreyi A.Gray
Trifolium trichocalyx A.Heller
Radicula curvipes (Greene) Greene
Aquilegia micrantha var. micrantha
Eriogonum bifurcatum Reveal
Astragalus iodanthus var. diaphanoides Barneby
Agrostis variabilis Rydb.
Perezia nana Gray
Coptis occidentalis (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Callitriche heterophylla var. bolanderi (Hegelm.) Fassett
Mentzelia memorabilis N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. salmonensis L.C.Anderson
Sisyrinchium sarmentosum Suksd. ex Greene
Epilobium praecox Suksd.
Astragalus consobrinus (Barneby) S.L.Welsh
Dodecatheon jeffreyi var. jeffreyi
Camissonia claviformis var. aurantiaca (Munz) Cronquist
Erigeron eatonii var. lavandulus Strother & Ferlatte
Penstemon absarokensis Evert
Erigeron garrettii A.Nelson
Lavatera maritima Gouan
Penstemon purpusii Brandegee
Gilia depressa M.E.Jones ex A.Gray
Muhlenbergia emersleyi Vasey
Viguiera deltoidea var. parishii (Greene) Vasey & Rose
Gnaphalium macounii Greene
Astragalus pterocarpus S.Watson
Eriogonum polycladon Benth.
Tagetes palmeri A.Gray
Saxifraga parryi Torr.
Elmera racemosa var. puberulenta C.L.Hitchc.
Lomatium nuttallii (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Eleocharis acicularis var. porcata S.G.Sm.
Calliandra humilis var. humilis
Astragalus flexuosus var. flexuosus
Toxicoscordion venenosum var. gramineum (Rydb.) Brasher
Carex dudleyi Mack.
Najas flexilis (Willd.) Rostk. & W.L.E.Schmidt
Senecio crassulus A.Gray
Erigeron ochroleucus Nutt.
Chaenactis nevii A.Gray
Astragalus douglasii var. douglasii
Cymopterus trotteri (S.L.Welsh & Goodrich) Cronquist
Melampodium cupulatum A.Gray
Lomatium nevadense var. parishii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Jeps.
Eriogonum corymbosum var. revealianum (Welsh) Reveal
Salix planifolia subsp. nelsonii (C.R.Ball) C.R.Ball
Penstemon lentus var. lentus
Mertensia ciliata var. ciliata
Caulanthus lasiophyllus var. lasiophyllus
Lomatium cous (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Machaeranthera grindelioides (Nutt.) Shinners
Drymaria Willd. ex Schult.
Dahlia coccinea Cav.
Dryas octopetala var. hookeriana (Juz.) Breitung
Rumex salicifolius subsp. salicifolius
Vaccinium membranaceum Douglas ex Torr.
Astragalus flavus var. higginsii S.L.Welsh
Senna bauhinioides (A.Gray) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Mentzelia pumila (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Rhynchosia senna var. texana (Torr. & A.Gray) M.C.Johnst.
Andrachne ciliatoglandulosa (Millsp.) Croizat
Arenaria fendleri var. fendleri
Dudleya saxosa subsp. collomiae (Rose ex Morton) Moran
Grevillea paniculata Meisn.
Mentzelia albicaulis (Douglas ex Hook.) Douglas ex Hook.
Lesquerella hemiphysaria var. lucens S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Cydonia maulei var. superba Frahm
Protea susannae Phillips
Corydalis caseana var. cusickii (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Salix amygdaloides Andersson
Wyethia ovata A.Gray, 1868
Anthemis L.
Allium neopolitanum Cirillo
Pascopyrum smithii (Rydb.) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Calliandra tergemina var. emarginata (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Barneby
Eremogone loisiae N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Zuckia brandegeei var. plummeri (Stutz & S.C.Sand.) Dorn
Festuca viviparoidea subsp. krajinae Pavlick
Castilleja stenantha A.Gray
Penstemon barbatus var. torreyi (Benth. ex DC.) A.Gray
Astragalus perianus Barneby
Lemna gibba L.
Poa bigelovii Vasey
Astragalus minthorniae var. minthorniae
Koeleria pyramidata (Lam.) P.Beauv.
Lupinus arbustus var. montanus (Howell) D.B.Dunn
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. linifolia H.M.Hall
Philadelphus mearnsii W.H.Evans ex Rydb.
Photinia arbutifolia Lindl.
Eremiastrum bellioides A.Gray
Thelypodium integrifolium var. complanatum (Al-Shehbaz) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Psorothamnus arborescens var. simplifolius (Parish) Barneby
Astragalus rafaelensis M.E.Jones
Atriplex obovata Moq.
Dalea lumholtzii C.B.Rob. & Fernald
Centaurea moschata L.
Chamaebatiaria (Porter) Maxim.
Piperia multiflora Rydb.
Boechera holboellii var. secunda (Howell) Dorn
Astragalus vexilliflexus var. nubilus Barneby
Tridax procumbens L.
Veratrum californicum var. californicum
Thelypodium wrightii subsp. wrightii
Erigeron nematophyllus Rydb.
Galium aparine var. echinospermum (Wallr.) Farw.
Circaea alpina subsp. pacifica (Asch. & Magnus) P.H.Raven
Salix candida Flüggé ex Willd.
Drosera linearis Goldie
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. latisquameus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. umbellatum
Balsamorhiza macrolepis var. platylepis (Sharp) Ferris
Antennaria neglecta Greene
Machaeranthera riparia (Kunth) A.G.Jones
Carex filifolia Nutt.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. californica (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Acacia texensis Torr. & A.Gray
Salazaria mexicana Torr.
Camissonia claviformis var. purpurascens (Watson) Cronquist
Ivesia santolinoides A.Gray
Brongniartia podalyrioides Kunth
Zygophyllum fabago L.
Silene drummondii var. drummondii
Callitriche hermaphroditica L.
Viburnum trilobum Marshall
Solanum candidum Lindl.
Langloisia lanata Brand
Castilleja kaibabensis N.H.Holmgren
Cryptantha osterhoutii (Payson) Payson
Sedum rubiginosum Zika & B.L.Wilson
Juncus arizonicus var. curtiflorus Wiegand
Eriogonum pharnaceoides var. pharnaceoides
Penstemon rhizomatosus N.H.Holmgren
Rumex maritimus L.
Amsinckia micrantha Suksd.
Tonestus eximius (H.M.Hall) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Castilleja revealii N.H.Holmgren
Baeriopsis guadalupensis Howell
Solanum pseudocapsicum L.
Lomatogonium rotatum (L.) Fr. ex Nyman
Melaleuca linearis var. pinifolia (J.C.Wendl.) Craven
Crepis elegans Hook.
Carex serpenticola Zika
Phlox caespitosa Nutt.
Plagiobothrys stipitatus var. micranthus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Platystemon remotus Greene
Sparganium simplex Huds.
Oxytheca watsonii Torr. & A.Gray
Agrostis hallii var. californica Vasey
Camassia quamash subsp. utahensis Gould
Delphinium geyeri Greene
Helenium arizonicum S.F.Blake
Salix commutata Bebb
Camissonia boothii var. villosa (S.Watson) Cronquist
Calylophus hartwegii subsp. pubescens (A.Gray) Towner & P.H.Raven
Howellia aquatilis A.Gray
Astragalus pinonis var. atwoodii (S.L.Welsh & Thorne) Barneby & Isely
Townsendia arizonica Gray
Lepidium montanum var. claronense S.L.Welsh
Eremogone congesta var. simulans (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Amaranthus obcordatus (Gray) Standl.
Lomatium minus (Rose ex Howell) Mathias & Constance
Atriplex pusilla (Torr.) S.Watson
Phlox diapensioides Rydb.
Philadelphus microphyllus var. microphyllus
Antirrhinum coulterianum Benth. ex A.DC.
Polemonium chartaceum Mason
Carex ebenea Rydb.
Draba cusickii B.L.Rob. ex O.E.Schulz
Salix ×rubens Schrank
Hymenoxys acaulis var. acaulis
Astragalus nuttallii var. virgatus (A.Gray) Barneby
Pectis angustifolia var. angustifolia
Stylocline gnaphalioides Nutt.
Packera crocata (Rydb.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Erigeron gracilis Rydb.
Trifolium laciniatum Greene
Thermopsis rhombifolia var. montana (Nutt.) Isely
Angelica arguta Nutt.
Prunus virens (Wooton & Standl.) Shreve
Caulanthus divaricatus Rollins
Opuntia basilaris var. longiareolata (Clover & Jotter) L.D.Benson
Penstemon floribundus Danley
Cercidium floridum Benth. ex A.Gray
Chamaesyce albomarginata (Torr. & A.Gray) Small
Astragalus vallaris M.E.Jones
Houstonia brandegeeana Rose
Mimulus rubellus A.Gray
Mentzelia torreyi var. acerosa (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Astragalus whitneyi var. confusus Barneby
Cenchrus tribuloides L.
Eleocharis palustris var. major Sond.
Salix bebbiana Sarg.
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. leucanthus (Rydb.) Dorn
Lupinus vallicola subsp. apricus (Greene) D.B.Dunn
Mertensia pulchella Piper
Chenopodium capitatum var. parvicapitatum S.L.Welsh
Heterotheca fulciens G.L.Nesom
Galium multiflorum var. multiflorum
Mimulus floribundus Douglas
Ruellia inundata Kunth
Eritrichium nanum var. elongatum (Rydb.) Cronquist
Potamogeton filiformis Pers.
Eupatorium greggii A.Gray
Lessingia lemmonii var. ramulosissima (A.Nelson) Ferris
Eriogonum brevicaule var. brevicaule
Chamaesyce micromera (Boiss.) Wooton & Standl.
Chamaerhodos erecta (L.) Bunge
Cryptantha celosioides (Eastw.) Payson
Astragalus rusbyi Greene
Glyceria fluitans (L.) R.Br.
Boechera pulchra var. pallens (M.E.Jones) Dorn
Carex klamathensis B.L.Wilson & Janeway
Mentzelia polita A.Nelson
Erigeron foliosus var. confinis (Howell) Jeps.
Corallorhiza striata var. vreelandii (Rydb.) L.O.Williams
Solidago missouriensis var. fasciculata Holz.
Chenopodium missouriense Aellen
Potentilla gracilis Wall. ex Hook.fil.
Chenopodium hians Standl.
Stenotus acaulis var. acaulis
Carex epapillosa Mack.
Lupinus confertus Kellogg
Astragalus mollissimus var. bigelovii (A.Gray) Barneby
Pluchea camphorata (L.) DC.
Bahia achillioides DC.
Tonella floribunda A.Gray
Hornungia procumbens (L.) Hayek
Castilleja austromontana Standl. & Blumer
Sphaeralcea leiocarpa Wooton & Standl.
Chaenactis evermannii Greene
Psorothamnus arborescens var. pubescens (Parish) Barneby
Hymenopappus filifolius var. megacephalus B.L.Turner
Symphyotrichum spathulatum var. intermedium (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Polygonum kelloggii var. watsonii (Small) Reveal
Opuntia thurberi Engelm.
Potamogeton nodosus Poir.
Krynitzkia depressa M.E.Jones
Lupinus argenteus var. moabensis S.L.Welsh
Mahonia haematocarpa (Wooton) Fedde
Lupinus argenteus var. parviflorus (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus whitneyi var. sonneanus (Greene) Jeps.
Juncus lesueurii Bol.
Dalea pogonathera var. pogonathera
Castilleja parvula Rydb.
Chilopsis linearis subsp. linearis
Frasera albicaulis var. cusickii (Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. coachellae Barneby
Ribes reniforme Nutt.
Sphaeralcea leptophylla (A.Gray) Rydb.
Carex viridula Michx.
Xanthium strumarium var. strumarium
Sphaeralcea grossulariifolia subsp. grossulariifolia
Matelea producta (Torr.) Woodson
Artemisia packardiae J.W.Grimes & Ertter
Eriophyllum lanatum var. arachnoideum (Fisch. & Avé-Lall.) Jeps.
Lycium pallidum Miers
Astragalus chamaeleuce var. laccoliticus (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Juncus macrophyllus Coville
Salix geyeriana var. geyeriana
Bahia nudicaulis var. oblongifolia (A.Gray) Cronquist
Valeriana sylvatica var. glabra Jeps.
Crepis occidentalis subsp. costata (A.Gray) Babc. & Stebbins
Isocoma rusbyi Greene
Isomeris arborea Nutt.
Allium fimbriatum var. purdyi (Eastw.) Ownbey ex McNeal
Astragalus porrectus S.Watson
Erigeron acris L.
Plagiobothrys torreyi (A.Gray) A.Gray
Apocynum pumilum (A.Gray) Greene
Castilleja angustifolia var. angustifolia
Erigeron fraternus var. fraternus
Anemone multifida var. stylosa (A.Nelson) B.E.Dutton & Keener
Muhlenbergia arenicola Buckley
Thelypodiopsis aurea (Eastw.) Rydb.
Chaenactis xantiana A.Gray
Solidago spectabilis var. confinis (A.Gray) Cronquist
Juncus covillei Piper
Camissonia cheiranthifolia subsp. cheiranthifolia
Synthyris missurica subsp. missurica
Astragalus australis (L.) Lam.
Sclerocactus parviflorus subsp. terrae-canyonae (K.D.Heil) K.D.Heil & J.M.Porter
Juncus acuminatus Michx.
Eriogonum smallianum A.Heller
Penstemon franklinii S.L.Welsh
Astragalus nutriosensis M.J.Sand.
Gaillardia parryi Greene
Lupinus intermontanus A.Heller
Packera subnuda var. subnuda
Salix reticulata L.
Astragalus tiehmii Barneby
Polygala scoparioides Chodat
Chenopodium incognitum Wahl
Arabis williamsii Rollins
Lupinus microcarpus var. densiflorus (Benth.) Jeps.
Achnatherum richardsonii (Link) Barkworth
Matthiola incana (L.) R.Br.
Sphaeromeria cana (D.C.Eaton) A.Heller
Oxalis dillenii Jacq.
Arabis pulchra var. gracilis M.E.Jones
Sphenosciadium capitellatum A.Gray
Rosa nutkana var. nutkana
Oxytheca dendroidea Nutt.
Calamagrostis purpurascens R.Br.
Rorippa tenerrima Greene
Gymnolomia linearis Rydb.
Salix phylicifolia var. monica (Bebb) Jeps.
Achnatherum nevadense (B.L.Johnson) Barkworth
Abutilon scabrum S.Watson
Ionactis stenomeres (A.Gray) Greene
Spergularia salina J.Presl & J.Presl
Galium biflorum Hochst. ex Boiss.
Besseya wyomingensis (A.Nelson) Rydb.
Chrysanthemum coronarium L.
Eriogonum anemophilum Greene
Draba rectifructa C.L.Hitchc.
Lupinus densiflorus J.Agardh
Descurainia incisa var. filipes (A.Gray) N.H.Holmgren
Alyssum minus (L.) Rothm.
Mimulus parryi A.Gray
Potentilla multijuga Lehm.
Valeriana edulis subsp. edulis
Lupinus argenteus var. holosericeus (Nutt.) Barneby
Eriogonum alatum var. alatum
Calamovilfa gigantea (Nutt.) Scribn. & Merr.
Saxifraga plantaginea Small
Gilia tweedyi Rydb.
Valeriana edulis Nutt.
Jamesia tetrapetala N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Carex inops subsp. inops
Cryptantha glomeriflora Greene
Gymnosperma glutinosum (Spreng.) Less.
Gnaphalium pannosum Gand.
Langloisia setosissima var. campyloclados Brand
Cryptantha longiflora (A.Nelson) Payson
Sphaeralcea grossulariifolia var. pedata (Torr. ex A.Gray) Kearney
Lupinus pusillus var. rubens (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Castilleja applegatei var. breweri (Fernald) Holmgren
Bacopa eisenii (Kellogg) Pennell
Helianthemum greenei B.L.Rob.
Astragalus nuttallianus var. nuttallianus
Havardia sonorae (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Oxytropis deflexa var. sericea Torr. & A.Gray
Mirabilis pudica Barneby
Ivesia paniculata T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Descurainia Webb & Berthel.
Arabis pendulina var. russeola (Rollins) Rollins
Lupinus concinnus var. agardhianus (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Carex praticola Rydb.
Melampodium longicorne A.Gray
Solidago simplex var. simplex
Saxifraga adscendens L.
Penstemon palmeri var. eglandulosus (D.D.Keck) N.H.Holmgren
Hieracium L.
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. sandbergii (T.G.White) Broich
Penstemon speciosus subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Eriogonum aretioides Barneby
Oxalis pilosa Nutt.
Drymocallis arizonica Rydb.
Salix eastwoodiae Cockerell ex A.Heller
Clarkia speciosa subsp. speciosa
Chamaesaracha coniodes (Moric. ex Dunal) Britton
Erigeron parryi Canby & Rose
Glyceria R.Br.
Crepis runcinata subsp. imbricata Babc. & Stebbins
Eriogonum corymbosum var. glutinosum (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Astragalus eurekensis M.E.Jones
Schoenoplectiella saximontana (Fernald) Lye
Machaeranthera carnosa (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Thelypodiopsis vermicularis (S.L.Welsh & Reveal) Rollins
Silene seelyi Morton & J.W.Thomps.
Senecio hydrophilus var. pacificus Greene
Sambucus racemosa var. microbotrys (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Houstonia brevipes Rose
Allium macropetalum Rydb.
Noccaea montana (L.) F.K.Mey.
Pennellia micrantha (A.Gray) Nieuwl.
Arenaria hookeri var. desertorum Maguire
Sida delphiniifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Gypsophila elegans M.Bieb.
Penstemon linarioides subsp. compactifolius D.D.Keck
Argemone pleiacantha subsp. pleiacantha
Nitrophila occidentalis (Moq.) S.Watson
Chenopodium incisum Poir.
Leucaena leucocephala subsp. glabrata (Rose) Zárate
Thelypodiopsis elegans (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Potentilla rhyolitica Ertter
Acalypha poiretii Spreng.
Viola bakeri Greene
Gilia ophthalmoides Brand
Oxytropis oreophila var. juniperina S.L.Welsh
Chrysothamnus teretifolius (Durand & Hilg.) Hall
Stellaria longipes subsp. longipes
Linum subteres (Trel.) Winkl.
Cordylanthus maritimus subsp. maritimus
Carex diandra Schrank
Mentzelia acerosa M.E.Jones
Cirsium acanthodontum S.F.Blake
Trifolium andersonii var. beatleyae (J.M.Gillett) Isely
Astragalus oocarpus A.Gray
Stellaria longifolia (Regel) Muhl. ex Willd.
Monardella odoratissima subsp. glauca (Greene) Epling
Astragalus lentiginosus var. floribundus A.Gray
Astragalus episcopus S.Watson
Alluaudia procera (Drake) Drake
Salvia sclarea L.
Franseria camphorata Greene
Epilobium oregonense Hausskn.
Psathyrotes pilifera A.Gray
Potentilla rectiformis Rydb.
Festuca viridula Vasey
Lotus greenei Ottley
Potentilla rubricaulis Lehm.
Boechera fendleri (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Chrysothamnus parryi var. asper (Greene) Munz
Agave huachucensis Baker
Camissonia micrantha (Hornem. ex Spreng.) Raven
Lappula redowskii (Hornem.) Greene
Parosela pilosa Rydb.
Amelanchier utahensis var. utahensis
Eriophyllum ambiguum var. paleaceum (Brandegee) Ferris
Heterosperma pinnatum Cav.
Penstemon serrulatus Menzies ex Rees
Lupinus densiflorus var. persecundus C.P.Sm.
Matricaria maritima var. inodora (L.) Hyl., 1945
Moringa pterygosperma Gaertn.
Crepis runcinata subsp. runcinata
Oxytropis besseyi var. salmonensis Barneby
Potamogeton robbinsii Oakes
Oenothera deltoides var. howellii Munz
Agoseris grandiflora var. grandiflora
Potentilla demotica Ertter
Callitriche heterophylla Pursh
Cirsium andrewsii (A.Gray) Jeps.
Machaeranthera confertifolia (Cronquist) Cronquist
Atriplex breweri S.Watson
Tetraneuris torreyana (Nutt.) Greene
Conimitella williamsii (D.C.Eaton) Rydb.
Coronilla varia L.
Melica stricta Bol.
Lesquerella navajoensis O'Kane
Astragalus detritalis M.E.Jones
Dianthus L.
Lithophragma catalinae Rydb.
Chaenactis stevioides var. stevioides
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. howardii (Parry ex A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Eriogonum ursinum S.Watson
Dalea analiliana Spellenb.
Abutilon carterae Kearney
Androsace septentrionalis var. septentrionalis
Carex mackenziei V.I.Krecz.
Brodiaea Sm.
Erigeron religiosus Cronquist
Encelia farinosa var. radians (Brandegee) Brandegee ex S.F.Blake, 1913
Asclepias involucrata Engelm. ex Torr.
Ericameria cervina (S.Watson) Rydb.
Dalea ramosissima Benth.
Salix tweedyi (Bebb ex Rose) Ball
Blennosperma californicum (DC.) Torr. & A.Gray
Hofmeisteria laphamioides var. laphamioides
Sophora stenophylla A.Gray
Dicentra cucullaria (L.) Bernh.
Eriogonum turbinatum Small
Castilleja chambersii M.Egger & Meinke
Thelesperma windhamii C.J.Hansen
Cylindropuntia californica subsp. parkeri (J.M.Coult.) U.Guzmán
Rorippa sinuata (Nutt.) Hitchc.
Astragalus praelongus var. ellisiae (Rydb.) Barneby
Zephyranthes candida (Lindl.) Herb.
Cacalia decomposita A.Gray
Stenanthium rhombipetalum Suksd.
Schoenocrambe suffrutescens (Rollins) S.L.Welsh & Chatterly
Juncus effusus var. effusus
Erigeron chrysopsidis A.Gray
Croton alamosanus Rose
Hemicarpha aristulata (Coville) A.Nelson
Viola rydbergii Greene
Euphorbia ocellata var. arenicola (Parish) Jeps.
Chrysothamnus depressus Nutt.
Encelia frutescens var. resinosa M.E.Jones ex S.F.Blake
Stenanthium occidentale A.Gray
Spiraea densiflora Nutt. ex Rydb.
Phlox colubrina Wherry & Constance
Erigeron fundus G.L.Nesom
Allium fibrillum M.E.Jones
Mimulus breweri (Greene) Coville
Crataegus douglasii var. douglasii
Thinopyrum ponticum (Podp.) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Lesquerella occidentalis S.Watson
Bouteloua parryi (E.Fourn.) Griffiths
Penstemon thompsoniae subsp. thompsoniae
Silene hitchguirei Bocquet
Hymenothrix loomisii S.F.Blake
Astragalus lentiginosus var. kennedyi (Rydb.) Barneby
Pectis rusbyi Greene ex A.Gray
Viola aurea Kellogg
Chorizanthe parryi var. fernandina (S.Watson) Jeps.
Ivesia utahensis S.Watson
Draba lonchocarpa Rydb.
Leptosyne arizonica var. pubescens B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Phlox austromontana var. prostrata E.E.Nelson
Amaranthus powellii S.Watson
Astragalus tortipes J.L.Anderson & J.M.Porter
Trifolium wormskioldii var. wormskioldii
Salix wolfii subsp. idahoensis (Ball) A.E.Murray
Descurainia pinnata subsp. halictorum (Cockerell) Detling
Camassia quamash subsp. quamash
Calamagrostis crassiglumis Thurb.
Alisma gramineum var. graminifolium (Wahlenb.) Hendricks
Hymenoxys cooperi var. canescens (D.C.Eaton ex S.Watson) K.F.Parker
Poa unilateralis Scribn. ex Vasey
Castilleja pilosa var. steenensis (Pennell) Holmgren
Eriogonum brevicaule var. nanum (Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Descurainia pinnata subsp. ochroleuca (Wooton) Detling
Gilia cana subsp. speciformis A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Schoenocrambe linearifolia (A.Gray) Rollins
Mirabilis longiflora var. wrightiana (A.Gray ex Britton & Kearney) Kearney & Peebles
Trifolium parryi var. montanense (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Penstemon palmeri subsp. eglandulosus D.D.Keck
Dalea polygonoides A.Gray
Urtica dioica subsp. gracilis (Aiton) Selander
Boechera cobrensis (M.E.Jones) Dorn
Flaveria sonorensis A.M.Powell
Vulpia microstachys var. ciliata (Beal) Lonard & Gould
Populus nigra var. italica Münchh.
Lesquerella pinetorum Wooton & Standl.
Acacia angustissima var. suffrutescens (Rose) Isely
Setaria glauca (L.) P.Beauv.
Lathyrus parvifolius var. tenuior Piper
Mitella caulescens Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Dithyrea wislizenii Engelm.
Persicaria amphibia (L.) Delarbre
Myosotis arvensis (L.) Hill
Eriogonum clavellatum Small
Ivesia shockleyi Watson
Rhinotropis lindheimeri var. parvifolia (Wheelock) J.R.Abbott
Lythrum tribracteatum Spreng.
Ledum glandulosum var. californicum (Kellogg) C.L.Hitchc.
Eriogonum strictum var. anserinum (Greene) S.Stokes
Camissonia boothii var. condensata (Munz) Cronquist
Sphaeralcea fendleri A.Gray
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana Parry
Mentzelia tenerrima Rydb.
Astragalus wootonii var. aquilonius Barneby
Heliomeris Nutt.
Fraxinus coriacea S.Watson
Melaleuca viminalis (Gaertn.) Byrnes
Atriplex dioica Raf.
Atriplex gardneri var. bonnevillensis (C.A.Hanson) S.L.Welsh
Muhlenbergia gooddingii Soderstr.
Allium sanbornii var. tuolumnense Ownbey & Aase ex Traub
Trillium scouleri Rydb.
Brachychiton rupestris (Lindl.) Schum.
Scutellaria angustifolia Pursh
Monarda austromontana Epling
Penstemon nitidus var. nitidus
Pectis coulteri Harv. & A.Gray
Erigeron superbus Greene ex Rydb., 1906
Sophia incisa (Engelm.) Greene
Hymenopappus filifolius var. nudipes (Maguire) B.L.Turner
Zizia aptera var. occidentalis Fernald
Astragalus jejunus var. jejunus
Hackelia patens var. harrisonii J.L.Gentry
Eriogonum zionis var. zionis
Rhus nitens Greene
Dalea lanata var. terminalis (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Astragalus desereticus Barneby
Draba sobolifera Rydb.
Elatine rubella Rydb.
Epilobium strictum Muhl. ex Spreng.
Trifolium longipes var. brachypus S.Watson
Vauquelinia torreyi S.Watson
Collinsia torreyi var. torreyi
Graphephorum wolfii (Vasey) Coult.
Heterotheca marginata Semple
Silene pectinata S.Watson
Sambucus canadensis L.
Anoda cristata (L.) Schltdl.
Eriogonum virgatum Benth.
Trifolium thompsonii C.V.Morton
Packera dimorphophylla var. paysonii (T.M.Barkley) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Bolboschoenus maritimus var. maritimus
Leptosiphon nudatus (Greene) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Lupinus minimus Hook.
Ribes leptanthum var. brachyanthum A.Gray
Berberis fendleri A.Gray
Digitaria pauciflora Hitchc.
Cymopterus purpurascens (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Lepidium montanum var. canescens (Thell.) C.L.Hitchc.
Amphiscirpus nevadensis (S.Watson) Oteng-Yeb.
Carex globosa Boott
Eriogonum ochrocephalum var. alexanderae Reveal
Juncus orthophyllus Coville
Chaenactis tenuifolia var. orcuttiana Greene
Helianthus petiolaris var. fallax (Heiser) S.L.Welsh
Prosopis laevigata (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) M.C.Johnst.
Lotus strigosus var. strigosus
Lupinus pallidipes A.Heller
Glyceria grandis S.Watson
Horkelia sericoleuca Rydb.
Rorippa intermedia (Kuntze) Stuckey
Geranium viscosissimum var. nervosum (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Eriogonum leptocladon var. papiliunculi Reveal
Steironema ciliatum var. occidentale Suksd.
Caucalis microcarpa Hook. & Arn.
Potentilla pensylvanica var. paucijuga (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh & B.C.Johnst.
Penstemon virgatus A.Gray
Schoenocrambe argillacea (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) Rollins
Phlox austromontana var. lutescens S.L.Welsh
Cryptantha mensana (M.E.Jones) Payson
Actinella rusbyi A.Gray
Sanguisorba occidentalis Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Ipomopsis aggregata subsp. bridgesii (A.Gray) V.E.Grant & A.D.Grant
Eragrostis curvula (Schrad.) Nees
Muhlenbergia porteri Scribn. ex Beal
Juncus hallii Engelm.
Senecio lugens var. hookeri D.C.Eaton
Packera fendleri (A.Gray) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Astragalus prorifer M.E.Jones
Astragalus cronquistii Barneby
Erigeron acris var. asteroides (Andrz. ex Besser) DC., 1836
Potentilla wheeleri S.Watson
Eriophyllum lanatum var. achillaeoides (DC.) Jeps.
Astragalus cimae M.E.Jones
Collomia Nutt.
Delphinium stachydeum (A.Gray) Tidestr.
Pentaphylloides fruticosa (L.) O.Schwarz
Salix lasiandra var. fendleriana (Andersson) Bebb
Astragalus lentiginosus var. pseudoiodanthus (Barneby) J.A.Alexander
Eleocharis suksdorfiana Beauverd
Cirsium inamoenum var. davisii (Cronquist) D.J.Keil
Triglochin palustris L.
Aquilegia loriae S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Plagiobothrys salsus (Brandegee) I.M.Johnst.
Cordylanthus wrightii subsp. wrightii
Penstemon leonardii Rydb.
Astragalus holmgreniorum Barneby
Sidalcea rostrata Eastw.
Arabis platysperma var. howellii (S.Watson) Jeps.
Potentilla newberryi var. arenicola Rydb.
Gilia laxiflora (Coult.) Osterh.
Penstemon attenuatus var. palustris (Pennell) Cronquist
Poa L.
Opuntia tetracantha Toumey
Allionia incarnata var. villosa (Standl.) B.L.Turner
Eriogonum lonchophyllum var. lonchophyllum
Lotus tomentellus Greene
Wislizenia melilotoides Greene
Sphaeralcea hastulata A.Gray
Lathyrus pauciflorus var. utahensis (M.E.Jones) R.J.Davis
Piptatherum shoshoneanum (Curto & Douglass M.Hend.) P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Heterotheca nitidula (Wooton & Standl.) G.L.Nesom
Pyrrocoma radiata Nutt.
Muhlenbergia virescens (Kunth) Trin.
Desmanthus bicornutus S.Watson
Dicentra canadensis (Goldie) Walp.
Langloisia punctata (A.Gray) Goodd.
Ranunculus acriformis var. montanensis (Rydb.) L.D.Benson
Gaura parviflora Douglas ex Lehm.
Chorizanthe R.Br. ex Benth.
Machaeranthera linearifolia (T.J.Watson) Cronquist
Astragalus olympicus J.S.Cotton
Penstemon fruticiformis var. amargosae (D.D.Keck) N.H.Holmgren
Leucophysalis nana (A.Gray) Averett
Lotus nevadensis var. douglasii (Greene) Ottley
Potentilla mogollonica Greene
Senecio cynthioides Greene
Mimosa palmeri Rose
Stachys pilosa var. pilosa
Bromus commutatus Schrad.
Elodea nevadensis H.St.John
Collinsia childii Parry ex A.Gray
Eriogonum crosbyae var. mystrium (Reveal) Grady & Reveal
Plagiobothrys pringlei Greene
Achnatherum parishii subsp. depauperatum (M.E.Jones) Barkworth
Salvia reflexa Hornem.
Erigeron compositus var. compositus
Nuxia floribunda Benth.
Ranunculus grayi Britton
Carex pallescens L.
Physaria hemiphysaria (Maguire) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Hofmeisteria fasciculata var. fasciculata
Chaenactis stevioides var. thornberi Stockw.
Eriogonum nudum var. pubiflorum Benth.
Boerhavia traubae Spellenb.
Eriogonum esmeraldense S.Watson
Leymus flavescens (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Pilg.
Penstemon goodrichii N.H.Holmgren
Ledum californicum Kellogg
Pectis prostrata Cav.
Audibertia mearnsii Britton
Lomatium salmoniflorum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Agrostis densiflora Vasey
Stenotus acaulis var. glabratus (D.C.Eaton) Kartesz & Gandhi
Ericameria greenei (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Washingtonia filifera (L.Linden) H.Wendl.
Phaseolus ritensis M.E.Jones
Agrostis canina L.
Bromelia pinguin L.
Physaria arizonica (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Erigeron strigulosus Greene
Horkelia fusca subsp. pseudocapitata (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Bouteloua trifida Thurb. ex S.Watson
Perideridia gairdneri subsp. borealis T.I.Chuang & Constance
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. pulchellum
Descurainia pinnata subsp. brachycarpon (Richardson) Detling
Sidalcea oregana var. spicata (Regel) Jeps.
Myosurus apetalus Gay
Allium stellatum Nutt.
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. gracilenta (Greene) D.D.Keck
Oenothera villosa var. strigosa (Rydb.) Dorn
Cryptantha semiglabra Barneby
Acacia cochliacantha f. cochliacantha
Thelypodium rollinsii Al-Shehbaz
Plagiobothrys stipitatus var. stipitatus
Plagiobothrys hispidus A.Gray
Conioselinum scopulorum (A.Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Symphyotrichum welshii (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom
Arenaria kingii (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Aconogonon davisiae (W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray) Soják
Erythrocoma arizonica Greene
Lomatium scabrum var. scabrum
Vicia americana Muhl.
Encelia frutescens var. actonii (Elmer) S.F.Blake
Chiranthodendron pentadactylon Larreat.
Astragalus tener var. ferrisiae Liston
Gayophytum diffusum subsp. diffusum
Aristida ternipes var. gentilis (Henrard) Allred
Hymenopappus filifolius var. filifolius
Carex brevior (Dewey) Mack. ex Lunell
Dalea obreniformis (Rydb.) Barneby
Dodecatheon conjugens var. conjugens
Silene dilatata Suksd.
Bebbia juncea var. juncea
Calandrinia ciliata var. menziesii (Hook.) J.F.Macbr.
Hymenopappus radiatus Rose
Carex curatorum Stacey
Cymopterus goodrichii S.L.Welsh & Neese
Lathyrus pauciflorus var. pauciflorus
Erigeron ochroleucus var. scribneri (M.L.Canby ex Rydb.) Cronquist
Potentilla shockleyi (Watson) Jeps.
Carex oederi Retz.
Cryptantha scoparia A.Nelson
Stanleya pinnata var. bipinnata (Greene) Rollins
Hieracium scouleri var. scouleri
Collinsia bartsiifolia var. bartsiifolia
Rhamnus californica var. ursina (Greene) McMinn
Prosopis palmeri S.Watson
Achillea arenicola A.Heller
Salix wolfii var. wolfii
Oenothera pallida var. runcinata (Engelm.) Cronquist
Pectis barberi Greenm.
Eriogonum roseum Durand & Hilg.
Larrea divaricata Cav.
Polyctenium williamsiae Rollins
Penstemon heterophyllus var. purdyi (D.D.Keck) McMinn
Drymocallis glabrata Rydb.
Acacia farnesiana var. farnesiana
Penstemon caespitosus var. perbrevis (Pennell) N.H.Holmgren
Sphaeromeria argentea Nutt.
Plagiobothrys scouleri var. scouleri
Astragalus hamiltonii Ced.Porter
Solidago spectabilis var. spectabilis
Lupinus grayi S.Watson
Fendlera wrightii (A.Gray) A.Heller
Eriogonum jonesii S.Watson
Mirabilis albida (Walter) Heimerl
Androsace occidentalis Pursh
Eremogone congesta var. crassula (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Paspalum convexum Flüggé
Astragalus gentryi Standl.
Descurainia pinnata var. brachycarpa (Richardson) Fernald
Lupinus arbustus var. calcaratus (Kellogg) S.L.Welsh
Thelypodiopsis divaricata (Rollins) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Corallorhiza arizonica S.Watson
Xanthocephalum gymnospermoides var. gymnospermoides
Corallorhiza trifida Châtel.
Salix ×fragilis L.
Hackelia brevicula (Jeps.) J.L.Gentry
Cirsium peckii L.F.Hend.
Mimulus washingtonensis Gand.
Delphinium distichum Geyer ex Hooker
Phlox solivaga Mayfield & Darrach
Salix dodgeana Rydb.
Apocynum sibiricum Jacq.
Euphorbia alta Norton
Castilleja angustifolia (Nutt.) G.Don
Ranunculus alismifolius var. davisii L.D.Benson
Leptosiphon pusillus (Benth.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Townsendia formosa Greene
Carex digitalis Willd.
Bouteloua diversispicula Columbus
Brickellia atractyloides A.Gray
Physaria oregona S.Watson
Poa nemoralis L.
Astragalus kentrophyta var. implexus (Canby ex Porter & J.M.Coult.) Barneby
Nothoscordum texanum M.E.Jones
Eriogonum ericifolium Torr. & A.Gray
Lepidium montanum var. heterophyllum (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Jacobinia ovata var. subglabra S.Watson
Astragalus humistratus var. humistratus
Polygonum majus (Meisn.) Piper
Boechera demissa var. russeola (Rollins) N.H.Holmgren
Dimorphocarpa wislizenii (Engelm.) Rollins
Agoseris monticola Greene
Baccharis emoryi A.Gray
Potentilla diversifolia var. perdissecta (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Plagiobothrys mollis (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Lepidium montanum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Downingia elegans f. rosea H.St.John
Arabis pulchra M.E.Jones ex S.Watson
Acer macounii Greene
Carduus acanthoides L.
Meibomia canbyi Schindl.
Carex specifica L.H.Bailey
Draba sphaerocarpa J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Eriogonum heermannii var. clokeyi Reveal
Camissonia Link
Linanthus ciliatus var. ciliatus
Psidium littorale var. longipes (O.Berg) Fosberg
Allocarya fragilis Brand
Helenium thurberi A.Gray
Lilium nevadense Eastw.
Erigeron lobatus A.Nelson
Minuartia macrantha var. filiorum (Maguire) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Utricularia vulgaris L.
Rubus deliciosus Torr.
Astragalus mohavensis var. mohavensis
Ceanothus integerrimus var. parvifolius S.Watson
Brassica elongata Ehrh.
Mimulus floribundus var. membranaceus (A.Nelson) A.L.Grant
Mirabilis coccinea (Torr.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Eragrostis pilosa (L.) P.Beauv.
Hosackia heermannii Durand & Hilg.
Potentilla anglica Laich.
Eriogonum thompsoniae var. albiflorum Reveal
Asclepias quinquedentata A.Gray
Madia citriodora Greene
Brickellia venosa (Wooton & Standl.) B.L.Rob.
Carduus candidissimus Greene
Amaranthus blitoides var. densifolius Uline & W.L.Bray
Astragalus convallarius var. margaretae Barneby
Carex concinna R.Br.
Cardamine L.
Cymopterus bakeri (J.M.Coult. & Rose) M.E.Jones
Echinodorus berteroi (Spreng.) Fassett
Cardamine breweri var. leibergii (Holz.) C.L.Hitchc.
Verbesina synotis S.F.Blake
Pectis filipes var. subnuda Fernald
Kochia scoparia (L.) Schrad.
Cryptantha inaequata (Brand) I.M.Johnst.
Grindelia squarrosa var. serrulata (Rydb.) Steyerm.
Arabis hirsuta var. pycnocarpa (M.Hopkins) Rollins
Epilobium leptophyllum Raf.
Camissonia nevadensis (Kellogg) Raven
Baccharis sergiloides A.Gray
Stephanomeria runcinata Nutt.
Arctostaphylos ×cinerea Howell
Juncus compressus Jacq.
Clematis hirsutissima var. hirsutissima
Rhinotropis acanthoclada (A.Gray) J.R.Abbott
Oenothera marginata Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.
Brickellia arguta var. odontolepis B.L.Rob.
Atriplex saccaria var. cornuta (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus misellus var. pauper Barneby
Erigeron abajoensis Cronquist
Epilobium alpinum var. clavatum (Trel.) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex nardina (Hornem.) Fr.
Ceanothus greggii var. perplexans (Trel.) Jeps.
Carex nova L.H.Bailey
Sporobolus jonesii Vasey
Spiranthes perexilis (Sheviak) M.C.Pace
Epilobium hirsutum L.
Corispermum welshii Mosyakin
Vicia americana var. minor Hook.
Potentilla arguta var. convallaria (Rydb.) Th.Wolf
Schoenoplectus americanus (Pers.) Volkart ex Schinz & R.Keller
Camissonia pusilla Raven
Cheiranthus suffrutescens Abrams
Carex serratodens W.Boott
Galium mexicanum subsp. asperrimum (A.Gray) Dempster
Sedum stelliforme S.Watson
Elymus saxicola Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Psilostrophe DC.
Opuntia polyacantha var. hystricina (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) B.D.Parfitt
Cryptantha paradoxa (A.Nelson) Payson
Eremogone macradenia var. macradenia
Lemna cyclostasa Elliott ex Chev.
Cuscuta salina Engelm.
Verbena ×clemensorum Moldenke
Oenothera deltoides subsp. piperi (Munz) W.M.Klein
Eritrichium holopterum var. submolle A.Gray, 1878
Crataegus chrysocarpa Ashe
Aliciella micromeria (A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Salvia cacaliifolia Benth.
Gnaphalium luteoalbum var. diffusum (Baker) Humbert
Erigeron vagus Payson
Streptanthus amplexicaulis var. barbarae J.T.Howell
Salix columbiana (Dorn) Argus
Penstemon scapoides D.D.Keck
Sanguisorba annua (Nutt. ex Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Trifolium parryi A.Gray
Tecoma stans var. stans
Primula cusickiana var. domensis (Kass & S.L.Welsh) N.H.Holmgren & S.Kelso
Gayophytum diffusum var. strictipes (Hook.) Dorn
Oenothera primiveris var. bufonis (M.E.Jones) Cronquist
Trifolium fucatum var. gambelii (Nutt.) Jeps.
Lupinus evermannii Rydb.
Trifolium eriocephalum var. piperi J.S.Martin
Athanasia acerosa (DC.) D.Dietr.
Minuartia pusilla (S.Watson) Mattf.
Carex tenacissima Suksd.
Orthocarpus cuspidatus subsp. cryptanthus (Piper) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Acer campbellii Hook.f. & Thomson ex Hiern
Amsinckia intermedia Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Cryptantha dumetorum (Greene ex A.Gray) Greene
Gaillardia pulchella subsp. pulchella
Ribes cereum var. inebrians (Lindl.) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus leptaleus A.Gray
Rubia tinctorum L.
Juncus nodosus L.
Lepidium ostleri S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Astragalus limnocharis var. limnocharis
Aquilegia holmgrenii S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Ranunculus cymbalaria var. cymbalaria
Erigeron lackschewitzii G.L.Nesom & W.A.Weber
Amarella copelandii Greene
Achnatherum hendersonii (Vasey) Barkworth
Arabis atrorubens Suksd. ex Greene
Epilobium glaberrimum Barbey
Salix argophylla Nutt.
Ranunculus eximius Greene
Arabis fernaldiana var. stylosa (S.Watson) Rollins
Eriogonum holmgrenii Reveal
Penstemon azureus var. angustissimus A.Gray
Erigeron pumilus subsp. intermedius Cronquist
Anemone occidentalis S.Watson
Lotus spencerae J.F.Macbr.
Lupinus concinnus var. concinnus
Achnatherum lettermanii (Vasey) Barkworth
Cordylanthus tecopensis Munz & Roos
Podagrostis humilis (Vasey) Björkman
Lotodes ellipticum var. latifolium Kuntze
Eriogonum crosbyae var. crosbyae
Dalea filiformis A.Gray
Chrysothamnus lanceolatus Nutt.
Arabis sparsiflora var. arcuata (Nutt.) Rollins
Ambrosia psilostachya var. californica (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Astragalus harbisonii Barneby
Gutierrezia petradoria (Welsh & Goodrich) S.L.Welsh
Lepidium densiflorum var. pubicarpum (A.Nelson) Thell.
Neolitsea aurata (Hayata) Koidz.
Descurainia incisa var. incisa
Fendlera falcata Thornber
Euphorbia bilobata Engelm.
Ilysanthes gratioloides var. depressa Suksd.
Erigeron peregrinus var. peregrinus
Erysimum virgatum Roth
Cryptantha micrantha var. lepida (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Nemacaulis denudata var. denudata
Muhlenbergia mexicana (L.) Trin.
Puccinellia lemmonii (Vasey) Scribn.
Callitriche trochlearis Fassett
Rorippa austriaca (Crantz) Besser
Ivesia baileyi var. baileyi
Eriogonum desertorum (Maguire) R.J.Davis
Dyssodia anthemidifolia Benth.
Eriogonum panguicense var. alpestre (S.Stokes) Reveal
Arabis dispar M.E.Jones
Hackelia cusickii (Piper) Brand
Carex triquetra Boott
Eriophyllum confertiflorum var. laxiflorum A.Gray
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. nauseosus
Festuca thurberi Vasey
Oenothera greggii A.Gray
Gnaphalium wrightii A.Gray
Eriogonum nummulare M.E.Jones
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. orthocaulon (Small) C.L.Hitchc.
Baileya pleniradiata var. perennis A.Nelson
Brassica elongata subsp. integrifolia (Boiss.) Breistr.
Cyperus acuminatus Torr. & Hook.
Dryopetalon runcinatum var. runcinatum
Astragalus kelseyi Rydb.
Dichanthelium boscii (Poir.) Gould & C.A.Clark
Arabis drummondii var. drummondii
Helianthella parryi A.Gray
Cotoneaster lucidus Schltdl.
Betula subcordata Rydb. ex B.T.Butler
Lessingia lemmonii A.Gray
Croton texensis var. utahensis Cronquist
Cirsium tweedyi (Rydb.) Petr., 1917
Ranunculus macounii var. macounii
Senecio blitoides Greene
Euphorbia biglandulosa Desf.
Oenothera pilosella Raf.
Caulanthus major var. nevadensis Rollins
Allium fimbriatum var. munzii Ownbey & Aase ex Traub
Gomphrena caespitosa Torr.
Haplopappus lanceolatus (Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus crotalariae var. virgatus A.Gray
Lupinus sulphureus Hook.
Sinapis alba L.
Bothriochloa ischaemum (L.) Keng
Eriogonum aureum var. glutinosum M.E.Jones
Tofieldia occidentalis S.Watson
Noccaea montana var. montana
Salix rosmarinifolia L.
Eriogonum decumbens Benth.
Penstemon angustifolius var. dulcis Neese
Verbena ciliata Benth.
Cyperus parishii Britton
Montanoa tomentosa subsp. rosei (Rose ex B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) V.A.Funk
Lomatium flavum (G.N.Jones) Suksd.
Cirsium barnebyi S.L.Welsh & Neese
Marina diffusa var. diffusa
Heuchera parvifolia var. utahensis (Rydb.) Garrett
Horkelia bolanderi var. marinensis Elmer
Encelia palmeri Vasey & Rose
Halimolobos virgata (Nutt.) O.E.Schulz
Carex schottii Dewey
Calylophus hartwegii subsp. filifolius (Eastw.) Towner & P.H.Raven
Hosackia palmeri Vasey & Rose
Salix vestita Pursh
Carex aquatilis var. aquatilis
Carex scirpoidea Michx.
Gratiola heterosepala Mason & Bacig.
Chrysothamnus humilis Greene
Eriogonum abertianum subsp. pinetorum (Greene) S.Stokes
Draba asterophora Payson
Artemisia carruthii Alph.Wood ex Carruth.
Cornutia pyramidata L.
Danthonia californica var. californica
Eriogonum microthecum var. phoeniceum (L.M.Shultz) Reveal
Mentzelia rusbyi Wooton
Ribes oxyacanthoides subsp. irriguum (Douglas) Q.P.Sinnott
Eriogonum abertianum var. abertianum
Allocarya aculeolata Piper
Penstemon ammophilus N.H.Holmgren & L.M.Schultz
Hedeoma nana subsp. californica W.S.Stewart
Asclepias uncialis var. ruthiae (Maguire) Sundell
Mentzelia uintahensis (N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren) J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Margaranthus solanaceus Schltdl.
Cryptantha holoptera (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Machaeranthera pinnatifida var. pinnatifida
Solanum deflexum Greenm.
Senecio multicapitatus Greenm. ex Rydb.
Salix lucida Muhl.
Acer flabellatum Rehder
Synthyris ranunculina Pennell
Thermopsis divaricarpa A.Nelson
Machaeranthera pinnatifida subsp. gooddingii (A.Nelson) B.L.Turner & R.L.Hartm.
Chenopodium capitatum (L.) Asch.
Eriogonum latifolium var. alternans S.Stokes
Eriogonum strictum var. proliferum (Torr. & A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Amsonia peeblesii Woodson
Echinocereus bonkerae Thornber & Bonker
Carex nervina L.H.Bailey
Dichelostemma pulchellum (Salisb.) A.Heller
Castilleja patriotica Fernald
Betula papyrifera subsp. commutata (Regel) A.E.Murray
Delphinium strictum A.Nelson
Prunus mollis Torr.
Salix pseudocordata Andersson
Eleocharis montana (Kunth) Roem. & Schult.
Conyza sophiifolia Kunth
Potentilla plattensis Nutt.
Cornus occidentalis (Torr. & A.Gray) Coville
Astragalus minthorniae var. villosus Barneby
Atriplex powellii var. minuticarpa (Stutz & G.L.Chu) S.L.Welsh
Tephrosia constricta S.Watson
Centaurium trichanthum (Griseb.) B.L.Rob.
Lygodesmia grandiflora var. dianthopsis (D.C.Eaton) S.L.Welsh
Eriogonum spergulinum A.Gray
Machaeranthera pinnatifida var. paradoxa B.L.Turner & Hartm.
Heterotheca hirsuta (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Osmanthus heterophyllus (G.Don) P.S.Green
Nothofagus fusca (Hook.f.) Oerst.
Artemisia papposa S.F.Blake & Cronquist
Enceliopsis argophylla var. argophylla
Hackelia hispida (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Epilobium glabellum G.Forst.
Polanisia dodecandra subsp. trachysperma (Torr. & A.Gray) Iltis
Marina alamosana (Rose) Barneby
Castilleja applegatei var. applegatei
Teucrium chamaedrys L.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. junceus (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Lycium L.
Chamerion latifolium (L.) Holub
Euphorbia zygophylloides Boiss.
Arabis lyallii S.Watson
Crassula solieri (Gay) F.Meigen
Mimulus floribundus var. floribundus
Papaver uintaense S.L.Welsh
Astragalus trichopodus var. trichopodus
Antennaria howellii subsp. neodioica (Greene) R.J.Bayer
Erigeron peregrinus var. scaposus (Torr. & A.Gray) Cronquist
Sisyrinchium radicatum E.P.Bicknell
Penstemon grahamii D.D.Keck ex E.H.Graham
Ericameria viscidiflora (Hook.) L.C.Anderson
Psorothamnus emoryi var. arenarius (Brandegee) Barneby
Lygodesmia grandiflora var. stricta Maguire
Arabis microphylla var. saximontana Rollins
Satureja douglasii (Benth.) Briq.
Castilleja aspera Eastw.
Baileya Harv. & A.Gray ex Torr.
Agoseris grandiflora var. leptophylla G.I.Baird
Astragalus kentrophyta var. ungulatus M.E.Jones
Stenotus lanuginosus (A.Gray) Greene
Banksia serratifolia Salisb.
Franseria magdalenae Brandegee
Erigeron disparipilus Cronquist
Cenchrus longispinus (Hack.) Fernald
Acanthostachys strobilacea (Schult. & Schult.f.) Klotzsch
Platanus racemosa var. wrightii (S.Watson) L.D.Benson
Epilobium nevadense Munz
Agoseris apargioides var. maritima (E.Sheld.) G.I.Baird
Lupinus argenteus var. montigenus (A.Heller) Barneby
Echinocereus coccineus subsp. santaritensis (W.Blum & Rutow) M.A.Baker
Hymenopappus filifolius var. pauciflorus (I.M.Johnst.) B.L.Turner
Potamogeton pusillus var. gemmiparus J.W.Robbins
Cymopterus lapidosus M.E.Jones
Lathyrus arizonicus Britton
Astragalus lentiginosus var. australis Barneby
Carex orestera Zika
Penstemon ovatus Douglas
Chenopodium incanum (S.Watson) A.Heller
Grindelia nana var. discoidea (Nutt.) A.Gray
Perideridia bolanderi (A.Gray) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. goodmanii Reveal
Draba pennellii Rollins
Astragalus robbinsii var. alpiniformis (Rydb.) Barneby
Micranthes subapetala (E.Nelson) Small
Eleocharis acicularis var. occidentalis Svenson
Grindelia squarrosa var. squarrosa
Sitanion hordeoides Suksd.
Astragalus lyallii A.Gray
Orthocarpus Nutt.
Solanum palmeri Vasey & Rose
Castilleja salsuginosa N.H.Holmgren
Physaria multiceps (Maguire) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Dalea scandens var. occidentalis (Rydb.) Barneby
Astragalus pulsiferae A.Gray
Aster ascendens Lindl.
Gaura gracilis Wooton & Standl.
Trifolium variegatum Torr. & A.Gray
Sorbus scopulina var. scopulina
Solanum lanceolatum Cav.
Hamosa minthorniae (Jeps.) Rydb.
Anaphalis sierrae A.Heller
Amaranthus hybridus L.
Gaillardia arizonica A.Gray
Juncus arcticus subsp. alaskanus Hultén
Aquilegia scopulorum var. goodrichii S.L.Welsh
Allium aaseae Ownbey
Draba stenoloba Ledeb.
Lupinus argenteus var. fulvomaculatus (Payson) Barneby
Solidago nemoralis f. nemoralis
Leucadendron salicifolium (Salisb.) I.Williams
Brodiaea purdyi Eastw.
Draba stenoloba var. ramosa C.L.Hitchc.
Rubus parviflorus var. velutinus (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Draba crassifolia Graham
Bouteloua repens (Kunth) Scribn. & Merr.
Lasthenia chrysostoma (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Greene
Erigeron pumilus var. concinnus (Hook. & Arn.) Dorn
Muhlenbergia ramulosa (Kunth) Swallen
Oenothera scapoidea Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Allium geyeri var. tenerum M.E.Jones
Galium mexicanum var. asperulum (A.Gray) Dempster
Dalea neomexicana var. neomexicana
Astragalus arrectus A.Gray
Eriogonum argophyllum Reveal
Leptosiphon Benth.
Cassia leptophylla Vogel
Stellaria jamesii Torr.
Senecio spatuliformis A.Heller
Allium bolanderi S.Watson
Sphaeralcea caespitosa var. caespitosa
Andropogon virginicus L.
Carex neurophora Mack.
Eriogonum thompsoniae var. thompsoniae
Carex nardina var. hepburnii (Boott) Kük.
Antirrhinum virga A.Gray
Atriplex navajoensis C.A.Hanson
Eurybia sibirica (L.) G.L.Nesom
Pyrola asarifolia subsp. asarifolia
Opuntia wilcoxii Britton & Rose
Cystium kennedyi Rydb.
Brickellia albicaulis (Rydb.) Nelson
Astragalus tephrodes var. tephrodes
Draba oreibata var. oreibata
Urtica strigosissima Rydb.
Cylindropuntia (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Carex bebbii (L.H.Bailey) Olney ex Fernald
Phlox tenuifolia E.Nelson
Acalypha ostryifolia Riddell ex J.M.Coult.
Cymopterus alpinus A.Gray
Eriogonum lonchophyllum var. saurinum (Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Solanum jamesii Torr.
Eriastrum diffusum subsp. jonesii H.Mason
Eriogonum umbellatum var. porteri (Small) S.Stokes
Mirabilis multiflora var. glandulosa (Standl.) J.F.Macbr.
Cryptantha salmonensis (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Payson
Allium douglasii var. constrictum Ownbey & Mingrone
Oxytropis lambertii var. bigelovii A.Gray
Cotoneaster multiflorus Bunge
Chrysothamnus eremobius L.C.Anderson
Camissonia claviformis subsp. integrior (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Saxifraga nidifica var. nidifica
Symphyotrichum foliaceum var. canbyi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Symphyotrichum foliaceum var. apricum (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Cotoneaster acutifolius Turcz.
Cantua quercifolia Juss.
Tetraneuris acaulis var. arizonica (Greene) K.F.Parker
Penstemon laetus var. laetus
Astragalus tephrodes var. chloridae (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Mimulus primuloides Benth.
Verbena harbisonii Moldenke
Solanum heterodoxum var. novomexicanum Bartlett
Lupinus arbustus var. arbustus
Eremogone fendleri var. porteri (Rydb.) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Sphaeralcea grossulariifolia var. moorei S.L.Welsh
Lepidium densiflorum var. ramosum (A.Nelson) Thell.
Allium macrum S.Watson
Astragalus missouriensis Nutt.
Senecio foetidus var. foetidus
Trisetum cernuum Trin.
Platystemon arvorum Greene
Yucca filifera Engelm.
Salix bonplandiana var. laevigata (Bebb) Dorn
Chaenactis douglasii var. montana M.E.Jones
Stroganowia tiehmii Rollins
Lesquerella pendula Rollins
Carex lemmonii W.Boott
Lotus heermannii Greene
Ranunculus sceleratus L.
Machaeranthera bigelovii (A.Gray) Greene
Jacobaea maritima (L.) Pelser & Meijden
Antennaria pulcherrima (Hook.) Greene
Penstemon crandallii var. atratus (D.D.Keck) Holmgren
Penstemon rubicundus D.D.Keck
Lomatium cusickii (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Juncus filiformis L.
Oenothera villosa subsp. villosa
Allocarya scripta Greene
Petrophytum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Rydb.
Oenothera caespitosa subsp. navajoensis W.L.Wagner et al.
Gnaphalium microcephalum Nutt.
Carex tribuloides Wahlenb.
Cryptantha intermedia var. grandiflora (Rydb.) Cronquist
Achnatherum eminens (Cav.) Barkworth
Cirsium ownbeyi S.L.Welsh
Astragalus lentiginosus var. scorpionis (Rydb.) M.E.Jones
Draba argyrea Rydb.
Vulpia myuros var. megalura (Nutt.) Auquier
Melampodium perfoliatum (Cav.) Kunth
Epilobium ciliatum subsp. watsonii (Barbey) Hoch & Raven
Trifolium longipes subsp. reflexum (A.Nelson) J.M.Gillett
Panicum L.
Rorippa calycina var. columbiae (Suksd. ex B.L.Rob.) Rollins
Erythronium grandiflorum subsp. chrysandrum Applegate
Drymocallis pseudorupestris var. crumiana D.D.Keck ex Ertter
Epilobium pallidum (Eastw.) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Spiraea ×vanhouttei (Briot) Carrière
Lotus salsuginosus Greene
Ficus fasciculata S.Watson
Synthyris missurica var. major (Hook.) Pennell ex R.J.Davis
Margaranthus purpurascens Rydb.
Penstemon pennellianus D.D.Keck
Salix exigua subsp. melanopsis (Nutt.) Cronquist
Astragalus speirocarpus A.Gray
Chorizanthe polygonoides var. polygonoides
Collinsia parryi A.Gray
Ivesia shockleyi var. ostleri Ertter
Hymenoxys lemmonii (Greene) Cockerell
Eriogonum microthecum var. schoolcraftii Reveal
Allium madidum S.Watson
Physaria nelsonii O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Astragalus lentiginosus var. stramineus (Rydb.) Barneby
Erigeron lepidopodus (Rob. & Fernald) G.L.Nesom
Senecio triangularis var. hansenii Greene
Trixis (P.Browne) Lag.
Thermopsis montana Torr. & A.Gray
Crassula argentea Thunb.
Hackelia arida (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Dugaldia grandiflora Rydb.
Physalis crassifolia var. versicolor (Rydb.) Waterf.
Caulanthus coulteri var. coulteri
Solanum wallacei (A.Gray) Parish
Vulpia microstachys var. pauciflora (Beal) Lonard & Gould
Townsendia jonesii (Beaman) Reveal
Eriogonum microthecum var. microthecum
Penstemon calcareus Brandegee
Saxifraga caespitosa var. minima Blank.
Arabis lyallii var. nubigena (J.F.Macbr. & Payson) Rollins
Rhinotropis rusbyi (Greene) J.R.Abbott
Perideridia oregana (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) Mathias
Erigeron nevadincola S.F.Blake
Scrophularia californica subsp. californica
Crassula L.
Vaccinium arbuscula (A.Gray) Merriam
Potentilla ovina Macoun
Phlox kelseyi subsp. salina (M.E.Jones) Wherry
Tripterocalyx carneus var. carneus
Erigeron L.
Epilobium minutum Lindl. ex Lehm.
Ochagavia carnea (Beer) L.B.Sm. & Looser
Lupinus caudatus var. utahensis (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh
Hemicarpha occidentalis A.Gray
Festuca dasyclada Beal
Marina maritima (Brandegee) Barneby
Euphorbia fendleri var. chaetocalyx Boiss.
Penstemon pseudoprocerus Rydb.
Eriogonum gracillimum S.Watson
Polygonum buxiforme f. montanum Brenckle
Lotus formosissimus Greene
Salix amygdaloides f. pilosiuscula C.K.Schneid.
Hibiscus trionum L.
Arabis cusickii S.Watson
Epilobium watsonii var. occidentale (Trel.) C.L.Hitchc.
Haplopappus Cass.
Amphilophium laxiflorum (DC.) L.G.Lohmann
Lepidium huberi S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Cryptantha decipiens (M.E.Jones) A.Heller
Arabis sabulosa M.E.Jones
Eriogonum rosense var. beatleyae (Reveal) Reveal
Haplopappus uniflorus (Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Arabis hirsuta var. glabrata Torr. & A.Gray
Lactuca serriola f. integrifolia Bogenh.
Keckiella rothrockii var. rothrockii
Astragalus didymocarpus var. didymocarpus
Oxytropis deflexa var. pulcherrima S.L.Welsh & A.Huber
Eriogonum villiflorum var. tumulosum Barneby
Hemizonia streetsii A.Gray
Solidago glutinosa Nutt.
Lathyrus nevadensis var. parkeri (H.St.John) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus pulsiferae var. pulsiferae
Senecio eremophilus var. eremophilus
Convolvulus aridus Greene
Aquilegia scopulorum subsp. perplexans Clokey
Penstemon miser A.Gray
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. salicifolius (Rydb.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Astragalus bodinii E.Sheld.
Chamaesyce ocellata (Durand & Hilg.) Millsp.
Jaltomata procumbens (Cav.) J.L.Gentry
Gilia longituba Benth.
Cirsium scariosum var. toiyabense D.J.Keil
Camassia suksdorfii Greenm.
Symphyotrichum ericoides var. pansum (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Atriplex griffithsii Standl.
Cirsium occidentale var. coulteri (Harv. & A.Gray) Jeps.
Astragalus naturitensis Payson
Cryptantha rattanii Greene
Trifolium heterodon Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus inyoensis E.Sheld.
Orobus californicus Alef.
Liatris punctata var. punctata
Carex marina Dewey
Gutierrezia arizonica (A.Gray) M.A.Lane
Jamesia americana var. macrocalyx (Small) Engl.
Eriogonum chrysops Rydb.
Oenothera L.
Euclidium syriacum (L.) R.Br.
Cryptantha sobolifera Payson
Myrrhis bolanderi A.Gray
Navarretia leucocephala subsp. minima (Nutt.) A.G.Day
Cercocarpus rotundifolius Rydb.
Salix sessilifolia Nutt.
Lysiloma watsonii Rose
Astragalus atratus var. owyheensis (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) M.E.Jones
Pennisetum ciliare (L.) Link
Vicia americana var. angustifolia Nees
Pediomelum epipsilum (Barneby) S.L.Welsh
Potentilla gracilis var. pulcherrima (Lehm.) Fernald
Marina vetula (Brandegee) Barneby
Allium tolmiei var. persimile Ownbey
Ceanothus greggii var. vestitus (Greene) McMinn
Rosa foetida Herrm.
Cymopterus beckii S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Portulaca halimoides L.
Castilleja oresbia Greenm.
Koeleria gracilis var. pseudocristatoides Domin
Astragalus bisulcatus var. haydenianus (A.Gray) Barneby
Lupinus diversalpicola C.P.Sm.
Mirabilis glabra (S.Watson) Standl.
Ivesia arizonica (Eastw. ex J.T.Howell) Ertter
Ambrosia tomentosa Nutt.
Castilleja lutescens (Greenm.) Rydb.
Mertensia bella Piper
Astragalus racemosus Pursh
Apocynum cannabinum var. glaberrimum A.DC.
Scirpus pallidus (Britton) Fernald
Matricaria maritima Fr. ex Nyman
Galium fendleri A.Gray
Penstemon deustus var. variabilis (Suksd.) Cronquist
Hymenoxys acaulis var. nana S.L.Welsh
Antennaria hygrophila Greene
Carex whitneyi Olney
Packera pseudaurea var. pseudaurea
Sphaeralcea subhastata subsp. connata Kearney
Astragalus desperatus var. conspectus Barneby
Machaeranthera linearis Greene
Phlox kelseyi subsp. kelseyi
Ivesia aperta (Howell) Munz
Senecio layneae Greene
Polygonum heterosepalum M.Peck & Ownbey
Carex muricata L.
Arabis glabra var. glabra
Bulbostylis capillaris (L.) Kunth ex C.B.Clarke
Minuartia nuttallii var. gracilis (B.L.Rob.) Rabeler & R.L.Hartm.
Machaeranthera laetevirens Greene
Poa alpina L.
Xanthium strumarium var. glabratum (DC.) Cronquist
Cirsium pulcherrimum (Rydb.) K.Schum.
Citharexylum shrevei Moldenke
Perityle microglossa var. saxosa (Brandegee) Powell
Phlox idahonis Wherry
Hymenopappus filifolius var. eriopodus (A.Nelson) B.L.Turner
Madia exigua (Sm.) A.Gray
Glossopetalon nevadense Gray
Lepigonum tenue Greene
Delphinium nuttallianum var. nuttallianum
Aconitum obtusiflorum Greene
Conyza canadensis var. canadensis
Micranthes bryophora (A.Gray) Brouillet & Gornall
Dicoria argentea Strother
Hordeum L.
Draba helleriana Greene
Carex vulpinoidea Michx.
Juncus arcticus var. balticus (Willd.) Trautv.
Juncus dubius Engelm.
Lupinus sericeus var. maximus C.P.Sm. ex L.S.Fleak & D.B.Dunn
Salix piperi Bebb
Calycadenia truncata var. truncata
Skimmia japonica Thunb.
Physalis hederifolia var. palmeri (A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Magnolia Plum. ex L.
Porophyllum cedrense Rose & Standl.
Bidens tripartita L.
Lesquerella obdeltata Rollins
Ficus afzelii G.Don
Rosa piscatoria Greene
Eriosema (DC.) G.Don
Opuntia echinocarpa Engelm. & Bigelow
Potamogeton foliosus Raf.
Sporobolus giganteus Nash
Antirrhinum nuttallianum subsp. subsessile (A.Gray) D.M.Thomps.
Montia latifolia Suksd.
Acacia willardiana Rose
Scleropogon brevifolius Phil.
Litchi chinensis Sonn.
Echinocereus fendleri (Engelm.) Sencke ex J.N.Haage
Machaeranthera crispa (Brandegee) B.L.Turner & Horne
Ivesia pityocharis Ertter
Euphorbia colorata Engelm.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. leiospermus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Ataenidia conferta (Benth.) Milne-Redh.
Mimulus nanus Hook. & Arn.
Potentilla gracilis var. owyheensis Ertter & Mansfield
Lepidium virginicum var. pubescens (Greene) Thell.
Cuscuta warneri Yunck.
Hymenopappus mexicanus A.Gray
Trifolium kingii var. productum (Greene) Jeps.
Iostephane heterophylla (Cav.) Benth. ex Hemsl.
Gilia tenerrima A.Gray
Thelypodiopsis ambigua var. erecta Rollins
Agrostis hallii Vasey
Astragalus humistratus var. tenerrimus M.E.Jones
Mimulus inflatulus Suksd.
Astragalus hornii A.Gray
Verbena xylopoda (L.M.Perry) G.L.Nesom
Penstemon campanulatus (Cav.) Willd.
Ericameria obovata (Rydb.) G.L.Nesom
Senecio fremontii var. inexpectatus Cronquist
Opuntia polyacantha var. hystericina (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) B.D.Parfitt
Boechera Á.Löve & D.Löve
Symphyotrichum jessicae (R.Piper) G.L.Nesom
Astragalus brandegeei Porter & J.M.Coult.
Penstemon montanus var. idahoensis (Pennell & D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Lessingia nana A.Gray
Boisduvalia densiflora (Lindl.) S.Watson
Sporobolus airoides var. wrightii (Scribn.) Gould
Cerastium brachypodum (Engelm. ex A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Cyperus odoratus L.
Mentzelia thompsonii Glad
Eriogonum palmeranum Reveal
Packera scalaris var. scalaris
Astragalus moranii Barneby
Eremogone congesta var. glandulifera (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Cymopterus minimus (Mathias) Mathias
Rosa nutkana subsp. macdougalii (Holz.) Piper
Astragalus lentiginosus var. sesquimetralis (Rydb.) Barneby
Carex ovalis Gooden.
Cerastium fontanum subsp. vulgare (Hartm.) Greuter & Burdet
Calochortus rhodothecus Clokey
Gnaphalium stramineum Kunth
Amaranthus graecizans L.
Arenaria hookeri Nutt.
Juncus bryoides F.J.Herm.
Aquilegia scopulorum var. scopulorum
Hypericum formosum Kunth
Poa annua var. stricta Vasey
Oenothera pubescens Willd. ex Spreng.
Sidalcea crenulata A.Nelson
Allium palmeri S.Watson
Perityle palmeri (A.Gray) S.Watson
Silene dichotoma Ehrh.
Astragalus sabulosus M.E.Jones
Chenopodium capitatum var. capitatum
Coreopsis maritima (Nutt.) Hook.fil.
Comandra pallida A.DC.
Cymopterus multinervatus (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Tidestr.
Salvia goldmanii Fernald
Drymaria glandulosa Bartl.
Arabis falcifructa Rollins
Cicuta grandifolia Greene
Senecio multilobatus Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray
Palafoxia linearis var. linearis
Ruellia nudiflora var. glabrata Leonard
Alopecurus magellanicus Lam.
Carex illota L.H.Bailey
Allium douglasii var. nevii (S.Watson) Ownbey & Mingrone
Oxytropis deflexa (Pall.) DC.
Jacquemontia palmeri S.Watson
Astragalus monumentalis var. monumentalis
Quercus wilcoxii Rydb.
Calamagrostis suksdorfii var. luxurians Kearney
Erigeron bloomeri A.Gray
Balsamorhiza macrolepis Sharp
Phyllodoce ×hybrida Rydb.
Astragalus curvicarpus (E.Sheld.) J.F.Macbr.
Rathbunia alamosensis Britton & Rose
Yucca kanabensis McKelvey
Mimulus glabratus var. glabratus
Erigeron rhizomatus Cronquist
Amsonia latifolia M.E.Jones
Perityle coronopifolia A.Gray
Galium stellatum var. eremicum Hilend & J.T.Howell
Noccaea fendleri subsp. glauca (A.Nelson) Al-Shehbaz & M.Koch
Keckiella antirrhinoides var. microphylla (A.Gray) N.H.Holmgren
Silene petersonii var. petersonii
Cimicifuga arizonica S.Watson
Lepidium oxycarpum Torr. & A.Gray
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. crebrifolia (Nutt.) A.G.Day
Eriogonum apachense Reveal
Stachys rigida var. rigida
Sidalcea malviflora (DC.) A.Gray
Eriogonum salsuginosum (Nutt.) Hook.
Mentzelia adhaerens Benth.
Opuntia erinacea Engelm. & Bigelow
Hyptis emoryi Torr.
Melianthus comosus Vahl
Amphilophium buccinatorium (DC.) L.G.Lohmann
Hipericum Neck.
Eremogone fendleri (A.Gray) Ikonn.
Micranthes marshallii (Greene) Small
Ipomopsis longiflora subsp. neomexicana Wilken
Stigmaphyllon ciliatum (Lam.) A.Juss.
Prunus glandulosa Thunb.
Micranthes howellii (Greene) Small
Opuntia ×curvispina Griffiths
Hedeoma oblongifolia var. oblongifolia
Micranthes hitchcockiana (Elvander) Brouillet & Gornall
Agave pringlei Engelm. ex Baker
Micranthes rhomboidea (Greene) Small
Plagiobothrys bracteatus (Howell) I.M.Johnst.
Erythrina L.
Micranthes eriophora (S.Watson) Small
Helleborus L.
Lasiacis ruscifolia (Kunth) Hitchc. ex Chase
Chironia baccifera L.
Grusonia parishii (Orcutt) Pinkava
Catha edulis Forssk.
Abronia Juss.
Ruta graveolens L.
Ceanothus L.
Cylindropuntia spinosior (Toumey) F.M.Knuth
Hazardia rosarica (Moran) W.D.Clark
Talinum aurantiacum Engelm.
Opuntia ×martiniana (L.D.Benson) B.D.Parfitt
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa var. thornberi (Thornber & Bonker) Backeb.
Quillaja brasiliensis (A.St.-Hil. & Tul.) C.Mart.
Micranthes idahoensis (Piper) Brouillet & Gornall
Rhaponticum repens (L.) Hidalgo
Aesculus L.
Prunus fasciculata subsp. fasciculata
Clethra lanata M.Martens & Galeotti
Enneapogon desvauxii P.Beauv.
Plantago ovata Phil.
Agrimonia gryposepala Wallr.
Opuntia pinkavae B.D.Parfitt
Monardella lanceolata A.Gray
Trifolium glomeratum L.
Castela emoryi (A.Gray) Moran & Fleger
Aloysia citriodora Palau
Polygala intermontana T.Wendt
Cylindropuntia bigelowii (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Quercus suber L.
Metastelma pringlei A.Gray
Chloracantha spinosa (Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Cylindropuntia ×deserta (Griffiths) Pinkava
Prunus ilicifolia var. integrifolia Sudw.
Tragopogon mirus Ownbey
Myrica californica Cham. & Schltdl.
Hypochaeris L.
Choisya ternata Kunth
Micranthes gormanii (Suksd.) Brouillet & Gornall
Ericameria nauseosa var. salicifolia (Rydb.) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Yucca jaegeriana (McKelvey) L.W.Lenz
Scrophularia californica subsp. floribunda (Greene) R.J.Shaw
Micranthes tischii (Skelly) Brouillet & Gornall
Calothamnus villosus R.Br. ex W.T.Aiton
Salvia officinalis L.
Hydrangea serratifolia (Hook. & Arn.) F.Phil.
Micranthes nelsoniana var. cascadensis (Calder & Savile) Gornall & H.Ohba
Micranthes tempestiva (Elvander & Denton) Brouillet & Gornall
Tidestromia oblongifolia (S.Watson) Standl.
Gunnera L.
Polygala subspinosa S.Watson
Opuntia polyacantha var. nicholii (L.D.Benson) B.D.Parfitt
Eucalyptus polyanthemos subsp. vestita L.A.S.Johnson & K.D.Hill
Polygala heterorhyncha (Barneby) T.Wendt
Gilia filiformis Parry ex A.Gray
Opuntia cantabrigiensis Lynch
Thlaspi montanum L.
Cylindropuntia whipplei var. enodis (Peebles) Backeb.
Amaranthus L.
Astragalus nelsonianus Barneby
Lavandula stoechas L.
Micranthes aprica (Greene) Small
Cuscuta salina var. major Yunck.
Callistemon viminalis (Sol. ex Gaertn.) G.Don ex Loudon
Micranthes fragosa (Suksd.) Small
Cavendishia crassifolia (Benth.) Hemsl.
Micranthes Haw.
Mazus miquelii Makino
Paeonia californica Nutt.
Micranthes apetala (Piper) Small
Polygala acanthoclada A.Gray
Sannantha Peter G.Wilson
Colignonia scandens Benth.
Dermatophyllum arizonicum (S.Watson) Vincent
Waltheria americana L.
Opuntia basilaris var. heilii S.L.Welsh & Neese
Agastache Clayton ex Gronov.
Centaurea stoebe subsp. micrantha
Opuntia polyacantha var. trichophora (Engelm. & Bigelow) Coult.
Ericameria juarezensis (Moran) Urbatsch
Prunus fasciculata var. punctata Jeps.
Micranthes lyallii (Engl.) Small
Cotoneaster lacteus W.W.Sm.
Halleria lucida L.
Dracocephalum moldavicum C.Morren
Solanum aviculare G.Forst.
Penstemon scariosus Pennell
Macleania rupestris (Kunth) A.C.Sm.
Amsonia grandiflora Alexander
Leptochloa viscida (Scribn.) Beal
Logfia Cass.
Abutilon californicum Benth.
Lonicera L.
Lepidium draba var. chalepensis L.
Cyperus mutisii (Kunth) Andersson
Opuntia tortispina Engelm. & Bigelow
Globularia L.
Penstemon laetus subsp. laetus
Collomia grandiflora Douglas
Clerodendrum L.
Hydrangea febrifuga (Lour.) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Melaleuca pulchella R.Br.
Bowkeria verticillata (Eckl. & Zeyh.) Druce
Micranthes nelsoniana (D.Don) Small
Hebe Comm. ex Juss.
Eucalyptus L'Hér.
Clarkia lewisii P.H.Raven & D.R.Parn.
Dactyloctenium radulans (R.Br.) P.Beauv.
Ceanothus ophiochilus S.Boyd, T.S.Ross & Arnseth
Astragalus kentrophyta subsp. elatus (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Sidalcea diploscypha (Torr. & A.Gray) Gray ex Benth.
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. pulchellus (Greene) Kruckeb.
Oreocarya thompsonii (I.M.Johnst.) Abrams
Chylismia scapoidea Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Cleome viscosa L.
Senecio lyonii A.Gray ex Lyon
Terminalia buceras (L.) Wright
Pediomelum esculentum (Pursh) Rydb.
Fagopyrum esculentum Moench
Eriastrum harwoodii (T.T.Craig) D.Gowen
Plagiobothrys stipitatus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Echinocereus arizonicus subsp. oldachiorum W.Blum & P.B.Breslin
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa subsp. ramosa Backeb.
Phlox stansburyi subsp. stansburyi
Carrichtera annua (L.) DC.
Malpighia emarginata DC.
Mazus pumilus (Burm.fil.) Steenis
Penstemon leiophyllus var. keckii (Clokey) Holmgren
Setaria parviflora (Poir.) Kerguélen
Porophyllum ruderale (Jacq.) Cass.
Freesia laxa (Thunb.) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Chimaphila umbellata subsp. occidentalis (Rydb.) A.E.Murray
Forestiera macrocarpa Brandegee
Agave attenuata Salm-Dyck
Erica carnea L.
Oxytropis borealis var. viscida (Nutt.) S.L.Welsh
Gilia cana (M.E.Jones) A.Heller
Draba crassa Rydb.
Ericameria parryi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Limnanthes douglasii subsp. douglasii
Sporobolus foliosus (Trin.) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Cirsium scariosum var. loncholepis (Petr.) D.J.Keil
Echinocereus barthelowanus Britton & Rose
Trichophorum alpinum (L.) Pers.
Mucronea perfoliata (A.Gray) A.Heller
Cryptantha leiocarpa (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Greene
Argemone gracilenta Greene
Agnorhiza reticulata (Greene) W.A.Weber
Eriogonum latens Jeps.
Calystegia collina subsp. collina
Coptis trifolia (L.) Salisb.
Corymbia ficifolia (F.Muell.) K.D.Hill & L.A.S.Johnson
Arctostaphylos nummularia subsp. nummularia
Erysimum perenne (S.Watson ex Coville) Abrams
Erythranthe nudata (Curran ex Greene) G.L.Nesom
Acmispon Raf.
Echinocereus pacificus subsp. mombergerianus (G.Frank) Blum & Rutow
Packera paupercula (Michx.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Dudleya parva Rose & Davidson
Nothoscordum gracile (Aiton) Stearn
Chylismia brevipes subsp. brevipes
Astragalus bisulcatus (Hook.) A.Gray
Navarretia linearifolia (Howell) L.A.Johnson
Iberis sempervirens L.
Packera greenei (A.Gray) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Elmera racemosa var. racemosa
Sagina apetala Ard.
Chloropyron tecopense (Munz & J.C.Roos) Tank & J.M.Egger
Quercus garryana var. breweri (Engelm.) Jeps.
Dudleya abramsii subsp. calcicola (Bartel & Shevock) K.M.Nakai
Senna atomaria (L.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Leonotis nepetifolia (L.) R.Br.
Calochortus weedii var. peninsularis Ownbey
Castilleja ambigua var. insalutata (Jeps.) J.M.Egger
Eriogonum diatomaceum Reveal, J.Reynolds & Picciani
Ribes roezlii var. roezlii
Lathyrus odoratus L.
Cota tinctoria (L.) J.Gay
Atamisquea emarginata Miers
Rivina humilis L.
Eryngium lemmonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Echinopepon wrightii (Gray) S.Watson
Lycopus uniflorus Michx.
Andropogon glomeratus (Walter) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Brodiaea filifolia S.Watson
Rumex acetosa L.
Navarretia heterodoxa (Greene) Greene
Cylindropuntia bigelovii subsp. ciribe (Engelm. ex J.M.Coult.) U.Guzmán
Viola riviniana Rchb.
Lonicera caerulea var. cauriana (Fernald) Boivin
Limnanthes douglasii subsp. sulphurea (C.T.Mason) C.T.Mason
Boechera retrofracta (Graham) A.Löve & D.Löve
Vancouveria chrysantha Greene
Allium nevii S.Watson
Veratrum californicum var. caudatum (A.Heller) C.L.Hitchc.
Limnanthes floccosa subsp. floccosa
Lasthenia coronaria (Nutt.) Ornduff
Euphorbia virgata Noë ex Nyman, 1881
Senecio riddellii Torr. & A.Gray
Lotus bryantii (Brandegee) Ottley
Argemone munita subsp. argentea G.B.Ownbey
Sambucus racemosa subsp. pubens (Michaux) House
Limnanthes floccosa subsp. californica Arroyo
Cynara cardunculus subsp. scolymus (L.) Beger, 1928
Salvia microphylla Kunth
Hyptis albida Kunth
Zeltnera calycosa (Buckley) G.Mans.
Metastelma arizonicum A.Gray
Acacia retinodes Schltdl.
Potentilla hippiana var. hippiana
Navarretia fossalis Moran
Gentiana plurisetosa C.T.Mason
Euphorbia crenulata Engelm.
Geum aleppicum Jacq.
Perityle gilensis (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Cardiospermum tortuosum Benth.
Delphinium oreganum Howell
Dichanthelium lanuginosum (Elliott) Gould
Mammillaria pondii subsp. setispina (J.M.Coult.) D.R.Hunt
Cyrtocarpa edulis (Brandegee) Standl.
Festuca myuros Gouan, 1762
Xanthisma junceum (Greene) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Eriogonum tripodum Greene
Atriplex barclayana (Benth.) D.Dietr.
Sedum oregonense (S.Watson) M.Peck
Pectis multiseta var. ambigua (Fernald) Keil
Astragalus tyghensis M.Peck
Penstemon newberryi var. sonomensis (Greene) Jeps.
Opuntia orbiculata Salm-Dyck ex Pfeiff.
Condalia globosa var. pubescens I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum brevicaule var. mitophyllum (Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Hulsea californica A.Gray
Mertensia platyphylla A.Heller
Persicaria hydropiperoides (Michx.) Small
Lupinus albicaulis var. shastensis (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Trichostema austromontanum subsp. austromontanum
Castilleja nervata Eastw.
Castilleja peirsonii Eastw.
Luzula comosa var. laxa Buchenau
Agave parryi var. huachucensis (Baker) Little
Phaseolus acutifolius var. tenuifolius A.Gray
Astragalus humistratus var. sonorae (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Opuntia camanchica Engelm. & Bigelow
Senecio wootonii Greene
Trifolium barbigerum Torr.
Salvia mohavensis Greene
Baccharis thesioides Kunth
Achimenes mexicana (Seem.) Fritsch
Nymphaea alba L.
Sambucus racemosa subsp. racemosa
Andromeda polifolia L.
Cakile edentula subsp. edentula
Atriplex amnicola Paul G.Wilson
Lomatium quintuplex Schlessman & Constance
Bidens alba (L.) DC.
Odontarrhena muralis (Waldst. & Kit.) Endl.
Ribes malvaceum var. malvaceum
Oxalis suksdorfii Trel.
Deinandra pallida (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Agave azurea R.H.Webb & G.D.Starr
Castilleja rubicundula var. rubicundula
Draba breweri S.Watson
Opuntia gilvescens Griffiths
Salsola kali L.
Asclepias viridiflora Raf.
Castilleja minor var. exilis (A.Nelson) J.M.Egger
Deinandra frutescens (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Galium catalinense subsp. catalinense
Catalpa speciosa (Warder ex Barney) Warder ex Engelm.
Jacaranda mimosifolia D.Don
Bursera epinnata (Rose) Engl.
Rubus spectabilis var. spectabilis
Cornus mas L.
Johnstonella micromeres (A.Gray) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Astragalus tibetanus Benth. ex Bunge
Sisyrinchium rosulatum E.P.Bicknell
Acmispon denticulatus (Drew) D.D.Sokoloff
Lepidium latipes Hook.
Brickellia oblongifolia Nutt.
Claytonia nevadensis S.Watson
Lasthenia conjugens Greene
Silene salmonacea T.W.Nelson, J.P.Nelson & S.A.Erwin
Astragalus canadensis var. mortonii (Nutt.) S.Watson
Lathyrus vestitus var. ochropetalus (Piper) Isely
Eruca vesicaria (L.) Cav.
Erysimum teretifolium Eastw.
Cryptantha muricata var. jonesii (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Calliscirpus criniger (A.Gray) C.N.Gilmour, J.R.Starr & Naczi
Vitex pyramidata B.L.Rob.
Ceanothus dentatus Torr. & A.Gray
Allium robinsonii L.F.Hend.
Eriogonum heermannii var. occidentale S.Stokes
Dicentra formosa subsp. oregona (Eastw.) Munz
Acanthocereus rosei (J.G.Ortega) Lodé
Microseris douglasii (DC.) Sch.Bip.
Oreonana vestita (S.Watson) Jeps.
Luzula macrantha (S.Watson) Zika & B.L.Wilson
Lupinus latifolius subsp. parishii (C.P.Sm.) Kenny & D.B.Dunn
Lomatium caruifolium var. caruifolium
Galium parisiense L.
Matthiola parviflora (Schousb.) W.T.Aiton
Geranium potentilloides L'Hér. ex DC.
Castilleja exserta var. venusta (A.Heller) J.M.Egger
Carpenteria californica Torr.
Grusonia kunzei (Rose) Pinkava
Heterotheca Cass.
Chylismiella pterosperma (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Arctostaphylos mewukka Merriam
Penstemon barrettiae A.Gray
Oenothera primiveris subsp. primiveris
Hyacinthus orientalis L.
Lomatium gormanii (Howell) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Gilia cana subsp. speciosa (Jeps.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Malacothrix saxatilis var. tenuifolia (Nutt.) A.Gray
Corydalis heterocarpa Siebold & Zucc.
Pelargonium grossularioides (L.) L'Hér.
Orcuttia tenuis Hitchc.
Oxalis albicans Kunth
Astragalus cicer L.
Anemone cylindrica A.Gray
Tetrapteron graciliflorum (Hook. & Arn.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Askellia elegans (Hook.) W.A.Weber
Echinocereus lindsayorum J.Meyrán, 1975
Brassica oleracea var. capitata L.
Streptopus streptopoides (Ledeb.) Frye & Rigg
Deinandra greeneana var. peninsularis (Moran) B.L.Turner
Angelica genuflexa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. rubidum (Gand.) Reveal & Mansfield
Logfia minima (Sm.) Dumort.
Thysanocarpus curvipes subsp. eradiatus (Jeps.) P.J.Alexander & Windham
Trillium ovatum var. oettingeri (Munz & Thorne) Case
Ipomoea nil (L.) Roth
Euphorbia pondii Millsp.
Kyhosia bolanderi (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Astragalus pycnostachyus var. pycnostachyus
Betula nigra L.
Monardella macrantha subsp. macrantha
Eurybia glauca (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Eriogonum microtheca var. alpinum Reveal
Ceanothus thyrsiflorus var. griseus Trel.
Abronia pogonantha Heimerl
Lilium bolanderi S.Watson
Carex engelmannii L.H.Bailey
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. hebeclada (DC.) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Hibiscus biseptus S.Watson
Mammillaria brandegeei subsp. glareosa (Boed.) D.R.Hunt
Monardella australis Abrams
Eriogonum compositum var. lancifolium H.St.John & F.A.Warren
Peniocereus greggii subsp. greggii
Pedicularis rainierensis Pennell & Warren
Diplacus pictus (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Lepidium virginicum subsp. menziesii (DC.) Thell.
Hesperostipa comata subsp. intermedia (Scribn. & Tweedy) Barkworth
Arctostaphylos canescens Eastw.
Erythranthe purpurea (A.L.Grant) N.S.Fraga
Eriogonum arcuatum var. rupicola (Reveal) Reveal
Eremogone franklinii (Douglas ex Hook.) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Eriogonum umbellatum var. munzii Reveal
Cornus amomum Mill.
Ericameria discoidea (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Eriogonum nudum var. auriculatum (Benth.) J.P.Tracy ex Jeps.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. laciniata C.L.Hitchc.
Androsace elongata subsp. acuta (Greene) G.T.Robbins
Linanthus concinnus Milliken
Douglasia montana A.Gray
Solanum mauritianum Scop.
Cirsium douglasii var. breweri (A.Gray) D.J.Keil & C.E.Turner
Chylismia walkeri subsp. tortilis (Jeps.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Nemacladus tenuis (McVaugh) Morin
Osmorhiza purpurea (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Suksd.
Linanthus dichotomus subsp. pattersonii J.M.Porter
Pediomelum megalanthum (Wooton & Standl.) Rydb.
Ericameria cooperi var. cooperi
Anemone coronaria L.
Centromadia parryi (Greene) Greene
Platystemon californicus var. ciliatus Dunkle
Eriogonum nudum var. psychicola Reveal
Arnica L.
Iris orientalis Mill.
Amsinckia douglasiana A.DC.
Glinus lotoides L.
Glinus radiatus (Ruiz & Pav.) Rohrb.
Viburnum opulus var. opulus
Lepidium jaredii subsp. jaredii
Juncus saximontanus A.Nelson
Coryphantha robustispina subsp. robustispina
Carex deweyana var. deweyana
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. focarium Reveal & Mansfield
Aquilegia longissima A.Gray ex S.Watson
Abutilon xanti A.Gray
Veronica perfoliata (R.Br.)
Ranunculus acris var. acris
Delphinium viridescens Leiberg
Mentzelia aspera L.
Euphorbia californica Benth.
Ageratina altissima (L.) R.King & H.Rob.
Aloysia gratissima (Gillies & Hook.) Tronc.
Hastingsia serpentinicola Becking
Echinocereus bristolii subsp. floresii (Backeb.) W.Blum & Mich.Lange
Neoholmgrenia andina (Nutt.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Chimaphila maculata (L.) Pursh
Ambrosia camphorata (Greene) Payne
Isocoma menziesii var. sedoides (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Argemone L.
Quercus john-tuckeri Nixon & C.H.Müll.
Astragalus crassicarpus Nutt.
Ericameria fasciculata (Eastw.) J.F.Macbr.
Lomatium bradshawii (Rose ex Mathias) Mathias & Constance
Phaseolus parvulus Greene
Oryctes nevadensis S.Watson
Potentilla albiflora L.O.Williams
Arctostaphylos hookeri subsp. hookeri
Calochortus elegans var. elegans
Dudleya blochmaniae (Eastw.) Moran
Micropus californicus var. californicus
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. exilis (A.Gray) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Astragalus clevelandii Greene
Hieracium lachenalii Suter
Nemacaulis denudata Nutt.
Agave wocomahi Gentry
Oreonana clementis (M.E.Jones) Jeps.
Lessingia glandulifera var. tomentosa (Greene) Ferris
Centaurea macrocephala Muss.Puschk. ex Willd.
Momordica charantia L.
Phlox speciosa subsp. woodhousei (A.Gray) Wherry
Lewisiopsis tweedyi (A.Gray) Govaerts
Laguncularia racemosa (L.) C.F.Gaertn.
Ipomoea batatas (L.) Lam.
Silene douglasii var. rupinae Kephart & Sturgeon
Psilocarphus oregonus Nutt.
Brickellia betonicifolia A.Gray
Brickellia eupatorioides (L.) Shinners
Fumaria agraria Lag.
Chorizanthe stellulata Benth.
Lantana L.
Eryngium pendletonense K.L.Marsden & M.G.Simpson
Pyrrocoma liatriformis Greene
Boechera centrifendleri P.J.Alexander
Acmispon prostratus (Nutt.) Brouillet
Populus nigra var. italica (Moench) Koehne
Cardamine californica var. sinuata (Greene) O.E.Schulz
Erigeron aphanactis var. congestus (Greene) Cronquist
Ceanothus roderickii W.Knight
Eriogonum intrafractum Coville & Morton
Eriogonum panamintense Morton
Agave margaritae Brandegee
Calamagrostis ophitidis (J.T.Howell) Nygren
Epilobium anagallidifolium Lam.
Erythranthe decora (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Polygala myrtifolia L.
Rubus ulmifolius Schott
Dactyloctenium aegyptium (L.) Willd.
Draba aureola S.Watson
Ferocactus gracilis H.E.Gates
Tagetes erecta L.
Ribes acerifolium Howell
Malva occidentalis (S.Watson) M.F.Ray
Ribes roezlii var. cruentum (Greene) Rehder
Berberis pumila Greene
Monardella linoides subsp. linoides
Hazardia squarrosa var. grindelioides (DC.) W.D.Clark
Digitalis purpurea subsp. purpurea
Arctostaphylos crustacea subsp. subcordata (Eastw.) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Castilleja victoriae Fairbarns & J.M.Egger
Calibrachoa parviflora (Juss.) D' Arcy
Guazuma ulmifolia Lam.
Asarum wagneri K.L.Lu & Mesler
Mauranthemum paludosum (Poir.) Vogt & Oberpr.
Pittosporum tobira (Murray) Aiton fil.
Geranium yeoi Aedo & Muñoz Garm.
Lomatium parvifolium (Hook. & Arn.) Jeps.
Romulea rosea var. australis (Ewart) M.P.de Vos
Aphyllon epigalium Colwell & A.C.Schneid.
Acalypha phleoides Cav.
Cynara cardunculus subsp. flavescens Wiklund
Ceanothus integerrimus var. macrothyrsus (Torr.) G.T.Benson
Cylindropuntia alcahes subsp. burrageana (Britton & Rose) U.Guzmán
Salvia arizonica A.Gray
Aconitum columbianum var. howellii (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) C.L.Hitchc.
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. elongatum (Benth.) H.Mason
Harmonia nutans (Greene) B.G.Baldwin
Eriastrum sapphirinum subsp. sapphirinum
Machaeranthera tagetina Greene
Silene noctiflora L.
Acmispon micranthus (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Brouillet
Leptosiphon pygmaeus subsp. continentalis (P.H.Raven) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Leontodon saxatilis subsp. saxatilis
Froelichia arizonica Thornb. ex Standl.
Plantago ovata var. insularis (Eastw.) S.C.Meyers & Liston
Centromadia parryi subsp. congdonii (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) B.G.Baldwin
Claytonia peirsonii subsp. californacis Stoughton
Aristida purpurea var. parishii (Hitchc.) Allred
Allium marvinii Davidson
Cypripedium parviflorum var. exiliens Sheviak
Alchemilla australis (Rydb.) Bomble
Primula vulgaris Hill
Cascadia nuttallii A.M.Johnson
Trifolium gracilentum Torr. & A.Gray
Rhodiola rhodantha (A.Gray) Jacobsen
Phlox griseola Wherry
Aquilegia skinneri Hook.
Physalis neomexicana Rydb.
Calochortus clavatus var. clavatus
Aristida purpurea var. purpurea
Callaeum macropterum (DC.) D.M.Johnson
Bauhinia purpurea L.
Verbascum bombyciferum Boiss.
Campanula medium L.
Lathyrus jepsonii Greene
Deinandra increscens subsp. increscens
Prunus emarginata var. mollis (Douglas) Brewer
Cucurbita maxima Duchesne
Kumara plicatilis (L.) G.D.Rowley
Nemacladus capillaris Greene
Morus nigra L.
Lupinus polycarpus Greene
Anoda abutiloides Gray ex S.Watson
Viola flettii Piper
Potentilla argentea L.
Cyperus esculentus L.
Castilleja rupicola Piper ex Fernald
Dudleya multicaulis (Rose) Moran
Ericameria nauseosa var. mohavensis (Greene) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Picris hieracioides L.
Trifolium resupinatum L.
Diospyros lycioides Desf.
Lyonothamnus floribundus subsp. floribundus
Handroanthus impetiginosum (Mart. ex DC.) Mattos
Brunnera macrophylla (Adams) I.M.Johnst.
Vitex agnus-castus L.
Arctostaphylos montereyensis Hoover
Primula clevelandii var. insularis (H.J.Thomps.) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Agave utahensis var. nevadensis Engelm. ex Greenm. & Roush
Potentilla subviscosa Greene
Lasthenia glaberrima DC.
Erodium cicutarium subsp. cicutarium
Asclepias macrosperma Eastw.
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. secundus (Greene) Kruckeb.
Sisyrinchium elmeri Greene
Narthecium californicum Baker
Astragalus nuttallianus DC.
Moraea polystachya (Thunb.) Ker Gawl.
Cirsium eatonii var. eatonii
Lupinus pratensis A.Heller
Carex unilateralis Mack.
Triteleia ixioides subsp. unifolia L.W.Lenz
Cercis L.
Leptosiphon floribundus subsp. hallii (Jeps.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Toxicoscordion brevibracteatum (M.E.Jones) R.R.Gates
Horkeliella purpurascens (S.Watson) Rydb.
Chloropyron maritimum subsp. palustre (Behr) Tank & J.M.Egger
Galium serpenticum Dempster
Erysimum suffrutescens (Abrams) Rossbach
Carex aquatilis Wahlenb.
Diplacus parryi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Viburnum opulus var. americanum (Mill.) Aiton
Erigeron breweri var. ensenadensis G.L.Nesom
Ludwigia octovalvis (Jacq.) Raven
Bidens amplissima Greene
Echeveria chihuahuaensis Poelln.
Crocus tommasinianus Herb.
Ivesia shockleyi var. shockleyi
Stellaria borealis var. sitchana (Steud.) Fernald
Perityle inyoensis (Ferris) A.M.Powell
Bebbia atriplicifolia A.Gray
Monardella breweri A.Gray
Frasera pahutensis Reveal
Quercus jolonensis Sarg.
Manihot angustiloba (Torr.) Müll.Arg.
Eriogonum baileyi S.Watson
Sidalcea pedata A.Gray
Castilleja lineariloba (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Leucosyris coulteri (A.Gray) Pruski & R.L.Hartm.
Sclerocactus mesae-verdae (Boissev. & Davidson) L.D.Benson
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa var. coloradensis (L.D.Benson) Pinkava
Eucalyptus erythrocorys F.Muell.
Mammillaria standleyi (Britton & Rose) Orcutt
Cyperus seslerioides Kunth
Arctostaphylos osoensis P.V.Wells
Agastache breviflora (A.Gray) Epling
Hypericum mutilum L.
Diplacus rupicola (Coville & A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Pediocactus peeblesianus subsp. fickeiseniae (Backeb. ex Hochstätter) Lüthy
Raillardella scaposa (A.Gray) A.Gray
Xanthium strumarium subsp. canadense (Mill.) Torr. & A.Gray
Potamogeton zosteriformis Fernald
Bergenia crassifolia (L.) Fritsch
Geranium maderense Yeo
Isocoma menziesii var. decumbens (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Leptosiphon minimus (H.Mason) Battaglia
Astragalus argophyllus Nutt.
Prunus domestica L.
Grusonia robertsii Rebman
Quercus mcvaughii Spellenb.
Scheuchzeria palustris L.
Mucronea californica Benth.
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. amplissima Brummitt
Linanthus dichotomus subsp. dichotomus
Monardella hypoleuca subsp. intermedia A.C.Sanders & Elvin
Drymaria molluginea (Ser.) Didr.
Atriplex spinifera J.F.Macbr.
Eriogonum prattenianum var. prattenianum
Vitis riparia Michx.
Stipellula capensis (Thunb.) Röser & Hamasha
Lupinus tidestromii Greene
Eriophorum chamissonis C.A.Mey.
Eremothera boothii subsp. alyssoides (Hook. & Arn.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Pedicularis racemosa subsp. racemosa
Lepechinia ganderi Epling
Fouquieria burragei Rose
Hydrocotyle verticillata Thunb.
Euonymus occidentalis var. parishii (Trel.) Jeps.
Calochortus clavatus var. avius Jeps.
Geranium macrorrhizum L.
Clarkia amoena subsp. amoena
Caltha palustris var. radicans (T.F.Forst.) Beck
Cordylanthus kingii subsp. helleri (Ferris) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Calochortus palmeri var. munzii Ownbey
Ficus pertusa L.fil.
Oreocarya fulvocanescens (S.Watson) Greene
Diplacus layneae (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Hedosyne ambrosiifolia (A.Gray) Strother
Calyptridium arizonicum (J.T.Howell) M.G.Simpson, M.Silveira & Guilliams
Tripterocalyx carneus (Greene) L.A.Galloway
Rhamnus alaternus L.
Lomatium graveolens (S.Watson) Dorn & R.L.Hartm.
Cissus trifoliata (L.) L.
Plagiobothrys figuratus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Hypertelis umbellata (Forssk.) Thulin
Astragalus troglodytus S.Watson
Clarkia arcuata (Kellogg) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Ipomoea hederifolia L.
Cardamine bellidifolia L.
Triantha glutinosa (Michx.) Baker
Harmonia stebbinsii (T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson) B.G.Baldwin
Leptosiphon floribundus subsp. glaber (R.Patt.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Setaria adhaerens (Forssk.) Chiov.
Nicotiana tomentosa Ruiz & Pav.
Orthocarpus cuspidatus subsp. copelandii (Eastw.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Eriogonum heermannii var. sulcatum (S.Watson) Munz & Reveal
Stevia plummerae A.Gray
Vaccinium myrtillus L.
Eriogonum pondii Greene
Grevillea rosmarinifolia A.Cunn.
Petrorhagia nanteuilii (Burnat) P.W.Ball & Heywood
Astragalus castaneiformis S.Watson
Astragalus howellii A.Gray
Lappula occidentalis var. occidentalis
Bletia purpurata A.Rich. & Galeotti
Sicyosperma gracile A.Gray
Escobaria vivipara var. bisbeana (Orcutt) D.R.Hunt
Collomia debilis var. trifida Payson
Aphyllon californicum subsp. feudgei (Munz) A.C.Schneid.
Macroptilium atropurpureum (DC.) Urb.
Ipomopsis longiflora subsp. australis R.A.Fletcher & W.L.Wagner
Murraya paniculata (L.) Jacq.
Cirsium hookerianum Nutt.
Setaria palmifolia (J.Koenig) Stapf
Convolvulus tricolor L.
Encelia ventorum Brandegee
Prunus serrulata Lindl.
Paulownia tomentosa (Thunb.) Steud.
Cornus sanguinea L.
Sedum ×rubrotinctum R.T.Clausen
Lomatium macdougalii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Puccinellia nuttalliana (Schult.) Hitchc.
Heleochloa schoenoides (L.) Host ex Roem.
Cryptantha tumulosa (Payson) Payson
Romneya coulteri M.Parsons
Rydbergia grandiflora (Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray) Greene
Tanacetum nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Haplopappus acaulis (Nutt.) A.Gray
Haplopappus lanuginosus Clem. & E.G.Clem., 1914
Osmorhiza obtusa (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Fernald
Lomatium plummerae (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Pteryxia petraea (M.E.Jones) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Tetradymia tetrameris (S.F.Blake) Strother
Sphaeromeria potentilloides (A.Gray) A.Heller
Crepis occidentalis var. conjuncta Jeps.
Hemizonia corymbosa (DC.) Torr. & A.Gray
Hemizonia virgata A.Gray
Hemizonia obconica J.C.Clausen & D.D.Keck
Hemizonia heermannii Greene
Tanacetum camphoratum Less.
Lessingia hololeuca var. arachnoidea (Greene) J.T.Howell
Scleropoa rigida (L.) Griseb.
Gymnocladus dioicus (L.) K.Koch
Diplacus constrictus (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Aeonium haworthii Salm-Dyck ex Webb & Berthel.
Hibiscus lasiocarpos var. occidentalis A.Gray
Lantana hybrida Neubert
Ceanothus lemmonii Parry
Hymenoxys grandiflora (Torr. & A.Gray) K.F.Parker
Downingia bicornuta var. bicornuta
Carsonia sparsifolia (S.Watson) Greene
Pericallis ×hybrida B.Nord.
Lilaeopsis occidentalis J.M.Coult. & Rose
Carex echinata Murray
Anemone lithophila Rydb.
Madia subspicata D.D.Keck
Agave aurea Brandegee
Senecio neowebsteri S.F.Blake
Chaenomeles japonica (Thunb.) Lindl. ex Spach
Lamium L.
Krameria paucifolia (Rose) Rose
Ivesia sericoleuca (Rydb.) Rydb.
Ribes divaricatum var. pubiflorum Koehne
Rosa arkansana Port. & Coult.
Nemacladus tenuis var. tenuis
Salix nigra Marshall
Croton wigginsii L.C.Wheeler
Calochortus simulans (Hoover) Munz
Silene scouleri Hook.
Trillium petiolatum Pursh
Carex atrosquama Mack.
Rosa bridgesii Crép. ex Rydb.
Prunus armeniaca L.
Lupinus arcticus subsp. subalpinus (Piper & B.L.Rob.) D.B.Dunn
Arctostaphylos hookeri subsp. hearstiorum (Hoover & Roof) P.V.Wells
Peritoma arborea var. angustata (Parish) Iltis
Eriogonum corymbosum Benth.
Potentilla holmgrenii D.F.Murray & Elven
Euphorbia chaetocalyx (Boiss.) Tidestr.
Angelica dawsonii S.Watson
Mabrya acerifolia (Pennell) Elisens
Matelea pringlei (A.Gray) Woodson
Fragaria ×ananassa subsp. cuneifolia (Nutt. ex Howell) Staudt
Galearis rotundifolia (Banks ex Pursh) R.M.Bateman
Polygonum sawatchense subsp. sawatchense
Zizania aquatica L.
Oenothera californica subsp. californica
Enceliopsis covillei (A.Nelson) S.F.Blake
Lathyrus jepsonii subsp. californicus (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Eucephalus vialis Bradshaw
Carex barbarae Dewey
Luzula spicata (L.) DC.
Lupinus pusillus Pursh
Rauvolfia tetraphylla L.
Xylorhiza venusta (M.E.Jones) A.Heller
Atriplex longipes Drejer & Fr.
Hazardia Greene
Dudleya palmeri (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Senecio megacephalus Nutt.
Boechera johnstonii (Munz) Al-Shehbaz
Fragaria vesca subsp. bracteata (A.Heller) Staudt
Mimosa tricephala var. xanti (A.Gray) Chehaibar & R.Grether
Mammillaria hutchisoniana subsp. louisae (G.E.Linds.) D.R.Hunt
Passiflora arida (Mast. & Rose) Killip
Scilla luciliae (Boiss.) Speta
Penstemon parvulus (A.Gray) Krautter
Portulaca suffruticosa Wight
Guardiola platyphylla A.Gray
Circaea alpina subsp. pacifica (Asch. & Magnus) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Callitriche marginata Torr.
Carex hirta L.
Cylindropuntia thurberi subsp. thurberi
Dipsacus laciniatus L.
Hesperomecon linearis (Benth.) Greene
Abutilon malacum S.Watson
Dedeckera eurekensis Reveal & J.T.Howell
Ionactis caelestis P.J.Leary & G.L.Nesom
Streptanthus barbatus S.Watson
Camissoniopsis hirtella (Greene) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Solidago simplex Kunth
Acmispon maritimus var. maritimus
Linaria maroccana Hook.fil.
Petrophytum hendersonii (Canby) Rydb.
Potentilla glaucophylla var. glaucophylla
Monardella sinuata subsp. nigrescens Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Streptanthus callistus J.L.Morrison
Agave angustifolia var. angustifolia
Opuntia ×demissa Griffiths
Rupertia rigida (Parish) J.W.Grimes
Lupinus sericatus Kellogg
Dudleya stolonifera Moran
Xylothamia diffusa (Benth.) G.L.Nesom
Brodiaea minor (Benth.) S.Watson
Cylindropuntia californica var. californica
Lepidium chalepense L.
Triteleia hendersonii Greene
Photinia ×fraseri Dress
Trifolium pratense var. pratense
Stephanomeria occultata Wellard & J.W.Baker
Cuscuta pacifica var. papillata (Yunck.) Costea & M.A.R.Wright
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. patens (Hoover) S.J.De Groot
Lilium humboldtii subsp. humboldtii
Chorizanthe turbinata Wiggins
Houttuynia cordata Thunb.
Fumaria capreolata subsp. capreolata
Lomatium farinosum (Geyer) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Dalea bicolor var. bicolor
Cephalanthus occidentalis var. californicus Benth.
Veronica ×franciscana (Eastw.) Howell, Raven & Rubtzov
Astragalus mollissimus var. thompsoniae (S.Watson) Barneby
Primula clevelandii var. gracilis (Greene) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Castilleja septentrionalis Lindl.
Erysimum cheiri (L.) Crantz
Quercus pauciloba Rydb.
Schistophragma polystachya (Brandegee) B.L.Turner
Caltha biflora DC.
Coleataenia rigidula (Bosc ex Nees) LeBlond
Orthocarpus bracteosus Benth.
Eriophyllum lanatum var. achilleoides (DC.) Jeps.
Navarretia jepsonii V.L.Bailey
Rumex fueginus Phil.
Sidalcea nelsoniana Piper
Passiflora arizonica (Killip) D.H.Goldman
Plectocephalus rothrockii (Greenm.) D.J.N.Hind
Cirsium eatonii var. murdockii S.L.Welsh
Ceanothus oliganthus var. oliganthus
Horkelia truncata Rydb.
Scorzonera laciniata L.
Sairocarpus vexillocalyculatus subsp. vexillocalyculatus
Eriogonum luteolum var. luteolum
Brickellia desertorum Coville
Schoenus nigricans L.
Scutellaria bolanderi A.Gray
Najas marina L.
Salix drummondiana Barratt
Ludwigia repens Forst.
Ericameria nauseosa var. hololeuca (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Prunus americana Marshall
Koelreuteria elegans (Seem.) A.C.Sm.
Eriogonum luteolum var. caninum (Greene) Reveal
Nuphar variegata Engelm. ex Durand
Euphorbia thymifolia L.
Monardella undulata Benth.
Trifolium jokerstii Vincent & Rand.Morgan
Horkelia fusca Lindl.
Diplacus cascadensis G.L.Nesom
Astragalus monumentalis Barneby
Urtica gracilis Aiton
Senna villosa (Mill.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Monardella odoratissima subsp. discolor (Greene) Epling
Gonolobus arizonicus (Gray) Woodson
Condalia warnockii var. kearneyana M.C.Johnst.
Gentianopsis macrantha (D.Don ex G.Don) Iltis
Euphorbia ceroderma I.M.Johnst.
Washingtonia ×filibusta Hodel
Astragalus kelseyae B.L.Corbin
Hazardia cana (A.Gray) Greene
Claytonia serpenticola Stoughton
Argemone grandiflora Sweet
Salvia greatae Brandegee
Monardella mojavensis Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Ribes tortuosum Benth.
Euphorbia segetalis L.
Myrica hartwegii S.Watson
Cirsium occidentale var. lucianum D.J.Keil
Oxalis pilosa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Penstemon grinnellii var. scrophularioides (M.E.Jones) N.H.Holmgren
Euphorbia heterophylla L.
Eriogonum nudum var. nudum
Ranunculus sceleratus var. multifidus Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Cucurbita argyrosperma K.Koch
Arctostaphylos klamathensis S.W.Edwards, Keeler-Wolf & W.Knight
Atriplex coronata var. notatior Jeps.
Eryngium jepsonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Randia thurberi S.Watson
Galium ambiguum subsp. siskiyouense (Ferris) Dempster & Stebbins
Astragalus robbinsii (Oakes) A.Gray
Eriogonum douglasii var. douglasii
Chorizanthe orcuttiana Parry
Veratrum insolitum Jeps.
Clarkia biloba subsp. biloba
Physaria alpestris Suksd.
Penstemon stenophyllus A.Gray
Microseris douglasii subsp. platycarpha (A.Gray) K.L.Chambers
Eriastrum sapphirinum subsp. dasyanthum (Brand) Mason
Mitella trifida Graham
Eremothera pygmaea (Douglas) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Cusickiella quadricostata (Rollins) Rollins
Physaria spatulata (Rydb.) Grady & O'Kane
Packera eurycephala var. lewisrosei (J.T.Howell) J.F.Bain
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. adamsii (Munz) Munz
Pelargonium ×hybridum (L.) L'Hér.
Astragalus calycosus var. monophyllidius (Rydb.) Barneby
Iris hollandica H.R.Wehrh.
Comandra umbellata subsp. californica (Eastw. ex Rydb.) Piehl
Nelumbo lutea (Willd.) Pers.
Desmodium angustifolium (Kunth) DC.
Lewisia columbiana var. wallowensis C.L.Hitchc.
Harpagonella palmeri var. palmeri
Serjania palmeri S.Watson
Barbarea verna (Mill.) Asch.
Eriocapitella hupehensis (Lemoine) Christenh. & Byng
Pseudofumaria alba (Mill.) Lidén
Caulanthus major (M.E.Jones) Payson
Vaccinium corymbosum L.
Tephrosia vicioides Schltdl.
Hydrocotyle bonariensis Comm. ex Lam.
Veronica dissecta subsp. lanuginosa (Piper) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Castilleja gracillima Rydb.
Dionaea muscipula Ellis
Astragalus allochrous var. playanus (M.E.Jones) Isely
Eriogonum pyrolifolium var. pyrolifolium
Blepharizonia laxa Greene
Cladium californicum (S.Watson) O'Neill
Oxystylis lutea Torr. & Frém.
Euphorbia serrula Engelm.
Utricularia subulata L.
Malvastrum coromandelianum (L.) Garcke
Oenothera laciniata Hill
Penstemon cerrosensis Kellogg
Asarum lemmonii S.Watson
Stuckenia filiformis (Pers.) Börner
Galium murale (L.) All.
Palafoxia linearis (Cav.) Lag.
Cucumis sativus L.
Berberis harrisoniana Kearney & Peebles
Dudleya gatesii D.A.Johans.
Salix caprea L.
Ranunculus eschscholtzii var. trisectus (Eastw.) L.D.Benson
Helianthus bolanderi Gray
Bahiopsis chenopodina (Greene) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Platanthera leptopetala (Rydb.) R.M.Bateman
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana subsp. stanfordiana
Dysphania multifida (L.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Delphinium bakeri Ewan
Drymocallis convallaria Rydb.
Ipomopsis macrosiphon (Kearney & Peebles) V.E.Grant & Wilken
Cuscuta californica var. californica
Euphrosyne nevadensis (M.E.Jones) Panero
Anchusa arvensis Tausch, 1824
Githopsis diffusa A.Gray
Pentachaeta exilis subsp. aeolica Van Horn & Ornduff
Ferocactus emoryi subsp. rectispinus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Muilla S.Watson ex Benth.
Vachellia campechiana (Mill.) Seigler & Ebinger
Monardella robisonii Epling ex Munz
Lomatium marginatum var. marginatum
Acer ×freemanii A.E.Murray
Clinopodium mimuloides (Benth.) Kuntze
Ericameria palmeri var. palmeri
Veronica peregrina subsp. xalapensis (Kunth) Pennell
Arctostaphylos mewukka subsp. truei (W.Knight) P.V.Wells
Carex leptalea subsp. pacifica Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Dieteria bigelovii var. commixta (Greene) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Malacothamnus fasciculatus var. nesioticus (B.L.Rob.) Kearney
Vicia disperma DC.
Penstemon dasyphyllus A.Gray
Calystegia macounii (Greene) Brummitt
Dulichium arundinaceum var. arundinaceum
Calandrinia spectabilis Otto & A.Dietr.
Erythranthe pulsiferae (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Lupinus saxosus Howell
Gilia latiflora subsp. davyi (Milliken) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Caulanthus simulans Payson
Astragalus iodanthus S.Watson
Calochortus raichei Farwig & V.Girard
Horkelia parryi Greene
Phalaris paradoxa L.
Trillium albidum subsp. parviflorum (V.G.Soukup) K.L.Chambers & S.C.Meyers
Solanum L.
Montia diffusa (Nutt.) Greene
Cnidoscolus maculatus (Brandegee) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Hooveria purpurea var. reducta (Hoover) D.W.Taylor & D.J.Keil
Eriogonum umbellatum var. bahiiforme (Torr. & A.Gray) Jeps.
Nemacladus ramosissimus Nutt.
Triantha occidentalis subsp. brevistyla (C.L.Hitchc.) Packer
Oxalis articulata subsp. rubra (A.St.-Hil.) Lourteig
Penstemon eriantherus var. whitedii (Piper) A.Nelson
Opuntia cochenillifera Karst.
Teucrium glandulosum Kellogg
Solidago confinis A.Gray
Myosotis L.
Mertensia ciliata var. stomatechoides (Kellogg) Jeps.
Genista linifolia L.
Prunus padus L.
Rhus trilobata var. trilobata
Hesperidanthus jaegeri (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Campanula scabrella Engelm.
Pediocactus despainii Welsh & Goodrich
Cottsia californica (Benth.) W.R.Anderson & C.Davis
Schoenoplectiella mucronata (L.) J.Jung & H.K.Choi
Galium porrigens var. porrigens
Ribes oxyacanthoides L.
Syntrichopappus lemmonii A.Gray
Jamesia americana var. zionis N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Tetraneuris ivesiana Greene
Smelowskia ovalis var. congesta Rollins
Euphorbia vizcainensis Maya-Lastra & V.W.Steinm.
Astragalus panamintensis E.Sheld. ex Coult.
Graptopetalum rusbyi (Greene) Rose
Zeuxine strateumatica (L.) Schltr.
Diaperia verna (Raf.) Morefield
Euryops pectinatus (L.) Cass.
Sedum lanceolatum subsp. nesioticum (G.N.Jones) Clausen
Mentzelia pectinata Kellogg
Drymocallis pseudorupestris Rydb.
Arenaria lanuginosa (Michx.) Rohrb.
Abelia ×grandiflora (Rovelli ex André) Rehder
Artemisia furcata M.Bieb.
Cymopterus douglassii R.L.Hartm. & Constance
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. glabriuscula
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. glaucescens P.V.Wells
Allium burlewii Davidson
Galium parishii Hilend & J.T.Howell
Plagiobothrys canescens Benth.
Carex kobomugi Ohwi
Sibaropsis hammittii S.Boyd & T.S.Ross
Ehrharta longiflora Sm.
Sorbus scopulina var. cascadensis (G.N.Jones) C.L.Hitchc.
Stylocline sonorensis Wiggins
Typha glauca Godr.
Crocanthemum suffrutescens (B.Schreib.) Sorrie
Calotropis procera (Aiton) Aiton fil.
Pectis multiseta Benth.
Castilleja glandulifera Pennell
Grindelia nana Nutt.
Ceanothus pinetorum Coult.
Cotyledon orbiculata L.
Sisyrinchium cernuum (E.P.Bicknell) Kearney
Datura ferox L.
Navarretia filicaulis (Torr.) Greene
Austrocylindropuntia subulata (Engelm.) Backeb.
Cuscuta californica var. papillosa Yunck.
Penstemon patens (M.E.Jones) N.H.Holmgren
Centella asiatica (L.) Urb.
Rorippa subumbellata Rollins
Amauria brandegeeana (Rose) Rydb.
Stillingia paucidentata S.Watson
Armoracia rusticana P.Gaertn., B.Mey. & Scherb.
Brickellia atractyloides var. odontolepis (B.L.Rob.) Jeps.
Sedum radiatum subsp. radiatum
Silene scouleri subsp. scouleri
Erigeron aliceae Howell
Cirsium occidentale var. candidissimum (Greene) J.F.Macbr.
Lathyrus holochlorus (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Eschscholzia minutiflora subsp. minutiflora
Coreocarpus arizonicus (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Sphagneticola trilobata (L.) Pruski
Justicia spicigera Schltdl.
Stachys arvensis (L.) L.
Crepis runcinata (James) Torr. & A.Gray
Cymopterus terebinthinus var. californicus (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Jeps.
Carex subnigricans Stacey
Asclepias nummularia Torr.
Eriogonum microtheca var. ambiguum (M.E.Jones) Reveal
Indigofera jamaicensis Spreng.
Pentachaeta aurea Nutt.
Sideroxylon lanuginosum Michx.
Cylindropuntia calmalliana (Coult.) F.M.Knuth
Pachysandra terminalis Siebold & Zucc.
Lupinus neomexicanus Greene
Draba asprella Greene
Psidium guajava L.
Phlox muscoides Nutt.
Caulanthus hallii Payson
Eriastrum pluriflorum subsp. pluriflorum
Malacothrix foliosa subsp. foliosa
Heuchera parishii Rydb.
Atriplex saccaria S.Watson
Eriastrum abramsii (Elmer) Mason
Frasera puberulenta Davidson
Arbutus xalapensis Kunth
Thermopsis gracilis Howell
Opuntia basilaris var. treleasei (Coult.) Toumey
Fraxinus excelsior L.
Bletia meridana (Rchb.f.) Garay & Dunst.
Coursetia caribaea (Jacq.) Lavin
Silene serpentinicola T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Senna occidentalis (L.) Link
Eriogonum crocatum Davidson
Ribes malvaceum var. viridifolium Abrams
Senna purpusii (Brandegee) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Artemisia albicans Sòn.Garcia, Garnatje, Mc Arthur, Pellicer, S.C.Sand. & Vallès-Xirau
Eriogonum rosense Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Adelia brandegeei V.W.Steinm.
Chylismia claviformis subsp. funerea (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Lappula occidentalis var. cupulata (A.Gray) Higgins
Cenchrus clandestinus (Hochst. ex Chiov.) Morrone
Schistophragma intermedium (A.Gray) Pennell
Spergularia canadensis var. occidentalis R.Rossbach
Kalanchoe delagoensis Eckl. & Zeyh.
Persea americana Mill.
Diplacus graniticola Schoenig
Viola sororia Willd.
Pseudognaphalium thermale (E.Nelson) G.L.Nesom
Galium cliftonsmithii (Dempster) Dempster & Stebbins
Petalonyx linearis Greene
Mimosa grahamii A.Gray
Eriogonum soliceps Reveal & Björk
Delphinium hutchinsoniae Ewan
Euphorbia jaegeri V.W.Steinm. & J.M.André
Senecio clarkianus A.Gray
Helictochloa hookeri (Scribn.) Romero Zarco
Calyptridium Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Eschscholzia lemmonii Greene
Frangula californica subsp. occidentalis (Howell) Kartesz & Gandhi
Peritoma platycarpa (Torr.) Iltis
Hypericum canariense L.
Gentiana asclepiadea L.
Eryngium castrense Jeps.
Primula pauciflora var. cusickii (Greene) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Stellaria media subsp. media
Eriogonum nortonii Greene
Oenothera primiveris subsp. bufonis (M.E.Jones) Munz
Cucurbita L.
Mammillaria wrightii Engelm.
Physaria A.Gray
Chylismia walkeri subsp. walkeri
Mentha aquatica L.
Dimorphocarpa pinnatifida Rollins
Eremocarya micrantha var. pseudolepida M.G.Simpson, L.M.Simpson & Rebman
Ivesia kingii var. eremica (Coville) Ertter
Veronica californica M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Mammillaria barbata Engelm.
Agave parryi subsp. parryi
Galium porrigens var. tenue (Dempster) Dempster
Opuntia woodsii Backeb.
Rosa chinensis Jacq.
Abutilon parishii S.Watson
Agoseris apargioides var. apargioides
Atriplex elegans var. fasciculata (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Ferocactus santa-maria Britton & Rose
Astragalus umbraticus E.Sheld.
Aliciella triodon (Eastw.) Brand
Streptanthus morrisonii subsp. morrisonii
Lupinus microcarpus var. horizontalis (A.Heller) Jeps.
Sidalcea cusickii Piper
Lasthenia ferrisiae Ornduff
Delphinium patens subsp. montanum (Munz) Ewan
Brahea armata S.Watson
Beta vulgaris subsp. maritima (L.) Thell.
Senecio linearifolius var. linearifolius
Zea mays subsp. mays
Stipa miliacea (L.) Hoover
Fallopia dumetorum (L.) Holub
Carex circinata C.A.Mey.
Elatine ambigua Wight
Hieracium cynoglossoides Arv.-Touv.
Nemacladus longiflorus var. breviflorus McVaugh
Fremontodendron californicum subsp. californicum
Anagallis minima (L.) E.H.L.Krause
Lupinus formosus var. robustus C.P.Sm.
Guadua amplexifolia J.Presl
Chamerion angustifolium subsp. circumvagum (Mosquin) Hoch
Trientalis borealis Raf.
Fremontodendron mexicanum Davidson
Hordeum vulgare var. trifurcatum (Schltdl.) Alef.
Clarkia purpurea subsp. viminea (Douglas) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Cyperus owanii Boeckeler
Juncus bufonius var. bufonius
Bromus pseudolaevipes Wagnon
Plantago rhodosperma Decne.
Rytidosperma caespitosum (Gaudich.) Connor & Edgar
Luzula multiflora subsp. multiflora
Stipa ×bloomeri Bol.
Rhipidocladum racemiflorum (Steud.) McClure
Crataegus laevigata (Poir.) DC.
Gamochaeta pensylvanica (Willd.) Cabrera
Eriogonum parishii S.Watson
Antirrhinum nuttallianum subsp. nuttallianum
Piperia unalascensis (Spreng.) Rydb.
Glyceria leptostachya Buckley
Campanula uniflora L.
Lactuca canadensis L.
Solidago mollis Bartl.
Symphytum asperum Lepech.
Ribes laxiflorum Pursh
Ribes amarum Mc Clatchie
Crataegus macracantha var. occidentalis (Britton) Eggl.
Alnus viridis (Chaix) DC.
Parietaria hespera var. californica Hinton
Amaranthus californicus (Moq.) S.Watson
Ruppia cirrhosa (Petagna) Grande
Juglans ailanthifolia Carrière
Echinocactus polycephalus subsp. polycephalus
Antirrhinum kelloggii Greene
Elodea nuttallii (Planch.) H.St.John
Ditaxis serrata var. californica (Brandegee) Steinm. & Felger
Avena sativa L.
Ceanothus cuneatus subsp. cuneatus
Cotoneaster dammeri C.K.Schneid.
Symphyotrichum ×columbianum (Piper) G.L.Nesom
Polygonum parryi Greene
Paspalum urvillei Steud.
Leymus vancouverensis (Macoun ex Vasey) Pilg.
Spartina townsendii H.Groves & J.Groves
Dodecatheon L.
Crassula aquatica (L.) Schönl.
Hypopitys monotropa Crantz
Thymophylla pentachaeta var. belenidium (DC.) Strother
Lathyrus vestitus var. alefeldii (T.G.White) Isely
Lonicera dioica L.
Eleocharis parvula (Roem. & Schult.) Link ex Bluff, Nees & Schauer
Bromus grandis (Shear) Hitchc.
Crataegus phippsii O'Kennon
Aeonium arboreum subsp. arboreum
Lathyrus hirsutus L.
Aloe schoenlandii Baker
Eupatorium cannabinum L.
Aphanes occidentalis (Nutt.) Rydb.
Kallstroemia peninsularis D.M.Porter
Dolichos L.
Linanthus orcuttii (Parry & Gray) Jeps.
Atriplex glauca L.
Rorippa indica (L.) Hiern
Cyperus rotundus L.
Anthriscus cerefolium (L.) Hoffm.
Juncus supiniformis Engelm.
Myriophyllum quitense Kunth
Vicia lathyroides L.
Arnica lanceolata Nutt.
Acmispon niveus (S.Watson) Brouillet
Cicuta maculata var. maculata
Fargesia nitida (Mitford) Keng f. ex T.P.Yi
Dichanthelium acuminatum (Sw.) Gould & C.A.Clark
Petrorhagia prolifera (L.) P.W.Ball & Heywood
Prunus munsoniana W.Wight & Hedrick
Minuartia douglasii (Fenzl ex Torr. & A.Gray) Mattf.
Plagiobothrys collinus var. gracilis (I.M.Johnst.) Higgins
Erigeron grandiflorus Hook.
Torreyochloa pallida (Torr.) Church
Carex distans L.
Heuchera duranii Bacig.
Carex sylvatica Huds.
Ipomopsis minutiflora (Benth.) V.E.Grant
Bromus vulgaris (Hook.) Shear
Bromus carinatus var. carinatus
Elymus canadensis subsp. canadensis
Cardamine pulcherrima Greene
Erysimum arenicola S.Watson
Coronopus didymus (L.) Sm.
Lupinus polyphyllus var. pallidipes (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Glehnia leiocarpa Mathias
Plagiobothrys tener (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Boechera macounii (S.Watson) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Centaurea paniculata L.
Cerastium beeringianum var. beeringianum
Arenaria serpyllifolia var. serpyllifolia
Triphysaria Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Nuphar lutea subsp. polysepala (Engelm.) E.O.Beal
Gilia aggregata (Pursh) Spreng.
Poa confinis Vasey
Arrhenatherum elatius subsp. elatius
Carex cusickii Mackenzie ex Piper & Beattie
Arrhenatherum elatior (L.) P.Beauv. ex J. & C.Presl
Calamagrostis canadensis var. langsdorffii (Link) Inman
Arabidopsis glauca (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Rydb.
Carex pauciflora Lightf.
Draba ruaxes Payson & H.St.John
Sagina maxima subsp. maxima
Lepidium bourgeauanum Thell.
Delphinium menziesii var. menziesii
Potentilla egedei Wormsk.
Agropyron cristatum subsp. pectinatum (M.Bieb.) Tzvelev
Hieracium aurantiacum L.
Stipa nelsonii subsp. dorei Barkworth & J.R.Maze
Linanthus septentrionalis Mason
Arabis eschscholtziana Andrz.
Danthonia spicata (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Camelina sativa (L.) Crantz
Lupinus densiflorus var. scopulorum C.P.Sm.
Carex capitata L.
Agrostis exarata var. monolepis (Torr.) Hitchc.
Cardamine pratensis L.
Elymus alaskanus subsp. latiglumis (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Á.Löve
Carex aenea Fernald
Hierochloe odorata (L.) P.Beauv.
Agrostis tenuis Sibth.
Danthonia californica var. americana (Scribn.) Hitchc.
Arabis kamchatica (Fisch. ex DC.) Ledeb.
Leptodactylon pungens (Torr.) Nutt.
Polemonium L.
Hackelia diffusa (Douglas ex Lehm.) I.M.Johnst.
Erigeron philadelphicus var. glaber J.K.Henry
Microseris bigelovii (A.Gray) Sch.Bip.
Torreyochloa pauciflora (J.Presl) Church
Lathyrus littoralis (Nutt.) Endl.
Cardaria pubescens var. elongata Rollins
Vaccinium uliginosum subsp. occidentale (A.Gray) Hultén
Agrostis aequivalvis (Trin.) Trin.
Trisetum canescens Buckley
Mentzelia laevicaulis var. parviflora (Douglas ex Hook.) C.L.Hitchc.
Triteleia howellii (S.Watson) Greene
Boechera pauciflora (Nutt.) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Piperia elegans (Lindl.) Rydb.
Aster curtus Cronquist
Dichanthelium acuminatum var. fasciculatum (Torr.) Freckmann
Hackelia deflexa var. americana (A.Gray) Fernald & I.M.Johnst.
Trisetum spicatum subsp. molle (Kunth) Hultén
Artemisia lindleyana Besser
Quercus garryana Douglas
Ranunculus flammula subsp. reptans (L.) Syme
Cassiope mertensiana subsp. mertensiana
Piperia transversa Suksd.
Salix fluviatilis Nutt.
Suksdorfia violacea A.Gray
Salix exigua var. sessilifolia (Nutt.) Dorn
Moenchia erecta (L.) G.Gaertn., G.Mey. & Scherb.
Minuartia tenella (Nutt.) Mattf.
Scolochloa festucacea (Willd.) Link
Stipa comata Trin. & Rupr.
Juncus alpinoarticulatus Chaix
Ranunculus uncinatus var. parviflorus (Torr.) L.D.Benson
Mimulus alsinoides Douglas ex Benth.
Hieracium scouleri var. albertinum (Farr) G.W.Douglas & G.A.Allen
Boechera calderi (G.A.Mulligan) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Elymus hirsutus J.Presl
Carex lasiocarpa Ehrh.
Carex lenticularis var. lipocarpa (Holm) L.A.Standl.
Chenopodium rubrum L.
Boechera lemmonii (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Taraxacum brachyglossum (Dahlst.) Dahlst.
Saxifraga tridactylites L.
Cochlearia groenlandica L.
Salix exigua subsp. interior (Rowlee) Cronquist
Phalaris arundinacea var. picta L.
Smelowskia calycina (Stephan) C.A.Mey.
Poa arctica subsp. arctica
Dodecatheon pulchellum subsp. cusickii (Greene) Calder & Taylor
Aristida longiseta Steud.
Koeleria cristata Pers.
Minuartia austromontana S.J.Wolf & Packer
Deschampsia atropurpurea (Wahlenb.) Scheele
Boechera divaricarpa (A.Nelson) A.Löve & D.Löve
Stipa richardsonii Link
Boechera collinsii (Fernald) A.Löve & D.Löve
Minuartia L.
Lepidium virginicum var. menziesii (DC.) C.L.Hitchc.
Poa canbyi (Scribn.) Howell
Agrostis thurberiana Hitchc.
Festuca saximontana var. purpusiana (St.-Yves) Fred. & Pavlick
Cardamine oligosperma var. oligosperma
Poa pratensis subsp. irrigata (Lindm.) H.Lindb.
Juncus dudleyi Wiegand
Sanguisorba occidentalis Nutt.
Rorippa islandica var. occidentalis (S.Watson) Butters & Abbe
Trisetum spicatum subsp. spicatum
Myriophyllum L.
Puccinellia pumila (Macoun ex Vasey) Hitchc.
Epilobium lactiflorum Hausskn.
Agrostis exarata subsp. minor (Hook.) C.L.Hitchc.
Sagina maxima subsp. crassicaulis (S.Watson) G.E.Crow
Kalmia microphylla subsp. occidentalis (Small) R.L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Grindelia stricta var. stricta
Poa pratensis subsp. alpigena (Lindm.) Hiitonen
Poa marcida Hitchc.
Poa gracillima Vasey
Aquilegia olympica Boiss.
Carex retrorsa Schwein.
Myriophyllum hippuroides Nutt.
Myriophyllum sibiricum Kom.
Loiseleuria procumbens (L.) Desv.
Carex gynocrates Wormsk. ex Drejer
Calamagrostis sesquiflora (Trinius) Kawano
Ranunculus cooleyae Vasey & Rose
Bromus pacificus Shear
Atriplex micrantha C.A.Mey.
Harrimanella stelleriana (Pall.) Coville
Cassiope lycopodioides (Pall.) D.Don
Festuca rubra subsp. arenaria (Osbeck) Syme, 1872
Bromus carinatus var. marginatus (Nees ex Steud.) Barkworth & Anderton
Festuca rubra subsp. arenicola E.B.Alexeev
Draba Dill. ex L.
Luzula spicata subsp. spicata
Delphinium nuttallianum var. fulvum C.L.Hitchc.
Draba lonchocarpa var. lonchocarpa
Astragalus miser var. serotinus (A.Gray ex E.Cooper) Barneby
Polygonum amphibium L.
Calamagrostis stricta subsp. inexpansa (A.Gray) C.W.Greene
Bromus polyanthus Scribn.
Festuca scabrella Torrey
Ranunculus subrigidus Drew
Peplis portula L.
Eleocharis parvula var. parvula
Elymus spicatus (Pursh) Gould
Agrostis exarata var. exarata
Poa sandbergii Vasey
Stipa curtiseta (Hitchc.) Barkworth
Pedicularis ornithorhyncha Benth.
Saxifraga caespitosa L.
Agoseris lackschewitzii D.M.Hend. & R.K.Moseley
Epilobium latifolium L.
Centunculus minimus L.
Sedum integrifolium subsp. integrifolium
Juncus oreganus S.Watson
Aruncus sylvester Kostel.
Myriophyllum farwellii Morong
Luzula multiflora (Retz.) Lej.
Cerastium L.
Halimolobos whitedii (Piper) Rollins
Carex stylosa C.A.Mey.
Spiraea densiflora Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Zigadenus venenosus var. gramineus (Rydb.) O.S.Walsh ex M.Peck
Koeleria nitida Nutt.
Boechera pendulocarpa (A.Nelson) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Potamogeton alpinus Balb.
Phyllodoce ×intermedia (Hook.) Rydb.
Vicia sativa var. angustifolia Wahlenb.
Lathyrus palustris L.
Aster stenomeres A.Gray
Sanguisorba officinalis L.
Saxifraga rufidula (Small) Macoun
Myosotis palustris (L.) L.
Madia madioides (Nutt.) Greene
Sanguisorba canadensis subsp. latifolia (Hook.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Dichanthelium oligosanthes var. scribnerianum (Nash) Gould
Viola howellii A.Gray
Lonicera involucrata var. involucrata
Festuca arundinacea Schreb.
Centaurea ×moncktonii Britton
Linaria canadensis var. texana (Scheele) Pennell
Astragalus tenellus Pursh
Veronica beccabunga subsp. americana (Raf.) Sellers
Carex macloviana d'Urv.
Luzula hitchcockii Hämet-Ahti
Petasites L.
Sedum oreganum Nutt.
Arnica amplexicaulis Nutt.
Saxifraga austromontana Wiegand
Anaphalis margaritacea (L.) Benth. ex C.B.Clarke
Potentilla gracilis var. flabelliformis (Lehm.) Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Lupinus lyallii A.Gray
Polygonum buxiforme Small
Sparganium minimum (L.) Fr.
Oxycoccus oxycoccos (L.) MacMill.
Saxifraga L.
Montia parvifolia var. flagellaris (Bong.) C.L.Hitchc.
Potentilla villosula Jurtzev
Dodecatheon dentatum Hook.
Fragaria L.
Boechera grahamii (Lehm.) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Stellaria crassifolia Ehrh.
Lilium columbianum hort.
Erigeron subtrinervis Rydb. ex Porter & Britton
Astragalus purshii Hook.
Rhinanthus L.
Pectiantia pentandra (Hook.) Rydb.
Draba aurea M.Vahl
Astragalus aboriginum Richardson
Polygonum douglasii subsp. douglasii
Stipa lemmonii (Vasey) Scribn.
Veronica wormskjoldii var. wormskjoldii
Plantago elongata Pursh
Ceanothus velutinus var. hookeri M.C.Johnst.
Lathyrus nevadensis var. nevadensis
Poa scabrella (Thurb.) Benth.
Agrostis scabra var. geminata (Trin.) Swallen
Physostegia parviflora Nutt. ex A.Gray
Gentiana amarella L.
Arabidopsis lyrata subsp. kamchatica (Fisch. ex DC.) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Carex sitchensis J.D.Prescott ex Bong.
Muhlenbergia glomerata (Willd.) Trin.
Rotala ramosior (L.) Koehne
Phlox diffusa subsp. longistylis Wherry
Polemonium caeruleum subsp. villosum (Rudolph ex Georgi) Brand
Luzula multiflora subsp. comosa (E.Mey.) Hultén
Ligusticum calderi Mathias & Constance
Cirsium arvense var. horridum Wimm. & Grab.
Petroselinum crispum (Mill.) A.W.Hill
Cassiope mertensiana var. mertensiana
Orobanche fasciculata var. fasciculata
Elymus mollis Trin.
Draba macounii O.E.Schulz
Rumex crispus x obtusifolius
Lobelia kalmii L.
Sphenopholis intermedia (Rydb.) Rydb.
Oryzopsis exigua Thurb.
Elymus glaucus subsp. virescens (Piper) Gould
Epilobium glaberrimum subsp. fastigiatum (Nutt.) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Carex atherodes Spreng.
Sparganium natans L.
Polygonum lapathifolium L.
Aster engelmannii (D.C.Eaton) A.Gray
Cicer arietinum L.
Hippuris montana Ledeb.
Senecio pauperculus Michx.
Senecio moresbiensis (Calder & Taylor) Douglas & Ruyle-Dougl.
Luzula arcuata (Wahlenb.) Sw.
Disporum smithii (Hook.) Piper
Dryas octopetala L.
Potamogeton pusillus L.
Atriplex L.
Chimaphila umbellata subsp. occidentalis (Rydb.) Hultén
Polygonum persicaria L.
Panicum ciliare Retz.
Boechera polyantha (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Sagittaria latifolia var. latifolia
Potamogeton amplifolius Tuck.
Potamogeton vaginatus Turcz.
Ludwigia palustris (L.) Elliott
Potamogeton friesii Rupr.
Carex scopulorum var. bracteosa (L.H.Bailey) F.J.Herm.
Potamogeton illinoensis Morong
Potamogeton obtusifolius Mert. & W.D.J.Koch
Carex sychnocephala J.Carey
Sparganium angustifolium subsp. emersum (Rehmann) Brayshaw
Montia perfoliata (Donn ex Willd.) Howell
Stellaria sitchana Steud.
Plantago maritima subsp. juncoides (Lam.) Hultén
Cardamine occidentalis (S.Watson) T.J.Howell
Cerastium fontanum subsp. triviale (E.H.L.Krause) Jalas
Alisma L.
Megalodonta beckii (Torr. ex Spreng.) Greene
Luzula comosa var. comosa
Subularia aquatica L.
Myriophyllum ussuriense (Regel) Maxim.
Allium schoenoprasum var. sibiricum (L.) Hartm.
Potamogeton strictifolius A.Benn.
Lobelia dortmanna L.
Bromus racemosus L.
Callitriche L.
Ceratophyllum echinatum A.Gray
Malva rotundifolia L.
Sparganium fluctuans (Engelm.) B.L.Rob.
Heteranthera dubia (Jacq.) MacMill.
Polygonum polygaloides subsp. confertiflorum (Nutt. ex Piper) J.C.Hickman
Lycopus europaeus L.
Myriophyllum pinnatum (Walter) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Anemone patens L.
Vaccinium alaskaense Howell
Carex physocarpa J.Presl & C.Presl
Carex phyllomanica W.Boott
Carex hindsii C.B.Clarke
Eriophorum virginicum L.
Helenium autumnale var. grandiflorum (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Pascopyrum smithii (Rydb.) Á.Löve
Chenopodium hybridum L.
Chenopodium desiccatum A.Nelson
Ranunculus ficaria subsp. ficaria
Eriophorum L.
Cerastium holosteoides Fr.
Gnaphalium purpureum L.
Conyza canadensis (L.) Cronquist
Thelypodium laciniatum var. laciniatum
Erythranthe inodora (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Stipa nelsonii Scribn.
Polygonum minus Huds.
Cerastium semidecandrum L.
Brodiaea hyacinthina (Lindl.) Baker
Listera cordata (L.) R.Br.
Platanthera hyperborea (L.) Lindl.
Coeloglossum viride (L.) Hartm.
Luzula piperi (Coville) M.E.Jones
Cassiope tetragona (L.) D.Don
Polygonum fagopyrum L.
Carex ablata L.H.Bailey
Juncus bulbosus L.
Anemone lyallii Britton
Phlox gracilis (Douglas ex Hook.) Greene
Puccinellia nutkaensis (J.Presl) Fernald & Weath.
Carex lenticularis Michx.
Saxifraga nelsoniana D.Don
Montia sibirica (L.) Howell
Taraxacum laevigatum (Willd.) DC.
Linaria texana Scheele
Lactuca tatarica subsp. pulchella (Pursh) Stebbins
Veronica verna L.
Pyrola asarifolia var. purpurea (Bunge) Fernald
Lasthenia maritima (A.Gray) M.C.Vasey & Madroño.
Prenanthes alata (Hook.) D.Dietr.
Anchusa azurea Mill.
Carex saxatilis subsp. laxa (Trautv.) Kalela
Carex canescens subsp. canescens
Crataegus castlegarensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Neslia paniculata (L.) Desv.
Senecio pauciflorus Pursh
Polygonum nuttallii Small
Elatine triandra Schkuhr
Erigeron humilis Graham
Thinopyrum ponticum (Podpěra) Z.W.Liu & R.R.-C.Wang
Crataegus macracantha Lodd. ex Loudon
Sisyrinchium angustifolium Mill.
Viola canadensis var. rugulosa (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Artemisia borealis Pall.
Polygonum hydropiper L.
Meconella oregana Nutt.
Arnica angustifolia Vahl
Aster ×lanceolatus Willd.
Sorbus sitchensis var. grayi (Wenz.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lappula Moench
Navarretia propinqua Suksd.
Saxifraga lyallii var. hultenii Calder & Savile
Festuca subuliflora Scribn.
Ranunculus reptans L.
Potamogeton berchtoldii Fieber
Agropyron smithii Rydb.
Artemisia ludoviciana var. latiloba Nutt.
Potamogeton praelongus Wulfen
Carex deweyana Schwein.
Spartina anglica C.E.Hubb.
Salix planifolia Pursh
Carex podocarpa R.Br.
Sagina decumbens subsp. occidentalis (S.Watson) G.E.Crow
Linaria genistifolia (L.) Mill.
Achnatherum occidentale subsp. pubescens (Vasey) Barkworth
Chionodoxa sardensis Drude
Salix barclayi Andersson
Utricularia macrorhiza Le Conte
Utricularia intermedia
Epilobium ciliatum subsp. glandulosum (Lehm.) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Poa grayana Vasey
Senecio cymbalarioides H.Buek
Ribes howellii Greene
Senecio jacobaea L.
Lactuca muralis (L.) Fresen.
Chenopodium album subsp. album
Spergularia salina J. & K.Presl
Achnatherum lemmonii var. lemmonii
Smilacina stellata (L.) Desf.
Brodiaea coronaria (Salisb.) Engl.
Lathyrus ochroleucus Hook.
Helianthus angustifolius L.
Symphoricarpos albus (L.) S.F.Blake
Aster alpinus L.
Rosa woodsii subsp. ultramontana (S.Watson) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Poa glauca subsp. rupicola (Nash) W.A.Weber
Hypericum scouleri subsp. nortoniae (M.E.Jones) J.M.Gillett
Alopecurus carolinianus Walter
Comandra umbellata subsp. umbellata
Petasites fragrans (Vill.) C.Presl
Aristida longiseta var. robusta Merr.
Platanthera elegans subsp. maritima (Rydb.) R.M.Bateman
Eleocharis ovata (Roth) Roem. & Schult.
Festuca idahoensis var. roemeri Pavlick
Poa leptocoma var. leptocoma
Epilobium foliosum (Torr. & A.Gray) Suksd.
Wolffia borealis (Engelm.) Landolt
Subularia aquatica subsp. americana G.A.Mulligan & Calder
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. watsonii (Tidestr.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lupinus sulphureus subsp. kincaidii (C.P.Sm.) L.Ll.Phillips
Agrostis humilis Vasey
Brassica campestris L.
Leymus innovatus (Beal) Pilg.
Festuca idahoensis var. idahoensis
Anthoxanthum odoratum var. puelii (Lecoq & Lamotte) Coss. & Durieu
Cardamine breweri var. orbicularis (Greene) Detling
Sisymbrium officinale var. leiocarpum DC.
Sanicula bipinnatifida Douglas ex Hooker
Helianthus maximiliani Schrad.
Artemisia tilesii subsp. unalaschcensis (Besser) Hultén
Populus tremuloides var. vancouveriana (Trel.) Sarg.
Barbarea vulgaris var. arcuata (Opiz) Fr.
Festuca rubra var. mediana Pavlick
Bromus tectorum var. tectorum
Aster chilensis Nees
Honckenya peploides subsp. major (Hook.) Hultén
Polemonium viscosum var. viscosum
Arnica chamissonis var. interior Maguire
Bromus sitchensis var. aleutensis (Trin. ex Griseb.) Hultén
Poa howellii Vasey & Scribn.
Castilleja unalaschcensis (Cham. & Schltdl.) Malte
Helianthus nuttallii subsp. rydbergii (Britton) R.W.Long
Poa lettermanii Vasey
Brassica kaber var. pinnatifida (Stokes) L.C.Wheeler
Salix hookeriana var. tomentosa J.K.Henry
Corylus cornuta var. cornuta
Brodiaea rosea (Greene) Baker
Actaea rubra subsp. arguta (Nutt.) Hultén
Bromus sitchensis var. sitchensis
Hackelia Opiz ex Berchtold
Boechera cascadensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Poa cusickii subsp. purpurascens (Beal) Soreng
Ranunculus ×heimburgerae Brayshaw
Ranunculus gmelinii var. hookeri (G.Don) L.D.Benson
Polygonum fowleri B.L.Rob.
Potentilla supina subsp. paradoxa (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Soják
Microseris nutans subsp. nutans
Agrostis mertensii Trin.
Aquilegia flavescens var. miniana J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Eleocharis quinqueflora (Hartmann) O.Schwarz
Pseudoroegneria spicata subsp. inermis (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Á.Löve
Valeriana scouleri Rydb.
Festuca rubra var. littoralis Vasey, 1896
Delphinium menziesii subsp. menziesii
Festuca rubra subsp. vallicola (Rydb.) Pavlick
Agropyron fragile subsp. fragile
Hordeum jubatum subsp. intermedium Bowden
Apocynum L.
Thymus praecox Opiz
Plagiobothrys cusickii (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Mertensia paniculata var. borealis (J.F.Macbr.) L.O.Williams
Koeleria Pers.
Packera buekii Trock & T.M.Barkley
Draba lonchocarpa var. vestita O.E.Schulz
Myriophyllum verticillatum L.
Lotus uliginosus Schkuhr
Calamagrostis canadensis var. canadensis
Elytrigia repens (L.) Nevski
Draba ventosa var. ruaxes (Payson & H.St.John) C.L.Hitchc.
Rhinanthus crista-galli L.
Erigeron subtrinervis var. conspicuus (Rydb.) Cronquist
Polygonum nepalense Meisn.
Lithophragma tenellum var. thompsonii (Hoover) C.L.Hitchc.
Chrysopsis villosus (Pursh) Nutt. ex DC.
Sisyrinchium californicum (Ker Gawler) W.T.Aiton
Aster paucicapitatus (B.L.Rob.) B.L.Rob.
Descurainia pinnata subsp. intermedia (Rydb.) Detling
Portulaca parvifolia Haw.
Epilobium paniculatum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Poa ampla Merr.
Lithophragma bulbifera Rydb.
Potentilla arguta Pursh
Atriplex subspicata (Nutt.) Rydb.
Viola septentrionalis Greene
Festuca baffinensis Polunin
Glyceria declinata Bréb.
Cytisus battandieri Maire
Aster modestus Lindl.
Artemisia norvegica subsp. saxatilis (Besser) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Zigadenus elegans Pursh
Carex tracyi Mack.
Salix pseudomonticola Ball
Epilobium watsonii Barbey
Aster L.
Stachys palustris subsp. pilosa (Nutt.) Epling
Lomatium Raf.
Gnaphalium bicolor Bioletti
Schizachyrium scoparium (Michx.) Nash
Dodecatheon hendersonii A.Gray
Juncus canadensis Gay
Psilocarphus tenellus var. tenellus
Achillea millefolium var. lanulosa (Nutt.) Piper
Alnus crispa subsp. sinuata (Regel) Hultén
Poa scabrella (Thurb.) Benth. ex Vasey
Gentianella propinqua subsp. propinqua
Viola langsdorfii (Regel) Fisch. ex Ging.
Agrostis geminata Trin.
Clarkia amoena var. caurina (Abrams ex Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Platanthera Rich.
Spergularia (Pers.) J.Presl & J.Presl
Eriogonum heracleoides var. angustifolium (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Mentha arvensis var. villosa (Benth.) S.R.Stewart
Sparganium hyperboreum Laest. ex Beurl.
Ribes irriguum Douglas
Draba paysonii J.F.Macbr.
Ranunculus aquatilis var. hispidulus Drew
Oxytropis podocarpa A.Gray
Vulpia microstachys var. microstachys
Madia minima (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Vicia nigricans var. gigantea (Hook.) Broich
Legousia perfoliata (L.) Britton
Carex rupestris subsp. drummondiana (Dewey) Holub
Carex garberi Fernald
Cuscuta pacifica var. pacifica
Salicornia virginica L.
Cerastium nutans Raf.
Salix pedicellaris Pursh
Senecio elmeri Piper
Trisetum cernuum var. canescens (Buckley) Beal
Senecio macounii Greene
Potamogeton pusillus var. tenuissimus Mert. & W.D.J.Koch
Potamogeton foliosus var. macellus Fernald
Erigeron elatus (Hook.) Greene
Sparganium angustifolium var. chlorocarpum (Rydb.) Brayshaw
Amsinckia scouleri I.M.Johnst.
Centaurium erythraea Raf.
Heuchera cylindrica var. glabella (Torr. & A.Gray) Wheelock
Cimicifuga elata Nutt.
Scirpus maritimus L.
Festuca saximontana Rydb.
Polygonum hydropiperoides var. hydropiperoides
Heterotheca villosa var. hispida (Hook.) V.L.Harms
Spiraea douglasii subsp. menziesii (Hook.) Calder & Taylor
Moldavica parviflora (Nutt. ex A.Gray) Britton
Sonchus uliginosus M.Bieb.
Festuca pratensis Huds.
Taraxacum lyratum (Ledeb.) DC.
Triglochin concinna Burtt Davy
Piperia maritima Rydb.
Collinsia grandiflora var. pusilla A.Gray
Salicornia europaea L.
Zizania palustris var. interior (Fassett) Dore
Poa angustifolia L.
Vulpia myuros var. myuros
Erigeron pallens Cronquist
Elatine brachysperma A.Gray
Veronica serpyllifolia subsp. serpyllifolia
Salix rigida Muhl.
Hypericum majus (A.Gray) Britton
Stipa nelsonii var. dorei (Barkworth & J.R.Maze) Dorn
Crataegus williamsii Eggl.
Arnica attenuata Greene
Allium cernuum var. cernuum
Eriophorum viridicarinatum (Engelm.) Fernald
Carex deweyana var. leptopoda (Mack.) B.Boivin
Helianthus tuberosus L.
Agropyron spicatum (Pursh) Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Saussurea densa (Hook.) Rydb.
Potamogeton pusillus subsp. tenuissimus (Mert. & W.D.J.Koch) R.R.Haynes & Hellq.
Stuckenia filiformis subsp. occidentalis (J.W.Robbins) R.R.Haynes, Les & M.Král
Alnus crispa (Aiton) Pursh
Myriophyllum heterophyllum Michx.
Trifolium dichotomum Hook. & Arn.
Armeria maritima subsp. purpurea (W.D.J.Koch) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Carex peckii Howe
Tulipa fosteriana W.Irving
Descurainia incana subsp. incana
Vicia villosa var. glabrescens W.D.J.Koch
Matricaria perforata Mérat
Rubus discolor Weihe & Nees
Silene latifolia subsp. alba (Mill.) Greuter & Burdet
Cynara scolymus L.
Symphytum ×uplandicum Nyman
Angelica genuflexa Nutt.
Urtica dioica subsp. dioica
Poa laxiflora Buckley
Prunella vulgaris subsp. lanceolata (W.P.C.Barton) Hultén
Lupinus polyphyllus subsp. polyphyllus
Linum narbonense L.
Filipendula vulgaris Moench
Aster conspicuus Lindl.
Dodecatheon conjugens var. viscidum (Piper) Mason
Rumex acetosa subsp. alpestris (Jacq.) Á.Löve
Cotoneaster qungbixiensis J.Fryer & B.Hylmö
Cotoneaster atropurpureus Flinck & B.Hylmö
Carex deflexa Hornem.
Beta vulgaris subsp. vulgaris
Penthorum sedoides L.
Viola praemorsa subsp. praemorsa
Pleuropogon refractus (A.Gray) Benth.
Physaria didymocarpa var. didymocarpa
Panicum miliaceum L.
Lupinus nootkatensis var. nootkatensis
Cuscuta epithymum (L.) L.
Sedum integrifolium (Raf.) A.Nelson ex Coult. & A.Nelson
Rorippa curvipes var. integra (Rydb.) Stuckey
Rorippa Scop.
Anemone patens subsp. multifida (Pritz.) Hultén
Lomatium triternatum subsp. platycarpum (Torr.) Cronquist
Corispermum villosum Rydb.
Rorippa islandica var. fernaldiana Butters & Abbe
Lupinus polyphyllus var. prunophilus (M.E.Jones) E.Phillips
Vaccinium uliginosum subsp. pubescens (Wormsk. ex Hornem.) S.B.Young
Cardaria draba var. repens (Schrenk) O.E.Schulz
Arabis pycnocarpa var. pycnocarpa
Anemone canadensis L.
Plagiobothrys Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Ranunculus uncinatus var. uncinatus
Poa pratensis subsp. angustifolia (L.) Lej.
Eleocharis R.Br.
Eleocharis mamillata (H.Lindb.) H.Lindb.
Oreocarya sheldonii Brand
Armeria maritima subsp. sibirica (Turcz. ex Boiss.) Nyman
Crataegus piperi Britton
Butomus umbellatus L.
Geum triflorum var. triflorum
Stuckenia vaginata (Turcz.) Holub
Boechera paupercula (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Lewisia columbiana var. rupicola (English) C.L.Hitchc.
Lathyrus japonicus var. glaber (Ser.) Fernald
Carex lenticularis var. lenticularis
Centaurium muhlenbergii (Griseb.) W.Wight ex Piper
Ranunculus alismifolius var. alismifolius
Bromus hordeaceus subsp. hordeaceus
Callitriche hermaphroditica subsp. hermaphroditica
Draba nivalis Lilj.
Clematis occidentalis subsp. grosseserrata (Rydberg) R.L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Bromus aleutensis Trin. ex Griseb.
Anemone drummondii subsp. drummondii
Fallopia japonica (Houtt.) Ronse Decr.
Ranunculus acris subsp. acris
Phragmites australis subsp. americanus Saltonst., P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Viola L.
Coreopsis atkinsoniana Douglas, 1830
Cassiope tetragona subsp. saximontana (Small) Porsild
Agropyron caninum var. unilaterale Vasey
Veronica peregrina var. xalapensis (Kunth) H.St.John
Artemisia campestris var. scouleriana (Besser ex Hook.) Cronquist
Pyrrocoma uniflora (Hook.) Greene
Hordeum leporinum Link
Aster foliaceus Lindl.
Dodecatheon pulchellum subsp. pulchellum
Agrostis oregonensis Vasey
Carex cordillerana Saarela & B.A.Ford
Apargidium boreale (Bong.) Torr. & A.Gray
Psoralea physodes Hook.
Salix prolixa Andersson
Carex atrata var. erecta W.Boott
Saxifraga tolmiei Torr. & A.Gray
Deschampsia beringensis Hultén
Veronica L.
Cardamine pulcherrima var. tenella (Pursh) L.C.Hitchc.
Luzula arcuata subsp. unalaschcensis (Buchenau) Hultén
Campanula rotundifolia var. alaskana A.Gray
Eriophyllum Lag.
Acmispon nevadensis var. nevadensis
Lindernia dubia var. anagallidea (Michx.) Cooperr.
Symphyotrichum falcatum var. falcatum
Sonchus arvensis var. glabrescens Wimm. & Grab.
Minuartia biflora (L.) Schinz & Thell.
Geum L.
Scirpus cernuus Vahl
Solidago canadensis var. subserrata (DC.) Cronquist
Viola canadensis subsp. rydbergii (Greene) House
Mirabilis nyctaginea (Michx.) MacMill.
Boschniakia hookeri Walp.
Prunus pensylvanica L.fil.
Erigeron purpuratus Greene
Lotus tenuis Waldst. & Kit.
Melica harfordii Bol.
Cirsium foliosum (Hook.) DC.
Polygonum convolvulus L.
Antennaria alpina var. media (Greene) Jeps.
Satureja vulgaris Fritsch
Kalmia occidentalis Small
Carex oederi var. viridula (Michx.) Kük.
Potentilla fruticosa subsp. floribunda (Pursh) Elkington
Juncus stygius L.
Aster sibiricus L.
Eleocharis tenuis (Willd.) Schult.
Lychnis coronaria (L.) Desr.
Spiraea douglasii subsp. douglasii
Artemisia borealis subsp. borealis
Stachys cooleyae A.Heller
Ranunculus flabellaris Raf.
Carex magellanica subsp. irrigua (Wahlenb.) Hiitonen
Oxytropis monticola subsp. monticola
Conioselinum pacificum (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Carex canescens subsp. arctiformis (Mack.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Lepidium ruderale L.
Erigeron subtrinervis subsp. conspicuus (Rydb.) Cronquist
Carex arctaeformis Mack., 1931
Orobanche californica subsp. californica
Fauria crista-galli (Menzies ex Hook.) Makino
Gnaphalium sylvaticum L.
Castilleja rupicola Piper
Heterotheca villosa var. villosa
Erigeron filiformis Spreng.
Chenopodium opulifolium Schrad. ex W.D.J.Koch & Ziz
Erigeron salishii G.W.Douglas & Packer
Delphinium ×burkei Greene
Medicago L.
Vallisneria americana Michx.
Betula hallii Howell
Oxytropis monticola A.Gray
Salix ×rubra Huds.
Heuchera micrantha Douglas ex Lindl.
Monarda fistulosa var. mollis (L.) Benth.
Tanacetum douglasii DC.
Anthoxanthum aristatum Boiss.
Ranunculus pedatifidus var. affinis (R.Br.) L.D.Benson
Smilacina racemosa (L.) Desf.
Calamovilfa longifolia (Hook.) Scribn.
Genista tinctoria L.
Myosurus apetalus var. borealis Whittem.
Achnatherum nelsonii subsp. dorei (Barkworth & J.R.Maze) Barkworth
Polygonum polygaloides subsp. kelloggii (Greene) J.C.Hickman
Hieracium piloselloides Vill.
Franseria chamissonis Less.
Antennaria pulcherrima var. anaphaloides (Rydb.) G.W.Douglas
Lomatium sandbergii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Stellaria longipes var. longipes
Parentucellia viscosa (L.) Caruel
Carex prairea Dewey ex Alph.Wood
Alnus sinuata (Regel) Rydb.
Polygonum hydropiperoides Michx.
Carex hystericina Muhl. ex Willd.
Carex media R.Br.
Cotoneaster ×suecicus G.Klotz
Calamagrostis epigejos (L.) Roth
Ligusticum scoticum L.
Lupinus nootkatensis Donn ex Sims
Eragrostis cilianensis (Bellardi) Mosher
Fallopia ×bohemica (Chrtek & Chrtková) J.P.Bailey
Brassica napus L.
Solanum nigrum var. nigrum
Viola tricolor subsp. tricolor
Calystegia sepium subsp. angulata Brummitt
Linaria genistifolia subsp. dalmatica (L.) Maire & Petitm.
Leontodon taraxacoides (Vill.) Mérat
Sonchus arvensis var. arvensis
Cotoneaster sternianus (Turrill) Boom
Poa nemoralis subsp. interior (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Consolida ajacis (L.) Schur
Aster ericoides subsp. pansus (S.F.Blake) A.G.Jones
Lupinus burkei S.Watson
Epilobium clavatum Trel.
Pyracantha angustifolia (Franch.) C.K.Schneid.
Lens culinaris subsp. culinaris
Carex tenera var. tenera
Lithospermum officinale L.
Lycopsis arvensis L.
Dryas octopetala subsp. hookeriana (Juz.) Hultén
Penstemon eriantherus var. eriantherus
Cochlearia L.
Silene L.
Cardamine cordifolia var. lyallii (S.Watson) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Stenotus lanuginosus var. lanuginosus
Senecio conterminus Greenm.
Draba praealta Greene
Lepidium densiflorum var. elongatum (Rydb.) Thell.
Helianthus rigidus var. subrhomboideus (Rydb.) Cronquist
Sisymbrium L.
Hieracium pilosella L.
Saxifraga lyallii var. lyallii
Agrostis alba L.
Caltha L.
Bromus hordeaceus subsp. pseudothominei (P.M.Sm.) H.Scholz
Melampyrum lineare var. lineare
Cuscuta cephalanthi Engelm.
Barbarea orthoceras var. dolichocarpa Fernald
Brassica L.
Smelowskia ovalis var. ovalis
Linanthus bicolor var. bicolor
Honkenya peploides subsp. major (Hook.) Hultén
Elytrigia pontica subsp. pontica
Chrysopsis villosa var. hispida (Hook.) A.Gray
Symphoricarpos mollis Nutt.
Urtica dioica var. angustifolia Schltr.
Oxytropis cusickii Greenm.
Acer negundo var. violaceum (Booth ex Loudon) G.Kirchn.
Glyceria maxima (Hartm.) Holmb.
Corallorhiza maculata var. flavida (M.Peck) Cockerell
Montia fontana var. tenerrima Fernald & Wiegand
Viola praemorsa var. praemorsa
Artemisia campestris subsp. borealis (Pall.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Anemone L.
Ranunculus circinatus var. subrigidus (W.B.Drew) L.D.Benson
Chorispora R.Br. ex DC.
Senecio sphaerocephalus Greene
Lygodesmia juncea (Pursh) D.Don
Apargidium Torr. & A.Gray
Corydalis sempervirens (L.) Pers.
Rubus idaeus var. gracilipes M.E.Jones
Ledum groenlandicum Oeder
Eriogonum strictum Benth.
Carex garberi subsp. garberi
Phyllodoce ×intermedia Camp
Pedicularis langsdorffii subsp. arctica (R.Br.) Pennell
Eriogonum umbellatum var. subalpinum (Greene) M.E.Jones
Erigeron trifidus Hook.
Plantago bigelovii A.Gray
Glycyrrhiza lepidota var. lepidota
Rhus diversiloba Torr. & A.Gray
Prunus virginiana subsp. demissa (Nutt.) R.L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Carex supina subsp. spaniocarpa (Steud.) Hultén
Dodecatheon cusickii Greene
Bromus squarrosus var. villosus Koch
Eriogonum flavum subsp. piperi (Greene) S.Stokes
Caltha palustris L.
Deschampsia holciformis J.Presl
Corallorhiza maculata subsp. mertensiana (Bong.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Orobanche uniflora var. occidentalis (Greene) R.L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Sisyrinchium L.
Arnica amplexicaulis subsp. amplexicaulis
Arnica parryi subsp. parryi
Centaurea pratensis Thuill.
Glaux maritima subsp. obtusifolia (Fernald) B.Boivin
Potamogeton gramineus var. maximus Morong ex A.Benn.
Arnica diversifolia Greene
Crataegus columbiana var. piperi (Britton) Eggl.
Triglochin debilis (M.E.Jones) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Myosoton aquaticum (L.) Moench
Callitriche anceps Fernald
Lotus pinnatus Hook.
Malaxis brachypoda (A.Gray) Fernald
Scirpus subterminalis Torr.
Crassula connata var. connata
Penstemon scouleri Lindl.
Eremopyrum orientale (L.) Jaub. & Spach
Ranunculus verecundus B.L.Rob., 1906
Triglochin concinna var. concinna
Actaea arguta Nutt.
Piperia candida Rand.Morgan & Ackerman
Cerastium pumilum Curtis
Carex pluriflora Hultén
Polygonum douglasii var. latifolium (Engelm.) Greene
Potentilla inclinata Vill.
Agropyron repens (L.) P.Beauv.
Listera convallarioides (Sw.) Nutt.
Tiarella laciniata Hook.
Sorbus intermedia (Ehrh.) Pers.
Plantago elongata var. elongata
Carex rupestris subsp. rupestris
Mimulus nasutus Greene
Carex gmelinii Hook. & Arn.
Chenopodium strictum Roth
Poa paucispicula Scribn. & Merr.
Crataegus chrysocarpa var. chrysocarpa
Talinum sediforme Poelln.
Aster ciliolatus Lindl.
Rubus acaulis Michx.
Carex vaginata Tausch
Poa pratensis subsp. pratensis
Carex petricosa Dewey
Salix alba var. vitellina (L.) Stokes
Scirpus pungens Vahl
Vulpia megalura (Nutt.) Rydb.
Agropyron intermedium (Host) P.Beauv.
Phlox speciosa subsp. occidentalis (Durand ex Torr.) Wherry
Descurainia richardsonii (Sweet) O.E.Schulz
Stellaria longipes var. monantha (Hultén) R.J.N.Emery & C.C.Chinnappa
Setaria pumila subsp. pumila
Medicago sativa subsp. sativa
Trientalis borealis subsp. latifolia (Hook.) Hultén
Distichlis spicata var. stricta (Torr.) Beetle
Vitis ×labruscana L.H.Bailey
Rubus fruticosus L.
Schoenoplectus maritimus (L.) Lye
Centaurea nigra L.
Sisyrinchium idahoense var. segetum (E.P.Bicknell) Douglass M.Hend.
Prunus spinosa L.
Eleocharis uniglumis (Link) Schult.
Bidens vulgata Greene
Carex luzulina var. ablata (L.H.Bailey) F.J.Herm.
Fallopia sachalinensis (F.Schmidt) Ronse Decr.
Potentilla paradoxa Nutt.
Polemonium caeruleum subsp. amygdalinum (Wherry) Munz
Thlaspi fendleri A.Gray
Carex paupercula Michx.
Elymus lanceolatus subsp. albicans (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Nymphaea alba var. rubra Lönnr.
Cardamine integrifolia (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Eriogonum pyrolifolium var. coryphaeum Torr. & A.Gray
Mentha arvensis var. arvensis
Ranunculus abortivus L.
Castilleja parviflora var. parviflora
Rhynchospora capillacea Torr.
Vahlodea Fr.
Danthonia DC.
Papaver dubium L.
Ranunculus pensylvanicus L.fil.
Erigeron leibergii Piper
Chrysothamnus scopulorum (M.E.Jones) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Agrostis stolonifera var. palustris (Huds.) Farw.
Calamagrostis canadensis subsp. canadensis
Alnus tenuifolia Nutt.
Oxycoccus palustris Pers.
Sanguisorba sitchensis C.A.Mey.
Urtica dioica var. lyallii (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Polygonum achoreum Blake
Viola nuttallii var. vallicola (A.Nelson) H.St.John
Hemicarpha micrantha (Vahl) Britton
Deschampsia cespitosa subsp. holciformis (J.Presl) W.E.Lawr.
Distichlis spicata var. spicata
Oenothera perennis L.
Claytonia exigua subsp. glauca (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) John M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Ranunculus testiculatus Crantz
Cassiope stelleriana (Pall.) DC.
Hypericum scouleri subsp. scouleri
Agoseris Raf.
Agropyron Gaertn.
Lipocarpha micrantha (Vahl) G.C.Tucker
Hieracium umbellatum subsp. umbellatum
Arabis hirsuta var. eschscholtziana (Andrz. ex Ledeb.) Rollins
Viola pallens (Banks ex Ging.) Brainerd
Polygonum L.
Senecio foetidus var. hydrophiloides (Rydb.) T.M.Barkley ex Cronquist
Leontodon nudicaulis (L.) Mérat
Aster alpinus subsp. vierhapperi Onno
Agoseris heterophylla subsp. heterophylla
Amaranthus powellii subsp. bouchonii (Thell.) Costea & Carretero
Braya humilis subsp. maccallae J.G.Harris
Spartina patens (Aiton) Muhl.
Elatine L.
Sparganium emersum subsp. emersum
Grindelia Willd.
Gnaphalium purpureum var. purpureum
Artemisia arctica Less.
Scheuchzeria palustris var. americana Fernald
Stellaria L.
Sanicula europaea L.
Scirpus maritimus var. paludosus (A.Nelson) Kük.
Carex sartwellii Dewey
Veronica argute-serrata Regel & Schmalh.
Nymphaea tuberosa Paine
Vicia villosa var. villosa
Deschampsia cespitosa subsp. beringensis (Hultén) W.E.Lawr.
Montia spathulata (Douglas ex Hook.) Howell
Platanthera saccata (Greene) Hultén
Empetrum hermaphroditum Hagerup
Solidago occidentalis (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Luzula parviflora subsp. fastigiata (E.Mey.) Hämet-Ahti
Aphanes microcarpa (Boiss. & Reut.) Rothm.
Mimulus sookensis B.G.Benedict, Modlisz., Sweigart, N.H.Martin, Ganders & J.H.Willis
Chenopodium L.
Cardamine oligosperma var. kamtschatica (Regel) Detling
Piperia elongata Rydb.
Minuartia howellii (S.Watson) Mattf.
Phlox hendersonii (E.Nelson) Cronquist
Crataegus enderbyensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Triadenum fraseri (Spach) Gleason
Acroptilon repens (L.) DC.
Carex arctiformis Mack.
Stellaria umbellata Turcz. ex Kar. & Kir.
Penstemon richardsonii Douglas ex Lindl.
Hieracium albertinum Farr
Carex scoparia Schkuhr ex Willd.
Poa bulbosa subsp. vivipara (Koeler) Arcang.
Phlox gracilis subsp. gracilis
Papaver argemone L.
Nicotiana alata Link & Otto
Nicandra physaloides (L.) Gaertn.
Rumex salicifolius var. salicifolius
Achnatherum lemmonii subsp. lemmonii
Setaria viridis var. viridis
Agoseris ×elata (Nutt.) Greene
Juncus kelloggii Engelm.
Geranium sibiricum L.
Sporobolus vaginiflorus (Torr. ex A.Gray) Alph.Wood
Brassica rapa subsp. nipposinica (L.H.Bailey) Hanelt
Sisyrinchium idahoense var. idahoense
Carex inversa R.Br.
Carex harfordii Mack.
Draba taylori G.A.Mulligan & Al-Shehbaz
Alopecurus myosuroides Huds.
Carex eburnea Boott
Conringia orientalis (Linnaeus) Andrzejowski
Solanum sarachoides Sendtn.
Rorippa islandica var. hispida (Desv.) Butters & Abbe
Carex lenticularis var. dolia (M.E.Jones) L.A.Standl.
Euphorbia esula var. uralensis (Fisch. ex Link) Dorn
Schizachne purpurascens (Torr.) Swallen
Poa arctica subsp. lanata (Scribn. & Merr.) Soreng
×Festulolium braunii (K.Richt.) A.Camus
Carex rugosperma var. tonsa (Fernald) E.G.Voss
Stipa comata var. comata
Nicotiana rustica L.
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. alaschensis L.D.Benson
Festuca rubra subsp. secunda (J.Presl) Pavlick
Senecio plattensis Nutt.
Luzula DC.
Veratrum eschscholtzii A.Gray
Orthocarpus hispidus Benth.
Descurainia richardsonii var. viscosa (Rydb.) M.Peck
Penstemon nemorosus (Douglas ex Lindl.) Trautv.
Veronica wormskjoldii subsp. nutans (Bong.) Pennell
Erigeron flagellaris var. flagellaris
Agropyron dasystachyum (Hook.) Scribn.
Solanum carolinense L.
Orthocarpus attenuatus A.Gray
Rosa acicularis subsp. sayi (Schwein.) W.H.Lewis
Cerastium viscosum L.
Carex bipartita All.
Sonchus L.
Cladothamnus pyroliflorus Bong.
Oxytropis sericea var. speciosa (Torr. & A.Gray) S.L.Welsh
Cypripedium passerinum var. passerinum
Rumex L.
Lithospermum L.
Poa juncifolia Scribn.
Carex magellanica Lam.
Calamagrostis stricta subsp. stricta
Puccinellia Parl.
Polygonum douglasii subsp. spergulariiforme (Meisn. ex Small) J.C.Hickman
Salix discolor Muhl.
Agrostis diegoensis Vasey
Myosotis micrantha Pall.
Claytonia megarhiza var. megarhiza
Cardamine bellidifolia var. bellidifolia
Lomatium triternatum subsp. triternatum
Juncus nevadensis var. inventus (L.F.Hend.) C.L.Hitchc.
Oxycoccus quadripetalus Gilib.
Cypripedium calceolus subsp. parviflorum (Salisb.) Hultén
Helenium autumnale var. montanum (Nutt.) Fernald
Senecio indecorus Greene
Epilobium glareosum G.N.Jones
Orobanche uniflora L.
Scirpus supinus var. saximontanus (Fernald) T.Koyama
Moenchia erecta var. erecta
Carex preslii Steud.
Rubus idaeus var. sachalinensis (H.Lév.) C.L.Hitchc.
Juncus hesperius (Piper) Lint
Saxifraga occidentalis var. rufidula (Small) C.L.Hitchc.
Aphanes australis Rydb.
Vulpia myuros f. hirsuta (Hack.) Blom
Symphyotrichum bracteolatum (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Carex viridula subsp. viridula
Populus nigra var. nigra
Cardaria draba subsp. chalepensis (L.) O.E.Schulz
Symphoricarpos hesperius G.N.Jones
Crepis occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Impatiens ecalcarata Blank.
Hesperostipa spartea (Trin.) Barkworth
Polygonum douglasii subsp. majus (Meisn.) J.C.Hickman
Vicia cracca subsp. cracca
Festuca idahoensis subsp. idahoensis
Hedera hibernica (G.Kirchn.) Bean
Juncus brachyphyllus Wiegand
Diplotaxis tenuifolia (L.) DC.
Pontederia cordata L.
Ranunculus parviflorus L.
Tephroseris palustris (L.) Schrenk ex Rchb.
Salix niphoclada Rydb.
Lepidium densiflorum var. macrocarpum G.A.Mulligan
Prunella vulgaris f. rhodantha Fernald, 1913
Sisymbrium glaucum Nutt.
Bromus commutatus subsp. commutatus
Lupinus laxiflorus var. pseudoparviflorus (Rydb.) C.P.Sm. & H.St.John
Trisetum flavescens (L.) P.Beauv.
Helianthus pauciflorus subsp. subrhomboideus (Rydb.) O.Spring & E.E.Schill.
Dianthus deltoides L.
Eleocharis elliptica Kunth
Crepis occidentalis subsp. conjuncta Babc. & Stebbins
Claytonia lanceolata var. multiscapa (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Myosotis sylvatica var. alpestris (F.W.Schmidt) W.D.J.Koch
Consolida ambigua (L.) P.W.Ball & Heywood
Chaenorrhinum minus (L.) Lange
Bromus marginatus Nees
Festuca rubra subsp. aucta (V.I.Krecz. & Bobrov) Hultén
Gentiana platypetala Griseb.
Juncus haenkei E.Mey.
Orobanche corymbosa subsp. mutabilis Heckard
Senecio pseudaureus subsp. pseudaureus
Gayophytum nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Streptopus roseus Michx.
Sparganium angustifolium var. multipedunculatum (Morong) Brayshaw
Festuca ovina var. rydbergii St.-Yves
Salix nivalis var. nivalis
Baeothryon caespitosum (L.) A.Dietr.
Arnica fulgens var. sororia (Greene) Douglas & Ruyle-Douglas
Claytonia lanceolata var. lanceolata
Carex anthoxanthea J. & K.Presl
Claytonia L.
Saxifraga tolmiei var. tolmiei
Erigeron acris var. kamtschaticus (DC.) Herder, 1865
Veratrum viride subsp. eschscholtzii (A.Gray) Á. & D.Löve
Dodecatheon pauciflorum var. cusickii (Greene) H.Mason ex H.St.John
Populus balsamifera subsp. balsamifera
Arenaria obtusiloba (Rydb.) Fernald
Nasturtium aquaticum T.M.Bock, 1824
Triglochin palustre L.
Montia L.
Carex saxatilis L.
Antennaria monocephala DC.
Carex deflexa var. boottii L.H.Bailey
Luzula campestris var. multiflora (Ehrh.) Celak.
Iva axillaris subsp. robustior (Hook.) Bassett
Smilacina racemosa var. amplexicaulis (Nutt.) S.Watson
Juncus effusus var. pacificus Fernald & Wiegand
Antennaria neglecta var. attenuata (Fernald) Cronquist
Alisma gramineum var. angustissimum (DC.) Hendricks
Ruppia maritima var. spiralis (Dumort.) Moris
Nasturtium microphyllum (Boenn. ex Rchb.) Rchb.
Juncus bufonius var. occidentalis F.J.Herm.
Ruppia maritima var. occidentalis (S.Watson) Graebn.
Koeleria cristata Kar. & Kir.
Eleocharis tenuis var. verrucosa (Svenson) Svenson
Barbarea intermedia Boreau
Rubus stellatus Sm.
Crepis modocensis subsp. rostrata (Coville) Babc. & Stebbins
Alisma plantago-aquatica var. plantago-aquatica
Gentiana glauca Pall.
Cerastium pumilum subsp. glutinosum (Fr.) Jalas
Erythranthe patula (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Betula pumila L.
Petasites nivalis Greene
Luzula fastigiata E.Mey.
Potentilla perdissecta Rydb.
Eriophorum gracile W.D.J.Koch
Carex scirpoidea var. pseudoscirpoidea (Rydb.) Cronquist
Sitanion hystrix (Nutt.) J.G.Sm.
Linnaea borealis subsp. longiflora (Torrey) Hultén
Senecio pseudaureus Rydb.
Aster campestris Nutt.
Potentilla hyparctica Malte
Carex richardsonii R.Br.
Coleanthus subtilis (Tratt.) Seidl
Carex pyrenaica subsp. micropoda (C.A.Mey.) Hultén
Setaria P.Beauv.
Lotus nevadensis (S.Watson) Greene
Salix reticulata subsp. reticulata
Galium spurium L.
Phalaris canariensis L.
Lolium hybridum Hausskn.
Solanum physalifolium Rusby
Sanguisorba minor subsp. muricata (Spach) Nordborg
Aubrieta Adans.
Scirpus georgianus R.M.Harper
Goodyera R.Br.
Pentaphylloides floribunda (Pursh) Á.Löve
Ranunculus macounii var. oreganus K.C.Davis
Delphinium elatum L.
Elymus alaskanus subsp. alaskanus
Mertensia paniculata subsp. paniculata
Deschampsia cespitosa subsp. cespitosa
Silene uralensis (Rupr.) Bocquet
Puccinellia lucida Fernald & Weath.
Brassica hirta Moench
Myriophyllum spicatum var. exalbescens (Fernald) Jeps.
Hesperis L.
Artemisia furcata var. heterophylla (Besser) Hultén
Stellaria graminea L.
Pyrrocoma lanceolata (Hook.) Greene
Hackelia deflexa (Wahlenb.) Opiz
Ranunculus ×lutzii A.Félix
Stachys L.
Betula papyrifera var. subcordata (Rydb. ex B.T.Butler) Sarg.
Lupinus sericeus var. fikeranus (C.P.Sm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Elymus triticoides var. triticoides
Mimulus dentatus Nutt. ex Benth.
Hieracium caespitosum Dumort.
Erigeron strigosus Muhl. ex Willd.
Linnaea borealis subsp. longiflora (Torr.) Piper & Beattie
Elymus smithii (Rydb.) Gould
Potentilla uniflora Ledeb.
Lotus subpinnatus Lag.
Cyperus virens Michx.
Carpobrotus aequilaterus (Haw.) N.E.Br.
Mentha piperita var. citrata (Ehrh.) Briq.
Elymus spicatus subsp. inermis (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Hanelt
Saxifraga integrifolia Hook.
Draba cana Rydb.
Agrostis borealis Hartm.
Epilobium leptocarpum Hausskn.
Senecio canus Hook.
Agoseris aurantiaca subsp. aurantiaca
Rumex sanguineus L.
Chenopodium botrys L.
Rosa eglanteria L.
Sedum lanceolatum subsp. lanceolatum
Artemisia tridentata var. vaseyana (Rydb.) B.Boivin
Stellaria borealis subsp. borealis
Lomatium martindalei var. angustatum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Draba lonchocarpa var. thompsonii (C.L.Hitchc.) Rollins
Agrostis stolonifera var. maritima (G.Mey.) W.D.J.Koch
Crataegus okanaganensis var. wellsii J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Crataegus shuswapensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Viola adunca var. cascadensis (M.S.Baker) C.L.Hitchc.
Artemisia tridentata var. tridentata
Xanthium orientale L.
Hieracium scabriusculum Schwein.
Acinos arvensis (Lam.) Dandy
Carex echinata subsp. phyllomanica (W.Boott) Reznicek
Geum macrophyllum subsp. perincisum (Rydb.) Hultén
Epilobium palustre L.
Festuca idahoensis subsp. roemeri (Pavlick) S.G.Aiken
Eragrostis pectinacea (Michx.) Nees ex Steud.
Anagallis arvensis subsp. arvensis
Tonella tenella (Benth.) A.Heller
Pseudelymus saxicola (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Hesperostipa comata subsp. comata
Erigeron annuus (L.) Pers.
Festuca rubra subsp. pruinosa (Hack.) Piper
Juncus nevadensis var. nevadensis
Verbena hastata var. scabra Moldenke
Setaria faberi R.A.W.Herrm.
Salix viminalis L.
Fumaria martinii Clavaud
Festuca filiformis Pourr.
Artemisia campestris var. borealis (Pall.) M.Peck
Tussilago farfara L.
Solanum americanum var. nodiflorum (Jacq.) Edmonds
Potentilla concinna var. divisa Rydb.
Vaccinium globulare Rydb.
Bromus L.
Downingia elegans var. corymbosa (A.DC.) A.Gray
Cakile edentula var. californica (A.Heller) Fernald
Barbarea W.T.Aiton
Minuartia nuttallii (Pax) Briq.
Ranunculus occidentalis var. brevistylis Greene Greene
Ranunculus cymbalaria var. saximontanus Fernald
Satureja acinos (L.) Scheele
Taraxacum alaskanum Rydb.
Salsola kali var. tenuifolia Tausch
Ranunculus gmelinii var. limosus (Nutt.) H.Hara
Aster chilensis subsp. adscendens (Lindl. ex DC.) Cronquist
Cerastium vulgatum L.
Oryzopsis micrantha (Trin. & Rupr.) Thurb.
Oxypolis occidentalis J.M.Coult. & Rose
Elymus glaucus var. glaucus
Aster junciformis Rydb.
Utricularia biflora Nutt., 1818
Logfia arvensis (L.) Holub
Arnica fulgens var. fulgens
Galeopsis pubescens Besser
Eragrostis poaeoides P.Beauv. ex Roem. & Schult.
Lonicera hispidula (Lindl.) Douglas
Moenchia erecta subsp. erecta
Polygonum amphibium var. stipulaceum (Coleman) Fernald
Poa nevadensis Vasey ex Scribner
Cicuta L.
Saxifraga occidentalis S.Watson
Chrysosplenium tetrandrum (N.Lund) Th.Fr.
Juncus drummondii var. drummondii
Potentilla quinquefolia (Rydb.) Rydb.
Anthoxanthum puelii Lecoq & Lamotte
Lactuca tatarica (L.) C.A.Mey.
Clarkia amoena subsp. lindleyi (Douglas) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Orobanche californica Cham. & Schltdl.
Solidago spathulata var. nana (A.Gray) Cronquist
Melissa officinalis subsp. officinalis
Solidago spathulata var. neomexicana (A.Gray) Cronquist
Ranunculus sceleratus subsp. multifidus (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Hultén
Montia parvifolia var. parvifolia
Oxytropis campestris var. columbiana (H.St.John) Barneby
Campanula alaskana (A.Gray) W.Wight
Carex filiformis L.
Atriplex hastata L.
Potentilla nivea var. nivea
Carex nigra (L.) Reichard
Sparganium americanum Nutt.
Kobresia simpliciuscula (Wahlenb.) Mack.
Aster borealis (Torr. & A.Gray) Prov.
Hordeum marinum subsp. gussonianum (Parl.) Thell.
Polygonum douglasii subsp. nuttallii (Small) J.C.Hickman
Montia washingtoniana Suksd.
Callitriche brutia var. hamulata (Kütz. ex W.D.J.Koch) Lansdown
Lupinus wyethii S.Watson
Luzula nivalis (Laest.) Spreng.
Prunus virginiana subsp. melanocarpa (A.Nelson) R.L.Taylor & MacBryde
Poa glauca subsp. glauca
Valeriana officinalis L.
Ventenata dubia (Leers) Coss. & Durieu
Erysimum Tourn. ex L.
Agrostis exarata var. pacifica Vasey
Stenotus lanuginosus var. andersonii (Rydb.) H.M.Hall
Anemone multifida f. leucantha Fernald
Saxifraga lyallii Engl.
Carex pensylvanica Lam.
Helianthemum chamaecistus Mill.
Anemone narcissiflora subsp. alaskana Hultén
Aster frondosus (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Steironema ciliata (L.) Raf.
Arenaria stricta Michx.
Lotus sativus (Hyl.) Büscher & G.H.Loos
Erigeron bellidiastrum Nutt.
Mesembryanthemum chilense Molina
Garrya elliptica Douglas
Ceratophyllum L.
Saussurea nuda subsp. densa (Hook.) G.W.Douglas
Pyrola asarifolia var. asarifolia
Carex scirpoidea var. scirpoidea
Artemisia cana subsp. cana
Antennaria flagellaris A.Gray
Sisyrinchium idahoense var. macounii (E.P.Bicknell) Douglass M.Hend.
Erigeron acris var. elatus (Hook.) Cronquist
Salix planifolia var. monica (Bebb) C.K.Schneid.
Sparganium eurycarpum var. greenei (Morong) Graebn.
Grindelia hirsutula var. hirsutula
Bidens beckii Torr. ex Spreng.
Myosurus aristatus Benth.
Suaeda depressa (Pursh) S.Watson
Aster canescens Pursh
Salix myrtillifolia Andersson
Fritillaria lanceolata Pursh
Aster lanceolatus subsp. hesperius (A.Gray) Semple & Chmiel.
Atriplex spinosa (Hook.) Collotzi
Kobresia myosuroides (Vill.) Fiori
Symphyotrichum laeve var. geyeri (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Carex halliana L.H.Bailey
Balsamorhiza rosea A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Agrostis palustris Huds.
Hieracium longiberbe Howell
Centaurium umbellatum Gilib.
Minuartia dawsonensis (Britton) House
Schoenoplectus saximontanus (Fernald) J.Raynal
Tanacetum bipinnatum subsp. huronense (Nutt.) Breitung
Calamagrostis purpurascens var. purpurascens
Festuca altaica Trin.
Sedum L.
Elymus albicans (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Á.Löve
Cotoneaster hjelmqvistii Flinck & B.Hylmö
Callitriche heterophylla subsp. bolanderi (Hegelm.) Calder & Taylor
Ornithopus perpusillus L.
Phytolacca americana var. americana
Cicuta bulbifera L.
Erysimum arenicola var. torulosum (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
×Elyleymus jamesensis (Lepage) Barkworth
Geranium ibericum Cav.
Lepidium sativum L.
Phlox longifolia subsp. calva Wherry
Erysimum cheiranthoides subsp. altum Ahti
Alyssum L.
Lepidium smithii Hook.
Salix arctica var. arctica
Trifolium procumbens L.
Carex stenophylla Wahlenb.
Douglasia laevigata var. laevigata
Setaria pumila (Poir.) Roem. & Schult.
Egeria densa Planch.
Piperia elegans var. elata (Jeps.) Luer
Populus L.
Dracocephalum nuttallii Britton
Allium douglasii Hook.
Silene involucrata subsp. involucrata
Agropyron caninum subsp. majus (Vasey) C.L.Hitchc.
Tofieldia glutinosa var. occidentalis (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Calamagrostis stricta var. stricta
Gnaphalium microcephalum subsp. thermale (A.Nelson) G.W.Douglas
Hackelia deflexa subsp. americana (A.Gray) Hultén
Plantago canescens Adams
Tiarella L.
Ribes leucoderme A.Heller
Amaranthus rudis J.D.Sauer
Cheiranthus cheiri L.
Eragrostis minor Host
Gentiana propinqua Richardson
Crataegus orbicularis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Trisetum wolfii Vasey
Habenaria viridis var. bracteata (Muhl. ex Willd.) A.Gray
Trollius laxus var. albiflorus A.Gray
Plagiobothrys cognatus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Luzula arctica Blytt
Ambrosia trifida L.
Draba borealis DC.
Juncus usitatus L.A.S.Johnson
Cleome hassleriana Chodat
Carex frankii Kunth
Osmorhiza Raf.
Chenopodium rubrum var. humile (Hook.) S.Watson
Thymus pulegioides L.
Salpichroa origanifolia (Lam.) Thell.
Braya humilis (C.A.Mey.) B.L.Rob.
Leucanthemum vulgare var. pinnatifidum (Lecoq & Lamotte) Moldenke
Buglossoides arvensis subsp. arvensis
Festuca rubra var. pruinosa Hack.
Sagina apetala L., 1771
Iris Tourn. ex L.
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. lyrata (Nutt.) M.Peck ex C.L.Hitchc.
Clematis L.
Luzula multiflora var. frigida (Buchenau) Sam.
Poa cusickii var. epilis (Scribn.) C.L.Hitchc.
Torreyochloa Church
Habenaria dilatata var. albiflora (Cham.) Correll
Spiranthes romanzoffiana var. romanzoffiana
Astragalus dasyglottis Fisch. ex DC.
Stellaria humifusa Rottb.
Phlox longiflora Sweet
Descurainia pinnata var. intermedia (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Agrostis alaskana Hultén
Solidago multiradiata var. scopulorum A.Gray
Alnus crispa subsp. crispa
Salix reticulata subsp. nivalis (Hook.) Á.Löve, D.Löve & B.M.Kapoor
Chaenactis DC.
Campanula lasiocarpa Cham.
Fragaria virginiana subsp. glauca (S.Watson) Staudt
Sanicula L.
Castilleja exserta subsp. latifolia (S.Watson) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Festuca bromoides L.
Astragalus lotiflorus Hook.
Senecio streptanthifolius Greene
Salix stolonifera Coville
Senecio foetidus Howell
Stellaria calycantha var. bongardiana (Fernald) Fernald
Betula pumila var. glandulifera Regel
Lupinus micranthus Douglas
Cacaliopsis nardosmia subsp. glabrata (Piper) Piper, 1906
Gentiana prostrata Haenke
Carex krausei Boeckeler
Symphyotrichum lanceolatum subsp. lanceolatum
Hieracium maculatum Sm.
Geocaulon lividum (Richardson) Fernald
Agropyron caninum (L.) P.Beauv.
Rorippa islandica (Oeder) Borbás
Carex scirpoidea var. stenochlaena Holm
Petasites sagittatus (Banks ex Pursh) A.Gray
Eriogonum heracleoides var. minus Benth.
Hordeum marinum Huds.
Polygonum punctatum Elliott
Carex hassei L.H.Bailey
Fraxinus Tourn. ex L.
Sedum forsterianum Sm.
Ranunculus longirostris Godr.
Anethum graveolens L.
Senecio viscosus L.
Cotoneaster crispii Exell
Carex longii Mack.
Linaria canadensis (L.) Dum.Cours.
Bromus rigidus Roth
Corispermum pallasii Stev.
Andersonglossum virginianum (L.) J.I.Cohen
Aster occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Bunias orientalis L.
Helenium autumnale var. autumnale
Rubus parviflorus var. fraserianus J.K.Henry
Eleocharis compressa var. acutisquamata (Buckley) S.G.Sm.
Deschampsia cespitosa var. longiflora Beal
Eleocharis obtusa var. gigantea Fernald
Agropyron desertorum var. desertorum
Festuca ammobia Pavlick
Arrhenatherum elatius var. bulbosum (Willd.) Spenn.
Agropyron desertorum (Fisch. ex Link) Schult.
Antennaria neglecta var. howellii (Greene) Cronquist
Lupinus bingenensis var. subsaccatus Suksd.
Juncus leseurii Bol., 1862
Carex swanii (Fernald) Mack.
Mirabilis L.
Artemisia tilesii subsp. tilesii
Erigeron lanatus (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Hook.
Fragaria virginiana subsp. platypetala (Rydb.) Staudt
Hyacinthoides non-scripta (L.) Chouard
Ambrosia chamissonis var. bipinnatisecta (Less.) J.T.Howell
Atriplex patula var. hastata (L.) A.Gray
Kalmia microphylla subsp. microphylla
Chenopodium pumilio R.Br.
Centaurea virgata subsp. squarrosa (Willd.) Gugler
Salicornia L.
Aster bracteolatus Nutt.
Agrostis melaleuca (Trin.) Hitchc.
Sporobolus asper (P.Beauv.) Kunth
Symphyotrichum cusickii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Potamogeton perfoliatus subsp. richardsonii (A.Benn.) Hultén
Delphinium nuttallianum var. lineapetalum (Ewan) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex leporina L.
Callitriche stenoptera Lansdown
Elymus innovatus Beal
Juncus conglomeratus L.
Calystegia sepium subsp. erratica Brummitt
Hammarbya paludosa (L.) Kuntze
Hierochloe odorata subsp. hirta (Schrank) Tzvelev
Centaurea jacea L.
Stipa viridula Trin.
Arnica angustifolia subsp. angustifolia
Scirpus caespitosus L.
Franseria chamissonis var. bipinnatisecta Less.
Galium trifidum subsp. trifidum
Chenopodium ficifolium Sm.
Schoenoplectus (Rchb.) Palla
Draba cinerea Adams
Euphorbia helioscopia L.
Alopecurus aequalis subsp. aequalis
Cotoneaster dielsianus E.Pritz. ex Diels
Pseudosasa japonica (Siebold & Zucc. ex Steud.) Makino ex Nakai
Ribes aureum var. villosum DC.
Rumex patientia L.
Lupinus latifolius subsp. latifolius
Rumex aquaticus var. fenestratus (Greene) Dorn
Barbarea vulgaris var. brachycarpa Rouy & Foucaud
Cornus canadensis var. intermedia Farr
Senecio cymbalaria Pursh
Helianthus ×laetiflorus Pers.
Elyhordeum macounii (Vasey) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Polygonum perfoliatum (L.) L.
Lepidium densiflorum var. bourgeauanum (Thell.) C.L.Hitchc.
Androsace chamaejasme Wulfen
Pinguicula vulgaris subsp. macroceras (Link) Calder & Taylor
Agropyron caninum var. latiglume (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Zigadenus venenosus var. venenosus
Calandrinia Kunth
Hieracium canadense Michx.
Delphinium ambiguum L.
Vaccinium ×intermedium Ruthe
Crataegus douglasii var. suksdorfii Sarg.
Arnica chamissonis var. chamissonis
Ribes hudsonianum var. hudsonianum
Prunus hortulana L.H.Bailey
Potentilla subvahliana Jurtzev
Gnaphalium L.
Polygonum aviculare var. littorale (Link) Mertens & W.D.J.Koch
Hieracium triste Willd. ex Spreng.
Haplopappus lyallii Gray
Agropyron repens f. aristatum (Schumach.) Holmb.
Descurainia incana subsp. incisa (Engelm.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Viola nephrophylla var. nephrophylla
Dracocephalum thymiflorum L.
Betula neoalaskana Sarg.
Melica bulbosa var. bulbosa
Potentilla pensylvanica var. pensylvanica
Solidago missouriensis var. extraria A.Gray
Agropyron subsecundum (Link) Hitchc.
Danthonia macounii Hitchc.
Conioselinum gmelini (Bray) Steud.
Draba lactea Adams
Gaillardia ×grandiflora Van Houtte
Alkekengi officinarum Moench
Fumaria muralis subsp. muralis
Cotoneaster mairei H.Lév.
Trifolium tridentatum Lindl.
Carex exsiccata var. pungens L.H.Bailey
Cardamine parviflora L.
Plagiobothrys figuratus (Piper) I.M.Johnston ex M.Peck
Aster radulinus A.Gray
×Elymordeum Lepage
Malus pumila Mill.
Pyrrocoma crocea (A.Gray) Greene
Lepidium heterophyllum var. canescens Gren. & Godr., 1848
Galium trifidum var. tinctorium (L.) Torr. & A.Gray
Corallorhiza Gagnebin
Rubus arcticus subsp. stellatus (Sm.) Boivin
Festuca myuros L.
Hieracium flagellare Willd.
Aster sibiricus var. meritus (A.Nelson) Raup
Corethrogyne leucophylla (Lindl.) Menzies ex Jeps.
Liparis loeselii (L.) Rich.
Erigeron peregrinus subsp. peregrinus
Saxifraga adscendens subsp. oregonensis (Raf.) Bacig.
Thalictrum dasycarpum Fisch., Mey. & Avé-Lall.
Aster novae-angliae L.
Sedum lanceolatum var. nesioticum (G.N.Jones) C.L.Hitchc.
Festuca reflexa Buckley
Potamogeton oakesianus J.W.Robbins
Delphinium L.
Sonchus asper subsp. glaucescens (Jord.) Ball
Trisetum cernuum var. cernuum
Cerastium beeringianum subsp. earlei (Rydb.) Hultén
Arenaria aculeata S.Watson
Camassia quamash subsp. azurea (A.Heller) Gould
Abronia umbellata subsp. acutalata (Standl.) Tillett
Delphinium bicolor subsp. bicolor
Carex brunnescens subsp. sphaerostachya (Tuck.) Kalela
Senecio solisii Cuatrec.
Rhynchospora Vahl
Epilobium angustifolium subsp. angustifolium
Agropyron latiglume (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Rydb.
Trillium hibbersonii (T.M.C.Taylor & Szczawinski) D.O'Neill & S.B.Farmer
Crocus vernus (L.) Hill
Mentha piperita L.
Glebionis coronaria (L.) Cass. ex Spach
Eragrostis multicaulis Steud.
Epilobium obscurum Schreb.
Luzula divaricata S.Watson
Silene drummondii subsp. drummondii
Arnica chamissonis subsp. incana (A.Gray) Maguire
Castilleja lanceifolia Rydb.
Poa cusickii var. purpurascens (Beal) C.L.Hitchc.
Luzula parviflora subsp. melanocarpa (Michx.) Tolm.
Polygonum douglasii var. douglasii
Heracleum L.
Calla palustris L.
Poa cusickii var. cusickii
Dodecatheon conjugens var. viscidum (Piper) Mason ex H.St.John
Acer negundo var. californicum (Torr. & A.Gray) Sarg.
Baeria macrantha (A.Gray) A.Gray
Lupinus sericeus var. egglestonianus C.P.Sm.
Claytonia spathulata Douglas ex Hook.
Muhlenbergia glomerata var. cinnoides (Link) F.Herm.
Platanthera chorisiana (Cham.) Rchb.f.
Phyllospadix serrulatus Rupr. ex Asch.
Aster cordifolius L.
Trillium ovatum f. hibbersonii T.M.C.Taylor & Szczaw.
Utricularia ochroleuca Hartm.
Carex atratiformis Britton
Salix arctica subsp. torulosa (Trautv.) Hultén
Pyrus nivalis Jacq.
Stipa spartea Trin.
Carex garberi subsp. bifaria (Fernald) Hultén
Piperia Rydb.
Cardamine penduliflora O.E.Schulz
Salix commutata var. denudata Bebb
Polygonum orientale L.
Atriplex oblongifolia Waldst. & Kit.
Amerorchis rotundifolia (Banks ex Pursh) Hultén
Gypsophila muralis L.
Montia parvifolia subsp. parvifolia
Populus ×canescens (Aiton) Sm.
Iris sibirica L.
Cotoneaster integrifolius (Roxb.) Klotz
Corispermum hookeri Mosyakin
Elymus virginicus var. submuticus Hook.
Armoracia lapathifolia Gilib.
Boisduvalia stricta (Gray) Greene
Gentiana calycosa var. obtusiloba (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lloydia serotina subsp. flava Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Ranunculus aquatilis var. capillaceus (Thuill.) DC.
Clematis alpina Linnaeus, 1753
Carex stenophylla subsp. eleocharis (L.H.Bailey) Hultén
Eryngium planum L.
Chenopodium leptophyllum var. leptophyllum
Silene acaulis var. exscapa (All.) DC.
Salix balsamifera (Hook.) Barratt ex Andersson
Smilacina Desf.
Oxytropis campestris var. spicata Hook.
Habenaria Willd.
Anemone patens var. wolfgangiana (Besser) Koch
Atriplex patula var. obtusa (Cham.) C.L.Hitchc.
Geum ×schofieldii Calder & Taylor
Chenopodium leptophyllum var. oblongifolium S.Watson
Nymphaea tetragona Georgi
Glyceria striata var. stricta (Scribn.) Fernald
Melilotus officinalis subsp. officinalis
Galinsoga ciliata (Raf.) S.F.Blake
Brickellia oblongifolia subsp. oblongifolia
Juncus marginatus Rostk.
Kobresia bellardii (All.) Degl. ex Loisel.
Scrophularia californica var. oregana (Pennell) B.Boivin
Salix lucida subsp. caudata (Nutt.) A.E.Murray
Carex loliacea L.
Thalictrum L.
Scirpus atrocinctus Fernald
Greeneocharis circumscissa var. rosulata (J.T.Howell) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Anemone blanda Schott & Kotschy
Hierochloe hirta subsp. arctica (J.Presl) G.Weim.
Cotoneaster tengyuehensis J.Fryer & B.Hylmö
Caltha palustris subsp. asarifolia (DC.) Hultén
Filago vulgaris Lam.
Comandra umbellata var. californica (Eastw. ex Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Sisyrinchium hitchcockii Douglass M.Hend.
Boechera drepanoloba (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Carex atrata subsp. atrosquama (Mack.) Hultén
Ranunculus flammula var. filiformis (Michx.) Hook.
Elymus brachystachys Scribn. & C.R.Ball
Koeleria gracilis var. pubiculmis Domin
Festuca saximontana var. robertsiana Pavlick
Puccinellia pauciflora (J.Presl) Munz
Arenaria tenella Nutt.
Chenopodium fremontii var. fremontii
Pedicularis bracteosa var. bracteosa
Triteleia Douglas ex Lindl.
Chimaphila umbellata var. occidentalis (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Sanguisorba menziesii Rydb.
Carex chordorrhiza L.f.
Calamagrostis Adans.
Asclepias L.
Polemoniella micrantha (Benth.) A.Heller
Orthocarpus castillejoides Benth.
Calamovilfa longifolia var. longifolia
Petasites frigidus var. nivalis (Greene) Cronquist
Elymus arenarius Georgi
Potentilla arguta subsp. convallaria (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Dipsacus L.
Phlox L.
Rosa multiflora Murray
Daboecia cantabrica Huds.
Vicia sativa var. sativa
Elymus lanceolatus subsp. yukonensis (Scribn. & Merr.) Á.Löve
Elymus elongatus (Host) Runemark
Stellaria monantha Hultén
Malaxis paludosa (L.) Sw.
Petasites palmatus (Aiton) A.Gray
Lepidium menziesii DC.
Arctium tomentosum Mill.
Carex microchaeta Holm
Scilla sibirica Andrews
Nuphar lutea subsp. variegata (Engelm. ex Durand) E.O.Beal
Descurainia pinnata var. filipes (A.Gray) M.Peck
Salix maccalliana Rowlee
Rorippa curvipes Greene
Arctostaphylos alpina subsp. rubra (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Hultén
Malva pusilla Sm.
Sarcocornia pacifica (Standl.) A.J.Scott
Atriplex gmelinii C.A.Mey. ex Bong.
Plagiobothrys hispidulus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Navarretia intertexta subsp. intertexta
Astragalus pectinatus (Hook.) Douglas
Papaver alpinum L.
Rorippa islandica var. glabrata (Lunell) Butters & Abbe
Aconitum cammarum L.
Ranunculus repens var. repens
Cardamine laciniata (Muhl. ex Willd.) A.W.Wood
Pedicularis L.
Cyclamen neapolitanum Ten.
Matricaria matricarioides (Less.) Porter, 1894
Salix rigida var. mackenzieana (Hook.) Cronquist
Ionopsidium acaule (Desf.) DC. ex Rchb.
Carex deweyana var. bolanderi (Olney) W.Boott
Pyrrocoma carthamoides Hook.
Agoseris apargioides var. eastwoodiae (Fedde) Munz
Teucrium canadense L.
Coeloglossum viride subsp. bracteatum (Muhl.) Hultén
Eragrostis orcuttiana Vasey
Glyceria canadensis (Michx.) Trin.
Astragalus falcatus Lam.
Wolffia punctata Griseb.
Carex adusta Boott
Brodiaea howellii S.Watson
Trientalis europaea subsp. arctica (Fisch. ex Hook.) Hultén
Verbascum phlomoides L.
Rhinanthus borealis (Sterneck) Chabert
Coreopsis tinctoria var. atkinsoniana (Douglas) H.M.Parker
Agropyron elmeri Scribn.
Gilia leptomeria A.Gray
Salix alba L.
Salsola kali var. kali
Vicia villosa subsp. villosa
Ilex crenata Thunb.
Mentha gentilis L.
Berberis thunbergii DC.
Eleocharis compressa Sull.
Aphanes arvensis L.
Rubus idaeus subsp. strigosus (Michx.) Focke
Mimulus langsdorffii Donn
Silene menziesii var. viscosa (Greene) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Sophia Adans.
Chrysanthemum leucanthemum var. pinnatifidum Lecoq & Lamotte
Juncus pylaei Laharpe
Trisetum cernuum subsp. cernuum
Sambucus racemosa var. pubens (Michx.) Koehne
Honkenya peploides (L.) Ehrh.
Braya humilis subsp. humilis
Habenaria hyperborea (L.) R.Br.
Pedicularis langsdorffii Fisch. ex Stev.
Alliaria officinalis Andrz.
Cypripedium calceolus L.
Carex interrupta Boeckeler
Hierochloe R.Br.
Carduus nutans subsp. leiophyllus (Petrovič) Stoj. & Stef., 1891
Juncus drummondii var. subtriflorus (E.Mey.) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. platyphyllidium (Rydb.) M.Peck
Atriplex argentea subsp. argentea
Mirabilis hirsuta (Pursh) MacMill.
Ruppia maritima var. longipes Hagstr.
Primula cuneifolia subsp. saxifragifolia (Lehm.) W.W.Sm. & Forrest
Lupinus sulphureus Douglas
Carex pedunculata Muhl. ex Willd.
Clarkia Pursh
Crataegus saligna Greene
Polygala vulgaris L.
Ranunculus polyanthemos L.
Elymus flavescens Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Muscari armeniacum Leichtlin
Hyacinthoides ×variabilis P.D.Sell, 1996
Eriogonum umbellatum var. haussknechtii (Dammer) M.E.Jones
Lavatera L.
Chenopodium album subsp. striatum (Krašan) Murr
Viola selkirkii Pursh ex Goldie
Poa supina Schrad.
Psathyrostachys juncea (Fisch.) Nevski
Physaria douglasii subsp. douglasii
Amsinckia inepta J.F.Macbr.
Cryptantha angelica I.M.Johnst.
Amsinckia nesophila Suksd.
Cryptantha wigginsii I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha grayi (Vasey & Rose) J.F.Macbr.
Pectocarya peninsularis I.M.Johnst.
Lithospermum tubuliflorum Greene
Cryptantha foliosa (Greene) Greene
Cryptantha echinosepala J.F.Macbr.
Cryptantha quentinensis J.F.Macbr.
Antiphytum peninsulare (Rose) I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha grayi var. cryptochaeta (J.F.Macbr.) I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha grayi var. nesiotica I.M.Johnst.
Sicana odorifera (Vell.) Naudin
Cucurbita argyrosperma subsp. argyrosperma
Cucurbita cordata S.Watson
Lagenaria siceraria (Molina) Standl.
Dieterlea Lott
Cucurbita argyrosperma subsp. sororia (L.H.Bailey) Merrick & D.M.Bates
Cucurbita pepo subsp. pepo
Cucurbita moschata (Duchesne) Duchesne ex Poir.
Sechium edule (Jacq.) Sw.
Hackelia Opiz
Poaceae
Polemoniaceae
Iresine P.Browne
Sidalcea A.Gray
Polygonaceae
Dendromecon Benth.
Papaveraceae
Calycanthus L.
Consolida hispanica (Costa) Greuter & Burdet
Myoporum insulare R.Br.
Fabaceae
Berberidaceae
Eucalyptus Lheritier, 1789
Celtis L.
Loasaceae
Lespedeza Michx.
Chenopodiaceae
Boraginaceae
Robinia L.
Trautvetteria Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Digitaria Haller
Sagina L.
Lathyrus L.
Alnus viridis subsp. viridis
Helianthemum Mill.
Vancouveria Morren & Decne.
Caryophyllaceae
Garrya Douglas ex Lindl.
Heteranthera Ruiz & Pav.
Malvaceae
Eucalyptus cosmophylla F.Muell.
Acacia decurrens (J.C.Wendl.) Willd.
Nuphar Sm.
Nyctaginaceae
Ericaceae
Thermopsis R.Br.
Thymelaeaceae
Carya Nutt.
Cistaceae
Acacia fimbriata A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Pimelea Banks ex Sol.
Gomphocarpus fruticosus subsp. fruticosus
Aconitum L.
Frankenia L.
Panicum obtusum Kunth
Echinocactus Link & Otto
Aristolochia L.
Phaseolus L.
Hypericum L.
Nicotiana L.
Muhlenbergia Schreb.
Cucurbitaceae
Agrostis parviflora R.Br.
Melaleuca brevifolia Turcz.
Myosurus australis F.Muell.
Myosurus L.
Corydalis Vent.
Acacia oxycedrus Sieber ex DC.
Vulpia myuros f. megalura (Nutt.) Stace & R.Cotton
Eucalyptus diversifolia Bonpl.
Blitum L.
Abutilon Mill.
Spergularia marina (L.) Besser
Myoporum acuminatum R.Br.
Moehringia L.
Lythrum L.
Linaceae
Ammannia L.
Acacia quornensis J.M.Black
Celtis sinensis Pers.
Eucalyptus angulosa Schauer
Hydrocharitaceae
Fremontodendron Coult.
Phytolacca octandra L.
Paeonia L.
Gypsophila vaccaria (L.) Sm.
Deschampsia P.Beauv.
Parietaria debilis G.Forst.
Acacia prominens A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Brassicaceae
Tecticornia Hook.fil.
Montiaceae
Eriochloa Kunth
Eritrichium Schrad. ex Gaudin
Amsinckia echinata Gray
Acacia euthycarpa subsp. euthycarpa
Desmodium Desv.
Solanum dimidiatum Raf.
Solanaceae
Frangula Mill.
Datiscaceae
Cinnamomum camphora (L.) J.Presl
Fallopia Adans.
Xylosma J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Limnanthes R.Br.
Polypogon fugax Nees ex Steud.
Malvella Jaub. & Spach
Glycyrrhiza Tourn. ex L.
Passiflora L.
Hakea laurina R.Br.
Melica L.
Myrica L.
Eucalyptus behriana F.Muell.
Saururaceae
Drosera L.
Urticaceae
Suaeda Scop.
Acacia beckleri Tindale
Bouteloua hirsuta var. glandulosa (Cerv.) Gould
Minuartia sajanensis (Willd.) House
Mimulus cusickii (Greene) Piper
Parkinsonia ×sonorae (Rose & I.M.Johnst.) J.E.Hawkins & Felger
Wyethia amplexicaulis subsp. major Piper
Chorizanthe perfoliata Gray
Sapindus saponaria subsp. drummondii (Hook. & Arn.) A.E.Murray
Polygala desertorum Brandegee
Lupinus croceus Eastw.
Chaenactis tanacetifolia A.Gray
Lactuca scariola L.
Prosopidastrum mexicanum (Dressler) Burkart
Sporobolus pyramidatus (Lam.) Hitchc.
Paspalum paspaloides (Michx.) Scribn.
Cyperus dioicus I.M.Johnst.
Polycarpon depressum Nutt.
Bursera odorata (Turcz.) Brandegee
Poncirus trifoliata (L.) Raf.
Stachys ajugoides var. rigida Jeps. & Hoover
Trisetum Pers.
Eriogonum inflatum var. deflatum I.M.Johnst.
Gilia capitata subsp. pedemontana V.E.Grant
Elymus triticoides Buckley
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum var. halimioides (Gand.) S.Stokes
Micromeria douglasii Benth.
Croton magdalenae Millsp.
Monarda citriodora subsp. austromontana (Epling) Scora
Amaranthus watsonii Standl.
Hedypnois cretica (L.) Dum.Cours.
Euryops lateriflorus (L.f.) DC., 1837
Sporobolus R.Br.
Poa curtifolia Scribn.
Cynanchum L.
Gilia palmeri S.Watson
Centaurium venustum (Gray) B.L.Rob.
Eriogonum compositum Douglas
Linum angustifolium Huds.
Gentianella wislizenii (Engelm.) J.M.Gillett
Setaria geniculata P.Beauv.
Eriogonum elongatum var. vollmeri (Wiggins) Reveal
Citropsis gabunensis (Engl.) Swingle & M.Kellerm.
Argemone ochroleuca subsp. ochroleuca
Acaciella goldmanii Britton & Rose
Verbesina peninsularis S.F.Blake
Lasiacis ruscifolia (Kunth) Hitchc.
Elymus glabriflorus var. glabriflorus
Bouteloua barbata var. rothrockii (Vasey) Gould
Petasites frigidus subsp. palmatus (Aiton) Cody
Linanthus androsaceus subsp. luteus (Benth.) H.Mason
Diodia teres Walter
Bromus orcuttianus var. orcuttianus
Centaurium floribundum (Benth.) B.L.Rob.
Cardiospermum spinosum Radlk.
Oenothera toumeyi (Small) Tidestr.
Muhlenbergia eludens C.Reeder
Astragalus rattanii A.Gray
Galvezia juncea (Benth.) A.Gray
Amsinckia lunaris J.F.Macbr.
Leptochloa panicoides (J.Presl) Hitchc.
Machaeranthera spinulosa Greene
Graphephorum Desv.
Calycadenia villosa DC.
Oenothera hartwegii subsp. pubescens (A.Gray) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Agave deserti subsp. deserti
Chlorogalum parviflorum S.Watson
Allium fimbriatum var. mohavense Jeps.
Allium lacunosum var. davisiae (M.E.Jones) McNeal & Ownbey
Lemna aequinoctialis Welw.
Wolffiella oblonga (Phil.) Hegelm.
Asparagus officinalis subsp. officinalis
Bolboschoenus maritimus subsp. paludosus (A.Nelson) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Carex spissa L.H.Bailey
Carex angustata Boott
Cyperus involucratus Rottb.
Cyperus niger Ruiz & Pav.
Eleocharis bella (Piper) Svenson
Eleocharis radicans (A.Dietr.) Kunth
Rhynchospora capitellata (Michx.) Vahl
Schoenoplectus pungens var. badius (C.Presl) S.G.Sm.
Scirpus congdonii Britton
Iris hartwegii subsp. hartwegii
Juncus mexicanus Willd. ex Schult. & Schult.f.
Juncus effusus subsp. austrocalifornicus Lint ex Zika
Juncus bufonius var. congestus Wahlenb.
Juncus textilis Buchenau
Juncus leiospermus var. leiospermus
Juncus ambiguus Guss.
Piperia cooperi (S.Watson) Rydb.
Piperia leptopetala Rydb.
Platanthera leucostachys Lindl.
Agrostis avenacea J.F.Gmel.
Alopecurus saccatus Vasey
Andropogon glomeratus var. scabriglumis C.S.Campb.
Bromus madritensis subsp. rubens (L.) Husn.
Bromus arenarius Labill.
Chloris gayana Kunth
Diplachne fusca subsp. fascicularis (Lam.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Eleusine tristachya (Lam.) Lam.
Elymus condensatus J.Presl
Elymus elymoides var. brevifolius (J.G.Sm.) Dorn
Elymus aristatus Merr.
Elymus hispidus (Opiz) Melderis
Eragrostis superba Peyr.
Eragrostis barrelieri Daveau
Festuca temulenta (L.) J.P.Sm. & Columbus
Festuca perennis (L.) Columbus & J.P.Sm.
Festuca elmeri Scribn. & Merr.
Hordeum brachyantherum subsp. californicum (Covas & Stebbins) Bothmer, N.Jacobsen & Seberg
Hordeum marinum subsp. gussoneanum (Parl.) Thell.
Hyparrhenia hirta (L.) Stapf
Melinis repens subsp. repens
Muhlenbergia californica Vasey
Neostapfia colusana (Burtt Davy) Burtt Davy
Orcuttia viscida (Hoover) Reeder
Panicum acuminatum var. acuminatum
Panicum capillare var. occidentale Rydb.
Pentameris airoides subsp. airoides
Phalaris lemmonii Vasey
Phragmites australis subsp. berlandieri (E.Fourn.) Saltonst. & Hauber
Poa diaboli Soreng & Keil
Polypogon maritimus Willd.
Setaria verticilliformis Dumort.
Stipa occidentalis var. occidentalis
Stipa nevadensis B.L.Johnson
Stipa pinetorum M.E.Jones
Stipa coronata Thurb.
Stipa diegoensis Swallen
Stipa lepida Hitchc.
Stipa capensis Thunb.
Stipa cernua Stebbins & Love
Swallenia alexandrae (Swallen) Soderstr. & H.F.Decker
Triteleia dudleyi Hoover
Avicennia marina var. australasica (Walp.) Moldenke
Sambucus nigra subsp. caerulea (Raf.) Bolli
Aptenia cordifolia (L.fil.) Schwantes
Tetragonia tetragonioides (Pallas) Kuntze
Amaranthus arenicola I.M.Johnst.
Amaranthus crassipes Schltdl.
Malosma laurina (Nutt.) Abrams
Rhus trilobata var. pilosissima Engl.
Rhus trilobata var. quinata (Greene) Jeps.
Schinus polygama (Cav.) Cabrera
Angelica arguta var. breweri (A.Gray) DiTomaso
Angelica tomentosa var. hendersonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) DiTomaso
Bupleurum lancifolium Hornem.
Eryngium aristulatum var. parishii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Lilaeopsis masonii Mathias & Constance
Lomatium tomentosum (Benth.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Osmorhiza brachypoda Torr. ex Durand
Agoseris apargioides var. maritima (E.Sheld.) Cronquist
Amauriopsis dissecta (A.Gray) Rydb.
Artemisia rothrockii A.Gray
Centromadia pungens subsp. laevis (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. lanceolatus (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. incana (Lindl.) M.L.Canby
Deinandra kelloggii (Greene) Greene
Deinandra floribunda (A.Gray) Davidson & Moxley
Deinandra mohavensis (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Dimorphotheca fruticosa (L.) DC.
Encelia frutescens subsp. frutescens
Erechtites glomerata (Desf. ex Poir.) DC.
Ericameria Nutt.
Ericameria ericoides var. ericoides
Ericameria cuneata McClatchie
Erigeron lassenianus Greene
Eriophyllum ambiguum var. ambiguum
Eriophyllum lanatum var. croceum (Greene) Jeps.
Flaveria trinervia (Spreng.) C.Mohr
Gamochaeta stagnalis (I.M.Johnst.) Anderb.
Grindelia hallii Steyerm.
Helenium bolanderi A.Gray
Helianthus petiolaris subsp. canescens (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Heterotheca sessiliflora subsp. echioides (Benth.) Semple
Lagophylla congesta (A.Gray) Greene
Lessingia ramulosa A.Gray
Madia radiata Kellogg
Madia Molina
Madia citrigracilis D.D.Keck
Malacothrix clevelandii A.Gray
Malacothrix foliosa subsp. polycephala W.S.Davis
Malacothrix stebbinsii W.S.Davis & Raven
Microseris laciniata (Hook.) Sch.Bip.
Oncosiphon piluliferum (L.fil.) Källersjö
Packera bernardina (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Packera ganderi (T.M.Barkley & Beauch.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Pseudognaphalium roseum (Kunth) Anderb.
Pulicaria paludosa Link
Senecio fremontii subsp. occidentalis (A.Gray)
Senecio californicus var. californicus
Stylocline intertexta Morefield
Thelesperma megapotamicum (Spreng.) Herter
Wyethia ovata Torr. & A.Gray ex Torr.
Alloberberis haematocarpa (Wooton) C.C.Yu & K.F.Chung
Mahonia dictyota (Jeps.) Fedde
Mahonia pinnata subsp. pinnata
Mahonia pinnata (Lag.) Fedde
Amsinckia vernicosa Hook. & Arn.
Eremocarya micrantha var. micrantha
Cryptantha sparsiflora (Greene) Greene
Cryptantha intermedia var. johnstonii J.F.Macbr.
Johnstonella racemosa (S.Watson) Brand
Cryptantha juniperensis R.B.Kelley & M.G.Simpson
Cryptantha ganderi I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha milobakeri I.M.Johnst.
Johnstonella inaequata Brand
Cryptantha maritima var. pilosa I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha clevelandii var. florosa I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha cycloptera (Greene) Greene
Cryptantha incana Greene
Cryptantha simulans Greene
Cryptantha clevelandii var. clevelandii
Cynoglossum grande Douglas ex Lehm.
Plagiobothrys collinus var. fulvescens (I.M.Johnst.) Higgins
Plagiobothrys trachycarpus (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys fulvus var. campestris (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys scriptus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys collinus var. californicus (A.Gray) Higgins
Plagiobothrys parishii I.M.Johnst.
Boechera arcuata (Nutt.) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Boechera xylopoda Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Cakile edentula var. edentula
Lepidium appelianum Al-Shehbaz
Caulanthus heterophyllus var. heterophyllus
Descurainia pinnata subsp. glabra (Wooton & Standl.) Detling
Draba cuneifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Draba sierrae Sharsm.
Lepidium virginicum var. robinsonii C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium acutidens (A.Gray) T.J.Howell
Lepidium oblongum var. insulare C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium virginicum subsp. virginicum
Lepidium strictum (S.Watson) Rattan
Lepidium dictyotum var. dictyotum
Lyrocarpa coulteri var. palmeri (S.Watson) Rollins
Nasturtium officinale W.T.Aiton
Rorippa obtusa (Nutt.) Britton
Rorippa palustris var. palustris
Streptanthella longirostris var. longirostris
Streptanthus cordatus var. piutensis J.T.Howell
Streptanthus bernardinus (Greene) Parish
Streptanthus insignis subsp. lyonii Kruckeb. & J.L.Morrison
Thysanocarpus curvipes subsp. elegans (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) P.J.Alexander & Windham
Cylindropuntia californica var. parkeri (J.M.Coult.) Pinkava
Echinocactus polycephalus var. polycephalus
Echinocereus engelmannii var. munzii (Parish) Pierce & Fosberg
Ferocactus cylindraceus var. cylindraceus
Ferocactus viridescens var. viridescens
Opuntia auberi Pfeiff.
Githopsis diffusa subsp. candida (Ewan) Morin
Nemacladus pinnatifidus Greene
Nemacladus interior (Munz) G.T.Robbins
Nemacladus longiflorus var. longiflorus
Triodanis biflora (Ruiz & Pav.) Greene
Arenaria douglasii Fenzl ex Torr. & A.Gray
Arenaria macradenia var. parishiorum B.L.Rob.
Arenaria pusilla S.Watson
Herniaria hirsuta var. cinerea (DC.) Loret & Barrandon
Loeflingia squarrosa Nutt.
Paronychia ahartii Ertter
Polycarpon tetraphyllum subsp. tetraphyllum
Silene multinervia S.Watson
Spergularia macrotheca var. leucantha (Greene) B.L.Rob.
Stellaria pallida (Dumort.) Crép.
Atriplex lentiformis subsp. breweri (S.Watson) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Atriplex lentiformis subsp. lentiformis
Atriplex linearis S.Watson
Atriplex triangularis Willd.
Atriplex elegans var. elegans
Beta macrocarpa Guss.
Chenopodium murale L.
Chenopodium berlandieri var. sinuatum (Murr) Wahl
Dysphania pumilio (R.Br.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Monolepis spathulata A.Gray
Suaeda torreyana S.Watson
Suaeda californica var. pubescens Jeps.
Crocanthemum greenei (B.L.Rob.) Sorrie
Crocanthemum scoparium var. vulgare (Jeps.) Sorrie
Crocanthemum scoparium var. scoparium
Wislizenia refracta subsp. palmeri (A.Gray) S.Keller
Calystegia soldanella (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. tenuifolia (Abrams) Brummitt
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. intermedia (Abrams) Brummitt
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. arida (Greene) Brummitt
Cressa truxillensis var. vallicola (A.Heller) Munz
Cuscuta californica Hook. & Arn.
Aeonium arboreum var. arboreum
Dudleya blochmaniae subsp. brevifolia (Moran) Moran
Dudleya baldwinensis P.H.Thomson
Dudleya cymosa subsp. minor (Rose) Moran
Marah macrocarpa var. macrocarpa
Marah macrocarpus var. macrocarpus
Diospyros lycioides subsp. lycioides
Arctostaphylos acutifolia Eastw.
Arctostaphylos otayensis Wiesl. & Schreib.
Arctostaphylos purissima P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos intricata Howell
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana subsp. bakeri (Eastw.) J.E.Adams
Arctostaphylos glandulosa f. wieriana P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos rainbowensis J.E.Keeley & Massihi
Kalmia polifolia Wangenh.
Pyrola secunda L.
Pyrola asarifolia var. incarnata (DC.) Fernald
Chamaesyce serpens (Kunth) Small
Croton setigerus Hook.
Ditaxis neomexicana (Müll.Arg.) A.Heller
Euphorbia dendroides L.
Euphorbia micromera Boiss. ex Engelm.
Acacia saligna (Labill.) H.L.Wendl.
Acmispon dendroideus var. veatchii (Greene) Brouillet
Acmispon nevadensis var. davidsonii (Greene) Brouillet
Albizia lophantha (Vent.) Benth.
Astragalus didymocarpus var. obispoensis (Rydb.) Jeps.
Astragalus macrodon (Hook. & Arn.) A.Gray
Astragalus pachypus var. jaegeri Munz
Hosackia oblongifolia var. oblongifolius Benth.
Hosackia oblongifolia var. cuprea (Greene) Ottley
Lathyrus splendens Kellogg
Lupinus excubitus var. hallii (Abrams) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus laxiflorus Douglas ex Lindl.
Lupinus microcarpus var. microcarpus
Lupinus latifolius var. parishii C.P.Sm.
Lupinus microcarpus var. glareosus (Elmer) Riggins
Lupinus fulcratus Greene
Lupinus apertus A.Heller
Lupinus excubitus var. johnstonii C.P.Sm.
Lupinus vallicola A.Heller
Lupinus affinis J.Agardh
Lupinus latifolius var. latifolius
Lupinus excubitus var. austromontanus C.P.Sm.
Medicago minima var. pubescens Webb
Pickeringia montana var. tomentosa (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Thermopsis californica var. semota (Jeps.) C.J.Chen & B.L.Turner
Trifolium albopurpureum var. albopurpureum
Trifolium monanthum subsp. monanthum
Vicia sativa subsp. nigra Ehrh.
Notholithocarpus densiflorus var. echinoides (R.Br.ter) Manos, Cannon & S.H.Oh
Fagaceae
Eustoma exaltatum (L.) Salisb. ex G.Don
Swertia parryi (Torr.) Kuntze
Swertia albicaulis var. nitida (Benth.) Jeps.
Erodium moschatum (L.) Aiton
Erodium cicutarium (L.) L'Hér. ex Aiton
Stemodia durantifolia var. durantifolia
Ribes menziesii var. ixoderme Quick
Ribes canthariforme Wiggins
Ribes thacherianum (Jeps.) Munz
Jamesia americana var. rosea J.A.Purpus ex C.K.Schneid.
Hypericum formosum var. scouleri (Hook.) J.M.Coult.
Mentha montana Lowe ex Benth.
Monardella breweri subsp. lanceolata (A.Gray) A.C.Sanders & Elvin
Monardella undulata subsp. crispa (Elmer) Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Monardella linoides subsp. sierrae Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Lamiaceae
Monardella macrantha subsp. hallii (Abrams) Abrams
Monardella nana subsp. tenuiflora (S.Watson ex A.Gray) Abrams
Monardella stoneana Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Monardella sheltonii (Torr.) Howell
Monardella linoides subsp. erecta (Abrams) Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Monardella nana subsp. arida (H.M.Hall) Abrams
Pogogyne douglasii subsp. douglasii
Prunella vulgaris var. lanceolata (W.P.C.Barton) Fernald
Rosmarinus officinalis L.
Salvia dorrii var. pilosa (A.Gray) Strachan & Reveal
Salvia mexicana L.
Satureja chandleri (Brandegee) Druce
Scutellaria bolanderi subsp. austromontana Epling
Stachys rigida var. quercetorum (A.Heller) G.A.Mulligan & D.B.Munro
Stachys ajugoides var. ajugoides
Teucrium fruticans L.
Mentzelia obscura H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Mentzelia californica H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Mentzelia longiloba var. longiloba
Ammannia robusta Heer ex Regel
Fremontodendron californicum (Torr.) Coville
Malacothamnus densiflorus var. viscidus (Abrams) Kearney
Malva assurgentiflora subsp. assurgentiflora
Malva pseudolavatera Webb & Berthel.
Sidalcea reptans Greene
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. dolosa C.L.Hitchc.
Sidalcea hickmanii subsp. anomala C.L.Hitchc.
Sidalcea hartwegii A.Gray ex Benth.
Sphaeralcea rusbyi var. eremicola (Jeps.) Kearney
Proboscidea parviflora var. parviflora
Calandrinia menziesii (Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Claytonia palustris Swanson & Kelley
Claytonia perfoliata subsp. mexicana (Rydb.) J.M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Melaleuca citrina (Curtis) Dum.Cours.
Eucalyptus rudis Endl.
Eucalyptus grandis W.Hill ex Maiden
Fraxinus velutina var. coriacea (S.Watson) Rehder
Ligustrum sinense Lour.
Menodora scabra var. glabrescens A.Gray
Onagraceae
Camissoniopsis robusta (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Chylismia claviformis subsp. aurantiaca (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Clarkia amoena subsp. huntiana (Jeps.) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Clarkia elegans Douglas
Epilobium campestre (Jeps.) Hoch & W.L.Wagner
Oenothera xenogaura W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Gaura L.
Oenothera sinuosa W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Aphyllon cooperi subsp. latilobum (Munz) A.C.Schneid.
Castilleja miniata subsp. miniata
Castilleja exserta subsp. exserta
Castilleja minor subsp. spiralis (Jeps.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja densiflora subsp. gracilis (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja applegatei subsp. martini (Abrams) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja affinis subsp. affinis
Castilleja lasiorhyncha (A.Gray) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja rubicundula subsp. rubicundula
Castilleja affinis subsp. litoralis (Pennell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja plagiotoma A.Gray
Castilleja subinclusa subsp. subinclusa
Cordylanthus rigidus subsp. setiger T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Cordylanthus rigidus subsp. brevibracteatus (Gray) Munz
Cordylanthus tenuis subsp. tenuis
Pedicularis densiflora Benth. ex Hook.
Argemone corymbosa subsp. corymbosa
Eschscholzia papastillii Still
Diplacus aridus Abrams
Erythranthe moniliformis (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Erythranthe palmeri (A.Gray) N.S.Fraga
Erythranthe shevockii (Heckard & Bacig.) N.S.Fraga
Pittosporum viridiflorum Sims
Antirrhinum multiflorum Pennell
Antirrhinum nuttallianum Benth. ex A.DC.
Antirrhinum vexillocalyculatum subsp. breweri (A.Gray) D.M.Thomps.
Collinsia greenii A.Gray
Collinsia bartsiifolia Benth.
Penstemon azureus Benth.
Platanus racemosa Nutt.
Limonium perezii (Stapf) F.T.Hubb.
Limonium macrophyllum (Brouss.) Kuntze
Allophyllum (Nutt.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. austromontanum (T.T.Craig) H.Mason
Eriastrum diffusum subsp. diffusum
Gilia achilleifolia subsp. abrotanifolia Brand
Gilia brecciarum subsp. neglecta A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia tenuiflora subsp. tenuiflora
Gilia latiflora subsp. elongata A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia Ruiz & Pav.
Gilia nevinii A.Gray
Gilia tetrabreccia A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Leptosiphon aureus (Nutt.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Leptosiphon parviflorus (Benth.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Linanthus killipii Mason
Linanthus pungens subsp. pulchriflorus (Brand) J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Navarretia capillaris (Kellogg) Kuntze
Navarretia prolifera subsp. prolifera
Navarretia peninsularis Greene
Navarretia cotulifolia (Benth.) Hook. & Arn.
Phlox stansburyi subsp. superba (Brand) Wherry
Polygala californica Nutt.
Polygala cornuta var. fishiae (Parry) Jeps.
Chorizanthe clevelandii Parry
Chorizanthe angustifolia Nutt.
Chorizanthe polygonoides var. longispina (Goodman) Munz
Chorizanthe wheeleri S.Watson
Chorizanthe leptotheca Goodman
Emex spinosa (L.) Campd.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. furcosum Reveal
Eriogonum covilleanum Eastw.
Eriogonum nudum var. deductum (Greene) Jeps.
Eriogonum mohavense S.Watson
Eriogonum luteolum var. pedunculatum (S.Stokes) Reveal
Eriogonum spergulinum var. pratense (S.Stokes) J.T.Howell
Eriogonum umbellatum var. speciosum (Drew) S.Stokes
Eriogonum grande var. timorum Reveal
Eriogonum wrightii var. wrightii
Eriogonum microthecum var. corymbosoides Reveal
Acanthoscyphus parishii var. parishii
Aconogonon phytolaccifolium (Meisn. ex Small) Small
Polygonum aviculare subsp. neglectum (Besser) Arcang.
Rumex triangulivalvis (Danser) Rech.fil.
Rumex californicus Rech.fil.
Sidotheca trilobata (A.Gray) Reveal
Anemone baldensis L.
Clematis pauciflora Nutt.
Clematis lasiantha subsp. pauciflora (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Kuntze
Delphinium hesperium subsp. cuyamacae (Abrams) Lewis & Epling
Delphinium hansenii subsp. kernense (A.Davidson) Ewan
Delphinium purpusii Brandegee
Myosurus minimus var. apus Greene
Reseda odorata L.
Ceanothus cyaneus Eastw.
Ceanothus oliganthus var. orcuttii (Parry) Trel. ex Jeps.
Ceanothus otayensis McMinn
Colubrina californica I.M.Johnst.
Frangula californica subsp. cuspidata (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Ziziphus parryi var. parryi
Ziziphus parryi Torr.
Aruncus sylvester Kostel. ex Maxim.
Cercocarpus ledifolius var. intricatus (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Cercocarpus traskiae Eastw.
Cercocarpus betuloides Nutt.
Fragaria chiloensis (L.) Mill.
Heteromeles arbutifolia var. macrocarpa (Munz) Munz
Horkelia cuneata var. puberula (Greene) Ertter & Reveal
Horkelia sericata S.Watson
Horkelia tridentata var. tridentata
Ivesia campestris (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Lyonothamnus floribundus A.Gray
Prunus emarginata (Douglas ex Hook.) Eaton
Purshia tridentata var. glandulosa (Curran) M.E.Jones
Pyracantha Roem.
Rosa woodsii subsp. gratissima (Greene) W.H.Lewis & Ertter
Rosa pisocarpa subsp. ahartii Ertter & W.H.Lewis
Rubus glaucifolius Kellogg
Rubus ×pensilvanicus Poir.
Galium nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Galium matthewsii A.Gray
Galium angustifolium subsp. nudicaule Dempster & Stebbins
Galium grayanum var. nanum Dempster & Ehrend.
Galium californicum subsp. flaccidum Dempster & Stebbins
Galium nuttallii subsp. insulare Ferris
Galium trifidum subsp. subbiflorum (Wiegand) Piper
Galium angustifolium subsp. gracillimum Dempster & Stebbins
Galium angustifolium subsp. gabrielense (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Dempster & Stebbins
Galium angustifolium Nutt. ex A.Gray
Galium catalinense A.Gray
Galium angustifolium subsp. borregoense Dempster & Stebbins
Galium bolanderi A.Gray
Galium hilendiae Dempster & Ehrend.
Cneoridium dumosum (Nutt.) Hook.f. ex Baill.
Salix breweri Bebb
Salix parksiana Ball
Salix jepsonii C.K.Schneid.
Heuchera pilosissima Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Lithophragma heterophyllum (Hook. & Arn.) Hook. & Arn.
Scrophularia villosa Pennell
Lycium brevipes var. hassei (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Lycium brevipes var. brevipes
Physalis pubescens var. grisea Waterf.
Solanum marginatum L.fil.
Styrax officinalis L.
Tamarix gallica L.
Plectritis davyana Jeps.
Verbena lasiostachys var. scabrida Moldenke
Agave phillipsiana W.C.Hodgs.
Hesperoyucca peninsularis (McKelvey) Clary
Yucca L.
Allium cepa L.
Habranthus longifolius (Hemsl.) Flagg, G.Lom.Sm. & Meerow
Gibasis venustula subsp. peninsulae D.R.Hunt
Carex agrostoides Mack.
Cyperus elegans L.
Cyperus laevigatus L.
Cyperus fugax Liebm.
Cyperus iria L.
Cyperus flavicomus Michx.
Cyperus dipsaceus Liebm.
Fuirena simplex var. simplex
Fuirena simplex Vahl
Calochortus venustulus var. madrensis (S.Watson) Reveal & W.J.Hess
Hymenocallis pimana Laferr.
Habenaria clypeata Lindl.
Dinebra panicea subsp. brachiata (Steud.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Dinebra viscida (Scribn.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Disakisperma dubium (Kunth) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Distichlis palmeri (Vasey) Fassett
Enteropogon brandegeei (Vasey) Clayton
Eragrostis pectinacea var. miserrima (E.Fourn.) Reeder
Eragrostis reptans (Michx.) Nees
Eriochloa aristata var. aristata
Festuca bajacaliforniana Gonz.-Led. & S.D.Koch
Jouvea pilosa (J.Presl) Scribn.
Lasiacis divaricata var. divaricata
Muhlenbergia appressa Goodd.
Muhlenbergia alamosae Vasey
Panicum hirticaule var. hirticaule
Piptochaetium pringlei (Beal) Parodi
Poa bajaensis Soreng
Poa bigelovii Vasey ex Scribn.
Setaria palmeri Henrard
Sporobolus virginicus (L.) Kunth
Tuctoria fragilis (Swallen) Reeder
Urochloa fusca (Sw.) B.F.Hansen & Wunderlin
Urochloa arizonica (Scribn. & Merr.) Morrone & Zuloaga
Holographis virgata subsp. glandulifera (Leonard & C.V.Morton) T.F.Daniel
Holographis virgata subsp. virgata
Justicia insolita subsp. insolita
Justicia palmeri Rose ex Vasey & Rose
Ruellia californica subsp. peninsularis (Rose) T.F.Daniel
Ruellia leucantha subsp. leucantha
Tetramerium yaquianum T.F.Daniel
Tetramerium fruticosum Brandegee
Phaulothamnus spinescens A.Gray
Lampranthus N.E.Br.
Alternanthera stellata (Watson) Uline & Bray
Amaranthus lepturus Blake
Amaranthus viridis L.
Celosia floribunda A.Gray
Dicraurus alternifolia (S.Watson) Uline & W.L.Bray
Iresine alternifolia S.Watson
Pachycormus discolor var. pubescens (S.Watson) Gentry
Pachycormus discolor var. veatchianus (Kellogg) Gentry
Rhus trilobata var. simplicifolia (Greene) F.A.Barkley
Rhus kearneyi subsp. borjaensis Moran
Rhus kearneyi subsp. kearneyi
Rhus trilobata var. anisophylla (Greene) Jeps.
Toxicodendron radicans var. divaricatum (Greene) F.A.Barkley
Sanicula deserticola Bell
Marsdenia carterae W.D.Stevens & Juárez-Jaimes
Matelea hastulata (A.Gray) Sundell
Matelea cordifolia (A.Gray) Woodson
Seutera palmeri var. palmeri
Aralia scopulorum Brandegee
Acourtia palmeri (S.Watson) Reveal & R.M.King
Adenothamnus validus (Brandegee) D.D.Keck
Ageratina palmeri (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Aldama glomerata (Brandegee) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Ambrosia divaricata (Brandegee) Payne
Ambrosia acuminata (Brandegee) W.W.Payne
Arida coulteri (A.Gray) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Bahiopsis triangularis (M.E.Jones) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Bahiopsis lanata Kellogg
Bahiopsis subincisa (Benth.) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Brickellia amplexicaulis B.L.Rob.
Centromadia perennis Greene
Chloracantha spinosa var. spinosissima (Brandegee) S.D.Sundb.
Chrysothamnus gramineus Hall
Cirsium scariosum var. americanum (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Cirsium trachylomum S.F.Blake
Coreocarpus parthenioides var. heterocarpus (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Coreocarpus sonoranus var. sonoranus
Deinandra palmeri (Rose) B.G.Baldwin
Deinandra peninsularis (Moran) B.G.Baldwin
Deinandra streetsii (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Dieteria asteroides var. asteroides
Dieteria bigelovii var. mucronata (Greene) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Ericameria arborescens subsp. penninsularis (Moran) Urbatsch
Ericameria parryi var. nevadensis (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Eupatorium peninsulare var. peninsulare
Eupatorium peninsulare var. epipolimum B.L.Rob.
Gochnatia arborescens Brandegee
Gundlachia diffusa (Benth.) Urbatsch & R.P.Roberts
Gutierrezia ramulosa (Greene) M.A.Lane
Hazardia stenolepis (Hall) Hoover
Hazardia odontolepis (Moran) W.D.Clark
Hazardia enormidens (Moran) W.D.Clark
Heliopsis anomala (M.E.Jones) B.L.Turner
Heterosperma xantii var. xanti
Heterotheca brandegeei (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) Semple
Hieracium bolanderi A.Gray
Hofmeisteria fasciculata var. xantii A.Gray
Hofmeisteria filifolia I.M.Johnst.
Isocoma acradenia var. acradenia
Leucosyris crispa (Brandegee) Pruski & R.L.Hartm.
Malacothrix similis W.S.Davis & Raven
Malacothrix xanti A.Gray
Pectis linifolia L.
Pectis vollmeri Wiggins
Perityle incana A.Gray
Perityle aurea Rose
Perityle cuneata var. cuneata
Perityle cuneata var. marginata (Rydb.) I.M.Johnst.
Pluchea carolinensis (Jacq.) G.Don
Pluchea parvifolia (A.Gray) R.K.Godfrey
Pseudognaphalium Kirp.
Senecio flaccidus var. douglasii (DC.) B.L.Turner & T.M.Barkley
Senecio californicus var. ammophilus Greenm.
Senecio palmeri A.Gray
Sonchus tenerrimus L.
Stephanomeria monocephala Moran
Stephanomeria Nutt.
Stevia palmeri A.Gray
Symphyotrichum potosinum (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Verbesina hastata (Kellogg) Kellogg ex Curran
Verbesina oligocephala I.M.Johnst.
Verbesina pustulata M.E.Jones
Aldama purisimae (Brandegee) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Xanthisma spinulosum var. scabrellum (Greene) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Xanthisma wigginsii (S.F.Blake) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Xanthisma spinulosum subsp. gooddingii (A.Nelson) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm., 2003
Xanthocephalum eradiatum (M.A.Lane) G.L.Nesom
Xylorhiza frutescens (S.Watson) Greene
Alloberberis higginsiae (Munz) C.C.Yu & K.F.Chung
Moranothamnus claireae (Moran) C.C.Yu & K.F.Chung
Macfadyena unguis-cati (L.) A.H.Gentry
Tabebuia palmeri Rose
Amsinckia spectabilis var. spectabilis
Cryptantha maritima var. vizcainensis Rebman & M.G.Simpson
Cryptantha martirensis M.G.Simpson & Rebman
Johnstonella echinosepala (J.F.Macbr.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Cryptantha patula Greene
Johnstonella grayi var. cryptochaeta (J.F.Macbr.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Johnstonella fastigiata (I.M.Johnst.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Johnstonella angelica (I.M.Johnst.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Hackelia pinetorum var. pinetorum
Descurainia obtusa (Greene) O.E.Schulz
Draba corrugata var. demareei (Wiggins) C.L.Hitchc.
Draba bifurcata (C.L.Hitch.) Al-Shehbaz & Windham
Eruca vesicaria subsp. sativa (Mill.) Thell.
Lepidium oblongum Small
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. latifolium C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium lasiocarpum subsp. palmeri (S.Watson) Thell.
Lyrocarpa coulteri var. apiculata Rollins
Lyrocarpa coulteri var. coulteri
Lyrocarpa xantii Brandegee
Planodes virginicum (L.) Greene
Rorippa teres var. rollinsii Stuckey
Sibara laxa (S.Watson) Greene
Thysanocarpus erectus S.Watson
Bursera penicillata (Sessé & Moc.) Engl.
Bursera fagaroides var. elongata McVaugh & Rzed.
Cochemiea halei (Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Cylindropuntia bigelovii var. bigelovii
Cylindropuntia alcahes var. alcahes
Cylindropuntia waltoniorum Rebman
Cylindropuntia cedrosensis Rebman
Cylindropuntia alcahes var. gigantensis Rebman
Cylindropuntia versicolor (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Cylindropuntia californica var. rosarica (G.E.Linds.) Rebman
Cylindropuntia ×kelvinensis (V.E.Grant & K.A.Grant) P.V.Heath
Echinocereus maritimus var. hancockii (E.Y.Dawson) N.P.Taylor
Ferocactus rectispinus (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Ferocactus viridescens var. littoralis G.E.Linds.
Ferocactus chrysacanthus (Orcutt) Britton & Rose
Lophocereus schottii var. australis (Brandegee) Borg
Mammillaria brandegeei subsp. lewisiana (H.E.Gates) D.R.Hunt
Mammillaria Haw.
Mammillaria evermanniana (Britton & Rose) Orcutt
Mammillaria angelensis R.T.Craig
Opuntia burrageana Britton & Rose
Opuntia comonduensis Britton & Rose
Opuntia pycnantha Engelm. ex Coult.
Opuntia macrorhiza var. macrorhiza
Opuntia setispina Engelm. ex Salm-Dyck
Peniocereus johnstonii Britton & Rose
Lobelia cardinalis var. pseudosplendens McVaugh
Celtis ehrenbergiana (Klotzsch) Liebm.
Atamisquea emarginata Miers ex Hook. & Arn.
Symphoricarpos rotundifolius var. parishii (Rydb.) Dempster
Arenaria confusa Rydb.
Drymaria holosteoides var. holosteoides
Drymaria viscosa S.Watson
Drymaria leptophylla var. leptophylla
Drymaria debilis Brandegee
Spergularia macrotheca var. talinum (Greene) Jeps.
Schaefferia cuneifolia A.Gray
Tricerma phyllanthoides (Benth.) Lundell
Atriplex barclayana subsp. sonorae (Standl.) Hall & Clem.
Atriplex canescens var. linearis (S.Watson) Munz
Atriplex barclayana subsp. lurida (Brandegee) Hall & Clem.
Atriplex barclayana subsp. barclayana
Atriplex magdalenae Brandegee
Chenopodium neomexicanum Standl.
Chenopodium giganteum D.Don
Chenopodium arizonicum Standl.
Cleome tenuis S.Watson
Cuscuta leptantha Engelm.
Cuscuta salina var. salina
Cuscuta costaricensis Yunck.
Cuscuta umbellata var. reflexa (J.M.Coult.) Yunck.
Cuscuta americana L.
Evolvulus alsinoides (L.) L.
Ipomoea bracteata Cav.
Ipomoea ternifolia var. leptotoma (Torr.) J.A.McDonald
Merremia aurea (Kellogg) O'Donell
Merremia palmeri (S.Watson) Hallier fil.
Dudleya linearis (Greene) Britton & Rose
Dudleya nubigena subsp. cerralvensis Moran
Cucumis melo L.
Cyclanthera ribiflora (Schltdl.) Cogn.
Echinopepon cirrhopedunculatus Rose
Echinopepon minimus var. peninsularis (Gentry) Stocking
Luffa operculata var. intermedia Cogn.
Vaseyanthus insularis var. inermis I.M.Johnst.
Vaseyanthus insularis (Watson) Rose
Arctostaphylos bolensis P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos peninsularis subsp. peninsularis
Acalypha aliena Brandegee
Acalypha ostryifolia Riddell
Acalypha subviscida S.Watson
Andrachne microphylla (Lam.) Baill.
Cnidoscolus palmeri (S.Watson) Rose
Croton caboensis Croizat
Croton sonorae Torr.
Euphorbia bartolomaei Greene
Euphorbia californica var. californica
Euphorbia polycarpa var. carmenensis (Rose) L.C.Wheeler
Euphorbia chersonesa Huft
Euphorbia pumicicola Huft
Euphorbia dentosa I.M.Johnst.
Euphorbia petrina S.Watson
Euphorbia trachysperma Engelm.
Euphorbia lagunensis Huft
Jatropha canescens (Benth.) Müll.Arg.
Manihot isoloba Standl.
Manihot chlorosticta Standl. & Goldman
Pedilanthus macrocarpus Benth.
Tragia nepetifolia var. dissecta Müll.Arg.
Tragia jonesii Radcl.-Sm. & Govaerts
Acaciella angustissima var. filicioides (Cav.) L.Rico
Acmispon argyraeus (Greene) Brouillet
Aeschynomene nivea Brandegee
Astragalus anemophilus Greene
Brongniartia peninsularis Rose
Caesalpinia arenosa Wiggins
Caesalpinia pannosa Brandegee
Calliandra peninsularis Rose
Chamaecrista leptadenia (Greenm.) Cockerell
Cologania scandens Rose
Dalea leporina (Aiton) Bullock
Desmanthus fruticosus Rose
Desmodium procumbens var. exiguum (A.Gray) B.G.Schub.
Errazurizia benthamii (Brandegee) I.M.Johnst.
Eysenhardtia peninsularis Brandegee
Hoffmannseggia intricata Brandegee
Indigofera suffruticosa Mill.
Lupinus niveus S.Watson
Lupinus latifolius var. wigginsii C.P.Sm.
Marina oculata (Rydb.) Barneby
Marina peninsularis (Rose) Barneby
Marina orcuttii var. campanea Barneby
Marina divaricata (Benth.) Barneby
Marina interstes Barneby
Mariosousa coulteri (Benth.) Seigler & Ebinger
Neptunia plena (L.) Benth.
Phaseolus vulgaris L.
Pithecellobium confine Standl.
Psoralea rigida Parish
Senna obtusifolia (L.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Sesbania herbacea (Mill.) McVaugh
Sphinctospermum constrictum (S.Watson) Rose
Trifolium palmeri S.Watson
Vachellia brandegeeana (I.M.Johnst.) Seigler & Ebinger
Vachellia farnesiana var. minuta (M.E.Jones) Seigler & Ebinger
Garrya grisea Wiggins
Mecardonia exilis (Brandegee) Pennell
Hydrangea villosa Rehder
Condea tephrodes (A.Gray) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Hyptis tephrodes A.Gray
Hyptis laniflora Benth.
Hyptis emoryi var. emoryi
Lepechinia caulescens (Ortega) Epling
Monardella breweri subsp. microcephala (A.Gray) Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Monardella thymifolia Greene
Salvia similis Brandegee
Salvia californica Brandegee
Salvia galinsogifolia Fernald
Stachys tenerrima Epling
Eucnide rupestris (Baill.) H.J.Thomps. & W.R.Ernst
Mentzelia montana (A.Davidson) A.Davidson
Mentzelia multiflora subsp. longiloba (Darl.) Felger
Mentzelia nesiotes (I.M.Johnst.) Brokaw & J.J.Schenk
Galphimia angustifolia Benth.
Abutilon trisulcatum (Jacq.) Urb.
Anoda crenatiflora Ortega
Anoda palmata Fryxell
Ayenia jaliscana S.Watson
Gossypium armourianum Kearney
Gossypium harknessii Brandegee
Horsfordia rotundifolia S.Watson
Malva pacifica M.F.Ray
Sida xanti A.Gray
Sida rhombifolia L.
Sida alamosana S.Watson ex Rose
Sphaeralcea hainesii Brandegee
Sphaeralcea sulphurea S.Watson
Sphaeralcea axillaris var. axillaris
Sphaeralcea axillaris var. violacea (Rose) Wiggins
Sphaeralcea coulteri subsp. californica (Rose) Kearney
Cistanthe guadalupensis (Dudley) Carolin ex Hershk.
Ficus palmeri S.Watson
Myrtus communis L.
Abronia maritima subsp. maritima
Boerhavia gracillima Heimerl
Commicarpus brandegei (Standl.) Standl.
Schoepfia californica Brandegee
Fraxinus ornus L.
Fraxinus papillosa Lingelsh.
Menodora scabra var. scabra
Epilobium fendleri Hausskn.
Eulobus sceptrostigma (Brandegee) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Lopezia clavata Brandegee
Oenothera wigginsii W.M.Klein
Oenothera arizonica (Munz) W.L.Wagner
Xylonagra arborea subsp. wigginsii Munz
Xylonagra arborea (Kellogg) Donn.Sm. & Rose
Castilleja bryantii T.S.Brandegee
Castilleja ambigua subsp. ambigua
Cordylanthus rigidus subsp. involutus (Wiggins) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Argemone subintegrifolia G.B.Ownbey
Eschscholzia palmeri Rose
Hunnemannia fumariifolia Sweet
Passiflora pentaschista (Killip) H.T.Svoboda
Erythranthe exigua (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Erythranthe lagunensis G.L.Nesom
Phyllanthus gypsicola McVaugh
Pittosporum erioloma C.Moore & F.Muell.
Antirrhinum watsonii Vasey & Rose
Pseudorontium cyathiferum (Benth.) Rothm.
Penstemon spectabilis var. subinteger (D.D.Keck) C.C.Freeman
Acanthogilia gloriosa (Brandegee) A.G.Day & Moran
Bryantiella palmeri (S.Watson) J.M.Porter
Gilia capitata subsp. pacifica V.E.Grant
Ipomopsis guttata (A.Gray) Moran
Ipomopsis pinnata (Cav.) V.E.Grant
Leptosiphon pygmaeus subsp. pygmaeus
Loeselia glandulosa (Cav.) G.Don
Chorizanthe jonesiana Goodman
Eriogonum pilosum S.Stokes
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. flavoviride Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum angelense Moran
Eriogonum pondii var. pondii
Eriogonum orcuttianum S.Watson
Eriogonum galioides I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum hastatum Wiggins
Eriogonum wrightii var. taxifolium (Greene) Parish
Eriogonum intricatum Benth.
Eriogonum wrightii var. dentatum (S.Stokes) Reveal
Harfordia macroptera var. fruticosa (Greene) Reveal
Harfordia macroptera var. galioides (Greene) Reveal
Rumex inconspicuus Rech.fil.
Portulaca californica D.Legrand
Portulaca umbraticola subsp. lanceolata (Engelm.) J.F.Matthews & Ketron
Ceanothus greggii var. greggii
Ziziphus obtusifolia (Hook. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Gray
Ziziphus obtusifolia var. canescens (Gray) M.C.Johnst.
Horkelia clevelandii var. brevibracteata (Wiggins) Ertter & Reveal
Ivesia argyrocoma var. moranii Ertter & Reveal
Prunus fasciculata var. fasciculata
Rosa minutifolia Engelm.
Vauquelinia californica subsp. californica
Carterella alexanderae (A.M.Carter) Terrell
Diodella teres (Walter) Small
Galium moranii subsp. aculeolatum (Dempster) Dempster
Randia sonorensis Wiggins
Stenotis brevipes (Rose) Terrell
Amyris carterae Rebman & F.Chiang
Esenbeckia flava Brandegee
Ruta chalepensis L.
Paullinia sonorensis S.Watson
Sideroxylon leucophyllum S.Watson
Heuchera rubescens var. versicolor (Greene) M.G.Stewart
Buddleja sessiliflora Kunth
Buddleja corrugata subsp. gentryi E.M.Norman
Castela peninsularis Rose
Castela polyandra Moran & Felger
Capsicum annuum L.
Lycium megacarpum Wiggins
Lycium macrodon A.Gray
Lycium fremontii var. fremontii
Lycopersicon esculentum Mill.
Physalis glabra Benth.
Solanum grayi Rose
Solanum erianthum D.Don
Solanum nigrescens M.Martens & Galeotti
Aloysia barbata (Brandegee) Moldenke
Lippia palmeri var. spicata Rose
Lippia palmeri var. palmeri
Priva lappulacea (L.) Pers.
Verbena orcuttiana L.M.Perry
Fagonia californica Benth.
Fagonia palmeri Vasey & Rose
Fagonia densa I.M.Johnst.
Fagonia villosa D.M.Porter
Viscainoa geniculata var. geniculata
Lemna L.
Bolboschoenus maritimus var. paludosus (A.Nelson) Dorn
Digitaria ciliaris var. ciliaris
Stipa speciosa Trin. & Rupr.
Alloberberis nevinii (A.Gray ex A.Gray & S.Watson) C.C.Yu & K.F.Chung
Chenopodium capitatum (L.) Ambrosi
Cyperus strigosus L.
Juncus phaeocephalus var. paniculatus Engelm.
Hordeum intercedens Nevski
Verbena litoralis Kunth
Hydrocotyle Hydrocotyle
Chenopodium macrospermum Hook.fil.
Verbena L.
Astragalus nevinii A.Gray
Artemisia nesiotica Raven
Gamochaeta purpurea (L.) Cabrera
Hesperolinon disjunctum H.Sharsm.
Datura arenicola Gentry ex Bye & Luna
Senecio angustifolius (Thunb.) Willd.
Delphinium variegatum subsp. kinkiense (Munz) M.J.Warnock
Chlorogalum pomeridianum var. pomeridianum
Cyperus esculentus var. leptostachyus Boeckeler
Arctostaphylos australis Eastw.
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. emphereium Reveal
Aristida californica var. glabrata Vasey
Achillea millefolium var. californica (Pollard) Jeps.
Chenopodium strictum var. glaucophyllum (Aellen) Wahl
Eleocharis coloradoensis (Britton) Gilly
Xanthisma incisifolium (I.M.Johnst.) G.L.Nesom
Lobelia dunnii var. serrata (A.Gray) McVaugh
Malva verticillata var. crispa L.
Arctostaphylos pechoensis (Abrams) Dudley ex Eastw.
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi var. saxicola Roof
Ficus retusa L.
Cissus antarctica Vent.
Agave salmiana Otto ex Salm-Dyck
Panicum hirticaule subsp. hirticaule
Eucalyptus eremophila (Diels) Maiden
Hermannia verticillata P.J.Bergius ex Schum.
Ficus sycomorus L.
Hibiscus L.
Trifolium bocconei Savi
Phyllanthus L.
Agave L.
Wolffiella lingulata (Hegelm.) Hegelm.
Bolboschoenus robustus (Pursh) Soják
Carex sartwelliana Olney
Cyperus esculentus subsp. heermannii (Buckley) Britton
Eleocharis bernardina (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Eleocharis pachycarpa É.Desv.
Isolepis cernua var. cernua
Schoenoplectus subterminalis (Torr.) Soják
Juncus phaeocephalus Engelm.
Triglochin striata Ruiz & Pav.
Trillium sessile var. californicum S.Watson
Aristida purpurea var. wrightii (Nash) Allred
Avena sterilis L.
Bromus arizonicus (Shear) Stebbins
Crypsis Aiton
Poa thomasii Refulio
Elymus gouldii J.P.Sm. & Columbus
Eragrostis mexicana subsp. virescens (J.Presl) S.D.Koch & Sánchez Vega
Eragrostis pilosa subsp. pilosa
Hainardia cylindrica (Willd.) Greuter
Orcuttia pilosa Hoover
Panicum miliaceum subsp. miliaceum
Panicum acuminatum var. fasciculatum (Torr.) Beetle
Poa atropurpurea Scribn.
Stenotaphrum secundatum (Walter) Kuntze
Stipa parishii Vasey
Stipa thurberiana Piper
Stipa parishii var. parishii
Stuckenia striata (Ruiz & Pav.) Holub
Cypselea humifusa Turpin
Galenia pubescens (Eckl. & Zeyh.) Druce
Malephora crocea var. crocea
Apium nodiflorum (L.) Lag.
Cymopterus terebinthinus var. petraeus (Jones) Goodrich
Ambrosia salsola var. pentalepis (Rydb.) Strother & B.G.Baldwin
Artemisia tridentata subsp. parishii (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Centromadia pungens subsp. pungens
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. denudata (Nutt.) Munz
Cirsium scariosum var. citrinum (Petr.) D.J.Keil
Deinandra halliana (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Dieteria asteroides var. lagunensis (D.D.Keck) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Ericameria nauseosa var. leiosperma (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Erigeron breweri A.Gray
Erigeron breweri var. covillei (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Erigeron foliosus Nutt.
Eriophyllum lanatum var. obovatum (Greene) Hall
Eriophyllum lanatum var. grandiflorum (A.Gray) Jeps.
Heliomeris multiflora var. nevadensis (A.Nelson) Yates
Hulsea brevifolia A.Gray
Lasthenia minor (DC.) Ornduff
Leptosyne stillmanii Gray
Lessingia pectinata var. pectinata
Leucosyris carnosa (A.Gray) Pruski & R.L.Hartm.
Microseris elegans Greene ex A.Gray
Microseris sylvatica (Benth.) Sch.Bip.
Packera eurycephala (Torr. & A.Gray) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Volutaria muricata (L.) Maire
Wyethia angustifolia var. foliosa (Congdon) H.M.Hall
Anredera cordifolia (Ten.) Steenis
Amsinckia spectabilis var. microcarpa (Greene) Jeps. & Hoover
Cryptantha corollata (I.M.Johnst.) I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha nemaclada Greene
Echium fastuosum Herb.Banks ex Link
Plagiobothrys undulatus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys fulvus (Hook. & Arn.) I.M.Johnst.
Caulanthus heterophyllus var. pseudosimulans R.E.Buck
Draba corrugata var. corrugata
Nasturtium gambelii (S.Watson) O.E.Schulz
Opuntia robusta H.L.Wendl. ex Pfeiff.
Asyneuma prenanthoides (Durand) McVaugh
Downingia montana Greene
Symphoricarpos vaccinioides Rydb.
Arenaria ursina B.L.Rob.
Arenaria macradenia subsp. macradenia
Silene occidentalis S.Watson
Atriplex serenana A.Nelson ex Abrams
Atriplex argentea var. expansa (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Atriplex cordulata Jeps.
Atriplex longitrichoma Stutz, G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.
Chenopodium rubrum var. rubrum
Salsola gobicola Iljin
Suaeda torreyana var. ramosissima (Standl.) Munz
Calystegia macrostegia subsp. longiloba (Abrams) Brummitt
Calystegia sepium subsp. binghamiae (Greene) Brummitt
Cuscuta suksdorfii Yunck.
Dudleya matsonii P.H.Thomson
Dudleya nesiotica (Moran) Moran
Marah macrocarpa var. major (Dunn) Stocking
Elatine californica A.Gray
Arctostaphylos hispidula Howell
Arctostaphylos densiflora M.S.Baker
Arctostaphylos patula subsp. platyphylla (A.Gray) P.V.Wells
Cassiope mertensiana (Bong.) G.Don
Comarostaphylis diversifolia subsp. planifolia (Jeps.) G.Wallace ex Thorne
Pyrola rotundifolia L.
Pyrola picta f. aphylla (Sm.) Camp
Chamaesyce polycarpa (Benth.) Millsp.
Ditaxis claryana (Jeps.) G.L.Webster
Acacia murrayana F.Muell. ex Benth.
Acmispon haydonii (Orcutt) Brouillet
Acmispon cytisoides (Benth.) Brouillet
Cassia artemisioides Gaudich. ex DC.
Genista monosperma (L.) Lam.
Lathyrus jepsonii var. californicus (S.Watson) Hoover
Lupinus arboreus var. eximius (Davy) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus torreyi A.Gray ex S.Watson
Lupinus menziesii J.Agardh
Lupinus nanus var. menkerae C.P.Sm.
Lupinus latifolius var. longipes (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus palmeri S.Watson
Lupinus albifrons var. collinus Greene
Prosopis glandulosa var. glandulosa
Trifolium monoense Greene
Trifolium gracilentum var. gracilentum
Vicia gigantea Hook.
Garrya flavescens subsp. pallida (Eastw.) Dahling
Garrya flavescens subsp. flavescens
Microcala quadrangularis (Lam.) Griseb.
Geranium concinnum G.N.Jones & F.F.Jones
Pelargonium L'Hér.
Ribes sanguineum var. glutinosum (Benth.) Loudon
Ribes sanguineum var. sanguineum
Juglans californica var. californica
Acanthomintha obovata Jeps.
Monardella nana subsp. nana
Monardella nana subsp. leptosiphon (Torr.) Abrams
Prunella vulgaris var. vulgaris
Stachys stricta Greene
Teucrium cubense subsp. depressum (Small) E.M.McClint. & Epling
Limnanthes alba subsp. alba
Hesperolinon bicarpellatum (H.Sharsm.) H.Sharsm.
Mentzelia desertorum (Davidson) H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Iliamna bakeri (Jeps.) Wiggins
Malacothamnus jonesii (Munz) Kearney
Sidalcea asprella subsp. asprella
Sidalcea ranunculacea Greene
Castilla Cerv.
Eucalyptus tereticornis Sm.
Eucalyptus cornuta Labill.
Boerhavia triquetra S.Watson
Ligustrum L.
Camissoniopsis intermedia (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Chylismia brevipes subsp. arizonica (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Clarkia xantiana A.Gray
Epilobium glaberrimum subsp. glaberrimum
Eremothera boothii subsp. intermedia (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Gayophytum A.Juss.
Oenothera caespitosa Nutt.
Oenothera caespitosa subsp. marginata (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) Munz
Castilleja mollis Pennell
Cordylanthus pilosus subsp. pilosus
Canbya candida Parry ex A.Gray
Fumaria parviflora Lam.
Diplacus leptaleus (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Erythranthe montioides (A.Gray) N.S.Fraga
Mimulus brevipes Benth.
Tetracoccus ilicifolius Coville & Gilman
Keckiella rothrockii (A.Gray) Straw
Penstemon speciosus Douglas ex Lindl.
Penstemon floridus Brandegee
Penstemon spectabilis var. subviscosus (D.D.Keck) McMinn
Plantago erecta subsp. erecta
Eriastrum sapphirinum subsp. brevibracteatum S.J.De Groot
Eriastrum pluriflorum subsp. sherman-hoytae (T.T.Craig) Mason
Gilia latiflora (A.Gray) Gray
Gilia capitata subsp. staminea (Greene) V.E.Grant
Gilia cana subsp. bernardina A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. vivida (A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia millefoliata Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Leptosiphon pachyphyllus (R.Patt.) M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Linanthus pungens subsp. hallii (Parish) J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Navarretia leucocephala subsp. plieantha (H.Mason) A.G.Day
Navarretia myersii P.S.Allen & A.G.Day
Navarretia leptalea subsp. leptalea
Phlox diffusa subsp. subcarinata Wherry
Eriogonum umbellatum var. juniporinum Reveal
Acanthoscyphus parishii var. goodmaniana (Ertter) Reveal
Sidotheca caryophylloides (Parry) Reveal
Persicaria hydropiper (L.) Opiz
Anemone deltoidea Hook.
Delphinium uliginosum Curran
Delphinium kinkiense Munz
Delphinium parryi subsp. maritimum (Davidson) M.J.Warnock
Delphinium inopinum (Jeps.) Lewis & Epling
Ranunculus cymbalaria subsp. saximontanus (Fernald) Thorne
Ceanothus foliosus Parry
Rhamnaceae
Aruncus vulgaris (Maxim.) Raf. ex H.Hara
Holodiscus discolor var. glabrescens (Greenm.) Jeps.
Horkelia cuneata var. cuneata
Potentilla andersonii Greene
Potentilla pensylvanica var. strigosa Pursh
Prunus punctata (Jeps.) Hoover
Pyracantha koidzumii (Hayata) Rehder
Galium hypotrichium subsp. tomentellum Ehrend.
Galium hallii Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Salicaceae
Salix exigua var. hindsiana (Benth.) Dorn
Heuchera brevistaminea Wiggins
Myoporum montanum R.Br.
Lycium pallidum var. oligospermum C.L.Hitchc.
Physalis hederifolia var. palmeri (A.Gray) Cronquist
Physalis greenei Vasey & Rose
Solanum furcatum Poir.
Ulmus minor Mill.
Viola blanda Willd.
Fagonia longipes Standl.
Larrea tridentata var. arenaria L.D.Benson
Agave cerulata subsp. cerulata
Agave subsimplex Trel.
Agave shawii subsp. goldmaniana (Trel.) Gentry
Allium eurotophilum Wiggins
Nothoscordum bivalve (L.) Britton
Habranthus arenicola (Brandegee) Flagg, G.Lom.Sm. & Meerow
Brahea aculeata (Brandegee) H.E.Moore
Tillandsia erubescens var. erubescens
Cyperus perennis (M.E.Jones) O'Neill
Cyperus pallidicolor (Kük.) G.C.Tucker
Aristida schiedeana var. orcuttiana (Vasey) Allred & Valdés-Reyna
Aristida schiedeana Trin. & Rupr.
Bouteloua hirsuta subsp. hirsuta
Bromus carinatus var. marginatus Hitchc. ex Scoggan
Cenchrus spinifex Cav.
Cynodon dactylon var. dactylon
Eragrostis lugens Nees
Hackelochloa granularis (L.) Kuntze
Hilaria belangeri var. longifolia (Vasey ex Beal) Hitchc.
Luziola gracillima Prodoehl
Panicum alatum var. alatum
Paspalum langei (E.Fourn.) Nash
Sorghastrum nutans (L.) Nash
Tripsacum lanceolatum E.Fourn.
Behria tenuiflora Greene
Triteleia guadalupensis L.W.Lenz
Justicia masiaca T.F.Daniel
Tetramerium abditum (Brandegee) T.F.Daniel
Amaranthus torreyi (A.Gray) S.Watson
Iresine calea (Ibáñez) Standl.
Eryngium L.
Lomatium mohavense subsp. longilobum Theob.
Sanicula moranii P.Vargas, Constance & B.G.Baldwin
Cynanchum ligulatum (Benth.) Woodson
Mandevilla hesperia (I.M.Johnst.) A.O.Simões, Kin.-Gouv. & M.E.Endress
Vallesia laciniata Brandegee
Bahiopsis microphylla (Vasey & Rose) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Bajacalia tridentata (Benth.) Loockerman, B.L.Turner & R.K.Jansen
Blumea viscosa (Mill.) V.M.Badillo
Brickellia brandegeei B.L.Rob.
Brickellia floribunda A.Gray
Chaptalia texana Greene
Coreocarpus parthenioides var. involutus (Greene) E.B.Sm.
Deinandra martirensis (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Encelia frutescens subsp. glandulosa C.Clark
Erigeron multiceps Greene
Eupatorium peninsulare Brandegee
Hazardia ferrisiae (S.F.Blake) W.D.Clark
Laennecia eriophylla (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Milleria quinqueflora L.
Parthenice mollis var. peninsularis Sauck
Perityle crassifolia var. crassifolia
Senecio cedrosensis Greene
Senecio martirensis T.M.Barkley
Stephanomeria guadalupensis Brandegee
Stephanomeria schottii (A.Gray) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Verbesina palmeri subsp. oligocephala (I.M.Johnst.) Felger
Alloberberis fremontii (Torr.) C.C.Yu & K.F.Chung
Johnstonella grayi var. grayi
Johnstonella grayi var. nesiotica (I.M.Johnst.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Johnstonella grayi (Vasey & Rose) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Plagiobothrys collinus var. ursinus (A.Gray) Higgins
Descurainia adenophora (Wooton & Standl.) O.E.Schulz
Draba reptans (Lam.) Fernald
Physaria fendleri (A.Gray) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Lyrocarpa linearifolia Rollins
Bursera confusa (Rose) Engl.
Burseraceae
Cochemiea setispina (J.M.Coult.) Walton
Cylindropuntia ganderi var. catavinensis Rebman
Echinocereus websterianus G.E.Linds.
Ferocactus peninsulae var. peninsulae
Mammillaria neopalmeri R.T.Craig
Opuntia ×spinosibacca Anthony
Lobelia dunnii var. dunnii
Drymaria glandulosa var. glandulosa
Silene scouleri subsp. pringlei (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Chenopodium amaranticolor (H.J.Coste & A.Reyn.) H.J.Coste & A.Reyn.
Cleome melanocarpa S.Watson
Peritoma jonesii (J.F.Macbr.) Iltis
Wislizenia refracta var. palmeri (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Cuscuta corymbosa Juss. ex Engelm.
Cuscuta desmouliniana Yunck.
Ipomoea scopulorum Brandegee
Jacquemontia polyantha (Cham. & Schltdl.) Hallier fil.
Merremia dissecta (Jacq.) Hallier fil.
Dudleya pulverulenta subsp. arizonica (Rose) Moran
Dudleya rubens (Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Dudleya brevipes Rose ex Britton & Rose
Sedum alamosanum S.Watson
Cucumis melo var. dudaim (L.) Naudin
Echinopepon minimus var. minimus
Marah guadalupensis (S.Watson) Greene
Bergia texana (Hook.) Seub. ex Walp.
Acalypha mexicana Müll.Arg.
Croton ciliatoglandulifer Ortega
Euphorbia leucophylla subsp. leucophylla
Euphorbia polycarpa var. johnstonii L.C.Wheeler
Euphorbia polycarpa var. mejamia L.C.Wheeler
Jatropha vernicosa Brandegee
Tragia Plum. ex L.
Acmispon utahensis (Ottley) Brouillet
Acmispon flexuosus (Greene) Brouillet
Astragalus idrietorum Barneby
Astragalus piscinus (Rydb.) Barneby
Caesalpinia placida Brandegee
Chamaecrista nictitans var. mensalis (Greenm.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Chloroleucon mangense var. leucospermum (Brandegee) Barneby & J.W.Grimes
Coursetia caribaea var. caribaea
Dalea elata Hook. & Arn.
Desmodium psilocarpum A.Gray
Desmodium glabrum (Mill.) DC.
Galactia striata (Jacq.) Urb.
Hosackia alamosana Rose
Lupinus hyacinthinus C.F.Baker
Marina diffusa (Moric.) Barneby
Pithecellobium Mart.
Rhynchosia minima (L.) DC.
Senegalia peninsularis Britton & Rose
Senna polyantha (Collad.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Vicia hassei S.Watson
Quercus albocincta Trel.
Quercus viminea Trel.
Geranium atropurpureum A.Heller
Pelargonium ×hortorum L.H.Bailey
Mecardonia vandellioides (Kunth) Pennell
Philadelphus occidentalis A.Nelson
Illicium anisatum L.
Clinopodium brownei (Sw.) Kuntze
Hedeoma martirensis Moran
Monardella lagunensis subsp. mediopeninsularis Moran
Salvia platycheila A.Gray
Salvia peninsularis Brandegee
Salvia hispanica L.
Salvia misella Kunth
Satureja ganderi Epling
Eucnide aurea (A.Gray) H.J.Thomps. & W.R.Ernst
Heimia salicifolia (Kunth) Link
Lythrum acinifolium (Moc. & Sessé)
Echinopterys eglandulosa (A.Juss.) Small
Galphimia glauca Cav.
Abutilon barrancae M.E.Jones
Ayenia insulicola Cristóbal
Ayenia glabra S.Watson
Ayenia mexicana Turcz.
Heliocarpus attenuatus S.Watson
Hermannia palmeri Rose
Hibiscus acicularis Standl.
Malva lindsayi (Moran) M.F.Ray
Malvastrum bicuspidatum subsp. bicuspidatum
Melochia speciosa S.Wats
Melochia tomentosa var. tomentosa
Sphaeralcea palmeri Rose
Sphaeralcea ambigua subsp. versicolor Kearney
Sphaeralcea coulteri var. coulteri
Sphaeralcea coulteri subsp. margaritae (Brandegee) Kearney
Triumfetta discolor Rose
Proboscidea parviflora subsp. parviflora
Cissampelos pareira L.
Calyptridium martirense (Guilliams, M.G.Simpson & Rebman) Hershk.
Vanieria tricuspidata (Carrière) Hu
Abronia carterae Ferris
Mirabilis oligantha (Standl.) Standl.
Mirabilis triflora Benth.
Camissoniopsis guadalupensis subsp. guadalupensis
Eulobus angelorum (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Castilleja fruticosa Moran
Castilleja ophiocephala Tank & J.M.Egger
Argemone mexicana L.
Erythranthe arvensis (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Pittosporum ferrugineum Dryand. ex Aiton
Antirrhinum costatum Wiggins
Penstemon wislizenii (A.Gray) Straw
Russelia retrorsa Greene
Eriastrum eremicum subsp. markianum S.J.De Groot
Leptosiphon laxus (Vasey & Rose) M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Polygala magdalenae Brandegee
Rhinotropis desertorum (Brandegee) J.R.Abbott
Chorizanthe chaetophora Goodman
Chorizanthe inequalis S.Stokes
Eriogonum austrinum (S.Stokes) Reveal
Eriogonum zapatoense Moran
Eriogonum repens (S.Stokes) Reveal
Thalictrum fendleri var. quadrinervatum B.Boivin
Condalia brandegeei I.M.Johnst.
Sageretia wrightii S.Watson
Adenostoma fasciculatum var. obtusifolium S.Watson
Prunus gentryi Standl.
Galium volcanense Dempster
Galium proliferum A.Gray
Stenotis mucronata (Benth.) Terrell
Stenotis gracilenta (I.M.Johnst.) Terrell
Sideroxylon occidentale (Hemsl.) T.D.Penn.
Lycium andersonii var. deserticola (C.L.Hitchc.) C.L.Hitchc. ex Munz
Physalis crassifolia var. infundibularis I.M.Johnst.
Physalis L.
Physalis pruinosa L.
Solanum madrense Fernald
Solanum umbellatum Mill.
Bouchea prismatica (L.) Kuntze
Lantana horrida Kunth
Lippia gentryi Standl.
Verbena officinalis L.
Verbena calinfera G.L.Nesom
Hybanthus fruticulosus var. fruticulosus
Cissus tiliacea Kunth
Tribulus cistoides L.
Stipa lemmonii var. lemmonii
Plagiobothrys canescens var. canescens
Extriplex joaquiniana (A.Nelson) E.H.Zacharias
Tragia amblyodonta (Müll.Arg.) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Anagallis monellii L.
Mimulus bigelovii var. bigelovii
Eriogonum umbellatum var. ahartii Reveal
Populus fremontii var. fremontii
Descurainia pinnata subsp. menziesii (DC.) Detling
Grusonia pulchella (Engelm.) H.Rob.
Mentha xsmithiana R.A.Graham
Salix lucida var. caudata (Nutt.) Cronquist
Mortonia utahensis (Coville) A.Nelson
Arctostaphylos viridissima (Eastw.) McMinn
Pectocarya linearis var. ferocula I.M.Johnst.
Funastrum cynanchoides var. hartwegii (Vail) Krings
Lagophylla diabolensis B.G.Baldwin
Monardella douglasii Benth.
Githopsis diffusa subsp. diffusa
Glandularia aristigera (S.Moore) Tronc.
Sorghum bicolor subsp. drummondii (Nees ex Steud.) de Wet ex Davidse
Xylorhiza tortifolia var. tortifolia
Washingtonia H.Wendl.
Cryptantha maritima var. cedrosensis (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Lomatium dasycarpum var. dasycarpum
Kyllinga brevifolia Rottb.
Euphorbia monteiroi Hook.f.
Syzygium paniculatum Gaertn.
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi subsp. coactilis (Fernald & J.F.Macbr.) Á.Löve, D.Löve & B.M.Kapoor
Tipuana tipu (Benth.) Kuntze
Phyllostachys nigra (Lodd. ex Lindl.) Munro
Schrebera alata (Hochst.) Welw.
Lotus eriosolen (Maire) Mader & Podlech
Agave zebra Gentry
Solanum rantonnetii Carrière ex Lesc.
Modiolastrum lateritum (Hook.) Krapov.
Clausena lansium (Lour.) Skeels
Lycianthes (Dunal) Hassl.
Schefflera actinophylla (Endl.) Harms
Camassia Lindl.
Sagittaria montevidensis subsp. calycina (Engelm.) Bogin
Carex scopulorum Holm
Cyperus difformis L.
Melasphaerula ramosa (L.) Klatt
Sisyrinchium funereum E.P.Bicknell
Juncus capillaris F.J.Herm.
Triglochin concinna var. debilis (M.E.Jones) J.T.Howell
Calochortus maweanus Leichtlin ex Baker
Haworthia fasciata (Willd.) Haw.
Lilium Tourn. ex L.
Arundo donax var. variegata E.Vilm.
Avena L.
Briza major C.Presl
Bromus orcuttianus Vasey
Bromus japonicus Thunb. ex Murray
Crypsis vaginiflora (Forssk.) Opiz
Elymus ponticus (Podp.) N.Snow
Melica aristata Thurb. ex Bol.
Oryza sativa L.
Panicum hillmanii Chase
Phragmites australis var. berlandieri (E.Fourn.) C.F.Reed
Phyllostachys aurea (André) Rivière & C.Rivière
Schismus P.Beauv.
Sorghum bicolor subsp. bicolor
Stipa webberi (Thurb.) B.L.Johnson
Monochoria vaginalis (Burm.f.) C.Presl
Tofieldia glutinosa subsp. occidentalis (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Zostera marina f. typica Setch
Lampranthus tenuifolius (L.) N.E.Br.
Malephora crocea subsp. purpureocrocea (Haw.) Jacobsen
Anacardiaceae
Rhus aromatica var. aromatica
Anthemis nobilis L.
Benitoa occidentalis (H.M.Hall) D.D.Keck
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. orcuttiana (Greene) Hall
Chrysanthemoides monilifera subsp. monilifera
Crepis pleurocarpa Gray
Deinandra increscens subsp. villosa (Tanowitz) B.G.Baldwin
Ericameria parryi var. latior (H.M.Hall & Clem.) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Ericameria arborescens subsp. arborescens
Erigeron parishii A.Gray
Erigeron lassenianus var. lassenianus
Eriophyllum caespitosum Douglas ex Lindl.
Helianthus ciliaris DC.
Hemizonia congesta subsp. clevelandii (Greene) Babc. & H.M.Hall
Hieracium cynoglossoides Arv. ex A.Gray
Hieracium argutum Nutt.
Lasthenia glabrata Lindl.
Lasthenia californica subsp. macrantha (A.Gray) R.Chan
Psilactis coulteri A.Gray
Pyrrocoma lanceolata var. subviscosa (Greene) Mayes ex G.K.Br. & D.J.Keil
Scorzonella nutans Hook.
Senecio quadridentatus Labill.
Senecio linearis DC.
Symphyotrichum subulatum var. elongatum (Boss. ex A.G.Jones & Lowry) S.D.Sundb.
Tetradymia argyraea Munz & Roos
Greeneocharis circumscissa var. circumscissa
Cryptantha muricata var. muricata
Cryptantha pterocarya var. stenoloba I.M.Johnst.
Oreocarya tumulosa Payson
Cynoglossum occidentale A.Gray
Plagiobothrys torreyi var. torreyi
Plagiobothrys reticulatus var. rossianorum I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys uncinatus Howell
Plagiobothrys torreyi var. diffusus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Boechera pygmaea (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Boechera repanda (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz
Descurainia incisa subsp. incisa
Draba saxosa Davidson
Sisymbrium erysimoides Desf.
Echinocactus polycephalus Engelm. & Bigelow
Opuntia dejecta Salm-Dyck
Githopsis pulchella Vatke
Nemacladus secundiflorus G.T.Robbins
Arenaria nuttallii var. gracilis B.L.Rob.
Arenaria macradenia var. kuschei (Eastw.) Maguire
Minuartia californica (Gray) Mattf.
Silene verecunda subsp. platyota (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Atriplex nummularia Lindl.
Atriplex coronata S.Watson
Atriplex canescens var. macilenta Jeps.
Beta vulgaris subsp. maritima (L.) Arcang.
Kochia scoparia subsp. scoparia
Convolvulus mauritanicus Boiss.
Dudleya tegelbergii P.H.Thomson
Sedum niveum Davidson
Hibbertia scandens (Willd.) Gilg
Elatine chilensis Gay
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. wieslanderi P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos parryana subsp. parryana
Chamaesyce setiloba (Engelm. ex Torr.) Norton
Alhagi pseudalhagi (M.Bieb.) Desv. ex B.Keller & Shap.
Caesalpinia gilliesii (Hook.) D.Dietr.
Inga feuillei DC.
Lupinus lapidicola A.Heller
Lupinus adsurgens Drew
Psorothamnus arborescens var. arborescens
Psorothamnus arborescens var. simplicifolius (Parish) Barneby
Trifolium variegatum var. geminiflorum (Greene) Vincent
Quercus parvula var. tamalpaisensis S.K.Langer
Swertia neglecta (Hall) Jeps.
Zeltnera abramsii (Munz) G.Mans.
Geranium palmatum Cav.
Ribes amarum McClatchie
Juglandaceae
Leonurus sibiricus L.
Trichostema austromontanum H.F.Lewis
Limnanthes douglasii subsp. striata (Jeps.) Morin
Limnanthes alba subsp. versicolor (Greene) C.T.Mason
Hesperolinon clevelandii (Greene) Small
Mentzelia crocea Kellogg
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. purpurea C.L.Hitchc.
Sphaeralcea emoryi Torr. ex A.Gray
Chamelaucium uncinatum Schauer
Epilobium brevistylum Barbey
Ludwigia decurrens Walter
Oenothera californica subsp. eurekensis (Munz & J.C.Roos) W.M.Klein
Aphyllon parishii (Jeps.) A.C.Schneid.
Castilleja ewanii Eastw.
Castilleja lanata subsp. hololeuca (Greene) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Cordylanthus rigidus subsp. littoralis (Ferris) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Cordylanthus eremicus subsp. eremicus
Cordylanthus pilosus subsp. hansenii (Ferris) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Orthocarpus copelandii Eastw.
Eschscholzia californica var. peninsularis (Greene) Munz
Eschscholzia androuxii Still
Pittosporum eriocarpum Royle
Antirrhinum ovatum Eastw.
Collinsia torreyi var. wrightii (S.Watson) I.M.Johnst.
Penstemon fruticiformis var. fruticiformis
Platanus ×acerifolia (Aiton) Willd.
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. densifolium
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. ochroleuca
Gilia leptantha subsp. leptantha
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. bizonata A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Linanthus Benth.
Navarretia heterandra Mason
Phlox dispersa Sharsm.
Eriogonum polypodum Small
Eriogonum microthecum var. panamintense S.Stokes
Eriogonum nudum var. scapigerum (Eastw.) Jeps.
Eriogonum kennedyi var. austromontanum Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum eremicola Howell & Reveal
Eriogonum hoffmannii S.Stokes
Eriogonum dasyanthemum Torr. & A.Gray
Eriogonum heermannii var. heermannii
Rumex persicarioides L.
Conospermum ericifolium Sm.
Delphinium polycladon Eastw.
Ranunculus sceleratus var. sceleratus
Ceanothus foliosus var. viejasensis D.O.Burge & Rebman
Frangula californica subsp. crassifolia (Jeps.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Drymocallis hansenii (Greene) Rydb.
Drymocallis glandulosa var. wrangelliana (Fisch. & Avé-Lall.) Ertter
Ivesia unguiculata A.Gray
Rosa obtusifolia Desv.
Galium sparsiflorum subsp. sparsiflorum
Galium angustifolium subsp. jacinticum Dempster & Stebbins
Galium argense Dempster & Ehrend.
Galium angustifolium subsp. foliosum (Hilend & J.T.Howell) Dempster & Stebbins
Galium glabrescens (Ehrend.) Dempster & Ehrend.
Galium buxifolium Greene
Salix tracyi Ball
Heuchera elegans Abrams
Myoporum sandwicense (A.DC.) Gray
Scrophularia atrata Pennell
Petunia violacea Lindl.
Solanum wallacei subsp. clokeyi (Munz) Thorne
Solanum gayanum (J.Rémy) F.Phil.
Laportea ovalifolia (Schum. & Thonn.) Chew
Viola purpurea subsp. venosa (S.Watson) M.S.Baker & Clausen
Viola lobata subsp. integrifolia (S.Watson) R.J.Little
Agave cerulata subsp. nelsonii (Trel.) Gentry
Agave chrysoglossa I.M.Johnst.
Agave datylio var. vexans (Trel.) I.M.Johnst.
Callisia repens (Jacq.) L.
Tripogandra palmeri (Rose) Woodson
Carex ultra L.H.Bailey
Limnocharis flava (L.) Buchenau
Achnatherum diegoense (Swallen) Barkworth
Bouteloua annua Swallen
Digitaria bicornis (Lam.) Roem. & Schult.
Distichlis bajaensis H.L.Bell
Tragus berteronianus Schult.
Heteranthera limosa (Sw.) Willd.
Carlowrightia pectinata Brandegee
Ruellia intermedia Leonard
Amaranthus venulosus S.Watson
Iresine latifolia (D.Dietr.) Moq.
Rhus kearneyi subsp. virginum Moran
Rhus microphylla Engelm. ex A.Gray
Arracacia brandegeei J.M.Coult. & Rose
Ageratina rothrockii (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Bahiopsis tomentosa (A.Gray) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Bahiopsis deltoidea (A.Gray) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Bajacalia moranii B.L.Turner
Bidens leptocephala var. leptocephala
Bidens alba subsp. radiata (Sch.Bip.) R.E.Ballard
Brickellia coulteri var. coulteri
Brickellia coulteri var. adenopoda (B.L.Rob.) B.L.Turner
Cirsium rothrockii (A.Gray) Petr.
Cynara cardunculus subsp. cardunculus
Encelia farinosa var. radians (Brandegee) Brandegee
Ericameria cooperi subsp. bajacalifornica Urbatsch & Wussow
Ericameria nauseosa var. latisquamea (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Erigeron oreophilus Greenm.
Galinsoga parviflora var. parviflora
Helianthus petiolaris subsp. petiolaris
Heliomeris multiflora var. multiflora
Ozothamnus leptophyllus (G.Forst.) Breitw. & J.M.Ward
Pectis multiseta var. multiseta
Porophyllum coloratum (Kunth) DC.
Artemisia martirensis (Wiggins) C.R.Hobbs & B.G.Baldwin
Tagetes subulata Cerv.
Tithonia tubaeformis (Jacq.) Cass.
Verbesina palmeri S.Watson
Vernonia triflosculosa var. palmeri (Rose) B.L.Turner
Ceiba acuminata (S.Watson) Rose
Cylindropuntia libertadensis Rebman
Echinocereus polyacanthus var. pacificus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Echinopsis spachiana (Lem.) H.Friedrich & G.D.Rowley
Ferocactus diguetii (F.A.C.Weber) Britton & Rose
Ferocactus coloratus H.E.Gates
Mammillaria albicans (Britton & Rose) A.Berger
Mammillaria fraileana (Britton & Rose) Backeb.
Mammillaria insularis H.E.Gates
Opuntia pubescens H.L.Wendl. ex Pfeiff.
Lobelia laxiflora subsp. laxiflora
Arenaria lanuginosa subsp. saxosa (A.Gray) Maguire
Drymaria gracilis subsp. carinata (Brandegee) Duke
Spergularia platensis var. platensis
Atriplex frankenioides Moran
Chenopodium flabellifolium Standl.
Chenopodium sonorense Benet-Pierce & M.G.Simpson
Crocanthemum nutans (Brandegee) Janch.
Crocanthemum pringlei (S.Watson) Janch.
Jacquemontia agrestis (C.Mart. ex Choisy) Meisn.
Jacquemontia abutiloides var. abutiloides
Dudleya attenuata subsp. australis Moran
Glossopetalon spinescens var. meionandrum (Koehne) Trel.
Cucumis dipsaceus Ehrenb. ex Spach
Diospyros californica var. californica
Arbutus peninsularis Rose & Goldman
Arctostaphylos moranii P.V.Wells
Croton californicus var. californicus
Croton yecorensis V.W.Steinmann & Felger
Aeschynomene fascicularis Schltdl. & Cham.
Amorpha apiculata Wiggins
Caesalpinia caladenia Standl.
Cologania broussonetii (Balb.) DC.
Dalea brandegeei (Rose) Bullock
Desmodium molliculum (Kunth) DC.
Desmodium procumbens (Mill.) C.L.Hitchc.
Haematoxylum brasiletto H.Karst.
Indigofera nesophila Lievens & Urbatsch
Lupinus aridus subsp. aridus
Marina palmeri (Rose) Barneby
Marina Liebm.
Mimosa L.
Phaseolus pedicellatus var. grayanus (Wooton & Standl.) A.Delgado ex Isely
Vachellia farnesiana var. farnesiana
Zornia venosa Mohlenbr.
Centaurium capense C.R.Broome
Swertia paniculata Wall.
Geranium gracile Ledeb.
Geranium deltoideum Rydb. ex Hanks & Small
Hydrangea seemannii Riley
Hyptis anitae Epling & Játiva
Hyptis decipiens M.E.Jones
Monardella arizonica Epling
Salvia chionopeplica Epling
Salvia alamosana Rose
Abutilon abutiloides (Jacq.) Garcke ex Hochr.
Anoda pentaschista A.Gray
Gossypium davidsonii Kellogg
Heliocarpus palmeri S.Watson
Hibiscus ribifolius A.Gray
Iliamna grandiflora (Rydb.) Wiggins
Phemeranthus aurantiacus (Engelm.) Kiger
Dorstenia drakeana L.
Boerhavia purpurascens A.Gray
Boerhavia triquetra var. triquetra
Mirabilis californica var. cedrosensis (Standl.) J.F.Macbr.
Camissoniopsis proavita (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Chylismia claviformis subsp. rubescens (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Erythranthe dentiloba (B.L.Rob. & Fernald) G.L.Nesom
Penstemon reidmoranii Zacarías & A.Wolfe
Allophyllum nemophilophyllum J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Leptosiphon jamauensis (Moran) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Linanthus veatchii (Parry ex Greene) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Chorizanthe flava Brandegee
Eriogonum wrightii var. linearifolium Reveal
Eriogonum grande var. testudinum Reveal
Eriogonum pondii var. gentryi Reveal & C.A.Hanson
Eriogonum encelioides Reveal & C.A.Hanson
Harfordia macroptera var. macroptera
Rumex violascens Rech.fil.
Ceanothus coeruleus Lag.
Condalia globosa var. globosa
Gouania rosei Wiggins
Vauquelinia californica subsp. sonorensis W.J.Hess & Henrickson
Chiococca petrina Wiggins
Galium coronadoense Dempster
Galium mexicanum subsp. flexicum Dempster
Mitracarpus schizangius DC.
Stenotis arenaria (Rose) Terrell
Zanthoxylum arborescens Rose
Buddleja corrugata subsp. moranii E.M.Norman
Capsicum annuum var. glabriusculum (Dunal) Heiser & Pickersgill
Cestrum tomentosum L.fil.
Lycium andersonii var. andersonii
Physalis hederifolia var. hederifolia
Solanum adscendens Sendtn.
Burroughsia fastigiata (Brandegee) Moldenke
Verbena moranii G.L.Nesom
Hybanthus attenuatus (Humb. & Bonpl.) Schulze-Menz
Hybanthus verticillatus (Ortega) Baill.
Drimys axillaris J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Larrea tridentata var. tridentata
Perideridia lemmonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) T.I.Chuang & Constance
Cryptantha nevadensis var. nevadensis
Nemacladus tenuis var. aliformis Morin
Acmispon nevadensis (S.Watson) Brouillet
Gongylocarpus fruticulosus subsp. fruticulosus
Ehrharta Thunb.
Symphyotrichum lanceolatum subsp. hesperium (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Senecio glomeratus Desf. ex Poir.
Salvia malvifolia Epling & Játiva
Eriogonum inerme (S.Watson) Jeps.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. gabrielensis (P.V.Wells) J.E.Keeley, M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Cryptantha costata Brandegee
Sida L.
Desmazeria rigida (L.) Tutin
Orobanche bulbosa Beck
Stephanomeria virgata subsp. virgata
Eranthemum nervosum (Vahl) R.Br. ex R. & S.
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. bakeri (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Casimiroa edulis La Llave & Lex.
Musa paradisiaca L.
Hylocereus Britton & Rose
Coccoloba diversifolia Jacq.
Ceanothus griseus (Trel.) McMinn
Leptospermum petersonii F.M.Bailey
Withania riebeckii Schweinf. ex Balf.fil.
Trifolium phleoides Pourr. ex Willd.
Lemna valdiviana Phil.
Wolffia globosa (Roxb.) Hartog & Plas
Aloe brevifolia Mill.
Cyperus esculentus var. macrostachyus Boeckeler
Iris purdyi Eastw.
Juncus exiguus (Fernald & Wiegand) Lint ex Snogerup & Zika
Juncus luciensis Ertter
Juncus hemiendytus var. abjectus (F.J.Herm.) Ertter
Calochortus lilacinus Kellogg
Pancratium maritimum L.
Andropogon virginicus var. virginicus
Avena occidentalis Durieu
Bromus frondosus (Shear) Wooton & Standl.
Bromus mollis L.
Echinochloa muricata (P.Beauv.) Fernald
Koeleria gerardii (Vill.) Shinners
Polypogon australis Brongn.
Stipa brachychaeta Godr.
Tribolium obliterum (Hemsl.) Renvoize
Brodiaea appendiculata Hoover
Typha L.
Sambucus racemosa var. racemosa
Lampranthus aurantiacus (DC.) Schwantes
Ligusticum apiifolium S.Watson
Cycladenia humilis var. humilis
Amphipappus fremontii var. spinosus (A.Nelson) Ced.Porter
Arctotis venusta Norl.
Bahia absinthifolia Benth.
Chrysopsis (Nutt.) Elliott
Cirsium canovirens Rydb.
Dieteria canescens var. ziegleri (Munz) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Erigeron eatonii subsp. plantagineus (Greene) Cronquist
Helianthella californica var. nevadensis (Greene) Jeps.
Heterotheca sessiliflora var. echioides (Benth.) Semple
Heterotheca subaxillaris subsp. latifolia (Buckley) Semple
Isocoma acradenia var. bracteosa (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Lasthenia platycarpha (A.Gray) Greene
Layia pentachaeta subsp. pentachaeta
Lessingia glandulifera var. peirsonii (J.T.Howell) Markos
Packera bolanderi (A.Gray) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Pentachaeta exilis A.Gray
Pseudobahia peirsonii Munz
Psilocarphus chilensis (J.Rémy) A.Gray
Pyrrocoma lucida (D.D.Keck) Kartesz & Gandhi
Rudbeckia californica subsp. glauca S.F.Blake
Senecio blochmaniae Greene
Stephanomeria exigua subsp. carotifera (Hoover) Gottlieb
Thymophylla tenuiloba var. tenuiloba
Wyethia elata H.M.Hall
Cryptantha muricata var. denticulata (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha traskiae I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha mohavensis (Greene) Greene
Hackelia velutina (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Boechera sparsiflora (Nutt.) Dorn
Athysanus unilateralis (M.E.Jones) Jeps.
Lepidium coronopus (L.) Al-Shehbaz
Streptanthus drepanoides Kruckeb. & J.L.Morrison
Ferocactus cylindraceus var. lecontei (Engelm.) Bravo
Lonicera catalinensis Millsp.
Arenaria L.
Arenaria congesta var. suffrutescens (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Atriplex crassipes J.M.Black
Dysphania anthelmintica (L.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Cistus ×incanus L.
Calystegia malacophylla var. berryi (Eastw.) Brummitt
Convolvulus subacaulis (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Cotyledon orbiculata var. oblonga (Haw.) DC.
Sedum stenopetalum subsp. radiatum (S.Watson) R.T.Clausen
Arctostaphylos confertiflora Eastw.
Arctostaphylos refugioensis Gankin
Arctostaphylos catalinae P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos glauca var. puberula J.T.Howell
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. insulicola P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. rosei (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Euphorbia rigida M.Bieb.
Acacia podalyriifolia A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Desmodium tortuosum (Sw.) DC.
Lathyrus angulatus L.
Lotus angustissimus L.
Lupinus sellulus Kellogg
Lupinus meionanthus A.Gray
Lupinus montigenus A.Heller
Psoralea macrostachya DC.
Psorothamnus fremontii (Torr. ex A.Gray) Barneby
Sesbania emerus (Aubl.) Urb.
Notholithocarpus densiflorus var. densiflorus
Gentiana viridula Parish
Gentianella amarella subsp. amarella
Geranium core-core Steud.
Philadelphus lewisii var. californicus (Benth.) A.Gray
Monardella candicans Benth.
Monardella exilis (A.Gray) Greene
Pogogyne floribunda Jokerst
Limnanthes montana Jeps.
Linum adenophyllum A.Gray
Lagunaria patersonia (Andrews) G.Don
Proboscidea louisianica subsp. louisianica
Calyptridium paniculatum (Kellogg) Greene
Claytonia parviflora subsp. grandiflora J.M.Mill. & K.L.Chambers
Metrosideros kermadecensis W.R.B.Oliv.
Chylismia claviformis subsp. yumae (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Clarkia imbricata H. & Lewis
Clarkia speciosa subsp. nitens (F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis) F.H.Lewis & P.H.Raven
Clarkia biloba subsp. australis F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Clarkia tembloriensis subsp. tembloriensis
Eremothera boothii subsp. desertorum (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Gaura coccinea var. epilobioides (Kunth) Munz
Oenothera tanacetifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Oenothera primiveris subsp. caulescens (Munz) Munz
Boschniakia strobilacea A.Gray
Castilleja campestris subsp. campestris
Castilleja applegatei subsp. pallida (Eastw.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja applegatei subsp. disticha (Eastw.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Cordylanthus tenuis A.Gray
Meconella californica Torr.
Diplacus whitneyi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Diplacus pygmaeus (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Erythranthe latidens (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Phyllanthus caroliniensis subsp. caroliniensis
Pittosporum buchananii Hook.fil.
Penstemon confertus var. caeruleopurpureus A.Gray
Limonium brassicifolium (Webb & Berthel.) Kuntze
Collomia tracyi Mason
Gilia latiflora subsp. latiflora
Gilia tricolor subsp. diffusa (Congdon) Mason & A.D.Grant
Gilia minor A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia leptantha subsp. pinetorum A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia leptantha subsp. transversa A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Chorizanthe xanti var. leucotheca Goodman
Eriogonum hirtiflorum A.Gray ex S.Watson
Grevillea robusta A.Cunn. ex R.Br.
Ranunculus californicus var. cuneatus Greene
Ranunculus hystriculus A.Gray
Ceanothus hybridus K.Koch
Horkelia californica var. elata (Greene) Ertter & Reveal
Horkeliella congdonis (Rydb.) Rydb.
Ivesia argyrocoma var. argyrocoma
Potentilla anserina subsp. pacifica (Howell) Rousi
Prunus dulcis (Mill.) D.A.Webb
Galium hardhamiae Dempster
Galium hypotrichium subsp. subalpinum (Hilend & J.T.Howell) Ehrend.
Citrus ×sinensis (L.) Osbeck
Salix ligulifolia Ball ex C.K.Schneid.
Lycopersicon peruvianum (L.) Mill.
Nicotiana acuminata (Graham) Hook.
Viola pedata L.
Agave vizcainoensis Gentry
Agave cerulata subsp. subcerulata Gentry
Agave turneri R.H.Webb & Salazar-Ceseña
Yucca grandiflora Gentry
Commelina erecta var. angustifolia (Michx.) Fernald
Tripogandra amplexicaulis (Klotzsch ex C.B.Clarke) Woodson
Carex chihuahuensis Mack.
Cyperus hermaphroditus (Jacq.) Standl.
Echeandia durangensis (Greenm.) Cruden
Dichromanthus michuacanus (Lex.) Salazar & Soto Arenas
Bromus arvensis L.
Chloris barbata Sw.
Eragrostis amabilis (L.) Wight & Arn.
Hilaria belangeri (Steud.) Nash
Otatea acuminata (Munro) C.E.Calderón ex Soderstr.
Pappophorum mucronulatum Nees
Smilax moranensis M.Martens & Galeotti
Holographis virgata (Harv. ex Benth. & Hook.) T.F.Daniel
Rhus choriophylla Wooton & Standl.
Arracacia brandegeei var. sylvatica M.E.Jones
Haplophyton cimicidum A.DC.
Metastelma latifolium Rose
Ilex tolucana Hemsl.
Aristolochia peninsularis Brandegee
Ambrosia flexuosa (A.Gray) W.W.Payne
Ambrosia humi León de la Luz & Rebman
Archibaccharis peninsularis S.F.Blake
Arida arizonica (R.C.Jacks. & R.R.Johnson) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Bahiopsis carterae (E.E.Schill.) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Bidens aurea (Aiton) Sherff
Brickellia peninsularis var. peninsularis
Brickellia eupatorioides var. chlorolepis (Wooton & Standl.) B.L.Turner
Chaenactis furcata Stockw.
Ericameria parishii var. peninsularis (Moran) G.L.Nesom
Pectis cylindrica (Fernald) Rydb.
Porophyllum macrocephalum DC.
Porophyllum maritimum Brandegee
Sclerocarpus divaricatus (Benth.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hemsl.
Senecio carlomasonii B.L.Turner & T.M.Barkley
Senecio hartianus A.Heller
Stenotus pulvinatus (Moran) G.L.Nesom
Trichocoronis wrightii var. wigginsii R.M.King & H.Rob.
Tabebuia impetiginosa (C.Mart. ex A.DC.) Standl.
Tecoma stans var. angustatum Rehder
Physaria peninsularis (Wiggins) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Bursera fragilis S.Watson
Bursera rupicola León de la Luz
Cylindropuntia californica var. delgadilloana Rebman
Cylindropuntia molesta var. clavellina (Engelm.) Rebman
Cylindropuntia santamaria (Baxter) Rebman
Echinocactus polycephalus var. xeranthemoides Coult.
Echinocereus engelmannii var. acicularis L.D.Benson
Ferocactus johnstonianus Britton & Rose
Grusonia invicta (Brandegee) E.F.Anderson
Opuntia tapona Engelm. ex Coult.
Sclerocactus spinosior (Engelm. ex Boiss.) Woodruff & Benson
Drymaria holosteoides var. crassifolia (Benth.) J.A.Duke
Atriplex barclayana subsp. dilatata (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Atriplex barclayana subsp. palmeri (S.Watson) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Quisqualis indica L.
Cuscuta corymbosa var. grandiflora Engelm.
Cuscuta macrocephala Schaffner ex Yunck.
Ipomoea jicama Brandegee
Ipomoea hirsutula J.Jacq.
Ipomoea tastensis Brandegee
Dudleya pulverulenta subsp. pulverulenta
Dudleya nubigena (Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Kalanchoe Adans.
Sedum sediforme (Schweinf.) Raym.-Hamet
Cucumis L.
Croton dioicus Cav.
Ditaxis brandegeei var. intonsa I.M.Johnst.
Euphorbia cerralvensis Maya-Lastra & V.W.Steinm.
Euphorbia brandegeei Millsp.
Euphorbia dentata Michx.
Acaciella villosa (Sw.) Britton & Rose
Aeschynomene vigil Brandegee
Astragalus magdalenae var. niveus (Rydb.) Barneby
Astragalus circumdatus Greene
Astragalus orcuttianus S.Watson
Caesalpinia pumila (Britton & Rose) F.J.Herm.
Caesalpinia palmeri S.Watson
Crotalaria sagittalis L.
Desmodium procumbens var. procumbens
Desmodium neomexicanum A.Gray
Indigofera fruticosa Rose
Marina chrysorrhiza (A.Gray) Barneby
Nissolia platycarpa Benth.
Rhynchosia precatoria (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) DC.
Trifolium eriocephalum var. harneyense McDermott
Trifolium mucronatum Willd. ex Spreng.
Vachellia campechiana f. campechiana
Quercus chihuahuensis Trel.
Zeltnera nudicaulis (Engelm.) G.Mans.
Geranium eremophilum Wooton & Standl.
Hedeoma matomianum Moran
Mentha L.
Cuphea laminuligera Koehne
Malpighia diversifolia Brandegee
Hibiscus sabdariffa L.
Horsfordia exalata Fryxell
Sida aggregata C.Presl
Sida glutinosa Comm. ex Cav.
Trichilia colimana C.DC. ex Donn.Sm.
Cocculus diversifolius DC.
Lysimachia hybrida Michx.
Abronia gracilis subsp. gracilis
Boerhavia maculata Standl.
Mirabilis exserta Brandegee
Forestiera Poir.
Chylismia cardiophylla subsp. cedrosensis (Greene) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Agonandra racemosa (DC.) Standl.
Passiflora ciliata Dryand. ex Aiton
Diplacus stellatus Kellogg
Diplacus latifolius Nutt.
Erythranthe brevinasuta G.L.Nesom
Callitriche longipedunculata Morong
Penstemon angelicus (I.M.Johnst.) Moran
Linanthus viscainensis Moran
Linanthus bigelovii subsp. bigelovii
Eriogonum wrightii var. brevifolium Reveal
Eriogonum moranii Reveal
Eriogonum esmeraldense var. toiyabense J.T.Howell
Portulaca pilosa L.
Thalictrum peninsulare (Brandegee) Rose
Ceanothus ochraceus Suess.
Ziziphus parryi var. microphylla (I.M.Johnst.) M.C.Johnst.
Chaenomeles Lindl.
Heteromeles arbutifolia var. arbutifolia
Crusea diversifolia (Kunth) W.A.Anderson
Galium hystricocarpum Greenm.
Randia capitata DC.
Spermacoce confusa Rendle
Stenotis asperuloides var. brandegeeana (Rose) Terrell
Sapindus saponaria L.
Buddleja parviflora Kunth
Lycium californicum var. californicum
Physalis purpurea Wiggins
Solanum amazonium Ker Gawl.
Talinum fruticosum (L.) Juss.
Tamarix hohenackeri Bunge
Citharexylum roxanae Moldenke
Citharexylum flabellifolium S.Watson
Glandularia bipinnatifida (Schauer) Nutt.
Hybanthus Jacq.
Drimys winteri J.R.Forst.
Cyperus flavescens L.
Stephanomeria elata Nutt.
Atriplex depressa Jeps.
Eleusine coracana subsp. africana (Kenn.-O'Byrne) Hilu & de Wet
Physaria navajoensis (O'Kane) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Herniaria hirsuta subsp. cinerea (DC.) Cout.
Trifolium macraei Hook. & Arn.
Atriplex serenana var. davidsonii (Standl.) Munz
Cryptantha hispidissima Greene
Delphinium variegatum subsp. thornei Munz
Gossypium herbaceum L.
Ipomoea carnea subsp. fistulosa (Mart. ex Choisy) D.F.Austin
Agave sobria subsp. sobria
Casuarina cunninghamiana Miq.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa f. hebeclada (DC.) P.V.Wells
Solandra maxima (Moc. & Sessé) P.S.Green
Macropiper excelsum (G.Forst.) Miq.
Eucalyptus albens Benth.
Lolium rigidum Gaudin
Tabernaemontana fuchsiifolia A.DC.
Melaleuca styphelioides Sm.
Cestrum aurantiacum Lindl.
Nicotiana langsdorffii Schrank
Cymbopogon citratus (DC.) Stapf
Asystasia gangetica subsp. micrantha (Nees) Ensermu
Elymus elymoides var. californicus (J.G.Sm.) J.P.Sm.
Cordyline australis (G.Forst.) Endl.
Carex helleri Mack.
Carex mendocinensis Olney
Eleocharis acicularis var. acicularis
Eleocharis decumbens C.B.Clarke
Scirpus tuberosus Desf.
Dietes iridioides (L.) Sweet ex Klatt
Juncus articulatus subsp. articulatus
Trillium sessile L.
Bromus catharticus var. catharticus
Echinochloa crus-pavonis (Kunth) Schult.
Panicum dichotomiflorum subsp. dichotomiflorum
Sporobolus indicus (L.) R.Br.
Potamogeton foliosus subsp. fibrillosus (Fernald) R.R.Haynes & Hellq.
Sparganium eurycarpum subsp. eurycarpum
Nitrophila mohavensis Munz & Roos
Lomatium caruifolium var. denticulatum (Jeps.) Jeps.
Agoseris hirsuta (Hook.) Greene
Argyranthemum foeniculaceum (Willd.) Webb ex Sch.Bip.
Carthamus creticus L.
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. heterocarpha (Torr. & A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. stenophyllus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Deinandra arida (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Encelia virginensis subsp. virginensis
Ericameria nauseosa var. ceruminosa (Durand & Hilg.) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Ericameria parryi var. vulcanica (Greene) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Eriophyllum lanatum var. monoense (Rydb.) Jeps.
Glebionis segetum (L.) Fourr.
Hemizonia congesta subsp. calyculata Babc. & Hall
Leptosyne douglasii DC.
Malacothrix saxatilis var. commutata (Torr. & A.Gray) Ferris
Malacothrix phaeocarpa W.S.Davis
Orochaenactis thysanocarpha (A.Gray) Coville
Pentachaeta fragilis Brandegee
Pluchea purpurascens (Sw.) DC.
Senecio integerrimus var. major (A.Gray) Cronquist
Senecio lautus Sol. ex G.Forst.
Symphyotrichum lanceolatum (Willd.) G.L.Nesom
Wyethia reticulata Greene
Alnus Mill.
Amsinckia tessellata var. gloriosa (Eastw. ex Suksd.) Hoover
Cryptantha cycloptera f. truncata M.E.Mabry & Rebman
Mertensia oblongifolia var. nevadensis (A.Nelson) L.O.Williams
Boechera platysperma (A.Gray) Al-Shehbaz
Iberis umbellata L.
Thysanocarpus desertorum A.Heller
Tropidocarpum capparideum Greene
Downingia concolor var. concolor
Downingia concolor var. brevior McVaugh
Atriplex coronata var. coronata
Cycloloma atriplicifolium (Spreng.) J.M.Coult.
Calystegia occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Cuscuta japonica Choisy
Ipomoea triloba L.
Cornus californica C.A.Mey.
Dudleya traskiae (Rose) Moran
Sedum eastwoodiae (Britton) A.Berger
Scabiosa atropurpurea L.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. crustacea (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos edmundsii var. parvifolia Roof
Ledum glandulosum subsp. columbianum (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Acacia cyanophylla Lindl.
Acmispon dendroideus var. traskiae (Eastw. ex Abrams) Brouillet
Astragalus lentiginosus var. antonius Barneby
Astragalus lentiginosus var. albifolius M.E.Jones
Astragalus nutans M.E.Jones
Dolichos lignosus L.
Hosackia crassifolia var. otayensis (Moran ex Isely) Brouillet
Lupinus arbustus subsp. silvicola (A.Heller) D.B.Dunn
Lupinus sellulus var. ursinus (Eastw.) B.J.Cox
Lupinus lobbii (S.Watson) Greene
Lupinus breweri var. bryoides C.P.Sm.
Lupinus croceus var. croceus
Lupinus latifolius var. viridifolius (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus albicaulis var. albicaulis
Lupinus pratensis var. eriostachyus C.P.Sm.
Oxytropis viscida Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Quercus chasei McMinn, Babc. & Righter
Ribes aureum var. gracillimum (Coville & Britton) Jeps.
Philadelphus lewisii subsp. gordonianus (Lindl.) Munz
Pterocarya stenoptera C.DC.
Cedronella canariensis (L.) Webb & Berthel.
Monardella villosa subsp. obispoensis (Hoover) Jokerst
Hesperolinon spergulinum (A.Gray) Small
Sidalcea diploscypha (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Sphaeralcea pulchella Jeps.
Ficus rubiginosa Desf. ex Vent.
Nymphaea capensis Thunb.
Camissonia kernensis subsp. kernensis
Clarkia gracilis subsp. albicaulis (Jeps.) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Ludwigia grandiflora (Michx.) Greuter & Burdet
Oenothera caespitosa subsp. crinita (Rydb.) Munz
Tetrapteron palmeri (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Castilleja applegatei subsp. pinetorum (Fernald) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja densiflora subsp. densiflora
Castilleja franciscana Pennell
Eschscholzia covillei Greene
Papaver hybridum L.
Diplacus viscidus (Congd.) G.L.Nesom
Collinsia Nutt.
Gratiola virginiana L.
Penstemon rattanii var. rattanii
Penstemon spectabilis subsp. subviscosus D.D.Keck
Gilia interior (Mason & A.D.Grant) A.D.Grant
Leptosiphon aureus subsp. decorus (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Polemonium caeruleum L.
Chorizanthe xanti S.Watson
Eriogonum umbellatum var. versicolor S.Stokes
Eriogonum spergulinum var. spergulinum
Gilmania luteola (Coville) Coville
Delphinium gracilentum Greene
Delphinium hansenii subsp. hansenii
Ranunculus occidentalis var. ultramontanus Greene
Ceanothus cuneatus var. fascicularis (Mc Minn) Hoover
Frangula rubra subsp. obtusissima (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Frangula californica subsp. ursina (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Galium hilendiae subsp. hilendiae
Galium munzii Hilend & J.T.Howell
Citrus ×limon (L.) Burm.fil.
Heuchera maxima Greene
Scrophularia californica var. laciniata Jeps.
Physalis pubescens var. integrifolia (Dunal) Waterf.
Verbena scabra Vahl
Viola canina L.
Agave toumeyana var. toumeyana
Yucca elata var. verdiensis (McKelvey) Reveal
Anthephora hermaphrodita (L.) Kuntze
Microchloa kunthii Desv.
Panicum alatum var. longiflorum Zuloaga & Morrone
Paspalum lentiginosum J.Presl
Paspalum hartwegianum E.Fourn.
Ruellia comonduensis T.F.Daniel
Tetramerium glandulosum Oerst.
Iresine heterophylla Standl.
Rhus aromatica subsp. trilobata (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Pseudocymopterus montanus (A.Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Matelea fruticosa (Brandegee) Woodson
Alvordia congesta (Rose ex Hoffm.) B.L.Turner
Berlandiera lyrata var. monocephala B.L.Turner
Bidens riparia Kunth
Carphochaete wislizenii A.Gray
Encelia farinosa f. phenicodonta S.F.Blake
Bahiopsis Kellogg
Encelia densifolia C.Clark & Kyhos
Eupatorium sagittatum A.Gray
Gamochaeta sphacelata (Kunth) Cabrera
Helianthus canus (Britton) Wooton & Standl.
Laennecia sophiifolia (Kunth) G.L.Nesom
Johnstonella albida (Kunth) M.E.Mabry & M.G.Simpson
Pectocarya DC. ex Meisn.
Sibara brandegeana (Rose) Greene
Bursera grandifolia (Schltdl.) Engl.
Cylindropuntia alcahes var. mcgillii Rebman
Cylindropuntia sanfelipensis (Rebman) Rebman
Cylindropuntia ×campii (M.A.Baker & Pinkava) M.A.Baker & Pinkava
Echinocereus ferreirianus H.E.Gates
Echinocereus mombergerianus G.Frank
Ferocactus peninsulae var. townsendianus (Britton & Rose) N.P.Taylor
Mammillaria petrophila subsp. baxteriana (H.E.Gates) D.R.Hunt
Morangaya pensilis (K.Brandegee) G.D.Rowley
Opuntia bravoana Baxter
×Myrtgerocactus lindsayi Moran
Silene scaposa B.L.Rob.
Dudleya campanulata Moran
Vaseyanthus brandegei (Cogn.) Rose
Diospyros virginiana L.
Acalypha umbrosa Brandegee
Euphorbia plummerae S.Watson
Euphorbia hindsiana Benth.
Manihot davisiae Croizat
Acacia millefolia S.Watson
Astragalus insularis var. insularis
Astragalus wootonii E.Sheld.
Astragalus hornii var. minutiflorus M.E.Jones
Caesalpinia californica (A.Gray) Standl.
Caesalpinia platyloba S.Watson
Desmanthus virgatus (L.) Willd.
Desmodium wislizeni Engelm. ex A.Gray
Desmodium rosei B.G.Schub.
Lupinus excubitus subsp. medius (Jeps.) R.M.Beauch.
Mariosousa russelliana (Britton & Rose) Seigler & Ebinger
Nissolia hirsuta DC.
Nissolia setosa Brandegee
Psorothamnus scoparius (A.Gray) Rydb.
Senegalia kelloggiana (A.M.Carter & Rudd) C.E.Glass & Seigler
Vachellia vernicosa (Britton & Rose) Seigler & Ebinger
Quercus ajoensis C.H.Mull.
Quercus depressipes Trel.
Koeberlinia spinosa var. tenuispina Kearney & Peebles
Hyptis emoryi var. palmeri (S.Watson) I.M.Johnst.
Hyptis mutabilis (Rich.) Briq.
Vitex mollis Kunth
Gronovia scandens L.
Corchorus hirtus L.
Sphaeralcea axillaris S.Watson
Waltheria detonsa A.Gray
Morus rubra L.
Boerhavia coulteri var. coulteri
Boerhavia alata S.Watson
Chylismia claviformis subsp. peeblesii (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Chylismia claviformis subsp. wigginsii (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Gongylocarpus fruticulosus subsp. glaber (J.H.Thomas) Carlquist & P.H.Raven
Oenothera taraxacoides (Wooton & Standl.) Munz
Eschscholzia elegans Greene
Plantaginaceae
Plantago argyrea Morris
Eriogonum foliosum S.Watson
Johanneshowellia puberula (S.Watson) Reveal
Ceanothus bolensis S.Boyd & J.E.Keeley
Photinia glabra (Thunb.) Maxim.
Prunus virens (Wooton & Standl.) Shreve ex Sarg.
Vauquelinia californica (Torr.) Sarg.
Chiococca alba (L.) Hitchc.
Galium diabolense Dempster
Hedyotis brevipes (Rose) W.H.Lewis
Ixora L.
Scrophularia oregana Pennell
Cestrum lanatum M.Martens & Galeotti
Solanum azureum Fernald
Valeriana sorbifolia var. sorbifolia
Hybanthus fruticulosus (Benth.) I.M.Johnst.
Hybanthus fruticulosus var. flavescens (Dowell) I.M.Johnst.
Brahea Mart.
Symphoricarpos Dill. ex Juss.
Atriplex fruticulosa Jeps.
Ceanothus ×bakeri Greene ex McMinn
Microseris douglasii var. douglasii
Galium californicum subsp. miguelense (Greene) Dempster & Stebbins
Opuntia pilifera F.A.C.Weber
Clarkia tembloriensis subsp. longistyla Vasek
Tacitus bellus Moran & Meyrán
Trifolium variegatum var. major Lojac.
Bougainvillea Comm. ex Juss.
Arctostaphylos hookeri subsp. franciscana (Eastw.) Munz
Eucalyptus robusta Sm.
Cistus ladanifer var. maculatus Dunal
Pittosporum Gaertn.
Macadamia ternifolia F.Muell.
Brachychiton discolor F.Muell.
Laurus nobilis L.
Agave sobria subsp. frailensis Gentry
Xylosma congestum (Lour.) Merr.
Aleurites moluccanus (L.) Willd.
Dombeya wallichii (Lindl.) Baill.
Damasonium californicum Torr.
Carex mariposana L.H.Bailey ex Mack.
Eleocharis montevidensis var. montevidensis
Lipocarpha occidentalis (A.Gray) G.C.Tucker
Hydrilla verticillata (L.f.) Royle
Juncus leiospermus F.J.Herm.
Toxicoscordion fontanum (Eastw.) Zomlefer & Judd
Agrostis hooveri Swallen
Bothriochloa laguroides subsp. torreyana (Steud.) Allred & Gould
Danthonia semiannularis (Labill.) R.Br.
Elymus stebbinsii Gould
Elymus sierrae Gould
Pentameris airoides Nees
Puccinellia simplex Scribn.
Delosperma litorale (Kensit) L.Bolus
Malephora luteola (Haw.) Schwantes
Mesembryanthemum elongatum Haw.
Perideridia gairdneri subsp. gairdneri
Cycladenia humilis var. venusta (Eastw.) Woods ex Munz
Arnica spathulata Greene
Artemisia annua L.
Baileya multiradiata var. multiradiata
Calycadenia spicata (Greene) Greene
Centaurea cineraria L.
Centaurea iberica Trevis. ex Spreng.
Crassocephalum crepidioides (Benth.) S.Moore
Erechtites prenanthoides (Rich.) DC.
Erigeron algidus Jeps.
Erigeron glacialis var. hirsutus (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom
Heterotheca oregona var. rudis (Greene) Semple
Hulsea vestita subsp. parryi (A.Gray) Wilken
Hulsea vestita subsp. pygmaea (A.Gray) Wilken
Ismelia carinata (Schousb.) Sch.Bip.
Lasthenia glabrata subsp. glabrata
Lembertia congdonii (A.Gray) Greene
Lessingia virgata A.Gray
Microseris douglasii subsp. douglasii
Nothocalais alpestris (A.Gray) K.L.Chambers
Osteospermum L.
Parthenium argentatum A.Gray
Phalacroseris bolanderi A.Gray
Psilocarphus Nutt.
Viguiera Kunth
Cryptantha oxygona (A.Gray) Greene
Plagiobothrys myosotoides (Lehm.) Brand
Plagiobothrys greenei (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys glyptocarpus var. modestus I.M.Johnst.
Plagiobothrys mollis var. mollis
Boechera pinetorum (Tidestr.) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Brassica fruticulosa Cirillo
Thelypodium integrifolium (Nutt.) Endl. ex Walp.
Thysanocarpus curvipes subsp. longistylus (Jeps.) P.J.Alexander & Windham
Cereus Mill.
Arenaria congesta Nutt.
Arenaria kingii subsp. compacta (Coville) Maguire
Cerastium viride A.Heller
Silene hookeri Nutt.
Silene parishii var. viscida C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Atriplex canescens subsp. canescens
Atriplex undulata (Moq.) D.Dietr.
Chenopodium glaucum subsp. salinum (Standl.) Aellen
Chenopodium incanum var. occidentale D.J.Crawford
Salsola ryanii Hrusa & Gaskin
Wislizenia refracta subsp. californica (Greene) S.Keller
Calystegia collina subsp. apicum Brummitt & Namoff
Calystegia felix Provance & A.C.Sanders
Calystegia silvatica subsp. disjuncta Brummitt
Cuscuta nevadensis I.M.Johnst.
Cornus sessilis Torr.
Dudleya hassei (Rose) Moran
Aristotelia chilensis (Molina) Stuntz
Elatine heterandra H.Mason
Arctostaphylos nummularia var. sensitiva (Jeps.) McMinn
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. howellii (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos elegans Jeps.
Pityopus californica (Eastw.) H.F.Copel.
Euphorbia hooveri L.C.Wheeler
Manihot esculenta Crantz
Astragalus tener var. titi (Eastw.) Barneby
Lupinus angustiflorus Eastw.
Lupinus littoralis Douglas
Lupinus polyphyllus subsp. superbus (A.Heller) Munz
Lupinus excubitus var. excubitus
Senna Mill.
Trifolium eriocephalum Nutt.
Trifolium macilentum var. dedeckerae (J.M.Gillett) Barneby
Vicia americana subsp. oregana (Nutt.) Abrams
Castanea dentata (Marshall) Borkh.
Quercus wislizeni f. parvula (Greene) Trel.
Centaurium pulchellum (Sw.) Hayek ex Hand.-Mazz., Stadlm., Janch. & Faltis
Pogogyne douglasii Benth.
Rotala indica (Willd.) Koehne
Sphaeralcea emoryi var. nevadensis (Kearney) Kearney
Calyptridium pulchellum (Eastw.) Hoover
Syzygium australe (J.C.Wendl. ex Link) B.Hyland
Menodora spinescens var. mohavensis Steyerm.
Chylismia claviformis subsp. claviformis
Chylismia heterochroma Small
Oenothera dentata var. johnstonii Munz
Chloropyron molle (A.Gray) A.Heller
Cordylanthus tenuis subsp. capillaris (Pennell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Pedicularis racemosa Douglas ex Benth.
Triphysaria micrantha (Greene ex A.Heller) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Diplacus mohavensis (Lemmon) G.L.Nesom
Collinsia sparsiflora var. collina (Jeps.) Newsom
Collinsia bartsiifolia var. davidsonii (Parish) Newsom
Penstemon stephensii Brandegee
Gilia aliquanta A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Navarretia linearifolia subsp. pinnatisecta (H.Mason & A.D.Grant) L.A.Johnson
Gilia capitata subsp. mediomontana V.E.Grant
Gilia leptantha Parish
Navarretia eriocephala Mason
Chorizanthe uniaristata Torr. & A.Gray
Chorizanthe xanti var. xanti
Dodecahema leptoceras (A.Gray) Reveal & Hardham
Eriogonum nudum var. decurrens (S.Stokes) M.L.Bowerman
Eriogonum umbellatum var. argus Reveal
Eriogonum apricum J.T.Howell
Eriogonum cithariforme S.Watson
Polygonum ramosissimum subsp. ramosissimum
Anemone quinquefolia L.
Ranunculus alismifolius var. alismellus A.Gray
Drymocallis cuneifolia Rydb.
Crucianella angustifolia L.
Galium californicum subsp. californicum
Galium clementis Eastw.
Galium sparsiflorum W.Wight
Lithophragma (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Holmgrenanthe petrophila (Coville & C.V.Morton) Elisens
Scrophularia californica var. floribunda Greene
Lycopersicon Mill.
Staphylea bolanderi A.Gray
Agave cerulata subsp. dentiens (Trel.) Gentry
Dasylirion gentryi Bogler
Araceae
Brahea edulis H.Wendl. ex S.Watson
Brahea calcarea Liebm.
Tillandsia elizabethae Rauh
Tradescantia peninsularis Brandegee
Bulbostylis arcuata Kral
Andropogon nodosus Nash
Lasiacis ruscifolia var. ruscifolia
Nassella lepida (Hitchc.) Barkworth
Oplismenus burmanni (Retz.) P.Beauv.
Paspalidium geminatum (Forssk.) Stapf
Trichloris crinita (Lag.) Parodi
Urochloa fusca var. reticulata (Torr.) B.F.Hansen & Wunderlin
Henrya insularis Nees ex Benth.
Eryngium calaster Standl.
Asclepias masonii Woodson
Sarcostemma R.Br.
Ageratina purpusii (Brandegee) R.King & H.Rob.
Carminatia tenuiflora DC.
Cirsium rydbergii Petr.
Gutierrezia wrightii A.Gray
Hofmeisteria anomalochaeta (R.M.King) B.L.Turner
Hymenoclea platyspina Seaman
Laennecia schiedeana (Less.) G.L.Nesom
Melampodium sericeum Lag.
Montanoa leucantha subsp. arborescens (DC.) V.A.Funk
Parthenium confertum A.Gray
Perityle microcephala A.Gray
Pleurocoronis laphamioides var. laphamioides
Senecio masonii De Wild.
Simsia amplexicaulis (Cav.) Pers.
Viguiera triloba (A.Gray) Olsen
Alloberberis pimana (Laferr. & Marroq.) C.C.Yu & K.F.Chung
Descurainia paradisa (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) O.E.Schulz
Dryopetalon purpureum Rollins
Neuontobotrys linearifolia (Kuntze) Al-Shehbaz
Bursera stenophylla Sprague & Riley
Cochemiea poselgeri (Hildm.) Britton & Rose
Cochemiea pondii (Greene) Walton
Ferocactus fordii var. fordii
Ferocactus gracilis var. gracilis
Grusonia wrightiana (E.M.Baxter) E.M.Baxter
Mammillaria goodridgei Scheer ex Salm-Dyck
Pacherocactus ×orcuttii (Brandegee) G.D.Rowley
Atriplex californica Moq.
Cleome guianensis Aubl.
Dudleya ×semiteres (Rose) Moran
Acalypha saxicola Wiggins
Bernardia lagunensis (M.E.Jones) L.C.Wheeler
Euphorbia gentryi V.W.Steinm. & T.F.Daniel
Euphorbia plicata S.Watson
Euphorbia hirta var. nocens L.C.Wheeler
Euphorbia heterophylla var. graminifolia Engelm.
Euphorbia peninsularis I.M.Johnst.
Jatropha macrorhiza var. septemfida Engelm.
Aeschynomene americana var. glandulosa (Poir.) Rudd
Astragalus insularis var. quentinus M.E.Jones
Brongniartia shrevei Wiggins
Chamaecrista absus (L.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Enterolobium cyclocarpum (Jacq.) Griseb.
Haematoxylon brasiletto H.Karst.
Indigofera sphaerocarpa A.Gray
Marina goldmanii (Rose) Barneby
Quercus coccolobifolia Trel.
Garrya laurifolia Benth.
Juglans major var. major
Hedeoma tenuiflora Brandegee
Hyptis emoryi var. amplifolia I.M.Johnst.
Salvia tiliifolia Vahl
Salvia setosa Fernald
Satureja brownei (Sw.) Briq.
Linum australe var. australe
Eucnide tenella (I.M.Johnst.) H.J.Thomps. & W.R.Ernst
Cuphea llavea Lex.
Lythrum bryantii Brandegee
Ayenia peninsularis Brandegee
Kosteletzkya thurberi A.Gray
Pseudabutilon scabrum (C.Presl) R.E.Fr.
Mirabilis jalapa var. jalapa
Osmanthus americanus (L.) A.Gray
Xylonagra arborea subsp. arborea
Dayia grantii J.M.Porter
Gilia austrooccidentalis (A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Linanthus uncialis (Brandegee) Moran
Polygala apopetala Brandegee
Chorizanthe rosulenta Reveal
Rumex palustris Sm.
Dryandra R.Br.
Ranunculus fasciculatus Sessé & Moc.
Potentilla rimicola (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Ertter
Cephalanthus occidentalis var. salicifolius (Humb. & Bonpl.) A.Gray
Galium angulosum A.Gray
Galium stellatum subsp. eremicum (Hilend & J.T.Howell) Ehrend.
Luculia Sweet
Randia obcordata S.Watson
Stenotis asperuloides var. asperuloides
Ptelea trifoliata subsp. angustifolia (Benth.) V.L.Bailey
Populus brandegeei C.K.Schneid.
Sapindus saponaria var. drummondii (Hook. & Arn.) L.D.Benson
Scrophularia L.
Lycium andersonii var. wrightii Gray
Lycium andersonii var. pubescens S.Watson
Solanum melongena var. esculentum (Dunal) Nees
Solanum tridynamum Dunal
Citharexylum scabrum Moc. & Sessé ex D.Don
Verbena carolina L.
Guaiacum coulteri var. palmeri (Vail) I.M.Johnst.
Agave gigantensis Gentry
Cordylanthus tenuis subsp. viscidus (T.Howell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Eriogonum molle Greene
Acer saccharum Marshall
Plagiobothrys canescens var. catalinensis (A.Gray) Jeps.
Thermopsis californica var. argentata (Greene) C.J.Chen & B.L.Turner
Gamochaeta coarctata (Willd.) Kerguélen
Thysanocarpus curvipes var. elegans (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) B.L.Rob.
Indigofera argentata Rydb.
Oenothera pilosella subsp. pilosella
Dudleya elongata Rose ex Britton & Rose
Cassia L.
Echinocereus pectinatus (Scheidw.) Engelm.
Proteaceae
Trochetiopsis erythroxylon (G.Forst.) Marais
Greyia sutherlandii Hook. & Harv.
Stipa tenuissima Trin.
Solanum sessiliflorum Dunal
Dombeya pulchra N.E.Br.
Lotus creticus L.
Crassula erecta (Hook. & Arn.) Berger
Yucca gloriosa L.
Allium sanbornii Alph.Wood
Allium monticola var. monticola
Spirodela punctata (G.Mey.) C.H.Thomps.
Bolboschoenus glaucus (Lam.) S.G.Sm.
Carex scabriuscula Mack.
Scirpus pauciflorus Lightf.
Juncus duranii Ewan
Bromus tectorum var. glabratus Spenn.
Eriochloa contracta Hitchc.
Stipa eminens Cav.
Tripidium ravennae (L.) H.Scholz
Tuctoria greenei (Vasey) Reeder
Potamogeton diversifolius Raf.
Delosperma N.E.Br.
Amaranthus blitum L.
Cymopterus panamintensis J.M.Coult. & Rose ex Coville
Matelea parviflora (A.Gray) Woodson
Antennaria pulvinata Greene
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. megacephala Gray
Encelia virginensis A.Nelson
Ericameria gilmanii (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Erigeron barbellulatus Greene
Erigeron petrophilus Greene
Erigeron floribundus (Kunth) Sch.Bip.
Madia wheeleri (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Parthenium hysterophorus L.
Senecio astephanus Greene
Solidago corymbosa Nutt.
Whitneya dealbata A.Gray
Mahonia pumila (Greene) Fedde
Boechera inyoensis (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Erysimum insulare Greene
Teesdalia coronopifolia (Bergeret ex Steud.) Thell.
Thelypodium lemmonii Greene
Nemacladus twisselmannii J.T.Howell
Linnaea ×grandiflora (Rovelli ex André) Christenh.
Arenaria nuttallii subsp. fragilis Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Bassia americana (S.Watson) A.J.Scott
Wislizenia refracta subsp. refracta
Calystegia peirsonii (Abrams) Brummitt
Calystegia collina subsp. oxyphylla Brummitt
Dudleya bettinae Hoover
Arctostaphylos hooveri P.V.Wells
Rhododendron macrophyllum D.Don
Euphorbia virgata Waldst. & Kit.
Euphorbia supina Raf.
Manihot Mill.
Lupinus caudatus Kellogg
Lupinus onustus S.Watson
Trifolium longipes var. shastense (House) Jeps.
Vicia angustifolia Reichard
Quercus wislizeni var. wislizeni
Centaurium tenuiflorum (Hoffmanns. & Link) Fritsch
Ribes aureum var. aureum
Juglans californica var. hindsii Jeps.
Satureja mimuloides (Benth.) Briq.
Hesperolinon drymarioides (Curran) Small
Hesperolinon serpentinum McCarten
Proboscidea parviflora var. hohokamiana Bretting
Eremothera boothii subsp. boothii
Clarkia heterandra (Torr.) F.H.Lewis & P.H.Raven
Aphyllon californicum subsp. condensum (Heckard) A.C.Schneid.
Aphyllon epigalium subsp. notocalifornicum Colwell & A.C.Schneid.
Castilleja miniata subsp. elata (Piper) Munz
Cordylanthus tenuis subsp. barbatus T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Oxalis micrantha Bertero ex Colla
Nuttallanthus canadensis (L.) D.A.Sutton
Plantago pusilla Nutt.
Gilia cana subsp. cana
Navarretia jepsonii V.L.Bailey ex Jeps.
Rhinotropis cornuta subsp. cornuta
Chorizanthe biloba var. biloba
Chorizanthe palmeri S.Watson
Eriogonum kelloggii A.Gray
Eriogonum eastwoodianum Howell
Eriogonum gilmanii S.Stokes
Eriogonum microthecum var. johnstonei Reveal
Eriogonum kennedyi var. pinicola Reveal
Delphinium hesperium subsp. pallescens (Ewan) Lewis & Epling
Ranunculus alismifolius var. lemmonii (A.Gray) L.D.Benson
Ceanothus jepsonii var. albiflorus J.T.Howell
Ceanothus foliosus var. medius McMinn
Frangula rubra subsp. yosemitana (C.B.Wolf) Kartesz & Gandhi
Horkelia californica var. frondosa (Greene) Ertter & Reveal
Horkelia tularensis (Howell) Munz
Horkelia fusca var. parviflora (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) Wawra
Poteridium annuum (Nutt. ex Hook.) Spach
Salix delnortensis C.K.Schneid.
Acer glabrum var. glabrum
Heuchera L.
Leucophyllum texanum Benth.
Brugmansia suaveolens (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Bercht. & J.Presl
Nicotiana acuminata var. multiflora (Phil.) Reiche
Petunia Juss.
Verbena abramsii Moldenke
Viola purpurea subsp. mohavensis (M.S.Baker & Clausen ex Blake) Clausen
Canna generalis L.H.Bailey
Muhlenbergia tricholepis (Torr.) Columbus
Muhlenbergia repens (J.Presl) Hitchc.
Panicum alatum Zuloaga & Morrone
Justicia hians (Brandegee) Brandegee
Justicia caudata A.Gray
Froelichia xantusii R.A.McCauley
Pachycormus discolor var. discolor
Acourtia pinetorum (Brandegee) Reveal & R.M.King
Bidens nudata Brandegee
Coreocarpus sonoranus var. libranus B.L.Turner
Erigeron alamosanus Rose
Perityle microglossa var. microglossa
Porophyllum ruderale var. macrocephalum (DC.) Cronquist
Simsia lagasceiformis DC.
Viguiera montana Rose
Xanthisma scabrellum (Greene) G.L.Nesom & B.L.Turner
Tecoma capensis (Thunb.) Lindl.
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. suffruticosa
Erysimum moranii Rollins
Lepidium lasiocarpum subsp. wrightii (A.Gray) Thell.
Cochemiea maritima G.E.Linds.
Cylindropuntia alcahes var. burrageana (Britton & Rose) Rebman
Cylindropuntia ciribe (Engelm. ex Coult.) F.M.Knuth
Echinocactus horizonthalonius var. nicholii L.D.Benson
Ferocactus diguetii var. carmenensis G.E.Linds.
Lophocereus gatesii M.E.Jones
Celtis australis L.
Lonicera cerviculata S.S.White
Drymaria arenarioides subsp. peninsularis (S.F.Blake) J.A.Duke
Suaeda ramosissima (Standl.) I.M.Johnst.
Cuscuta umbellata Kunth
Ipomoea thurberi A.Gray
Ipomoea pes-caprae subsp. brasiliensis (L.) Ooststr.
Dudleya virens subsp. extima Moran
Dudleya cedrosensis Moran
Crassulaceae
Schizocarpum palmeri Cogn. & Rose
Diospyros intricata H.Perrier
Rhododendron occidentale var. paludosum Jeps.
Euphorbia hexagonoides S.Watson
Manihot rubricaulis I.M.Johnst.
Astragalus insularis Kellogg
Brongniartia palmeri Rose
Cercis orbiculata Greene
Chamaecrista serpens var. wrightii (A.Gray) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Dalea purpusii Brandegee
Desmodium mexicanum S.Watson
Indigofera laevis Rydb.
Phaseolus acutifolius var. latifolius G.F.Freeman
Rhynchosia pyramidalis (Lam.) Urb.
Senna pallida var. shreveana H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Trifolium mucronatum subsp. lacerum (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Trifolium pinetorum Greene
Zornia reticulata Sm.
Quercus brandegeei Goldman
Geranium wislizeni S.Watson
Hypericum punctatum Lam.
Condea anitae (Epling & Játiva) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Hyptis suaveolens (L.) Poit.
Monardella macrantha A.Gray
Salvia reptans Jacq.
Mentzelia pumila var. pumila
Struthanthus haenkeanus (J.Presl) Standl.
Bastardia bivalvis (Cav.) Kunth ex Griseb.
Melochia tomentosa var. frutescens (Jacq.) DC.
Proboscidea parviflora subsp. sinaloensis (Van Eselt.) Bretting
Oxalis L.
Tetracoccus capensis (I.M.Johnst.) Croizat
Mabrya geniculata subsp. geniculata
Dayia scabra (Brandegee) J.M.Porter
Lastarriaea ptilota Reveal
Galium mechudoense Dempster
Randia armata (Sw.) DC.
Stenotis australis (I.M.Johnst.) Terrell
Buddleja corrugata subsp. corrugata
Lycium californicum subsp. carinatum (S.Watson) Felger
Nicotiana tabacum L.
Physalis solanacea (Schltdl.) Axelius
Physalis leptophylla B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Solanum stoloniferum Schltdl. & Bouché
Glandularia J.F.Gmel.
Phoenix L.
Erigeron petrophilus var. sierrensis G.L.Nesom
Helianthella californica var. californica
Lepidium oblongum var. oblongum
Desmodium grahamii A.Gray
Eriastrum tracyi Mason
Suaeda puertopenascoa M.C.Watson & Ferren
Aloe L.
Dieteria canescens var. shastensis (A.Gray) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Marcetella moquiniana (Webb & Berthel.) Svent.
Cryptantha clokeyi I.M.Johnst.
Abutilon grandifolium (Willd.) Sweet
Trochetiopsis melanoxylon (R.Br. ex Aiton) Marais
Schlumbergera Lem.
Solanum asperolanatum Ruiz & Pav.
Momordica balsamina L.
Jarava ichu Ruiz & Pav.
Hastingsia bracteosa S.Watson
Carex abrupta Mack.
Juncus howellii F.J.Herm.
Luzula cascadensis Zika
Phalaris L.
Puccinellia maritima (Huds.) Parl.
Zostera asiatica Miki
Sambucus microbotrys Rydb.
Drosanthemum Schwantes
Apium graveolens var. graveolens
Perideridia pringlei (J.M.Coult. & Rose) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Perideridia Rchb.
Arnica cernua Howell
Erechtites arguta (A.Rich.) DC.
Erigeron concinnus var. concinnus
Eriophyllum confertiflorum var. trifidum (Nutt.) A.Gray
Eriophyllum lanatum var. cuneatum (Kellogg) Jeps.
Helianthus nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Heterotheca sessiliflora var. camphorata (Eastw.) Semple
Heterotheca sessiliflora var. fastigiata (Greene) Semple
Lessingia tenuis (A.Gray) Coville
Osteospermum monstrosum (Burm.fil.) J.C.Manning & Goldblatt
Caulanthus flavescens (Hook.) Payson
Thelypodium stenopetalum S.Watson
Spergularia media (L.) C.Presl ex Griseb.
Velezia rigida L.
Chenopodium serotinum Forssk.
Cuscuta indecora var. indecora
Parvisedum congdonii (Eastw.) R.T.Clausen
Acmispon procumbens (Greene) Brouillet
Astragalus cimae var. cimae
Caesalpinia spinosa (Molina) Kuntze
Lupinus andersonii var. andersonii
Lupinus dalesae Eastw.
Medicago praecox DC.
Trifolium howellii S.Watson
Ulex L.
Quercus subconvexa Tucker
Frankenia pulverulenta L.
Geranium incisum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Geranium pratense L.
Ribes menziesii var. hystrix (Eastw.) Jeps.
Hypericum perforatum subsp. perforatum
Monarda L.
Monardella saxicola I.M.Johnst.
Monardella breweri subsp. breweri
Monardella boydii A.C.Sanders & Elvin
Pogogyne clareana J.T.Howell
Mentzelia eremophila (Jeps.) H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Eremalche parryi subsp. parryi
Proboscidea lutea (Lindl.) Stapf
Calyptridium parryi var. parryi
Jasminum polyanthum Franch.
Clarkia speciosa subsp. polyantha F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Oenothera micrantha Hornem. ex Spreng.
Castilleja densiflora subsp. obispoensis (D.D.Keck) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Orobanchaceae
Chloropyron molle subsp. hispidum (Pennell) Tank & J.M.Egger
Cordylanthus eremicus subsp. kernensis T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Eschscholzia hypecoides Benth.
Collinsia rattanii A.Gray
Platanus L.
Leptosiphon rattanii (A.Gray) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Leptosiphon grandiflorus (Benth.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Leptosiphon acicularis (Greene) Jeps.
Navarretia subuligera Greene
Chorizanthe xantii subsp. leucotheca (Goodman) Munz
Eriogonum ternatum Howell
Eriogonum hoffmannii var. robustius S.Stokes
Rumex pauciflorus Campd.
Primula subalpina (Eastw.) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Myosurus minimus subsp. apus (Greene) G.R.Campb.
Ranunculus eschscholtzii var. oxynotus (A.Gray) Jeps.
Frangula purshiana (DC.) A.Gray
Ivesia pygmaea Gray
Rosaceae
Pectiantia breweri (A.Gray) Rydb.
Agalinis heterophylla (Nutt.) Small
Cestrum parqui (Lam.) L'Hér.
Viola lobata var. lobata
Agave avellanidens Trel.
Canna indica L.
Gibasis linearis (Benth.) Rohweder
Carex longissima M.E.Jones
Cyperus pygmaeus Rottb.
Bouteloua simplex Lag.
Digitaria insularis (L.) Fedde
Echinochloa crus-pavonis var. crus-pavonis
Eragrostis spicata Vasey
Muhlenbergia fragilis Swallen
Muhlenbergia brandegeei C.Reeder
Panicum annulatum (Flüggé) A.Rich.
Setaria scheelei (Steud.) Hitchc.
Sporobolus airoides var. airoides
Eichhornia crassipes (Mart.) Solms
Matelea tristiflora (Standl.) Woodson
Aristolochia quercetorum Standl.
Ageratina O.Hoffm.
Ageratina viscosissima (Rolfe) R.King & H.Rob.
Bidens odorata var. calcicola (Greenm.) R.E.Ballard
Brickellia simplex A.Gray
Brickellia megaphylla M.E.Jones ex B.L.Rob.
Chaetymenia peduncularis Hook. & Arn.
Cirsium mexicanum DC.
Coreocarpus sanpedroensis E.B.Sm.
Gazania rigens (L.) Gaertn.
Heterotheca thiniicola (Rzed. & E.Ezcurra) B.L.Turner
Senecio pinacatensis Felger
Xanthisma arenarium (Benth.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Xanthocephalum gymnospermoides var. eradiatum M.A.Lane
Crescentia alata Kunth
Ferocactus gracilis var. coloratus (H.E.Gates) G.E.Linds.
Ferocactus peninsulae var. viscainensis (H.E.Gates) G.E.Linds.
Lophocereus Britton & Rose
Mammillaria petrophila subsp. arida (Rose ex Quehl) D.R.Hunt
Opuntia durangensis Britton & Rose
Opuntia engelmannii var. flavispina (L.D.Benson) B.D.Parfitt & Pinkava
Polycarpon tetraphyllum subsp. depressum (Nutt.) Iamonico
Silene laciniata subsp. greggii (Gray) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Atriplex falcata (M.E.Jones) Standl.
Cuscuta legitima Costea & Stefanovic
Ipomoea tenuiloba var. lemmonii (A.Gray) Yatsk. & Mason
Marah macrocarpa var. micrantha (Dunn) Stocking
Croton fragilis Kunth
Albizia lebbek
Brongniartia alamosana Rydb.
Caesalpinia sclerocarpa Standl.
Calliandra pilocarpa A.E.Estrada, Rebman & Villarreal
Dalea schottii Torr.
Dalea versicolor subsp. versicolor
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. arizonicus (Britton) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus subvexus var. subvexus
Lupinus gormanii Piper
Parkinsonia praecox subsp. praecox
Trifolium amabile Kunth
Quercus havardii var. tuckeri S.L.Welsh
Abutilon mucronatum J.E.Fryxell
Pseudabutilon thurberi (A.Gray) Fryxell
Sida collina Schltdl.
Wissadula amplissima (L.) R.E.Fr.
Ficus benjamina L.
Eucalyptus microtheca F.Muell.
Salpianthus macrodontus Standl.
Schoepfia schreberi J.F.Gmel.
Penstemon barbatus subsp. torreyi (Benth.) D.D.Keck
Bonplandia geminiflora Cav.
Polygala sinaloae Blake
Polygala glochidiata Kunth
Rumex salicifolius var. utahensis (Rech.fil.) Reveal
Adolphia infesta (Kunth) Meisn.
Pseudoziziphus parryi var. microphylla (I.M.Johnst.) Hauenschild
Randia Houst. ex L.
Lycium fremontii var. congestum C.L.Hitchc.
Glandularia shrevei (Moldenke) Umber
Lippia formosa Brandegee
Hybanthus mexicanus Ging. ex DC.
Viola palmata L.
Cissus mexicana Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Vitis L.
Pentachaeta alsinoides Greene
Baccharis pilularis var. consanguinea (DC.) Kuntze
Lippia carterae (Moldenke) G.L.Nesom
Oxalis nudiflora Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Penstemon clevelandii subsp. clevelandii
Chloris truncata R.Br.
Marina catalinae Barneby
Daucus L.
Gossypium barbadense L.
Arctostaphylos ×repens (Howell) P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos insularis var. pubescens Eastw.
Ficus palmata Forssk.
Tamarindus indica L.
Sedum vinicolor S.Watson
Michelia figo (Lour.) Spreng.
Echinopsis Zucc.
Gelsemium sempervirens (L.) J.St.-Hil.
Lotus maroccanus Ball
Navarretia modocensis L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Gomphocarpus fruticosus (L.) W.T.Aiton
Acanthoscyphus parishii (Parry) Small
Allium howellii var. clokeyi Ownbey & Aase ex Traub
Carex davyi Mack.
Carex multicostata Mack.
Scirpus diffusus Schuyler
Trichophorum clementis (M.E.Jones) S.G.Sm.
Juncus phaeocephalus var. phaeocephalus
Luzula subcongesta (S.Watson) Jeps.
Alstroemeria L.
Elymus glaucus var. tenuis Vasey
Elymus farctus subsp. boreoatlanticus (Simonet & Guin.) Melderis
Glyceria cookei Swallen
Melica geyeri Munro
Panicum coloratum L.
Stipa latiglumis Swallen
Stipa divaricata Columbus & J.P.Sm.
Amaranthus blitum subsp. emarginatus (Moq. ex Uline & Bray) Carretero, Muñoz Garm. & Pedrol
Blepharizonia plumosa (Kellogg) Greene
Helianthus nuttallii subsp. parishii (A.Gray) Heiser
Heterotheca sessiliflora var. sanjacintensis Semple
Lagophylla glandulosa A.Gray
Lasthenia microglossa (DC.) Greene
Ozothamnus diosmifolius (Vent.) DC.
Pyrrocoma uniflora var. gossypina (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Soliva pterosperma (Juss.) Less.
Symphyotrichum spathulatum var. yosemitanum (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Taraxacum californicum Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Draba corrugata S.Watson
Erysimum menziesii subsp. menziesii
Malcolmia graeca Boiss. & Spruner
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa var. acanthocarpa
Downingia ornatissima var. eximia (Hoover) McVaugh
Arenaria nuttallii subsp. gregaria (A.Heller) Maguire
Herniaria hirsuta var. hirsuta
Paronychia chilensis DC.
Silene parishii var. latifolia C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Silene bridgesii Rohrb.
Spergularia platensis (Cambess.) Fenzl
Kochia californica S.Watson
Crassula tetragona L.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa var. tomentosiformis (J.E.Adams) Munz
Bryanthus breweri A.Gray
Kalmia glauca var. microphylla Hook.
Acacia mearnsii De Wild.
Lupinus magnificus var. glarecola M.E.Jones
Lupinus breweri var. parvulus C.P.Sm.
Rupertia hallii (Rydb.) J.W.Grimes
Sophora chrysophylla (Salisb.) Seem.
Vicia semicincta Greene
Geranium pilosum Sol. ex Willd.
Koeberlinia spinosa subsp. tenuispina (K. & P.) A.E.Murray
Stachys emersonii Piper
Limnanthes douglasii var. douglasii
Hesperolinon adenophyllum (A.Gray) Small
Sidalcea calycosa M.E.Jones
Anagallis arvensis var. arvensis
Chylismia claviformis subsp. lancifolia (A.Heller) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Castilleja exserta subsp. venusta (A.Heller) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Eschscholzia lemmonii subsp. kernensis (Munz) C.Clark
Pittosporum phillyraeoides DC.
Collinsia antonina Hardham
Penstemon confertus var. geniculatus (Greene) Jeps.
Gilia tenuiflora subsp. hoffmannii (Eastw.) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Chorizanthe biloba var. immemora Reveal & Hardham
Chorizanthe polygonoides A.Gray
Chorizanthe breweri S.Watson
Eriogonum kennedyi var. alpigenum (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum apricum var. apricum
Delphinium parishii subsp. pallidum (Munz) M.J.Warnock
Ceanothus parryi Trel.
Ceanothus impressus Trel.
Ivesia aperta var. aperta
Potentilla breweri var. expansa S.Watson
Galium californicum subsp. primum Dempster & Stebbins
Myoporum Banks & Sol. ex G.Forst.
Phyla canescens (Kunth) Greene
Yucca angustissima subsp. toftiae Reveal
Sisyrinchium translucens (E.P.Bicknell) Espejo & López-Ferr.
Bothriochloa barbinodis var. barbinodis
Cenchrus brownii Roem. & Schult.
Holographis virgata var. palmeri (Rose) T.F.Daniel
Justicia austrocapensis T.F.Daniel
Mandevilla foliosa (Müll.Arg.) Hemsl.
Amauria carterae A.M.Powell
Bidens odorata Cav.
Encelia conspersa Benth.
Eupatorium collinum DC.
Hofmeisteria crassifolia S.Watson
Melampodium appendiculatum B.L.Rob.
Senecio actinella Greene
Zinnia zinnioides (Kunth) Olorode & A.M.Torres
Tabebuia chrysantha (Jacq.) Nicholson
Descurainia pinnata subsp. nelsonii (Rydb.) Detling
Echinocereus lindsayi J.Meyrán
Mammillaria louisae G.E.Linds.
Neomammillaria arida Britton & Rose
Sagina subulata (Sw.) C.Presl
Cuscuta odontolepis Engelm.
Ipomoea sescossiana Baill.
Graptopetalum pusillum Rose
Citrullus vulgaris Schrader
Cyclanthera micrantha Cogn. ex Rose
Ditaxis brandegeei (Millsp.) Rose & Standl.
Euphorbia platysperma Engelm. ex S.Watson
Euphorbia chamaesula Boiss.
Euphorbia incisa var. incisa
Acmispon nudatus (Greene) Brouillet
Dalea pinetorum Gentry
Phaseolus pauciflorus Benth.
Senegalia occidentalis (Rose) Britton & Rose
Senna wislizeni var. painteri (Britton) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Tephrosia saxicola C.E.Wood
Vachellia glandulifera (S.Watson) Seigler & Ebinger
Vachellia californica (Brandegee) Seigler & Ebinger
Hypericum pratense Cham. & Schltdl.
Clinopodium palmeri (A.Gray) Kuntze
Monardella eplingii Elvin, A.C.Sanders & J.L.Anderson
Struthanthus venetus (Kunth) Blume
Cuphea wrightii var. wrightii
Ayenia microphylla A.Gray
Ficus microcarpa L.fil.
Acleisanthes longiflora A.Gray
Pisonia capitata (S.Watson) Standl.
Fraxinus cuspidata Torr.
Oxalis drummondii A.Gray
Veronica mexicana S.Watson
Chorizanthe mutabilis Brandegee
Diodella crassifolia (Benth.) Borhidi
Salix elaeagnos Scop.
Maurandella antirrhiniflora (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Rothm.
Polypremum procumbens L.
Pouzolzia palmeri S.Watson
Verbena urticifolia L.
Vitis peninsularis M.E.Jones
Philadelphus mexicanus Schltdl.
Proboscidea parviflora subsp. gracillima (Hevly) Bretting
Cardiospermum grandiflorum Sw.
Apiaceae
Chaetadelpha wheeleri A.Gray
Lactuca serriola f. integrata Bogenhard
Lyonothamnus floribundus var. aspleniifolius (Greene) Brandegee
Anisodontea capensis (L.) D.M.Bates
Pittosporum napaulense (DC.) Rehder & Wilson
Aglaonema Schott
Luehea divaricata Mart.
Setaria italica (L.) P.Beauv.
Bauhinia ×blakeana Dunn
Malpighia glabra L.
Leucadendron discolor H.Buek ex Meisn.
Solanum lidii Sunding
Drymocallis glandulosa var. viscida (Parish) Ertter
Allium lacunosum var. lacunosum
Carex vernacula L.H.Bailey
Najas guadalupensis subsp. guadalupensis
Iris pallida Lam.
Agrostis lacuna-vernalis P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Bromidium tandilense (Kuntze) Rúgolo
Eustachys distichophylla (Lag.) Nees
Festuca ovina var. glauca (P.Beauv.) G.Mey.
Sambucus callicarpa Greene
Angelica tomentosa var. tomentosa
Cymopterus deserticola Brandegee
Perideridia parishii subsp. parishii
Artemisia arbuscula subsp. arbuscula
Centaurea jacea subsp. pratensis (W.D.J.Koch) Čelak., 1871
Cirsium nidulum (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Eriophyllum confertiflorum var. tanacetiflorum (Greene) Jeps.
Eriophyllum lanatum var. lanceolatum (Howell) Jeps.
Eriophyllum lanatum var. hallii Constance
Helianthus inexpectatus D.J.Keil & Elvin
Holocarpha obconica (J.C.Clausen & D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck
Lasthenia debilis (Greene ex A.Gray) Ornduff
Layia pentachaeta subsp. albida D.D.Keck
Luina nardosmia (A.Gray) Cronquist
Packera subnuda (DC.) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Packera ionophylla (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Pyrrocoma racemosa (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Rafinesquia Nutt.
Senecio angulatus L.fil.
Oreocarya virginensis (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Greeneocharis similis (K.Mathew & P.H.Raven) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Plagiobothrys chorisianus var. chorisianus
Boechera dispar (M.E.Jones) Al-Shehbaz
Thlaspi glaucum var. hesperium Payson
Downingia ornatissima var. ornatissima
Eremogone macradenia var. arcuifolia (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Silene invisa C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Calystegia purpurata subsp. saxicola (Eastw.) Brummitt
Diospyros virginiana var. virginiana
Kalmia glauca Aiton
Croton californicus var. tenuis (S.Watson) A.M.Ferguson
Lupinus superbus A.Heller
Lupinus magnificus M.E.Jones
Lupinus ×inyoensis A.Heller
Quercus alvordiana Eastw.
Zeltnera trichantha (Griseb.) G.Mans.
Philadelphus microphyllus var. pumilus (Rydb.) Henrickson
Juglans L.
Lavandula angustifolia Mill.
Lycopus lucidus Turcz. ex Benth.
Monardella Benth.
Sidalcea hirsuta A.Gray
Angophora costata (Gaertn.) Britton
Eucalyptus utilis Brooker & Hopper
Eucalyptus cypellocarpa L.A.S.Johnson
Chylismia arenaria A.Nelson
Clarkia cylindrica subsp. cylindrica
Epilobium oreganum Greene
Ludwigia peploides subsp. montevidensis (Spreng.) Raven
Orobanche parishii subsp. parishii
Gilia tricolor subsp. tricolor
Saltugilia latimeri T.L.Weese & L.A.Johnson
Aristocapsa insignis (Curran) Reveal & Hardham
Eriogonum hoffmannii var. hoffmannii
Eriogonum gossypinum Curran
Eriogonum temblorense Howell & Twisselm.
Rumex berlandieri Meisn.
Reseda alba L.
Galium johnstonii Dempster & Stebbins
Galium californicum subsp. maritimum Dempster & Stebbins
Datura quercifolia Kunth
Parietaria L.
Yucca arizonica McKelvey
Gibasis linearis subsp. rhodantha (Torr.) D.R.Hunt
Tradescantia gentryi D.R.Hunt
Cyperus surinamensis Rottb.
Eleocharis montana var. nodulosa (Roth) Svenson
Elymus lanceolatus (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Gould
Eriochloa lemmonii Vasey & Scribn.
Festuca sororia Piper
Panicum hirticaule var. stramineum (Hitchc. & Chase) Beetle
Nolina beldingii Brandegee
Prionosciadium madrense S.Watson
Aralia humilis Cav.
Ageratina stricta (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Bidens lemmonii A.Gray
Brickellia baccharidea A.Gray
Cirsium pulchellum (Greene) Wooton & Standl.
Layia glandulosa var. hispida (Greene) Jeps.
Parthenice mollis var. mollis
Pyrrocoma linearis (D.D.Keck) Kartesz & Gandhi
Symphyotrichum subulatum var. squamatum (Spreng.) S.D.Sundb.
Zinnia peruviana (L.) L.
Ferocactus fordii var. grandiflorus Linds.
Ferocactus acanthodes var. acanthodes
Drymaria leptophylla (Cham. & Schltdl.) Fenzl ex Rohrb.
Schaefferia shrevei Lundell
Wimmeria mexicana (DC.) Lundell
Atriplex canescens subsp. macropoda (Rose & Standl.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Evolvulus rotundifolius (S.Watson) Hallier fil.
Citrullus lanatus var. lanatus
Cyclanthera dissecta (Torr. & A.Gray) Arn.
Arctostaphylos peninsularis subsp. juarezensis J.E.Keeley
Ditaxis heterantha Zucc.
Drypetes gentryi Monach.
Cassia leptadenia Greenm.
Chamaecrista nictitans subsp. nictitans
Marina orcuttii (S.Watson) Barneby
Medicago polymorpha f. apiculata (Willd.) Shinners
Phaseolus leptostachyus Benth.
Quercus turbinella subsp. turbinella
Gentianella microcalyx (Lemmon) J.M.Gillett
Krameria sonorae Britton
Condea decipiens (M.E.Jones) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Struthanthus palmeri Kuijt
Gossypium turneri Fryxell
Hermannia pauciflora S.Watson
Wissadula hernandioides (L'Hér.) Garcke
Mirabilis laevis var. laevis
Tripterocalyx wootonii Standl.
Oenothera cavernae Munz
Xylonagra Donn.Sm. & Rose
Erythranthe austrolatidens G.L.Nesom
Mabrya geniculata (Rob. & Fernald) Elisens
Russelia grandidentata Carlson
Aliciella mcvickerae (M.E.Jones) J.M.Porter
Polygonum mexicanum Small
Delphinium scopulorum A.Gray
Thalictrum pinnatum S.Watson
Colubrina triflora Brongn.
Rosa minutifolia f. albiflora W.H.Lewis
Mitracarpus hirtus (L.) DC.
Serjania mexicana (L.) Willd.
Sideroxylon tepicense (Standl.) T.D.Penn.
Buddleja crotonoides A.Gray
Priva mexicana (L.) Pers.
Viscainoa geniculata var. pinnata I.M.Johnst.
Brickellia atractyloides var. atractyloides
Lantana hirsuta M.Martens & Galeotti
Eucalyptus citriodora Hook.
Quercus macdonaldii Greene & Kellogg
Delphinium umbraculorum H.Lewis & Epling
Poa bulbosa subsp. bulbosa
Plantago elongata subsp. elongata
Ficus nitida Thunb.
Diospyros lotus L.
Baeckea virgata (J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.) Andrews
Iochroma australe Griseb.
Streptosolen jamesonii (Benth.) Miers
Guichenotia ledifolia J.Gay
Eucalyptus leucoxylon F.Muell.
Carex luzulifolia W.Boott
Eleocharis engelmannii var. detonsa A.Gray
Juncus gerardii subsp. gerardii
Bromus catharticus var. elatus (É.Desv.) Planchuelo
Orcuttia inaequalis Hoover
Amaranthaceae
Perideridia howellii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Perideridia californica (Torr.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Hydrocotyle sibthorpioides Lam.
Centaurea sulphurea Willd.
Cirsium occidentale var. compactum Hoover
Erigeron pumilus subsp. concinnoides Cronquist
Helenium L.
Heterotheca sessiliflora subsp. fastigiata (Greene) Semple
Isocoma veneta (Kunth) Greene
Lasthenia leptalea (A.Gray) Ornduff
Lessingia arachnoidea Greene
Picradeniopsis multiflora (Hook. & Arn.) B.G.Baldwin
Thelesperma filifolium (Hook.) A.Gray
Zinnia elegans Jacq.
Mahonia pinnata subsp. insularis (Munz) Roof
Lepidium jaredii Brandegee
Streptanthus oliganthus Rollins
Campanula exigua Rattan
Downingia Torr.
Arenaria macradenia var. macradenia
Paronychia franciscana Eastw.
Atriplex patula subsp. hastata (L.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Dudleya blochmaniae subsp. insularis (Moran) Moran
Chamaesyce serpillifolia subsp. serpillifolia
Albizia distachya (Vent.) J.F.Macbr.
Astragalus webberi A.Gray ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Astragalus nigricalycis (M.E.Jones) Abrams
Glycyrrhiza lepidota var. glutinosa (Nutt.) S.Watson
Lupinus croceus var. pilosellus (Eastw.) Munz
Lupinus citrinus var. citrinus
Trifolium atropurpureum Nutt.
Quercus parvula Greene
Dovyalis caffra (Hook.fil. ex Harv. & Sond.) Warb.
Ribes divaricatum var. parishii (A.Heller) Jeps.
Ribes velutinum var. glanduliferum (A.Heller) Jeps.
Lavandula dentata L.
Scutellaria bolanderi subsp. bolanderi
Limnanthes vinculans Ornduff
Linum californicum Benth.
Nymphoides peltata (S.G.Gmel.) Kuntze
Aegiceras corniculatum (L.) Blanco
Callistemon acuminatus Cheel
Melaleuca linariifolia Sm.
Abronia umbellata var. breviflora (Standl.) L.A.Galloway
Boerhavia Vaill. ex L.
Ligustrum ovalifolium Hassk.
Clarkia amoena subsp. whitneyi (Gray) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Eschscholzia rhombipetala Greene
Tetracoccus Engelm. ex Parry
Antirrhinum leptaleum A.Gray
Eriastrum calocyanum S.J.De Groot
Navarretia prolifera subsp. lutea (Brand) Mason
Polygala cornuta subsp. fishiae (Parry) Munz
Eriogonum kennedyi var. kennedyi
Eriogonum glandulosum (Nutt.) Nutt. ex Benth.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. minus I.M.Johnst.
Ceanothus oliganthus var. tomentosus (Parry) K.Brandegee
Drymocallis lactea var. austiniae (Jeps.) Ertter
Galium angustifolium subsp. onycense (Dempster) Dempster & Stebbins
Galium serpenticum subsp. warnerense Dempster & Ehrend.
Heuchera caespitosa Eastw.
Viola adunca subsp. adunca
Commelina coelestis Willd.
Cyperus entrerianus Boeckeler
Sisyrinchium palmeri Greenm.
Luzula forsteri (Sm.) DC.
Hymenocallis sonorensis Standl.
Malaxis unifolia Michx.
Prionosciadium townsendii Rose
Metastelma minutiflorum Wiggins
Aristolochia monticola Brandegee
Acourtia mexicana (Lag. ex D.Don) H.Rob.
Bidens gentryi Sherff
Brickellia hastata Benth.
Dieteria bigelovii (A.Gray) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Eupatorium sagittatum var. sagittatum
Galinsoga parviflora Cav.
Lactuca graminifolia Michx.
Malacothrix insularis Greene
Pluchea salicifolia (Mill.) S.F.Blake
Stevia micrantha Lag.
Stevia viscida Kunth
Symphyotrichum falcatum var. commutatum (Torr. & A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Tagetes lucida Cav.
Verbesina erosa Brandegee
Physaria palmeri (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Opuntia littoralis var. littoralis
Arivela viscosa (L.) Raf.
Ipomoea madrensis S.Watson
Cucurbita palmeri L.H.Bailey
Sicyos ampelophyllus Wooton & Standl.
Ditaxis serrata var. serrata
Acaciella angustissima var. texensis (Torr. & A.Gray) L.Rico
Acmispon mearnsii (Britton) Brouillet
Albizia sinaloensis Britton & Rose
Erythrina caffra Thunb.
Parkinsonia ×carterae Hawkins
Platymiscium trifoliolatum Benth.
Quercus perpallida Trel.
Salvia parryi A.Gray
Gossypium hirsutum L.
Malacothamnus Greene
Sida endlicheriana C.Presl
Eucalyptus torquata Luehm.
Forestiera angustifolia Torr.
Oxalis latifolia Kunth
Phyllanthus evanescens Brandegee
Plantago insularis var. fastigiata (E.Morris) Jeps.
Condalia spathulata A.Gray
Sideroxylon peninsulare (Brandegee) T.D.Penn.
Agalinis peduncularis (Benth.) Pennell
Physalis cardiophylla Torr.
Githopsis pulchella subsp. pulchella
Psorothamnus thompsoniae (Vail) R.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Achillea L.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. mollis J.E.Adams
Lavatera venosa S.Watson
Dendromecon harfordii var. rhamnoides (Greene) Munz
Terminalia catappa L.
Dimorphotheca ecklonis DC.
Echeveria ×imbricata Deleuil
Clerodendrum ugandense Prain
Cyclanthera pedata (L.) Schrad.
Rondeletia amoena (Planch.) Hemsl.
Spinacia oleracea L.
Allium roseum L.
Crataegus pubescens (Kunth) Steud.
Ferocactus robustus (Pfeiff.) Britton & Rose
Iochroma cyaneum (Lindl.) M.L.Green
Solanum subinerme Jacq.
Pentas Benth.
Eleocharis bolanderi A.Gray
Perideridia bacigalupii T.I.Chuang & Constance
Tauschia Schltdl.
Rorippa palustris var. dictyota (Greene) Stuckey
Arenaria nuttallii Pax
Atriplex micrantha Ledeb.
Dudleya bicolor P.H.Thomson
Arctostaphylos pechoensis var. viridissima Eastw.
Rhododendron sonomense Greene
Acacia pycnantha Benth.
Astragalus kentrophyta var. danaus (Barneby) Barneby
Lupinus aridus Douglas
Lupinus hypolasius Greene
Lupinus adsurgens var. lilacinus A.Heller
Lupinus ludovicianus Greene
Medicago rigidula (L.) All.
Trifolium longipes subsp. atrorubens (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Quercus turbinella subsp. californica Tucker
Pelargonium denticulatum Jacq.
Lavandula intermedia Emeric ex Loisel.
Monardella undulata subsp. undulata
Monardella eremicola A.C.Sanders & Elvin
Salvia splendens Sellow ex Schult.
Scutellaria tuberosa subsp. australis (Jeps.) Epling
Stachys albens var. juliensis Jeps.
Melaleuca armillaris (Gaertn.) Sm.
Clarkia rostrata W.S.Davis
Aphyllon validum subsp. validum
Erythranthe inconspicua (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Erythranthe norrisii (Heckard & Shevock) G.L.Nesom
Mimulus pilosus (Benth.) S.Watson
Plantago truncata subsp. firma (Kunze ex Walp.) Pilg.
Eriogonum siskiyouense Small
Amelanchier utahensis subsp. covillei (Standl.) Clokey
Galium grayanum subsp. grayanum
Heuchera alpestris Rosend. & Lakela
Heuchera abramsii Rydb.
Solanum umbelliferum var. xanti (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Plectritis DC.
Cyperus semiochraceus Boeckeler
Enteropogon chlorideus (J.Presl) Clayton
Tetramerium tenuissimum Rose
Gomphrena serrata L.
Cyrtocarpa edulis var. glabra León de la Luz & Pérez Navarro
Conioselinum mexicanum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Lomatium bicolor var. leptocarpum (Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray) Schlessman
Acmella oppositifolia (Lam.) R.K.Jansen
Cirsium mexicanum var. mexicanum
Encelia ravenii Wiggins
Heliomeris longifolia var. longifolia
Perityle cordifolia (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Roldana hartwegii (Benth.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Stevia glandulosa var. gentryi Grashoff
Verbesina felgeri B.L.Turner
Begonia gracilis var. nervipilosa A.DC.
Bursera Jacq. ex L.
Comandra umbellata subsp. pallida (A.DC.) Piehl
Cyclanthera minima (S.Watson) Kearns & C.E.Jones
Comarostaphylis polifolia (Kunth) Zucc. ex Klotzsch
Acalypha burquezii V.W.Steinm. & Felger
Euphorbia anychioides Boiss.
Sapium appendiculatum (Müll.Arg.) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Haematoxylum boreale S.Watson
Psoralea lanceolata Pursh
Quercus radiata Trel.
Garrya salicifolia Eastw.
Hyptis laniflora var. insularis (Standl. & Goldman) I.M.Johnst.
Monardella linoides subsp. stricta (Parish) Epling
Salvia azurea Lam.
Eucnide hypomalaca Standl.
Mentzelia cronquistii H.J.Thomps. & Prigge
Malvella sagittifolia (A.Gray) Fryxell
Martynia annua L.
Castilleja fraterna Greenm.
Penstemon vizcainensis Moran
Coccoloba goldmanii Standl.
Ranunculus macranthus Scheele
Ranunculus inamoenus var. inamoenus
Ceanothus huichagorare Loes.
Crusea wrightii var. wrightii
Buchnera obliqua Benth.
Solanum verbascifolium L.
Bouchea dissecta S.Watson
Ixchelia mexicana (Ging. ex DC.) H.E.Ballard & Wahlert
Zapoteca formosa (Kunth) H.M.Hern.
Brickellia longifolia var. longifolia
Thelypodium integrifolium subsp. affine (Greene) Al-Shehbaz
Peritoma DC.
Eriogonum cithariforme var. agninum (Greene) Reveal
Eucnide Zucc.
Rhus aromatica var. trilobata (Nutt.) A.Gray ex S.Watson
Gamochaeta stachydifolia (Lam.) Cabrera
Ficus elastica Roxb. ex Hornem.
Pisonia umbellifera (J. & G.Forst.) Seem.
Cissus rhombifolia M.Vahl
Eucalyptus punctata DC.
Sabal Adans.
Trifolium vavilovii Eig
Juanulloa mexicana (Schltdl.) Miers
Eucalyptus gomphocephala A.Cunn. ex DC.
Holmskioldia sanguinea Retz.
Trifolium constantinopolitanum Ser.
Simarouba glauca DC.
Sphenopholis interrupta subsp. californica (Vasey) Scribn.
Agave shawii var. shawii
Wolffia arrhiza (L.) Horkel ex Wimm.
Carex lenticularis var. impressa (L.H.Bailey) L.A.Standl.
Isolepis carinata Hook. & Arn. ex Torr.
Schoenoplectus mucronatus (L.) Palla
Lilium occidentale Purdy
Agrositanion saundersii (Vasey) Bowden
Muhlenbergia jonesii (Vasey) Hitchc.
Orcuttia californica var. californica
Sambucus velutina Nakai
Malephora N.E.Br.
Cymopterus panamintensis var. acutifolius (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Munz
Lomatium torreyi (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Erigeron sanctarum S.Watson ex Brandegee
Erigeron elmeri (Greene) Greene
Guizotia abyssinica (L.fil.) Cass.
Heteranthemis viscidihirta Schott
Holozonia filipes (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Layia graveolens Greene
Microseris acuminata Greene
Onopordum illyricum L.
Oreocarya hoffmannii (I.M.Johnst.) Abrams
Plagiobothrys tener var. subglaber I.M.Johnst.
Thysanocarpus conchuliferus Greene
Nyctocereus (A.Berger) Britton & Rose
Arenaria howellii S.Watson
Silene grayi S.Watson
Spergula arvensis subsp. arvensis
Chenopodium littoreum Benet-Pierce & M.G.Simpson
Convolvulus peirsonii Abrams
Aeonium arboreum (L.) Webb & Berthel.
Cotyledon L.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. daciticola P.V.Wells
Erica melanthera L.
Euphorbiaceae
Acacia pendula A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Halimodendron halodendron (Pall.) Druce
Lupinus laxiflorus var. silvicola C.P.Sm.
Lupinus lepidus var. ramosus Jeps.
Trifolium virescens Greene
Trifolium kingii S.Watson
Vicia lutea L.
Garrya flavescens subsp. congdonii (Eastw.) Dahling
Swertia tubulosa (Coville) Jeps.
Zeltnera arizonica (A.Gray) G.Mans.
Mentzelia tridentata (Davidson) H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Chylismia munzii (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Clarkia virgata Greene
Oenothera heterantha Nutt.
Castilleja rubicundula subsp. lithospermoides (Benth.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Aphyllon californicum subsp. grayanum (Beck) A.C.Schneid.
Corydalis caseana A.Gray
Dicentra nevadensis Eastw.
Phrymaceae
Pittosporum floribundum Wight & Arn.
Antirrhinum vexillo-calyculatum subsp. vexillo-calyculatum
Keckiella Straw
Linaria bipartita (Vent.) Willd.
Penstemon pseudospectabilis subsp. pseudospectabilis
Plantago aristata Michx.
Gilia jacens A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Chorizanthe rectispina Goodman
Eriogonum ericifolium var. thornei Reveal & Henrickson
Eriogonum umbellatum var. chlorothamnus Reveal
Horkelia fusca var. pseudocapitata (Rydb. ex Howell) M.Peck
Malus Mill.
Galium ambiguum subsp. ambiguum
Galium grande McClatchie
Galium grayanum Ehrend.
Mitellastra caulescens (Nutt.) Howell
Lycium ferocissimum Miers
Valeriana sylvatica Banks ex Richards.
Agave datylio F.A.C.Weber
Juncus balticus subsp. littoralis (Engelm.) Snogerup
Mesadenus polyanthus (Rchb.f.) Schltr.
Dichanthium annulatum (Forssk.) Stapf
Muhlenbergia palmeri Vasey
Schizachyrium mexicanum (Hitchc.) A.Camus
Dyschoriste hirsutissima (Nees) Kuntze
Mandevilla brachysiphon (Torr.) Pichon
Metastelma californicum subsp. californicum
Aldama brandegeei (A.M.Carter) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Dyssodia tagetiflora Lag.
Heliomeris longifolia Cockerell
Koanophyllon peninsulare (Brandegee) B.L.Turner
Lorandersonia salicina (S.F.Blake) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Porophyllum ochroleucum Rydb.
Pseudognaphalium priscum G.L.Nesom
Verbesina parviflora (Kunth) S.F.Blake
Descurainia longipedicellata (E.Fourn.) O.E.Schulz
Halimolobos diffusus (A.Gray) O.E.Schulz
Ferocactus horridus Britton & Rose
Lophocereus schottii f. mieckleyanus G.E.Linds.
Mammillaria thornberi Orcutt
Githopsis diffusa subsp. guadalupensis (Morin) Lammers
Cerastium fastigiatum Greene
Suaeda californica var. taxifolia (Standl.) Munz
Cuscuta umbellata var. umbellata
Ditaxis gracilis Rose & Standl.
Euphorbia colletioides Benth.
Astragalus minthorniae (Rydb.) Jeps.
Conzattia sericea Standl.
Dalea bicolor f. megalostachya (Rose) Barneby
Nissolia gentryi Rudd
Stylosanthes viscosa (L.) Sw.
Vicia pulchella subsp. pulchella
Fouquieriaceae
Gentianopsis Ma
Hedeoma oblongifolia var. mexicana R.S.Irving
Triumfetta galeottiana Turcz.
Schoepfia shreveana Wiggins
Gaura coccinea var. coccinea
Gongylocarpus fruticulosus Brandegee
Oenothera drummondii Hook.
Castilleja beldingii (Greene) Tank & J.M.Egger
Tetracoccus fasciculatus (S.Watson) Croizat
Plantago patagonica var. oblonga (E.Morris) Shinners
Gilia flavocincta subsp. australis (A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant) Day & V.E.Grant
Loeselia amplectens (Hook. & Arn.) Benth.
Persicaria amplexicaulis (D.Don) Ronse Decr.
Dryandra pteridifolia R.Br.
Frangula obovata (Kearney & Peebles) G.L.Nesom & Sawyer
Rhamnus scopulorum (M.E.Jones) C.B.Wolf
Rosa fendleri Crép.
Galium moranii subsp. moranii
Thamnosma trifoliata I.M.Johnst.
Seymeria sinaloana (Pennell) Standl.
Capsicum annuum var. baccatum (L.) Kuntze
Physalis lagascae Roem. & Schult.
Parietaria floridana Nutt.
Kallstroemia maxima (L.) Hook. & Arn.
Agave utahensis var. eborispina (Hester) Breitung
Bouteloua trifida Thurb.
Kalinia obtusiflora (E.Fourn.) H.L.Bell & Columbus
Lampranthus coccineus (Haw.) N.E.Br.
Camissoniopsis guadalupensis (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Brachypodium P.Beauv.
Vicia villosa var. varia (Host) Corb.
Ambrosia ×platyspina (Seaman) Strother & B.G.Baldwin
Eriastrum luteum (Benth.) Mason
Comarostaphylis diversifolia var. diversifolia
Castanea mollissima Blume
Arctostaphylos pilosula subsp. pismoensis P.V.Wells
Banksia speciosa R.Br.
Jasminum mesnyi Hance
Gardenia thunbergia L.f.
Angophora Cav.
Acacia riceana Hensl.
Banksia hookeriana Meisn.
Schwenckia americana L.
Theobroma cacao L.
Eucommia ulmoides Oliv.
Enchylaena tomentosa R.Br.
Leucojum vernum L.
Carex hirtissima W.Boott
Juncus capitatus Weigel
Juncus digitatus C.W.Witham & Zika
Erythronium tuolumnense Applegate
Toxicoscordion exaltatum (Eastw.) A.Heller
Hordeum murinum subsp. murinum
Phalaris paradoxa var. praemorsa (Lam.) Coss. & Durieu
Stipa lettermanii Vasey
Stipa californica Vasey
Brodiaea insignis (Jeps.) Niehaus
Erigeron bloomeri var. nudatus (A.Gray) Cronquist
Gnaphalium antillanum Urb.
Grindelia aphanactis Rydb.
Iva ciliata Willd.
Microseris douglasii subsp. tenella (A.Gray) K.L.Chambers
Pallenis maritima (L.) Greuter
Sericocarpus oregonensis Nutt.
Urospermum echioides Fraas
Plagiobothrys diffusus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Boechera suffrutescens (S.Watson) Dorn
Erysimum insulare subsp. insulare
Thelypodium brachycarpum (Torr.) Torr.
Cereus peruvianus (L.) Mill.
Silene verecunda subsp. andersonii (Clokey) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Chenopodium album var. album
Tuberaria guttata (L.) Fourr.
Tarenaya hassleriana (Chodat) Iltis
Calystegia R.Br.
Cornus sericea subsp. sericea
Dudleya lurida Rose ex Britton & Rose
Rhododendron californicum Hook.
Glochidion ferdinandii (Müll.Arg.) F.M.Bailey
Acmispon argyraeus var. multicaulis (Ottley) Brouillet
Acmispon procumbens var. jepsonii (Ottley) Brouillet
Astragalus serenoi (Kuntze) E.Sheld.
Astragalus hornii var. hornii
Lupinus adsurgens var. undulatus C.P.Sm.
Wisteria sinensis (Sims) DC.
Swertia puberulenta (Davidson) Jeps.
Ribes menziesii var. thacherianum Jeps.
Myriophyllum hippuroides Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Prunella vulgaris var. atropurpurea Fernald
Mentzelia ravenii H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Petalonyx thurberi subsp. gilmanii (Munz) W.S.Davis & H.J.Thomps.
Eugenia uniflora L.
Epilobium cleistogamum (Curran) Hoch & P.H.Raven
Loeseliastrum (Brand) Timbrook
Eriogonum argillosum Howell
Delphinium decorum subsp. decorum
Ceanothus gloriosus Howell
Amelanchier covillei Standl.
Neviusia cliftonii Shevock, Ertter & D.W.Taylor
Potentilla anserina var. argentea Jeps.
Rosa pinetorum A.Heller
Galium jepsonii Hilend & J.T.Howell
Petunia ×atkinsiana D.Don ex Loudon
Viola tomentosa M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Agave toumeyana Trel.
Cyperus manimae Kunth
Cyperus duripes I.M.Johnst.
Bletia gracilis G.Lodd.
Malaxis fastigiata (Rchb.f.) Kuntze
Leptochloa nealleyi Vasey
Muhlenbergia rigida (Kunth) Kunth
Paspalum pubiflorum E.Fourn.
Schizachyrium semitectum (Swallen) Reeder
Setaria arizonica Rominger
Mandevilla macrosiphon (Torr.) Pichon
Vallesia baileyana Woodson
Ageratina lasioneura (Hook. & Arn.) R.King & H.Rob.
Artemisia dracunculus var. dracunculus
Eupatorium ovaliflorum Hook. & Arn.
Heterotheca villosa var. scabra (Eastw.) Semple
Stevia lemmonii A.Gray
Boechera microphylla (Nutt.) Dorn
Lepidium tiehmii (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Ferocactus cylindraceus var. tortulispinus (H.E.Gates) Bravo
Drymaria crassifolia Benth.
Ipomoea seaania Felger & D.F.Austin
Ipomoea muricata (L.) Jacq.
Cotyledon macrantha A.Berger
Cassia corymbosa Lam.
Cercis occidentalis var. orbiculata (Greene) Tidestr.
Coursetia DC.
Dalea mollis subsp. pilosa (Rydb.) Wiggins
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. pallescens Barneby
Nissolia microptera Poir.
Phaseolus polymorphus S.Watson
Piscidia mollis Rose
Willardia mexicana (S.Watson) Rose
Quercus toumeyi Sarg.
Quercus durifolia Seemen ex Loes.
Mentzelia puberula J.Darl.
Galphimia floribunda C.E.Anderson
Sida ciliaris L.
Triumfetta semitriloba Jacq.
Boerhavia watsonii Standl.
Erythranthe geyeri (Torr.) G.L.Nesom
Spermacoce suaveolens (G.Mey.) Kuntze
Heuchera versicolor Greene
Physalis microcarpa Urb. & Ekman
Glandularia pumila (Rydb.) Umber
Agave datylio var. datylio
Bromus suksdorfii Vasey
Acmispon mearnsii var. mearnsii
Dalea neomexicana (A.Gray) Cory
Frangula californica var. tomentella (Benth.) A.Gray
Deinandra increscens (H.M.Hall ex D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Crepis occidentalis subsp. pumila (Rydb.) Babc. & Stebbins
Penstemon grinnellii subsp. scrophularioides (M.E.Jones) Munz
Agave deserti subsp. simplex Gentry
Arthrocnemum subterminale (Parish) Standl.
Hibiscus rosa-sinensis L.
Banksia elderiana F.Muell. & Tate
Nopalea cochenillifera (L.) Salm-Dyck
Metrosideros excelsa Sol. ex Gaertn.
Bougainvillea spectabilis Willd.
Acacia sieberiana DC.
Dais cotinifolia L.
Solandra Sw.
Mercurialis annua L.
Pulicaria arabica subsp. arabica
Yucca aloifolia L.
Allium tribracteatum Torr.
Dietes bicolor (Steud.) Sweet ex Klatt
Disporum trachyandrum (Torr.) Britton
Elymus pacificus Gould
Eragrostis hirsuta (Michx.) Nees
Stipa stillmanii Bol.
Sambucus L.
Eryngium articulatum Hook.
Arctotis stoechadifolia P.J.Bergius
Cirsium ochrocentrum var. ochrocentrum
Crepis runcinata subsp. hallii Babc. & Stebbins
Ericameria parryi var. imula (H.M.Hall & Clem.) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Heterotheca oregona var. scaberrima (A.Gray) Semple
Heterotheca sessiliflora subsp. bolanderi (A.Gray) Semple
Jensia yosemitana (Parry ex A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Oreostemma elatum (Greene) Greene
Boechera hoffmanii (Munz) Al-Shehbaz
Cornus greenei J.M.Coult. & W.H.Evans
Euphorbia pulcherrima Willd. ex Klotzsch
Astragalus crotalariae var. davidsonii (Rydb.) Munz & McBurney
Crotalaria juncea L.
Lotus scoparius var. brevialatus Ottley
Lupinus breweri var. grandiflorus C.P.Sm.
Ribes glutinosum Benth.
Sidalcea hickmanii subsp. hickmanii
Trientalis europaea var. latifolia (Hook.) Torr.
Papaver apulum var. micranthum
Antirrhinum vexillocalyculatum subsp. intermedium D.M.Thomps.
Linanthus californicus subsp. californicus
Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens
Eriogonum nudum var. paralinum Reveal
Sidotheca emarginata (H.M.Hall) Reveal
Rumex triangulivalvis var. oreolapathum Rech.fil.
Delphinium hansenii subsp. ewanianum M.J.Warnock
Horkelia cuneata var. sericea (A.Gray) Ertter & Reveal
Citrus L.
Echeandia ramosissima (C.Presl) Cruden
Bouteloua alamosana Vasey
Urochloa reptans (L.) Stapf
Rhus terebinthifolia Schltdl. & Cham.
Heterosperma brandegeei Sherff
Porophyllum confertum Greene
Psilactis asteroides A.Gray
Schkuhria Roth
Senecio salignus DC.
Senecio huachucanus A.Gray
Hackelia pinetorum (Greene ex A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Echinocereus leucanthus N.P.Taylor
Sclerocactus intertextus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Atriplex fasciculata S.Watson
Cucumis melo subsp. agrestis (Naudin) Greb.
Euphorbia subreniformis S.Watson
Astragalus mollissimus var. mogollonicus (Greene) Barneby
Astragalus comonduensis A.E.Estrada, Rebman & Villarreal
Calliandra houstoniana (Mill.) Standl.
Coursetia caribaea var. sericea (A.Gray) Lavin
Desmodium madrense Hemsl.
Eysenhardtia orthocarpa var. orthocarpa
Leucaena leucocephala subsp. leucocephala
Mimosa pigra var. berlandieri (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Senna wislizeni var. wislizeni
Senna alata (L.) Roxb.
Stachys agraria Schltdl. & Cham.
Eucalyptus amygdalina Labill.
Salpianthus arenarius Humb. & Bonpl.
Oenothera triloba Nutt.
Orobanche multicaulis Brandegee
Oxalis amplifolia (Trel.) Tidestr.
Passiflora suberosa L.
Eriogonum eremicum Reveal
Ranunculus arizonicus Lemmon ex A.Gray
Geum macrophyllum var. perincisum (Rydb.) Raup
Crusea psyllioides (Kunth) W.R.Anderson
Alvaradoa amorphoides Liebm.
Solanum papita Rydb.
Boehmeria cylindrica (L.) Sw.
Valeriana sorbifolia Kunth
Cissus verticillata (L.) Nicolson & C.E.Jarvis
Cyperus fuscus L.
Arida carnosa (A.Gray) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Logfia californica (Nutt.) Holub
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. axillaris (D.D.Keck) L.C.Anderson
Comarostaphylis diversifolia var. planifolia Jeps.
Maytenus cymosa Krug & Urb.
Cneorum tricoccon L.
Podachaenium eminens (Lag.) Sch.Bip. ex Baill.
Dombeya cacuminum Hochr.
Chlorogalum purpureum var. purpureum
Furcraea foetida (L.) Haw.
Syagrus romanzoffiana (Cham.) Glassman
Panicum thermale Bol.
Angelica callii Mathias & Constance
Sanicula maritima Kellogg ex S.Watson
Erigeron cervinus Greene
Erigeron elegantulus Greene
Grindelia arenicola Steyerm.
Heterotheca oregona var. oregona
Lessingia pectinata Greene
Microseris paludosa (Greene) Howell
Rudbeckia hirta var. pulcherrima Farw.
Plagiobothrys reticulatus var. reticulatus
Plagiobothrys austiniae (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Arenaria rossii R.Br. ex Richardson
Stellaria sitchana var. bongardiana (Fernald) Hultén
Atriplex bracteosa Trautv.
Cucurbita pepo var. pepo
Arctostaphylos glutinosa Schreib.
Acacia bivenosa DC.
Astragalus gilmanii Tidestr.
Astragalus atratus var. mensanus M.E.Jones
Cytisus canariensis (L.) Kuntze
Trifolium barbigerum var. andrewsii A.Gray
Quercus ×kinselae (C.H.Mull.) Nixon & C.H.Mull.
Erodium L'Hér.
Bacopa Aubl.
Limosella L.
Ribes inerme var. klamathense (Coville) Jeps.
Monardella undulata subsp. arguelloensis Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Camissonia campestris subsp. obispoensis Raven
Clarkia xantiana subsp. xantiana
Oenothera californica var. glabrata Munz
Castilleja affinis subsp. neglecta (Zeile) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Castilleja montigena Heckard
Eriastrum diffusum subsp. coachellae S.J.De Groot
Gilia latiflora subsp. cuyamensis A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Linanthus arenicola (M.E.Jones) Jeps. & V.L.Bailey
Eriogonum hirtellum Howell & Bacig.
Polygonum imbricatum Nutt.
Polygonum shastense W.H.Brewer
Rumex lacustris Greene
Macadamia integrifolia Maiden & Betche
Ceanothus austromontanus Abrams
Horkelia hendersonii Howell
Rosa spithamea S.Watson
Agavaceae
Aloe vera (L.) Burm.f.
Cyperus bipartitus Torr.
Rhynchospora contracta (Nees) J.Raynal
Cenchrus purpureus (Schumach.) Morrone
Muhlenbergia elongata Scribn. ex Beal
Panicum antidotale Retz.
Trisetum interruptum E.Fourn. ex Hemsl.
Dyschoriste decumbens (A.Gray) Kuntze
Justicia insolita subsp. tastensis (Brandegee) T.F.Daniel
Justicia sonorae (S.Watson) Wassh.
Artemisia cana subsp. viscidula (Osterh.) Beetle
Brickellia fendleri A.Gray
Carphochaete pringlei (S.Watson) Grashoff ex B.L.Turner
Erigeron eatonii var. nevadincola (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Heterotheca villosa var. pedunculata (Greene) V.L.Harms ex Semple
Matricaria chamomilla L.
Pinaropappus roseus (Less.) Less.
Schkuhria anthemoidea var. wrightii (A.Gray) Heiser
Stevia anadenotricha (B.L.Rob.) Grashoff
Tithonia thurberi A.Gray
Zinnia multiflora L.
Ferocactus fordii (Orcutt) Britton & Rose
Mammillaria boolii G.E.Linds.
Stellaria cuspidata subsp. cuspidata
Croton niveus Jacq.
Dalechampia scandens L.
Jatropha malacophylla Standl.
Acmispon greenei (Ottley) Brouillet
Dalea pringlei var. pringlei
Desmanthus oligospermus Brandegee
Desmodium hartwegianum Hemsl.
Desmodium metcalfei (Rose & J.H.Painter) Kearney & Peebles
Diphysa racemosa Rose
Ebenopsis Britton & Rose
Eriosema pulchellum (Kunth) G.Don
Ribes dugesii Greenm.
Heteropterys palmeri Rose
Sida hyalina Fryxell
Psidium sartorianum (Berg) Nied.
Argemone arizonica G.B.Ownbey
Pittosporum rhombifolium A.Cunn. ex Hook.
Sideroxylon lanuginosum var. rigidum (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Lycium parishii var. parishii
Nicotiana plumbaginifolia Viv.
Solanum tenuilobatum Parish
Cyperus ochraceus Vahl
Catapodium rigidum (L.) Dony
Cressa L.
Euphorbia taluticola Wiggins
Gleditsia triacanthos var. inermis (L.) C.K.Schneid.
Sollya heterophylla Lindl.
Stenocarpus sinuatus (Loudon) Endl.
Dudleya pachyphytum Moran & M.Benedict
Rutaceae
Pittosporum kirkii Hook.fil. ex Kirk
Vitex lucens Kirk
Lepechinia rossii S.Boyd & Mistretta
Isolepis setacea (L.) R.Br.
Juncus leiospermus var. ahartii Ertter
Bromus carinatus var. maritimus (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Calamagrostis breweri Thurb.
Hordeum bulbosum L.
Panicum scribnerianum Nash
Poa napensis Beetle
Sorghum sudanense (Piper) Stapf
Stipa stipoides (Hook.f.) Veldkamp
Potamogeton filiformis Pursh ex Tuck.
Erigeron sonnei Greene
Euphrosyne acerosa (Nutt.) Panero
Lessingia subspicata Greene
Rudbeckia californica var. californica
Tetradymia axillaris var. axillaris
Cryptantha clevelandii var. dissita (I.M.Johnst.) Jeps. & Hoover
Plagiobothrys infectivus I.M.Johnst.
Anelsonia eurycarpa (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Caulanthus S.Watson
Raphanus raphanistrum x sativus
Nopalea auberi (Pfeiff.) Salm-Dyck
Legenere limosa (Greene) McVaugh
Lonicera ruprechtiana Regel
Dianthus barbatus subsp. barbatus
Silene aperta Greene
Atriplex argentea var. mohavensis (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Suaeda depressa var. depressa
Cuscuta howelliana Rubtzoff
Marah Kellogg
Arctostaphylos pechoensis var. cruzensis (Roof) Gankin
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana subsp. hispidula (J.T.Howell) J.E.Adams
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. glaucomollis P.V.Wells
Pyrola rotundifolia var. bracteata (Hook.) A.Gray
Euphorbia ocellata var. kirbyi J.T.Howell
Acmispon junceus (Benth.) Brouillet
Lupinus breweri var. breweri
Swertia albomarginata (S.Watson) Kuntze
Monardella sinuata subsp. sinuata
Lythrum adsurgens Greene
Malacothamnus palmeri (S.Watson) Greene
Eriogonum grande var. dunklei Reveal
Eriogonum vestitum Howell
Ceanothus impressus var. impressus
Ceanothus purpureus Jeps.
Ivesia patellifera (J.T.Howell) Ertter
Rhaphiolepis indica (L.) Lindl.
Rosa bridgesii Crép.
Galium glabrescens subsp. modocense Dempster & Ehrend.
Physalis lanceifolia Nees
Aloysia triphylla Britton
Fimbristylis complanata (Retz.) Link
Festuca brachyphylla var. coloradensis (Fred.) Dorn
Nassella cernua (Stebbins & Love) Barkworth
Panicum trichoides Sw.
Trisetum deyeuxioides (Kunth) Kunth
Zuloagaea bulbosa (Kunth) Bess
Nolina Michx.
Ruellia ciliatiflora Hook.
Celosia L.
Tidestromia eliassoniana (Sánch.Pino & Flores Olv.) Sánch.Pino
Funastrum pannosum (Decne.) Schltr.
Matelea arizonica (A.Gray) Shinners
Ageratina malacolepis (B.L.Rob.) R.King & H.Rob.
Cosmos pringlei B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Erigeron coronarius Greene
Lasianthaea fruticosa var. occidentalis K.M.Becker
Trixis pterocaulis B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Cylindropuntia ×neoarbuscula (Griffiths) F.M.Knuth
Echinocereus fendleri var. fasciculatus (Engelm. ex B.D.Jacks.) N.P.Taylor
Ferocactus diguetii var. diguetii
Peniocereus greggii var. transmontanus (Engelm.) Backeb.
Lobelia aurita (Brandegee) T.J.Ayers
Lobelia laxiflora subsp. angustifolia (A.DC.) Eakes & Lammers
Chenopodium palmeri Standl.
Acalypha filipes (S.Watson) McVaugh
Jatropha platyphylla Müll.Arg.
Desmodium angustifolium var. angustifolium
Desmodium arizonicum S.Watson
Galactia acapulcensis Rose
Psorothamnus thompsoniae var. thompsoniae
Senna pallida var. pallida
Zornia leptophylla (Benth.) Pittier
Stemodia palmeri A.Gray
Jamesia Torr. & A.Gray
Agastache pallidiflora (A.Heller) Rydb.
Hedeoma nana subsp. macrocalyx W.S.Stewart
Salvia lasiocephala Hook. & Arn.
Abutilon reventum S.Wats
Anoda abutiloides A.Gray
Anoda acerifolia Cav.
Kosteletzkya depressa (L.) O.J.Blanch., Fryxell & D.M.Bates
Waltheria acuminata Rose
Cordylanthus laxiflorus A.Gray
Sesamum indicum L.
Primula pauciflora var. pauciflora
Esenbeckia hartmanii B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Zanthoxylum fagara (L.) Sarg.
Sideroxylon persimile subsp. subsessiliflorum (Hemsl.) T.D.Penn.
Lippia alba var. carterae Moldenke
Arctostaphylos cruzensis Roof
Sidalcea gigantea G.Clifton, R.E.Buck & S.R.Hill
Boechera puberula (Nutt.) Dorn
Atriplex argentea subsp. expansa (S.Watson) Hall & Clem.
Medicago sphaerocarpos Bertol.
Dichelostemma capitatum subsp. capitatum
Escallonia Mutis ex L.fil.
Pelargonium crispum (P.J.Bergius) L'Hér.
Eleusine coracana (L.) Gaertn.
Montanoa schottii B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Acacia podalyriaefolia A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Rauvolfia sumatrana Jack
Asparagus densiflorus (Kunth) Jessop
Aloe chabaudii Schönland
Juncus effusus var. exiguus Fernald & Wiegand
Fritillaria Tourn. ex L.
Aegilops tauschii Coss.
Poa secunda var. secunda
Stipa purpurata (Phil.) Columbus & J.P.Sm.
Potamogeton perfoliatus L.
Cymopterus panamintensis var. panamintensis
Eryngium constancei M.Y.Sheikh
Amsonia tomentosa var. tomentosa
Argyranthemum frutescens (L.) Sch.Bip.
Brickellia Elliott
Erigeron salsuginosus var. angustifolius A.Gray
Pyrrocoma racemosa var. racemosa
Solidago altissima L.
Achlys triphylla subsp. triphylla
Plagiobothrys chorisianus (Cham.) I.M.Johnst.
Caulanthus lemmonii S.Watson
Streptanthus fenestratus (Greene) J.T.Howell
Thelypodium jaegeri Rollins
Nopalea Salm-Dyck
Nemacladus montanus Greene
Symphoricarpos rotundifolius var. rotundifolius
Glossopetalon pungens Brandegee
Lotus oblongifolius var. oblongifolius
Lupinus superbus var. elongatus (Greene ex A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus caespitosus Nutt.
Melilotus Mill.
Ribes lasianthum Greene
Trichostema simulatum Jeps.
Sidalcea covillei Greene
Eucalyptus deglupta Blume
Nelumbo lutea Willd.
Fraxinus velutina var. velutina
Antirrhinum cornutum Benth.
Collinsia heterophylla var. austromontana (Newsom) Munz
Chorizanthe obovata Goodman
Ceanothus ferrisiae McMinn
Duchesnea indica (Andr.) Focke
Horkelia wilderae Parish
Galium tricornutum Dandy
Hymenanthera dentata R.Br. ex DC.
Halodule wrightii Asch.
Carex oreocharis Holm
Bouteloua eludens Griffiths
Echinochloa holciformis (Kunth) Chase
Muhlenbergia trifida Hack.
Pereilema crinitum J.Presl
Justicia insolita Brandegee
Stenandrium pilosulum (Blake) T.F.Daniel
Cosmos linearifolius (Sch.Bip.) Hemsl.
Dahlia sherffii P.D.Sørensen
Eupatorium sonorae A.Gray
Launaea intybacea (Jacq.) Beauverd
Schkuhria pinnata var. guatemalensis (Rydb.) McVaugh
Selloa glutinosa Spreng.
Tagetes filifolia Lag.
Tithonia diversifolia (Hemsl.) A.Gray
Tridax tenuifolia Rose
Verbesina rothrockii B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Echinocereus coccineus var. coccineus
Drymaria villosa subsp. palustris (Cham. & Schltdl.) Duke
Acalypha pseudalopecuroides Pax & K.Hoffm.
Croton pottsii (Klotzsch) Müll.Arg.
Euphorbia dioscoreoides subsp. attenuata Steinmann
Caesalpinia cacalaco Bonpl.
Dalea seemannii S.Watson ex Orcutt
Psorothamnus thompsoniae var. whitingii (Kearney & Peebles) Barneby
Trifolium amabile var. amabile
Vachellia pennatula (Schltdl. & Cham.) Seigler & Ebinger
Salvia betulifolia Epling
Wissadula cincta (Brandegee) Rose
Oenothera brandegeei (Munz) Raven
Orobanche parishii subsp. brachyloba Heckard
Dayia sonorae (Rose) J.M.Porter
Eriogonum ericifolium var. ericifolium
Banksia occidentalis R.Br.
Pomaderris elliptica Labill.
Rhamnus pinetorum Standl.
Prunus serotina subsp. virens (Wooton & Standl.) McVaugh
Galium carterae Dempster
Zanthoxylum mazatlanum Sandwith
Blighia K.D.Koenig
Sideroxylon socorrense (Brandegee) T.D.Penn.
Iochroma coccineum Scheidw.
Solanum muticum N.E.Br.
Lantana hispida Kunth
Dalea flavescens (S.Watson) Welsh
Castilleja applegatei var. pallida (Eastw.) Holmgren
Malacothrix saxatilis var. arachnoidea (E.A.Mc Gregor) E.W.Williams
Aster greatae Parish
Thevetia peruviana (Pers.) K.Schum.
Sollya fusiformis (Labill.) Briq.
Banksia menziesii R.Br.
Murraya koenigii (L.) Spreng.
Jaltomata contorta (Ruiz & Pav.) Mione
Chrysanthemoides monilifera (L.) Norl.
Allium denticulatum Kit.
Juncus lesueurii var. tracyi Jeps.
Haworthia Duval
Dichelostemma Kunth
Triteleia tubergenii L.W.Lenz
Eryngium spinosepalum Mathias
Perideridia parishii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Carissa grandiflora (E.Mey.) A.DC.
Carlquistia muirii (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Erigeron oxyphyllus Greene
Eriophyllum congdonii Brandegee
Hazardia squarrosa var. obtusa (Greene) Jeps.
Symphyotrichum lentum (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Boechera shockleyi (Munz) Dorn
Thysanocarpus rigidus (Munz) P.J.Alexander & Windham
Thysanocarpus Hook.
Echinocereus engelmannii var. engelmannii
Opuntia ×curvospina Griffiths
Arenaria macradenia var. arcuifolia Maguire
Atriplex vallicola Hoover
Cucumis melo var. acidulus Naudin
Arctostaphylos truei W.Knight
Acmispon rubriflorus (H.Sharsm.) D.D.Sokoloff
Astragalus menziesii A.Gray
Cassia nemophila A.Cunn. ex Vogel
Lupinus pratensis var. pratensis
Prosopis juliflora var. juliflora
Quercus parvula var. parvula
Monardella australis subsp. jokerstii Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Satureja thymbra L.
Westringia fruticosa (Willd.) Druce
Iliamna latibracteata Wiggins
Sidalcea oregana subsp. hydrophila (A.Heller) C.L.Hitchc.
Clarkia stellata Mosquin
Aphyllon californicum subsp. californicum
Castilleja campestris subsp. succulenta (Hoover) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Cordylanthus pringlei A.Gray
Cordylanthus filifolius Nutt. ex Benth.
Erythranthe gracilipes (B.L.Rob.) N.S.Fraga
Ipomopsis aggregata subsp. attenuata (A.Gray) V.E.Grant & A.D.Grant
Eriogonum shockleyi var. shockleyi
Eriogonum breedlovei (J.T.Howell) Reveal
Pyracantha fortuneana (Maxim.) H.L.Li
Sorbus sambucifolia (Cham. & Schltdl.) M.Roem.
Galium hypotrichium subsp. inyoense Dempster & Ehrend.
Tinantia longipedunculata Standl. & Steyerm.
Bromus carinatus var. arizonicus Shear
Lasiacis divaricata (L.) Hitchc.
Muhlenbergia polycaulis Scribn.
Schizachyrium cirratum (Hack.) Wooton & Standl.
Sambucus racemosa subsp. arborescens (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Mandevilla hypoleuca (Benth.) Pichon
Matelea Aubl.
Arida parviflora (A.Gray) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Astranthium orthopodum (B.L.Rob. & Fernald) Larsen
Brickellia subsessilis B.L.Rob.
Chloracantha spinosa var. jaliscensis (Mc Vaugh) S.D.Sundb.
Deinandra Greene
Erigeron arisolius G.L.Nesom
Solidago wrightii var. adenophora S.F.Blake
Symphyotrichum divaricatum (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Xylorhiza tortifolia var. imberbis (Cronquist) T.J.Watson
Lepidium alyssoides A.Gray
Ferocactus acanthodes var. tortulispinus (H.E.Gates) Linds.
Opuntia elata Link & Otto ex Salm-Dyck
Cuscuta corymbosa var. stylosa (Choisy) Engelm.
Ipomoea parasitica (Kunth) G.Don
Ipomoea wrightii A.Gray
Operculina pteripes (G.Don) O'Donell
Sicyos peninsularis Brandegee
Tragia urticifolia Michx.
Dalea cliffortiana Willd.
Dalea pinetorum var. pinetorum
Mimosa moniliformis (Britton & Rose) R.Grether & Barneby
Quercus scytophylla Liebm.
Hedeoma patens M.E.Jones
Origanum L.
Sida glabra Mill.
Phyllanthus peninsularis subsp. peninsularis
Gilia roseata Rydb.
Karwinskia parvifolia Rose
Ziziphus zizyphus (L.) H.Karst.
Rosa arizonica Rydb.
Stenotis Terrell
Tessiera lithospermoides DC.
Zanthoxylum sonorense Lundell
Buddleja wrightii B.L.Rob.
Solanum seaforthianum Andrews
Lantana achyranthifolia Desf.
Verbenaceae
Comarostaphylis Zucc.
Penstemon floridus subsp. austinii (Eastw.) D.D.Keck
Silene laciniata var. laciniata
Bocconia arborea S.Watson
Agave mckelveyana Gentry
Lotus arenarius Brot.
Agave seemanniana Jacobi
Kalanchoe manginii Raym.-Hamet & Perrier
Lycianthes rantonnei (Carrière) Bitter
Withania frutescens (L.) Pauquy
Crotalaria capensis Jacq.
Searsia pendulina (Jacq.) Moffett
Ficinia nodosa (Rottb.) Goetgh., Muasya & D.A.Simpson
Schoenoplectus acutus var. acutus
Leucocoryne coquimbensis F.Phil. ex Phil.
Beckmannia eruciformis (L.) Host
Digitaria californica var. californica
Potamogeton pusillus subsp. tenuissimus (Mert. & W.D.J.Koch) K.Richt.
Zostera marina f. sulcatifolia Setch.
Lithraea molleoides (Vell.) Engl.
Angelica archangelica L.
Anthriscus neglecta Boiss. & Reut. ex Lange
Calycadenia oppositifolia (Greene) Greene
Chrysanthemum parthenium (L.) Pers.
Complaya trilobata (L.) Strother
Ericameria nauseosa var. nauseosa
Erigeron philadelphicus var. philadelphicus
Lasiospermum bipinnatum (Thunb.) Druce
Scorzonella nutans var. laciniata (A.Gray) Jeps.
Hackelia sharsmithii I.M.Johnst.
Boechera davidsonii (Greene) N.H.Holmgren
Calystegia polymorpha (Greene) Munz
Convolvulaceae
Dichondra donelliana Tharp & M.C.Johnst.
Dudleya temeculana P.H.Thomson
Euphorbia seguieriana Neck.
Stillingia L.
Astragalus breweri A.Gray
Astragalus lemmonii A.Gray
Ornithopus sativus Brot.
Trifolium flavulum Greene
Vicia acutifolia Elliott
Geranium incanum var. multifidum (Sweet) Hillard & B.L.Burtt
Scaevola L.
Monardella linoides subsp. oblonga (Greene) Abrams
Sidalcea calycosa subsp. rhizomata (Jeps.) Munz
Sidalcea keckii Wiggins
Penstemon menziesii Hook.
Rumex cristatus subsp. kerneri (Borbás) Akeroyd & D.A.Webb
Delphinium parryi subsp. blochmaniae (Greene) Lewis & Epling
Ceanothus sonomensis Howell
Pyrus occidentalis S.Watson
Koelreuteria Laxm.
Nicotiana sylvestris Speg.
Agave delamateri W.C.Hodgs. & Slauson
Allium cernuum var. neomexicanum (Rydb.) J.F.Macbr.
Fimbristylis annua (All.) Roem. & Schult.
Achnatherum parishii var. parishii
Cottea pappophoroides Kunth
Echinochloa crus-galli var. crus-galli
Setariopsis auriculata (E.Fourn.) Scribn.
Sorghum bicolor var. sudanense (Piper) Hitchc.
Cyrtocarpa edulis var. edulis
Metastelma arizonicum subsp. arizonicum
Antheropeas lanosum (A.Gray) Rydb.
Erigeron fraternus Greene
Eriophyllum wallacei subsp. australe (Rydb.) Wiggins
Evax multicaulis DC.
Gnaphalium polycaulon Pers.
Heterosperma xanti var. carterae Sherff
Layia pentachaeta A.Gray
Psilactis gentryi (Standl.) D.R.Morgan
Cryptantha pondii Greene
Streptanthus carinatus C.Wright ex A.Gray
Mortonia greggii A.Gray
Cuscuta erosa Yunck.
Dudleya rigidiflora Rose ex Britton & Rose
Euphorbia polycarpa var. intermixta (S.Watson) L.C.Wheeler
Euphorbia apicata L.C.Wheeler
Sebastiania pringlei S.Watson
Astragalus francisquitensis M.E.Jones
Astragalus pattersonii A.Gray
Crotalaria rotundifolia var. vulgaris Windler
Desmodium psilophyllum Schltdl.
Galactia P.Browne
Piptadenia Benth.
Robinia neomexicana var. neomexicana
Hyptis seemannii A.Gray
Monardella odoratissima subsp. parvifolia (Greene) Epling
Salvia henryi A.Gray
Aspicarpa hirtella Rich.
Malpighia ovata Rose
Azadirachta indica A.Juss.
Trichilia hirta L.
Eucalyptus pulverulenta Sims
Commicarpus brandegeei subsp. glabrior Standl.
Menodora laevis Wooton & Standl.
Castilleja guadalupensis Brandegee
Diplacus brandegeei (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Callitriche deflexa A.Braun
Ranunculus harveyi var. australis (Brandegee) L.D.Benson
Ceanothus depressus Benth.
Amyris P.Browne
Lippia graveolens Kunth
Eremopyrum bonaepartis (Spreng.) Nevski
Cryptantha torreyana var. pumila (A.Heller) I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum callistum Reveal
Microseris douglasii var. platycarpha (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Acmispon procumbens var. procumbens
Malvaviscus arboreus var. penduliflorus (DC.) Schery
Eugenia mexicana Steud.
Agrostis rossiae Vasey
Chenopodium albescens Small
Yucca smalliana Fernald
Brugmansia candida Pers.
Withania somnifera (L.) Dunal
Trifolium scabrum L.
Triticum durum Desf.
Opuntia rufida Engelm.
Clarkia mildrediae subsp. lutescens Gottlieb & Janeway
Penstemon linarioides subsp. sileri (Gray) D.D.Keck
Trifolium eriocephalum subsp. eriocephalum
Bignoniaceae
Boechera howellii (S.Watson) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Cryptantha traskae I.M.Johnst.
Potentilla hickmanii Eastw.
Viola pedunculata subsp. pedunculata
Sisyrinchium micranthum Cav.
Drosera binata Labill.
Bessera tenuiflora (Greene) J.F.Macbr.
Iris tenax var. gormanii (Piper) R.C.Foster
Nephelium lappaceum L.
Eriocoma nelsonii (Scribn.) Romasch.
Draba petrophila Greene
Perityle reinana B.L.Turner
Oxalis caerulea (Small) R.Knuth
Agapanthus praecox Willd.
Alchemilla vulgaris L.
Rhodiola integrifolia subsp. integrifolia
Arctostaphylos franciscana Eastw.
Cylindropuntia imbricata subsp. imbricata
Euphorbia stictospora var. stictospora
Veratrum viride var. eschscholtzianum (Roem. & Schult.) Breitung
Lathyrus torreyi A.Gray
Lathyrus bijugatus T.G.White
Dalea lachnostachys A.Gray
Verbascum phoeniceum L.
Rhamnus cathartica L.
Navarretia paradoxinota L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Coronilla valentina L.
Gazania krebsiana Less.
Eriocoma lemmonii (Vasey) Romasch.
Salix barrattiana Hook.
Perityle intricata (Brandegee) Shinners
Lonicera maackii (Rupr.) Maxim.
Escobaria missouriensis subsp. navajoensis Hochstätter
Dieteria canescens var. aristata (Eastw.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Broussonetia papyrifera (L.) Vent.
Eriocoma parishii subsp. parishii
Cytisus scoparius subsp. scoparius
Centaurea varnensis Velen.
Astragalus spaldingii A.Gray
Plantago erecta var. erecta
Pedicularis bracteosa var. atrosanguinea (Pennell & C.H.Thomps.) Cronquist
Erigeron supplex A.Gray
Dolichandra unguis-cati (L.) L.G.Lohmann
Echinomastus erectocentrus subsp. acunensis (W.T.Marshall) U.Guzmán
Leptosiphon croceus (Eastw.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Carex spissa L.H.Bailey ex Hemsl.
Agapanthus africanus (L.) Hoffmanns.
Erythrina crista-galli L.
Yucca angustissima var. kanabensis (McKelvey) Reveal
Sedum patens Zika
Geranium reuteri Aedo & Muñoz Garm.
Eucephalus ledophyllus var. ledophyllus
Enemion stipitatum (A.Gray) J.R.Drumm. & Hutch.
Agave colorata Gentry
Cardamine pachystigma (S.Watson) Rollins
Douglasia nivalis Lindl.
Cordylanthus nidularius Howell
Eriocoma arida (M.E.Jones) Romasch.
Ipomoea longifolia Benth.
Astragalus chamaeleuce A.Gray
Phemeranthus confertiflorus (Greene) Hershk.
Mertensia nevadensis A.Nelson
Sclerocactus wrightiae L.D.Benson
Tanacetum vulgare var. crispum DC.
Pilosella tristis (Willd. ex Spreng.) F.W.Schultz & Sch.Bip.
Sabulina sororia B.S.Legler
Polemonium pulcherrimum var. shastense (Eastw.) Stubbs
Cirsium inamoenum var. inamoenum
Atriplex canescens var. gigantea S.L.Welsh & Stutz
Claytonia obovata Rydb.
Ceanothus maritimus Hoover
Pedicularis densiflora subsp. densiflora
Clerodendrum trichotomum Thunb.
Hypertelis cerviana (L.) Thulin
Erythranthe serpentinicola D.J.Keil
Erythranthe washingtonensis (Gand.) G.L.Nesom
Mammillaria pondii subsp. maritima (G.E.Linds.) D.R.Hunt
Salvia dorrii var. clokeyi Strachan
Calystegia stebbinsii Brummitt
Lomatium simplex (Nutt.) J.F.Macbr.
Daphne odora Thunb.
Primula rusbyi Greene
Senna wislizeni (A.Gray) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Coulteria pumila (Britton & Rose) Sotuyo & G.P.Lewis
Lomatium observatorium Constance & Ertter
Clarkia xantiana subsp. parviflora (Eastw.) F.H.Lewis & P.H.Raven
Bidens bigelovii A.Gray
Trichostema ruygtii H.Lewis
Pseudofumaria lutea (L.) Borkh.
Penstemon ×jonesii Pennell
Lupinus covillei Greene
Hackelia bella (J.F.Macbr.) I.M.Johnst.
Yucca glauca Nutt.
Downingia bicornuta var. picta Hoover
Hypoestes phyllostachya Baker
Collinsia greenei A.Gray ex Greene
Nabalus sagittatus (A.Gray) Rydb.
Gossypium aridum (Rose & Standl.) Skovst.
Carex aquatilis var. dives (Holm) Kük.
Lophophora williamsii (Lem. ex Salm-Dyck) J.M.Coult.
Arctostaphylos viridissima (Eastw.) Mc Minn
Boechera thompsonii (S.L.Welsh) N.H.Holmgren
Frangula purshiana subsp. purshiana
Carex serratodens S.Watson
Filago germanica L.
Physaria hitchcockii subsp. rubicundula (Rollins) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Sporobolus hookerianus P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Geum rivale L.
Erythranthe veronicifolia (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Mammillaria albicans subsp. fraileana (Britton & Rose) D.R.Hunt
Delphinium wootonii Rydb.
Schkuhria pinnata (Lam.) Kuntze
Lagerstroemia subcostata Koehne
Dicoria canescens subsp. canescens
Colchicum autumnale L.
Corydalis caseana subsp. caseana
Iris reticulata M.Bieb.
Eriophorum angustifolium subsp. angustifolium
Campanula shetleri Heckard
Blennosperma nanum var. robustum J.T.Howell
Populus ×hinckleyana Correll
Primula nevadensis N.H.Holmgren
Eriogonum wrightii var. olanchense (J.T.Howell) Reveal
Erythranthe filicaulis (S.Watson) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Hieracium carneum Greene
Heuchera glomerulata Rosend. & Lakela
Opuntia decumbens Salm-Dyck
Solanum lycopersicum var. lycopersicum
Draba cusickii var. cusickii
Phlox subulata L.
Eriogonum kennedyi Porter ex S.Watson
Elymus californicus (Bol. ex Thurb.) Gould
Pyrrocoma scaberula Greene
Clarkia gracilis subsp. sonomensis (C.L.Hitchc.) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Penstemon ×parishii Davidson
Mammillaria thornberi subsp. thornberi
Diplacus thompsonii G.L.Nesom
Draba asterophora var. asterophora
Diplacus bicolor (A.Gray) Hrusa
Chionanthus retusus Lindl. & Paxton
Eriogonum breedlovei var. breedlovei
Triteleia ixioides subsp. cookii (Hoover) L.W.Lenz
Limnobium spongia (Bosc) Steud.
Coulteria platyloba (S.Watson) N.Zamora
Platanus hispanica Ten.
Opuntia rileyi J.G.Ortega
Sanguisorba canadensis L.
Oreochrysum parryi (A.Gray) Rydb.
Keckiella ternata var. septentrionalis (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) N.H.Holmgren
Sedum paradisum subsp. subroseum B.L.Wilson & Zika
Sedum paradisum subsp. paradisum
Pediomelum argophyllum (Pursh) J.W.Grimes
Ferocactus fordii subsp. borealis N.P.Taylor
Senna lindheimeriana (Scheele) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Astragalus atratus S.Watson
Tetraneuris acaulis var. acaulis
Echinocereus triglochidiatus subsp. triglochidiatus
Euphorbia amygdaloides L.
Sedum radiatum var. depauperatum (R.T.Clausen) H.Ohba
Choisya dumosa (Torr.) Gray
Opuntia karwinskiana Salm-Dyck
Lupinus padre-crowleyi C.P.Sm.
Potentilla bipinnatifida Douglas ex Hook.
Allium munzii (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) McNeal
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. vineum (Small) A.Nelson
Epilobium septentrionale (D.D.Keck) R.N.Bowman & Hoch
Agave parviflora Torr.
Arctostaphylos gabilanensis V.T.Parker & M.C.Vasey
Lupinus cervinus Kellogg
Allium tuberosum Rottler ex Spreng.
Erigeron foliosus var. franciscensis G.L.Nesom
Castilleja xanthotricha Pennell
Erythronium pusaterii (Munz & J.T.Howell) Shevock, Bartel & G.A.Allen
Lolium perenne subsp. perenne
Achillea millefolium var. borealis (Bong.) Farw.
Crepis tectorum L.
Erythranthe geniculata (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Pediomelum tenuiflorum (Pursh) A.N.Egan
Opuntia ×vaseyi (Coult.) Britton & Rose
Cordylanthus kingii S.Watson
Forestiera pubescens var. pubescens
Narcissus incomparabilis Mill.
Pomaria jamesii (Torr. & A.Gray) Walp.
Cardamine californica subsp. cuneata (Greene) O.E.Schulz
Viola purpurea var. mohavensis (Baker & Clausen) J.T.Howell
Dichelostemma venustum (Greene) Hoover
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. eximium (Tidestr.) J.T.Howell
Anemonoides nemorosa (L.) Holub
Allium ampeloprasum L.
Hooveria purpurea var. purpurea
Psilocarphus brevissimus var. multiflorus Cronquist
Hemerocallis fulva (L.) L.
Sonchus arvensis subsp. uliginosus (M.Bieb.) Nyman
Lamium galeobdolon subsp. flavidum (F.Herm.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Pentas lanceolata (Forssk.) Deflers
Eriogonum libertini Reveal
Ceanothus gloriosus var. porrectus J.T.Howell
Taraxia subacaulis (Pursh) Rydb.
Lupinus argenteus subsp. argenteus
Cosmos palmeri B.L.Rob.
Erica canaliculata Andr.
Mammillaria halei Brandegee
Perityle ciliata (L.H.Dewey) Rydb.
Astragalus nevinii A.Gray ex Lyon
Scutellaria potosina subsp. platyphylla Epling
Drosera gunniana (Planch.) Mig.F.Salas
Salvia rosmarinus Schleid.
Mirabilis nyctaginea (Michx.) Mac Mill.
Mammillaria mazatlanensis K.Schum. ex Gürke
Prunus ×yedoensis Matsum.
Corydalis caseana var. brachycarpa (Rydb.) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Eriogonum twisselmanii (J.T.Howell) Reveal
Arctostaphylos ohloneana M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Lupinus huachucanus M.E.Jones
Castilleja ambigua var. humboldtiensis (D.D.Keck) J.M.Egger
Mammillaria phitauiana (Baxter) Werderm.
Platanthera brevifolia (Greene) Senghas
Celosia argentea var. plumosa Voss
Clarkia tembloriensis Vasek
Boechera breweri subsp. breweri
Salvia pinguifolia (Fernald) Wooton & Standl.
Ferocactus gracilis subsp. gatesii (G.E.Linds.) N.P.Taylor
Capnoides sempervirens (L.) Borkh.
Cuphea hyssopifolia Kunth
Corallorhiza maculata var. ozettensis Tisch
Opuntia covillei Britton & Rose
Sedella pentandra H.Sharsmith
Heuchera cylindrica var. alpina S.Watson
Ficus cotinifolia Kunth
Boechera koehleri (T.J.Howell) Al-Shehbaz
Echinocereus salm-dyckianus Scheer
Sidalcea asprella Greene
Erysimum menziesii subsp. eurekense R.A.Price
Clarkia springvillensis Vasek
Eriogonum corymbosum var. nilesii Reveal
Lomatium brunsfeldianum Kemper & R.P.Mc Neill
Toxicodendron radicans (L.) Kuntze
Aralia racemosa L.
Phylica pubescens Aiton
Penstemon pinifolius Greene
Rubus caesius L.
Veronica idahoensis M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Platanthera purpurascens (Rydb.) Sheviak & W.F.Jenn.
Polemonium foliosissimum var. molle (Greene) Anway
Montanoa leucantha (Lag. & Segura) S.F.Blake
Randia echinocarpa Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Viola ×wittrockiana Gams
Asclepias ovata M.Martens & Galeotti
Linanthus maricopensis J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Heterotheca orovillosa G.L.Nesom
Silene acaulis var. subacaulescens (F.N.Williams) Fernald & H.St.John
Lonicera caerulea L.
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. josephinensis Al-Shehbaz & M.S.Mayer
Landoltia punctata (G.Mey.) Les & D.J.Crawford
Escobaria vivipara var. arizonica (Engelm.) D.R.Hunt
Ageratina shastensis (Taylor & Stebbins) R.King & H.Rob.
Solanum citrullifolium A.Br.
Allophyllum capillare (Kellogg) A.G.Day & V.E.Grant
Streptanthus anomalus D.L.Smith, A.Arthur & R.E.Preston
Hieracium maculatum Schrank
Clematis alpina (L.) Mill.
Linanthus pungens subsp. pungens
Nymphaea nouchali Burm.fil.
Pseudobahia bahiifolia (Benth.) Rydb.
Ceiba pentandra (L.) Gaertn.
Ficus religiosa L.
Trifolium monanthum subsp. grantianum (A.Heller) J.M.Gillett
Pediocactus sileri (Engelm. ex Coult.) L.D.Benson
Orthocarpus pachystachyus A.Gray
Drymocallis pseudorupestris var. saxicola Ertter
Antennaria suffrutescens Greene
Erythronium klamathense Applegate
Amsinckia vernicosa var. furcata (Suksd.) Hoover ex Jeps.
Scilla forbesii (Baker) Speta
Lithophragma parviflorum var. trifoliatum (Eastw.) Jeps.
Kalanchoe daigremontiana Raym.-Hamet & Perrier
Romneya Harv.
Distimake dissectus (Jacq.) A.R.Simões & Staples
Opuntia ×occidentalis Engelm. & Bigelow
Thunbergia alata Bojer ex Sims
Phedimus spurius (M.Bieb.) 't Hart
Dyschoriste schiedeana (Nees) Kuntze
Gagea serotina (L.) Ker Gawl.
Eriogonum nudum var. indictum (Jeps.) Reveal
Claytonia peirsonii subsp. bernardinus Stoughton
Astragalus curvicarpus var. brachycodon (Barneby) Barneby
Raphanus L.
Eriastrum pluriflorum (A.Heller) Mason
Caroxylon vermiculatum (L.) Akhani & Roalson
Sclerolinon digynum (A.Gray) C.M.Rogers
Boechera pendulina (Greene) W.A.Weber
Sedum flavidum (Denton) B.L.Wilson & Zika
Lomatium tuberosum Hoover
Hesperevax sparsiflora var. brevifolia (A.Gray) Morefield
Lomatium greenmanii Mathias
Erythranthe linearifolia (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Pyracantha crenulata (D.Don) M.Roem.
Aruncus dioicus var. acuminatus (Rydb.) Rydb. ex H.Hara
Acer ginnala Maxim.
Euonymus japonicus Thunb.
Phlox mollis Wherry
Silene petersonii Maguire
Dudleya abramsii subsp. bettinae (Hoover) Bartel
Acaena pallida (Kirk) J.W.Dawson
Actaea elata var. alpestris (H.W.Lee & C.W.Park) Cubey
Layia munzii D.D.Keck
Linanthus harknessii (Curran) Greene
Dalea candida Willd.
Horkelia tenuiloba (Torr.) Gray
Yucca elata var. elata
Aralia elata (Miq.) Seem.
Agave aktites Gentry
Streptanthus vimineus (Greene) Al-Shehbaz & D.W.Taylor
Lomatium lithosolamans J.F.Sm. & Feist
Asclepias hallii A.Gray
Ivesia lycopodioides var. lycopodioides
Bidens pilosa var. pilosa
Potentilla millefolia Rydb.
Filago pyramidata L.
Pediocactus bradyi L.D.Benson
Sporobolus alterniflorus (Loisel.) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Madia elegans subsp. elegans
Ipomoea ternifolia subsp. leptotoma (Torr.) J.R.I.Wood & Scotland
Andersonglossum occidentale (A.Gray) J.I.Cohen
Penstemon heterophyllus var. purdyi (D.D.Keck) Mc Minn
Chamaecrista nictitans (L.) Moench
Arctostaphylos bakeri subsp. sublaevis P.V.Wells
Helleborus orientalis Lam.
Echinocereus polyacanthus Engelm.
Penstemon laricifolius Hook. & Arn.
Delonix regia (Bojer ex Hook.) Raf.
Penstemon davidsonii var. praeteritus Cronquist
Lewisia cotyledon var. cotyledon
Monardella sheltonii Torr. ex Durand
Gaillardia suavis (Gray & Engelm.) Britton & Rusby
Cylindropuntia ×viridiflora (Britton & Rose) F.M.Knuth
Jasminum nudiflorum Lindl.
Olea europaea subsp. europaea
Prunus lyonii (Eastw.) Sarg.
Euphorbia vermiculata Raf.
Chloroleucon mangense (Jacq.) Britton & Rose
Photinia davidiana (Decne.) Cardot
Sisyrinchium arizonicum Rothr.
Agrostemma githago L.
Vesper bulbosus (A.Nelson) R.L.Hartm. & G.L.Nesom
Thymophylla tenuiloba (DC.) Small
Rosa banksiae R.Br. ex Aiton
Astragalus pauperculus Greene
Salix interior Rowlee
Quercus jonesii Trel.
Dalea purpurea Vent.
Eucalyptus spathulata subsp. spathulata
Leucadendron P.J.Bergius
Lilaeopsis schaffneriana var. recurva (A.W.Hill) Affolter
Tamayorkis porphyrea (Ridl.) Salazar & Soto Arenas
Erythranthe bergeri G.L.Nesom
Glaucium flavum Crantz
Stellaria borealis Bigelow
Platycodon grandiflorus (Jacq.) A.DC.
Clarkia gracilis subsp. gracilis
Melica geyeri Munro ex Bol.
Perityle cuneata Brandegee
Primula pauciflora var. macrocarpa (A.Gray) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Campanula poscharskyana Degen
Penstemon glaber var. glaber
Convolvulus sabatius Viv.
Syzygium samarangense (Blume) Merr. & L.M.Perry
Ocimum basilicum L.
Eriogonum flavum var. flavum
Abronia umbellata subsp. breviflora (Standl.) Munz
Poa bulbosa f. vivipara (Koeler) Maire
Agave americana subsp. americana
Dimocarpus longan Lour.
Boerhavia diffusa L.
Indigofera L.
Plagiobothrys hystriculus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Allium tuolumnense (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) S.S.Denison & McNeal
Heteromeles arbutifolia var. cerina (Jeps.) A.E.Murray
Genista stenopetala Webb & Berthel.
Diplacus angustatus (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Viola pinetorum var. grisea (Jeps.) R.J.Little
Aphanostephus ramosissimus DC.
Erythronium elegans P.C.Hammond & K.L.Chambers
Azara microphylla Hook.fil.
Artemisia longifolia Nutt.
Nyctaginia capitata Choisy
Epilobium nummularifolium R.Cunn. ex A.Cunn.
Esula (Pers.) Haw.
Saxifraga aizoides L.
Impatiens ×pacifica Zika
Calochortus macrocarpus var. macrocarpus
Sedum obtusatum subsp. obtusatum
Erigeron petrophilus var. petrophilus
Hechtia edulis I.Ramírez, Espejo & López-Ferr.
Extriplex joaquinana (A.Nelson) E.H.Zacharias
Lysimachia foemina (Mill.) U.Manns & Anderb.
Arabis crucisetosa Constance & Rollins
Lewisia oppositifolia (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Erythranthe taylorii G.L.Nesom
Mammillaria hertrichiana R.T.Craig
Epixiphium wislizenii (Engelm. ex A.Gray) Munz
Rubus praecox Bertol.
Sporobolus arenicola P.M.Peterson
Delphinium hansenii (Greene) Greene
Camissonia sierrae subsp. alticola Raven
Opuntia polyacantha var. juniperina (Britton & Rose) L.D.Benson
Schinus terebinthifolia var. terebinthifolia
Ceanothus fresnensis Dudley ex Abrams
Echinocereus triglochidiatus Engelm.
Echinocactus horizonthalonius subsp. nicholii (L.D.Benson) U.Guzmán
Boechera gracilipes (Greene) Dorn
Festuca nigrescens Lam.
Amelanchier arborea (F.Michx.) Fernald
Brickellia rusbyi A.Gray
Lomatium peckianum Mathias & Constance
Clarkia franciscana F.H.Lewis & Raven
Sarracenia leucophylla Raf.
Lonicera ×bella Zabel
Arctostaphylos nortensis (P.V.Wells) P.V.Wells
Castilleja minor var. minor
Holosteum umbellatum subsp. umbellatum
Potentilla erecta (L.) Raeusch.
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. caelestinum Reveal
Phlox missoulensis Wherry
Arctostaphylos incognita J.E.Keeley, Massihi, J.Delgad. & Hirales
Fuchsia ×hybrida Voss
Penstemon bracteatus D.D.Keck
Encelia laciniata Vasey & Rose
Geranium ocellatum Cambess.
Clematis tangutica (Maxim.) Korsh.
Cistus ×pulverulentus Pourr.
Allium sharsmithiae (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) McNeal
Quercus pungens Liebm.
Draba incrassata (Rollins) Rollins & R.A.Price
Navarretia leucocephala subsp. leucocephala
Plagiobothrys chorisianus var. hickmanii (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Hexasepalum teres (Walter) J.H.Kirkbr.
Sedum adolphi Raym.-Hamet
Allium lacunosum var. micranthum Eastw.
Heterotheca utahensis G.L.Nesom
Symphoricarpos orbiculatus Moench
Chorizanthe valida S.Watson
Atriplex acanthocarpa (Torr.) S.Watson
Allium parishii S.Watson
Echinomastus intertextus var. intertextus
Kelseya uniflora (S.Watson) Rydb.
Monardella sinuata Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Colocasia esculenta (L.) Schott
Solanum umbelliferum var. wallacei (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Ceanothus cuneatus var. rigidus (Nutt.) Hoover
Ceanothus gloriosus var. gloriosus
Physaria cinerea (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Penstemon lentus var. albiflorus (D.D.Keck) Reveal
Primula poetica (L.F.Hend.) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Eschscholzia minutiflora subsp. covillei (Greene) C.Clark
Acacia stenophylla A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Matelea chihuahuensis (A.Gray) Woodson
Cirsium palustre (L.) Scop.
Phyllanthus urinaria L.
Tabernaemontana donnell-smithii Rose ex J.D.Sm.
Ribes divaricatum var. divaricatum
Heliomeris longifolia var. annua (M.E.Jones) Yates
Erythranthe corallina (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Mammillaria heyderi Muehlenpf.
Lomatium filicinum (M.E.Jones) Mansfield & M.Stevens
Luffa operculata (L.) Cogn.
Allium sativum var. ophioscorodon (Link) Döll
Porophyllum ruderale subsp. macrocephalum (DC.) R.R.Johnson
Penstemon miniatus Lindl.
Thunbergia gregorii S.Moore
Primula utahensis (N.H.Holmgren) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Erigeron uncialis var. conjugans S.F.Blake
Carex zikae Roalson & Waterway
Palmerella debilis subsp. serrata (A.Gray) Lammers
Ivesia aperta var. canina Ertter
Silene spaldingii S.Watson
Aesculus glabra Willd.
Eriophyllum jepsonii Greene
Diplotaxis erucoides (L.) DC.
Cerinthe major L.
Calystegia atriplicifolia Hallier fil.
Sicyos angulatus L.
Thespesia populnea (L.) Sol. ex Corrêa
Viburnum rhytidophyllum Hemsl. ex Forbes & Hemsl.
Echinocereus rigidissimus (Engelm.) Rose
Nahuatlea arborescens (Brandegee) V.A.Funk
Castilleja subinclusa var. subinclusa
Antennaria howellii subsp. howellii
Distimake palmeri (S.Watson) A.R.Simões & Staples
Eremogone congesta (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Ikonn.
Hosackia stipularis var. stipularis
Arctostaphylos bakeri subsp. bakeri
Juglans cinerea L.
Cochlearia officinalis L.
Aphyllon validum (Jeps.) A.C.Schneid.
Rubus ×loganobaccus L.H.Bailey
Eremogone stenomeres (Eastw.) Ikonn.
Oenothera cespitosa subsp. cespitosa
Arctostaphylos malloryi (W.Knight & Gankin) P.V.Wells
Penstemon venustus Douglas
Delphinium lineapetalum Ewan
Cirsium fontinale var. fontinale
Askellia pygmaea (Ledeb.) Sennikov
Penstemon thompsoniae subsp. jaegeri D.D.Keck
Lupinus sericeus subsp. sericeus
Physaria douglasii (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Cynoglossum amabile Stapf & Drumm.
Clarkia prostrata H. & Lewis
Claytonia megarhiza var. nivalis (English) C.L.Hitchc.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus var. laciniatus
Oreocarya semiglabra (Barneby) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Clitoria mariana L.
Draba howellii S.Watson
Heuchera novomexicana Wheelock
Castilleja ambigua var. meadii J.M.Egger & Ruygt
Oreocarya setosissima (A.Gray) Greene
Penstemon glandulosus Douglas ex Lindl.
Bursera exequielii León de la Luz
Brodiaea nana Hoover
Hemerocallis fulva var. kwanso Regel
Eriocoma occidentalis (Thurb. ex S.Watson) Romasch.
Anticlea elegans subsp. elegans
Arctostaphylos crustacea subsp. insulicola (P.V.Wells) V.T.Parker, M.C.Vasey & J.E.Keeley
Phlox paniculata L.
Montia parvifolia subsp. flagellaris (Bong.) Ferris
Acer L.
Veronica cymbalaria Bodard
Nicotiana quadrivalvis var. wallacei (A.Gray) Mansf.
Verbena neomexicana (A.Gray) Briq.
Eriogonum baileyi var. praebens (Gand.) Reveal
Silene coniflora Nees ex Otth
Zeltnera namatophila (Reveal, C.R.Broome & Beatley) G.Mans.
Castilleja minor var. spiralis (Jeps.) J.M.Egger
Cyclamen coum Mill.
Daphne cneorum L.
Stellaria apetala Bernardino
Persicaria wallichii Greuter & Burdet
Sedum rupicola G.N.Jones
Kalanchoe ×houghtonii D.B.Ward
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. pustulosa (Rydb.) R.B.Kelley
Ivesia baileyi S.Watson
Acmispon neomexicanus (Greene) Brouillet
Prunus cerasifera var. pissardii (Carrière) C.K.Schneid., 1906
Allium plummerae S.Watson
Crataegus germanica (L.) Kuntze
Cytisus scoparius var. andreanus (Puiss.) Dippel
Agropyron fragile (Roth) P.Candargy
Campanula glomerata L.
Watsonia borbonica (Pourr.) Goldblatt
Drosera aliciae R.Hamet
Clarkia concinna subsp. raichei G.A.Allen, V.S.Ford & Gottlieb
Calochortus clavatus var. recurvifolius (Hoover) P.L.Fiedl. & Zebell
Achillea millefolium subsp. millefolium
Passiflora bryonioides Kunth
Galega officinalis L.
Leptosyne hamiltonii Elmer
Ceanothus prostratus var. prostratus
Lupinus dalesiae Eastw.
Thermopsis robusta Howell
Echinomastus erectocentrus (J.M.Coult.) Britton & Rose
Viburnum carlesii Hemsl. ex Forbes & Hemsl.
Bouteloua triaena (Trin.) Scribn.
Aira elegans Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Juncus effusus subsp. austrocalifornicus Lint
Phygelius capensis E.Mey. ex Benth.
Fumaria bastardii Bor.
Astragalus sericoleucus A.Gray
Combretum indicum (L.) Jongkind
Echinocereus stolonifer subsp. tayopensis (W.T.Marshall) N.P.Taylor
Trichostema austromontanum subsp. compactum F.H.Lewis
Puccinellia howellii J.I.Davis
Callianthe megapotamica (A.Spreng.) Dorr
Luffa cylindrica Linnaeus, 1753
Mimulus torreyi A.Gray
Mimulus shevockii Heckard & Bacig.
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana subsp. raichei W.Knight
Festuca megalura Nutt.
Festuca octoflora var. octoflora
Zigadenus fremontii var. fremontii
Hordeum glaucum Steud.
Calycadenia micrantha R.L.Carr & G.D.Carr
Festuca dertonensis (All.) Asch. & Graebn.
Vulpia dertonensis (All.) Gola
Hordeum californicum Covas & Stebbins
Calochortus albus var. rubellus Greene
Lilium humboldtii var. ocellatum (Kellogg) Elwes
Habenaria elegans (Lindl.) Bol.
Gastridium ventricosum (Gouan) Schinz & Thell.
Elymus triticoides subsp. multiflorus Gould
Elymus triticoides subsp. triticoides
Zygadenus fremontii Torr.
Mimulus aurantiacus var. puniceus (Nutt.) D.M.Thomps.
Mimulus floribundus Douglas ex Lindl.
Suaeda Forssk. ex J.F.Gmel.
Batis R.Br.
Bloomeria Kellogg
Helianthemum scoparium Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Mimulus whitneyi Gray
Haplopappus linearifolius DC.
Grindelia procera Greene
Hemizonia australis (D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck
Eurotia lanata (Pursh) Moq.
Gnaphalium bicolor Sch.Bip.
Gnaphalium californicum DC.
Gnaphalium luteoalbum L.
Delphinium patens subsp. greenei (Eastw.) Ewan
Gnaphalium ramosissimum Nutt.
Spiranthes Rich.
Quercus pubescens Willd.
Sedum obtusatum subsp. boreale Clausen
Zea mays subsp. parviglumis Iltis & Doebley
Hemizonia ramosissima Benth.
Grindelia robusta Nutt.
Lotus grandiflorus (Benth.) Greene
Thelypodium lasiophyllum (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Lotus subpinnatus Ottley
Solanum xanti var. xanti
Lolium perenne subsp. multiflorum (Lam.) Husn.
Melica imperfecta var. minor Scribn.
Pennisetum clandestinum Hochst. ex Chiov.
Oryzopsis miliacea (L.) Asch. & Schweinf.
Polypogon semiverticillatus (Forssk.) Hyl.
Stipa lepida var. lepida
Zostera marina var. latifolia Gray
Stipa lepida var. andersonii (Vasey) Hitchc.
Salix lasiolepis var. lasiolepis
Mimulus flemingii Munz
Lyonothamnus floribundus subsp. asplenifolius (Greene) A.E.Murray
Castilleja affinis subsp. insularis (Eastw.) Munz
Mimulus longiflorus (Nutt.) A.L.Grant
Solanum xanti var. hoffmannii Munz
Iris spuria L.
Zannichellia P.Micheli ex L.
Dudleya blochmanae (Eastw.) Moran
Polygala cornuta Kellogg
Hypericum perfoliatum L.
Camissonia boothii var. desertorum (Munz) Cronquist
Marah fabacea var. agrestis (Greene) Stocking
Gnaphalium beneolens Davidson
Trifolium bifidum var. bifidum
Mimulus johnstonii Grant
Silene laciniata subsp. major C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Chaenactis douglasii subsp. rubricaulis (Rydb.) Ferris
Helianthemum scoparium var. vulgare Jeps.
Salicornia subterminalis Parish
Cuscuta ceanothii Behr
Mimulus guttatus var. guttatus
Centaurium davyi (Jeps.) Abrams
Urtica gracilis subsp. holosericea (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Orthocarpus densiflorus var. densiflorus
Kentranthus ruber (L.) Druce
Scirpus californicus (C.A.Mey.) Steud.
Mimulus guttatus subsp. guttatus
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. subcordata (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Marah fabaceus var. agrestis (Greene) Stocking
Lavatera assurgentiflora Kellogg
Mirabilis californica A.Gray
Epilobium adenocaulon Hausskn.
Zauschneria cana Greene
Zauschneria californica subsp. mexicana (C.Presl) P.H.Raven
Oxalis corniculata subsp. corniculata
Oxalis albicans subsp. californica (Abrams) G.Eiten
Orobanche uniflora subsp. occidentalis (Greene) Abrams ex Ferris
Orobanche parishii var. brachylob Heckard
Orobanche fasciculata var. franciscana Achey
Mimulus latidens (A.Gray) Greene
Mimulus kelloggii (Curran ex Greene) Curran ex A.Gray
Layia glandulosa subsp. glandulosa
Layia platyglossa subsp. campestris D.D.Keck
Quercus variabilis Blume
Quercus petraea (Matt.) Liebl.
Lessingia germanorum var. lemmonii (A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Haplopappus cooperi (A.Gray) Hall
Camissoniopsis pallida subsp. hallii (Davidson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Dichelostemma capitatum (Benth.) Alph.Wood
Ceanothus vestitus Greene
Ceanothus papillosus var. roweanus McMinn
Ceanothus papillosus subsp. roweanus (Mc Minn) Munz
Plagiobothrys californicus var. californicus
Proboscidea louisiana (Mill.) Wooton & Standl.
Linaria Mill.
Toxicoscordion micranthum (Eastw.) A.Heller
Spergularia arvensis (L.) Cambess.
Frankenia grandifolia Cham. & Schltdl.
Solanum clokeyi Munz
Scutellaria tuberosa var. similis Jeps.
Sidalcea malviflora S.Watson, 1871
Mimulus guttatus subsp. micranthus (A.Heller) Munz
Orthocarpus purpurascens var. purpurascens
Datura meteloides DC. ex Dunal
Orthocarpus purpurascens var. pallidus D.D.Keck
Urtica holosericea Nutt.
Lippia nodiflora var. rosea (D.Don) Munz
Erigeron petrophilus var. viscidulus (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Mimulus rattanii A.Gray
Hieracium nudicaule (A.Gray) A.Heller
Mimulus pulchellus (Drew ex Greene) A.L.Grant
Mimulus palmeri A.Gray
Mimulus pictus (Curran ex Greene) Gray
Mimulus nanus var. jepsonii (A.L.Grant) D.M.Thomps.
Mimulus mohavensis Lemmon
Helianthemum scoparium var. aldersonii (Greene) Munz
Mimulus leptaleus A.Gray
Ceanothus megacarpus subsp. insularis (Eastw.) P.H.Raven
Linanthus dianthiflorus subsp. dianthiflorus
Platystemon californicus var. nutans Brandegee
Alchemilla occidentalis Nutt.
Dendromecon rigida subsp. harfordii (Kellogg) Raven
Eschscholzia californica var. californica
Mimulus bolanderi A.Gray
Mimulus bicolor Hartw. ex Benth.
Mimulus aurantiacus var. pubescens (Torr.) D.M.Thomps.
Chenopodium berlandieri subsp. zschackei (Murr) A.Zobel
Monardella linoides var. oblonga (Greene) Munz
Mimulus fremontii (Benth.) Gray
Heleocharis T.Lestib.
Eriophorum crinigerum (A.Gray) Beetle
Rytidosperma penicillatum (Labill.) Connor & Edgar
Oxalis albicans subsp. pilosa (Nutt.) G.Eiten
Mirabilis californica var. californica
Atriplex hastata Geners. ex Steud.
Chenopodium ambrosioides L.
Helianthemum scoparium var. scoparium
Mimulus glaucescens Greene
Calandrinia maritima Nutt.
Dodecatheon clevelandii subsp. insulare H.J.Thomps.
Eriogonum grande subsp. rubescens (Greene) Munz
Rumex angiocarpus Murb.
Camissoniopsis luciae (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Mimulus congdonii B.L.Rob.
Mimulus clevelandii Brandegee
Mimulus constrictus (A.L.Grant) Pennell
Mimulus exiguus A.Gray
Kochia americana S.Watson
Chenopodium strictum subsp. glaucophyllum (Aellen) Aellen & Just
Lupinus nipomensis Eastw.
Heteranthemis viscidehirta Schott
Orobanche L.
Camissonia cheiranthifolia (Hornem. ex Spreng.) Raim.
Piptatherum miliaceum (L.) Coss.
Poa stebbinsii Soreng
Dentaria californica var. integrifolia (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Detling
Cardamine californica var. californica
Lupinus lepidus subsp. confertus (Kellogg) Detling
Eriogonum fasciculatum subsp. foliolosum (Nutt.) S.Stokes
Horkelia cuneata subsp. cuneata
Castilleja minor subsp. minor
Carex vesicaria var. vesicaria
Mimulus aurantiacus var. parviflorus (Greene) D.M.Thomps.
Castilleja subinclusa subsp. franciscana (Pennell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Ceanothus megacarpus subsp. megacarpus
Stipa pulchella Munro ex Ball
Erysimum capitatum var. lompocense (Rossbach) Kartesz
Piperia michaelii (Greene) Rydb.
Eriogonum lobbii var. lobbii
Ceanothus cuneatus subsp. fascicularis C.L.Schmidt
Chorizanthe thurberi (Gray ex Benth.) S.Watson
Camissonia hirtella (Greene) Raven
Campanula griffinii Morin
Eriogonum grande subsp. timorum (Reveal) Munz
Pseudognaphalium canescens subsp. microcephalum (Nutt.) Kartesz
Chamaesyce ocellata subsp. ocellata
Bloomeria montana Greene
Orobanche californica subsp. feudgei (Munz) Heckard
Jarava speciosa (Trin. & Rupr.) Peñail.
Rorippa palustris var. occidentalis (S.Watson) Rollins
Lonicera cauriana Fernald
Lobelia dunnii Greene
Nemacladus secundiflorus var. secundiflorus
Dodecatheon clevelandii subsp. sanctarum (Greene) Abrams
Lessingia lemmonii var. lemmonii
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. brevicula (Greene) M.L.Canby
Cirsium californicum A.Gray
Amsonia brevifolia A.Gray
Delphinium parryi subsp. purpureum (Lewis & Epling) M.J.Warnock
Linaria pinifolia (Poir.) Thell.
Stipa williamsii Scribn.
Cyperaceae
Arctostaphylos ×benitoensis Roof
Lotus oblongifolius (Benth.) Greene
Phalaris aquatica var. stenoptera (Hack.) Burkart
Filago californica Nutt.
Chamaedorea Willd.
Rauvolfia samarensis Merr.
Dodecatheon clevelandii Greene
Quercus grandidentata Ewan
Garrya congdonii Eastw.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. latifolia H.M.Hall
Amsonia brevifolia var. tomentosa (Torr. & Frém.) Jeps.
Agropyron cristatum var. pectinatum (M.Bieb.) B.Fedtsch.
Salix laevigata var. laevigata
Saxifraga californica Greene
Mimulus longiflorus var. longiflorus
Microseris linearifolia (DC.) Sch.Bip.
Microseris heterocarpa (Nutt.) K.L.Chambers
Perezia microcephala A.Molina
Thelypodium laciniatum (Hook.) Endl. ex Walp.
Dactylus glomerata Linnaeus
Erysimum capitatum subsp. perenne (S.Watson ex Coville) R.A.Price
Lotus scoparius var. scoparius
Trifolium tridentatum var. aciculare (Nutt.) McDermott
Lupinus densiflorus var. palustris (Kellogg) C.P.Sm.
Lotus grandiflorus var. grandiflorus
Lathyrus vestitus subsp. puberulus (T.G.White ex Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Lathyrus laetiflorus subsp. barbarae (T.G.White) C.L.Hitchc.
Stephanomeria paniculata Nutt.
Berberis aquifolium var. dictyota (Jeps.) Jeps.
Conyza bonariensis (L.) Cronquist
Baccharis plummerae A.Gray
Baccharis douglasii DC.
Carex gracilior Mack.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. robusta Greene
Coreopsis gigantea (Kellogg) Hall
Erigeron foliosus subsp. stenophyllus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Haplopappus detonsus (Greene) Raven
Hieracium argutum var. argutum
Haplopappus venetus subsp. vernonioides (Nutt.) H.M.Hall
Haplopappus venetus var. sedoides (Greene) Munz
Haplopappus squarrosus subsp. grindelioides (DC.) D.D.Keck
Hemizonia fitchii A.Gray
Lactuca serriola var. serriola
Bromus willdenowii Kunth
Chenopodium ambrosioides var. ambrosioides
Arnica dealbata (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Allocasuarina verticillata (Lam.) L.A.S.Johnson
Lupinus albifrons var. abramsii (C.P.Sm.) Hoover
Zostera pacifica S.Watson
Arnica chamissonis subsp. bernardina (Greene) Maguire
Mimulus longiflorus var. rutilus A.L.Grant
Mimulus aurantiacus subsp. lompocensis (Mc Minn) Munz
Erysimum capitatum subsp. lompocense (Rossbach) R.A.Price
Populus trichocarpa var. trichocarpa
Mimulus fremontii var. vandenbergensis D.M.Thomps.
Mimulus androsaceus Curran ex Greene
Rumex crassus Rech.fil.
Holodiscus discolor subsp. microphyllus (Rydb.) A.E.Murray
Horkelia cuneata subsp. puberula (Greene) D.D.Keck
Horkelia cuneata subsp. sericea (Gray) D.D.Keck
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. subaridum (S.Stokes) Munz
Avicennia marina subsp. australasica (Walp.) J.Everett
Amsinckia menziesii subsp. intermedia (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Ganders
Disphyma australe (Sol.) J.M.Black
Cryptantha cinerea var. abortiva (Greene) Cronquist
Viola purpurea subsp. integrifolia M.S.Baker & Clausen
Scirpus robustus Pursh
Viola purpurea subsp. mesophyta M.S.Baker & Clausen
Limnanthes floccosa Howell
Scirpus americanus (Boeckeler) T.Koyama
Eleocharis atropurpurea (Retz.) J.Presl & C.Presl
Berberis pinnata subsp. insularis Munz
Brassica geniculata (Desf.) Ball
Sambucus nigra subsp. canadensis (L.) Bolli
Salvia columbariae var. columbariae
Ericameria cooperi subsp. cooperi
Nasturtium W.T.Aiton
Mimulus aurantiacus var. aurantiacus
Cercocarpus betuloides subsp. blancheae (C.K.Schneid.) Thorne
Bernardia myricifolia (Scheele) S.Watson
Perityle megalocephala (S.Watson) J.F.Macbr.
Cercocarpus betulifolius var. blancheae C.K.Schneid.
Zeltnera namophila (Reveal, C.R.Broome & Beatley) G.Mans.
Potamogeton latifolius Sloboda
Calochortus clavatus subsp. pallidus (Hoover) Munz
Adenostoma fasciculatum var. prostratum Dunkle
Festuca myuros var. hirsuta (Hack.) Asch. & Graebn.
Cryptantha micromeres (A.Gray) Greene
Cryptantha intermedia var. rigida (I.M.Johnst.) Brand
Festuca myuros var. myuros
Chorizanthe brevicornu subsp. spathulata (Small ex Rydb.) Munz
Araujia sericofera Brot.
Eriogonum fasciculatum subsp. polifolium (Benth.) S.Stokes
Ceanothus impressus var. nipomensis McMinn
Calochortus palmeri S.Watson
Delphinium patens Benth.
Astragalus albens Greene
Limonium Mill.
Eriogonum nudum subsp. pauciflorum (S.Watson) Munz
Calochortus clavatus subsp. clavatus
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. munzii (Reveal) Thorne ex Munz
Astragalus pachypus Greene
Microseris campestris Greene
Eriogonum grande subsp. grande
Berberis aquifolium var. aquifolium
Berberis aquifolium var. repens (Lindl.) Scoggan
Eriogonum giganteum subsp. giganteum
Lotus argophyllus var. niveus (Greene) Ottley
Trifolium amplectens Torr. & A.Gray
Chorizanthe staticoides subsp. staticoides
Lotus argophyllus subsp. niveus (Greene) Munz
Platanus californica Benth.
Mascagnia macroptera (DC.) Nied.
Monardella exilis var. exilis
Rosa woodsii var. gratissima (Greene) D.Cole
Lilium pardalinum subsp. vollmeri (Eastw.) M.W.Skinner
Drymocallis lactea var. austinae (Jeps.) Ertter
Achillea millefolium subsp. pacifica (Rydb.) G.N.Jones
Herniaria L.
Alismataceae
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. cushingiana (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Salix lasiandra subsp. lasiandra
Navarretia ojaiensis Elvin, J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Monardella beneolens Shevock, Ertter & Jokerst
Allium fimbriatum subsp. mohavense (Jeps.) Traub & Ownbey
Chenopodium carnosulum Moq.
Asclepias fruticosa L.
Castanopsis sempervirens (Kellogg) Dudley ex Merriam
Nemacladus glanduliferus var. orientalis McVaugh
Ruppia L.
Helianthus niveus subsp. canescens (A.Gray) Heiser
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. membranaceum (S.Stokes ex Jeps.) S.Stokes
Pennisetum villosum Fresen.
Linaria reticulata (Sm.) Desf.
Pennisetum nervosum (Nees) Trin.
Mimulus arenarius A.L.Grant
Mimulus dudleyi A.L.Grant
Ceanothus pinetorum Coville
Janusia gracilis A.Gray
Gnaphalium canescens subsp. microcephalum (Nutt.) Stebbins & D.J.Keil
Viola purpurea var. quercetorum (M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen) R.J.Little
Carex texensis (Torr. ex L.H.Bailey) L.H.Bailey
Lupinus antoninus Eastw.
Conyza Less.
Callistemon R.Br.
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. subscaposum (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Ceanothus gloriosus subsp. exaltatus C.L.Schmidt
Ceanothus gloriosus subsp. gloriosus
Aster alpigenus subsp. andersonii (A.Gray) Onno
Quercus munzii Tucker
Abronia umbellata subsp. umbellata
Linanthus californicus subsp. tomentosus (P.J.Gordon & Arn.) J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Linanthus ciliatus (Benth.) Greene
Ceanothus oliganthus subsp. sorediatus (Hook. & Arn.) C.L.Schmidt
Ceanothus oliganthus subsp. oliganthus
Quercus townei E.J.Palmer
Boechera depauperata (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Ceanothus confusus Howell
Penstemon newberryi subsp. newberryi
Ceanothus arcuatus McMinn
Dicoria canescens subsp. clarkiae (P.B.Kenn.) D.D.Keck
Mimulus montioides A.Gray
Penstemon heterodoxus subsp. heterodoxus
Ceanothus crassifolius var. planus Abrams
Ceanothus diversifolius Kellogg
Ceanothus foliosus subsp. foliosus
Ceanothus ramulosus (Greene) McMinn
Quercus kinseliae (C.H.Mull.) Nixon & C.H.Müll.
Chamomilla suaveolens (Pursh) Rydb.
Systenotheca vortriedei (Brandegee) Reveal & Hardham
Lyonothamnus floribundus f. aspleniifolius (Greene) Franceschi
Arabis repanda var. greenei Jeps.
Petrophyton caespitosum var. caespitosum
Cryptantha nubigena (Greene) Payson
Rubiaceae
Anemone oregana A.Gray
Salix lasiandra subsp. caudata (Nutt.) A.E.Murray
Eriochloa acuminata (J.Presl) Kunth
Camassia quamash subsp. breviflora Gould
Symphoricarpos parishii Rydb.
Quercus turbinella var. ajoensis (C.H.Mull.) Little
Chenopodium macrospermum var. halophilum (Phil.) Standl.
Filago gallica L.
Monardella frutescens (Hoover) Jokerst
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. eastwoodiana P.V.Wells
Rorippa palustris subsp. occidentalis (S.Watson) Abrams
Ceanothus greggii subsp. vestitus (Greene) Thorne
Portulaca L.
Arabis inyoensis Rollins
Boechera elkoensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Chamaesyce parishii (Greene) Millsp. ex Parish
Chamaesyce arizonica (Engelm.) Arthur
Pyrola picta subsp. integra (A.Gray) Piper
Eriogonum butterworthianum Howell
Trifolium retusum L.
Plantago L.
Penstemon fruticiformis subsp. fruticiformis
Penstemon heterophyllus subsp. heterophyllus
Penstemon heterophyllus subsp. australis (Munz & Johnst.) D.D.Keck
Eriastrum hooveri (Jeps.) Mason
Layia platyglossa subsp. platyglossa
Filago arizonica A.Gray
Eriophyllum staechadifolium var. depressum Greene
Isocoma veneta var. sedoides (Greene) Jeps.
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana subsp. decumbens (P.V.Wells) P.V.Wells
Astragalus trichopodus subsp. leucopsis (Torr. & A.Gray) Thorne
Toxicodendron Mill.
Amsinckia furcata Suksd.
Euonymus occidentalis subsp. parishii (Trel.) R.M.Beauch.
Euonymus occidentalis var. occidentalis
Torreyochloa erecta (Hitchc.) Church
Acanthoxanthium spinosum (L.) Fourr.
Plagiobothrys californicus (A.Gray) Greene
Cryptantha Lehm. ex G.Don
Senecio douglasii var. douglasii
Calamagrostis muiriana B.L.Wilson & Sami Gray
Haplopappus squarrosus Hook. & Arn.
Brassica rapa subsp. sylvestris (Lam.) Janch.
Hordeum geniculatum All.
Hypochoeris glabra L.
Eremocarpus setigerus (Hook.) Benth.
Yucca baccata var. vespertina McKelvey
Yucca navajoa J.M.Webber
Linanthus aureus subsp. aureus
Silene coniflora Nees ex DC.
Sagina occidentalis S.Watson
Lotus scoparius var. dendroideus (Greene) Ottley
Medicago polymorpha var. polymorpha
Medicago polymorpha var. brevispina (Benth.) Heyn
Eremogone ursina (Rob.) Ikonn.
Eremogone macradenia (S.Watson) Ikonn.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus var. ramosus (Greene) Munz
Vicia exigua Nutt.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus var. crenatus (Nutt.) W.H.Brewer
Verbesina encelioides subsp. exauriculata B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Lupinus concinnus subsp. concinnus
Lupinus bicolor subsp. microphyllus (S.Watson) D.B.Dunn
Senecio mikanioides Otto ex Walp.
Eryngium aristulatum subsp. aristulatum
Eryngium pinnatisectum Jeps.
Tiarella trifoliata subsp. unifoliata (Hook.) P.M.Kern
Lotus argophyllus subsp. ornithopus (Greene) P.H.Raven
Boechera subpinnatifida (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. mojavensis (Engelm. & Bigelow) L.D.Benson
Allium howellii Eastw.
Allium cernuum var. obtusum (Cockerell) Cockerell
Aegilops L.
Trillium L.
Lavatera cretica L.
Gnaphalium sphaericum Willd.
Hordeum depauperatum Steud.
Oenanthe L.
Eremalche Greene
Navarretia setiloba Coville
Agrostis viridis Gouan
Ribes divaricatum subsp. parishii (A.Heller) A.E.Murray
Ribes binominatum A.Heller
Quercus densiflora var. hartwegii A.DC.
Aruncus dioicus var. pubescens (Rydb.) Fernald
Picris echioides L.
Quercus dumosa var. kinselae C.H.Mull.
Sphaeralcea ambigua subsp. rugosa Kearney
Sphaeralcea ambigua subsp. rosacea (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Kearney
Buddleja madagascariensis Lam.
Beloperone californica Benth.
Viburnum L.
Hordeum arizonicum Covas
Keckiella ternata subsp. septentrionalis (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Straw
Mentha spicata var. spicata
Anemopsis californica var. californica
Cenchrus incertus M.A.Curtis
Lithocarpus densiflorus var. echinoides (R.Br.ter) Abrams
Camissonia boothii subsp. decorticans (Hook. & Arn.) P.H.Raven
Navarretia jaredii Eastw.
Scrophularia peregrina L.
Clarkia purpurea subsp. purpurea
Trichostema L.
Erythrina coralloides Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Atriplex lentiformis var. breweri (S.Watson) McMinn
Bromeliaceae
Echium L.
Atriplex coronata var. vallicola (Hoover) S.L.Welsh
Quercus shrevei C.H.Mull.
Camissonia graciliflora (Hook. & Arn.) Raven
Rubus vitifolius Cham. & Schltdl.
Marah macrocarpus var. major (Dunn) Stocking
Mirabilis pumila (Standl.) Standl.
Nuttallanthus D.A.Sutton
Calycadenia DC.
Jacaranda Juss.
Oenothera wolfii (Munz) P.H.Raven, W.Dietr. & W.Stubbe
Lonicera hildebrandiana Collett & Hemsl.
Ochna serrulata (Hochst.) Walp.
Lathyrus laetiflorus var. laetiflorus
Rumex occidentalis var. fenestratus (Greene) Lepage
Jasminum beesianum Forrest & Diels
Urtica dioica var. holosericea (Nutt.) C.L.Hitchc.
Sidalcea malvaeflora (DC.) A.Grey
Orthocarpus densiflorus Benth.
Brachypodium hybridum Catalán, Joch.Müll., L.A.J.Mur & T.Langdon
Torilis arvensis subsp. purpurea (Ten.) Hayek
Carpobrotus quadrifidus L.Bolus
Boykinia Nutt.
Calamagrostis bolanderi Thurb.
Heuchera rubescens var. alpicola Jeps.
Rhynchospora californica Gale
Atriplex covillei (Standl.) J.F.Macbr.
Proboscidea altheifolia (Benth.) Decne.
Lavatera arborea L.
Sphaeralcea fasciculata (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Arthur
Sphaeralcea densiflora (S.Watson) Jeps.
Malacothamnus niveus (Eastw.) Kearney
Malacothamnus fasciculatus var. laxiflorus (A.Gray) Kearney
Achnatherum occidentale subsp. californicum (Merr. & Burtt Davy) Barkworth
Achnatherum parishii (Vasey) Barkworth
Malacothamnus densiflorus var. densiflorus
Linanthus parviflorus (Benth.) Greene
Trillium chloropetalum var. angustipetalum (Torr.) Munz
Galium glabrescens subsp. glabrescens
Orobanche valida subsp. valida
Mimulus aurantiacus var. aridus (Abrams) D.M.Thomps.
Orobanche cooperi (Gray) A.Heller
Orobanche californica subsp. condensa Heckard
Orobanche californica subsp. grandis Heckard
Orobanche californica subsp. jepsonii (Munz) Heckard
Lysimachia minima (L.) U.Manns & Anderb.
Galium serpenticum subsp. scotticum Dempster & Ehrend.
Solidago rigida subsp. glabrata (Braun) S.B.Heard & Semple
Linanthus jamauensis Moran
Hemizonia increscens subsp. villosa Tanowitz
Galium nuttallii var. cliftonsmithii Dempster
Felicia amelloides (DC.) Voss
Mimulus aurantiacus var. grandiflorus (Lindl. & Paxton) D.M.Thomps.
Zigadenus fontanus Eastw.
Claytonia spathulata var. tenuifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Claytonia perfoliata var. perfoliata
Panicum acuminatum Sw.
Phlox viridis E.Nelson
Chorizanthe brevicornu subsp. brevicornu
Polemonium pulcherrimum subsp. pulcherrimum
Naiocrene parvifolia (DC.) Rydb.
Montia parviflora Howell
Grewia L.
Erioneuron pulchellum (Kunth) Tateoka
Anagallis arvensis var. coerulea (Schreb.) Gren. & Godr.
Cryptantha circumscissa var. circumscissa
Lepidagathis formosensis C.B.Clarke ex Hayata
Anagallis arvensis subsp. latifolia (L.) Arcang.
Chorizanthe staticoides var. staticoides
Mirabilis laevis var. aspera (Greene) Jeps.
Leptosiphon serrulatus (Greene) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Lesquerella palmeri S.Watson
Machaeranthera tortifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Fraxinus americana L.
Vulpia myuros var. hirsuta Hack.
Ceratotheca triloba (Bernh.) Hook.fil.
Flaveria pubescens Rydb.
Pseudotrillium S.B.Farmer
Chaenactis stevioides var. brachypappa (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Systenotheca vortreidei (Brandegee) Reveal & Hardham
Ribes amarum var. hoffmanni Munz
Bolboschoenus (Asch.) Palla
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. bahiiforme (Torr. & A.Gray) Munz
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. minus (I.M.Johnst.) Munz
Monolepis Schrad.
Oenothera dentata var. parishii (Abrams) Munz
Camissonia benitensis Raven
Drymocallis glandulosa subsp. reflexa (Greene) Soják
Deschampsia caespitosa (L.) P.Beauv.
Bromus hallii (Hitchc.) Saarela & P.M.Peterson
Deschampsia domingensis Hitchc. & Ekman
Lupinus concinnus subsp. optatus (C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. nodosum (Small) Munz
Eriogonum kennedyi subsp. alpigenum (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Munz
Eriogonum kennedyi subsp. austromontanum (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) S.Stokes
Ribes sericeum Eastw.
Eriogonum parvifolium var. parvifolium
Achillea millefolium var. millefolium
Tetragonia expansa Murray
Delphinium parryi var. maritimum Davidson
Brodiaea crocea var. modesta (H.M.Hall) Munz
Senecio neomexicanus A.Gray
Senecio spartioides var. spartioides
Zigadenus paniculatus (Nutt.) S.Watson
Senecio werneriifolius (A.Gray) A.Gray
Juncus balticus var. vallicola Rydb.
Juncus tenuis var. dudleyi (Wiegand) F.J.Herm.
Senecio mutabilis Greene
Sisymbrium elegans (M.E.Jones) Payson
Scirpus acutus Willd. ex Kunth, 1837
Eremogone eastwoodiae var. eastwoodiae
Scirpus validus Vahl
Lewisia pygmaea subsp. glandulosa (Rydb.) Ferris
Mimulus eastwoodiae Rydb.
Anulocaulis leiosolenus (Torr.) Standl.
Agropyron trachycaulum (Link) Malte ex H.F.Lewis
Oenothera trichocalyx Nutt.
Machaeranthera rubricaulis Rydb.
Potentilla gracilis var. brunnescens (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Psilostrophe bakeri Greene
Senecio ambrosioides Rydb.
Cleome lutea var. lutea
Keckiella antirrhinoides subsp. microphylla (A.Gray) Straw
Viola nuttallii var. linguifolia (Nutt.) Jeps.
Oenothera jamesii Torr. & A.Gray
Machaeranthera canescens var. latifolia (A.Nelson) S.L.Welsh
Penstemon harringtonii Penland
Penstemon lentus Pennell
Orthocarpus purpureoalbus S.Watson
Platyschkuhria integrifolia (A.Gray) Rydb.
Senecio debilis Nutt.
Senecio eremophilus subsp. kingii (Rydb.) G.W.Douglas & Ruyle-Dougl.
Senecio dimorphophyllus Greene
Gilia attenuata (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Rumex salicifolius var. mexicanus (Meisn.) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus shortianus Nutt.
Poa longiligula Scribn. & T.A.Williams
Epilobium angustifolium Lam.
Leucelene ericoides (Torr.) Greene
Elymus trachycaulis (Link) Gould
Lygodesmia grandiflora var. grandiflora
Tetraneuris acaulis var. epunctata (A.Nelson) Kartesz & Gandhi
Quercus harvardii var. tuckeri S.L.Welsh
Zuckia brandegeei (Gray) S.L.Welsh & Stutz
Gentiana heterosepala Engelm.
Hymenoxys acaulis var. caespitosa (A.Nelson) K.F.Parker
Hymenopappus cinereus Rydb.
Hymenoxys scaposa (DC.) K.F.Parker
Hymenopappus lugens Greene
Penstemon saxosorum Pennell
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. laetivirens (Greene ex Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus bakeri Greene
Pleuraphis jamesii Torr.
Phlox austromontana subsp. austromontana
Haplopappus spinulosus (Pursh) DC.
Haplopappus nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Xanthium pensylvanicum Wallr.
Grindelia subalpina Greene
Haplopappus carthamoides (Hook.) A.Gray
Haplopappus armerioides (Nutt.) A.Gray
Haplopappus clementis (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Androsace septentrionalis subsp. puberulenta (Rydb.) G.T.Robbins
Elymus salina M.E.Jones
Physaria wardii (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Eragrostis spectabilis (Pursh) Steud.
Dodecatheon radicatum Greene
Portulaca retusa Engelm.
Stipa arida M.E.Jones
Astragalus lentiginosus Douglas
Eupatorium maculatum L.
Grindelia decumbens Greene
Atriplex wolfii S.Watson
Erigeron vetensis Rydb.
Enceliopsis nutans (Eastw.) A.Nelson
Cryptantha fulvocanescens var. fulvocanescens
Poa agassizensis B.Boivin & D.Löve
Cryptantha johnstonii Higgins
Astragalus geyeri A.Gray
Astragalus flexuosus (Hook.) Douglas ex G.Don
Aster laevis L.
Oreocarya elata Eastw.
Oreocarya gypsophila Payson
Oreocarya nitida Greene
Aster arenosus (A.Heller) S.F.Blake
Cryptantha jonesiana (Payson) Payson
Delphinium andersonii var. scaposum (Greene) S.L.Welsh
Collomia mazama Coville
Lygodesmia arizonica Tomb
Collomia debilis var. ipomoea Payson
Cryptantha jamesii (Torr.) Payson
Cryptantha jamesii var. multicaulis (Greene) Payson
Harbouria J.M.Coult. & Rose
Lomatium eastwoodiae (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.F.Macbr.
Cymopterus acaulis var. fendleri (A.Gray) Goodrich
Townsendia glabella A.Gray
Chrysothamnus vaseyi (A.Gray) Greene
Abronia fragrans var. elliptica (A.Nelson) M.E.Jones
Artemisia dracunculus var. glauca (Pall. ex Willd.) Besser
Asclepias capricornu Woodson
Astragalus thompsoniae S.Watson
Cryptantha crassisepala var. elachantha I.M.Johnst.
Mentzelia albicaulis var. veatchiana (Kellogg) Urb. & Gilg
Mentzelia humilis (Rydb.) J.Darl.
Mentzelia pumila var. lagarosa K.H.Thorne
Mentzelia pumila var. procera (Wooton & Standl.) J.Darl.
Thelesperma megapotamicum (Spreng.) Kuntze, 1898
Penstemon alpinus Torr.
Eriogonum corymbosum var. smithii (Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Calamagrostis neglecta G.Gaertn., B.Mey. & Schreb.
Fragaria virginiana Mill.
Astragalus sesquiflorus S.Watson
Astragalus wetherillii M.E.Jones
Tridens pulchellus (Kunth) Hitchc.
Yucca standleyi McKelvey
Pulsatilla patens (L.) Mill.
Lathyrus leucanthus Rydb.
Pulsatilla ludoviciana (Nutt.) A.Heller
Lupinus ammophilus Greene
Thalictrum heliophilum Wilken & De Mott
Agoseris glauca var. laciniata (D.C.Eaton) Smiley
Arenaria eastwoodiae Rydb.
Castilleja linifolia N.H.Holmgren
Penstemon teucrioides Greene
Nuttallia multiflora (Nutt.) Greene
Astragalus bigelovii A.Gray
Astragalus bisulcatus var. major (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Scirpus pungens Willd. ex Kunth
Astragalus confertiflorus A.Gray
Astragalus equisolensis Neese & S.L.Welsh
Eriogonum leptophyllum (Torr. & A.Gray) Wooton & Standl.
Elymus cinereus var. cinereus
Elymus ambiguus Vasey & Scribn.
Platyschkuhria integrifolia var. oblongifolia (A.Gray) Ellison
Oxybaphus linearis (Pursh) B.L.Rob.
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. attenuatus (M.E.Jones) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Sisymbrium linifolium (Nutt.) Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Cirsium lanceolatum (L.) Scop.
Cirsium calcareum var. bipinnatum (Eastw.) S.L.Welsh
Stanleya albescens M.E.Jones
Thlaspi alpestre Jacq.
Erigeron collinus Sch.Bip.
Eriogonum racemosum var. racemosum
Cirsium scopulorum (Greene) Cockerell ex Daniels
Malcolmia africana (L.) W.T.Aiton
Panicum virgatum L.
Oryzopsis hymenoides (Roem. & Schult.) Ricker ex Piper
Dugaldia hoopesii (A.Gray) Rydb.
Astragalus missouriensis var. amphibolus Barneby
Gilia montezumae Tidestr. & Dayton
Gilia congesta Hook.
Erigeron eatonii A.Gray
Descurainia richardsonii var. sonnei (B.L.Rob.) C.L.Hitchc.
Gilia haydenii A.Gray
Bahia nudicaulis A.Gray
Lesquerella parviflora Rollins
Chrysopsis foliosa Nutt.
Heuchera parviflora Bartl.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. uintahensis (L.C.Anderson) S.L.Welsh
Cymopterus anisatus Gray
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. pinifolius (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. consimilis (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. gnaphalodes (Greene) H.M.Hall
Sullivantia purpusii (Brandegee) Rosend.
Astragalus cerussatus E.Sheld.
Eremothera minor (A.Nelson) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Muhlenbergia thurberi (Scribn.) Rydb.
Bouteloua curtipendula var. caespitosa Gould & Kapadia
Oenothera brevipes A.Gray
Oenothera caespitosa var. montana (Nutt.) Durand
Gilia subnuda Torr. ex A.Gray
Gilia stenothyrsa A.Gray
Gilia polycladon Torr.
Cryptantha minima Rydb.
Camissonia scapoidea subsp. scapoidea
Aster bigelovii A.Gray
Aster glaucodes S.F.Blake
Aster fendleri A.Gray
Aster kingii D.C.Eaton
Aster hesperius A.Gray
Aster leucanthemifolius Greene
Lycurus phleoides Kunth
Oreocarya osterhoutii Payson
Boechera pallidifolia (Rollins) W.A.Weber
Geranium fremontii Torr. ex A.Gray
Geranium parryi (Engelm.) A.Heller
Aquilegia caerulea James
Arenaria eastwoodiae var. eastwoodiae
Forsellesia meionandra (Koehne) A.Heller
Aquilegia caerulea var. ochroleuca Hook.
Cryptantha wetherillii (Eastw.) Payson
Vicia linearis var. caespitosa (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Psoralea megalantha Wooton & Standl.
Lappula fremontii (Torr.) Greene
Lygodesmia doloresensis Tomb
Lappula texana (Scheele) Britton
Lappula texana var. coronata (Greene) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Lygodesmia grandiflora var. doloresensis (Tomb) S.L.Welsh
Plantago tweedyi A.Gray
Plantago purshii Roem. & Schult.
Elytrigia elongata (Host) Nevski
Eremogone kingii subsp. uintahensis (A.Nelson) W.A.Weber
Boechera duchesnensis (Rollins) Windham, Al-Shehbaz & Allphin
Arenaria congesta var. congesta
Delphinium nelsonii Greene
Haplopappus drummondii (Torr. & A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Leptodactylon caespitosum Nutt.
Lupinus crassus Payson
Lupinus greenei A.Nelson
Lupinus parviflorus Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.
Lupinus prunophilus M.E.Jones
Habenaria unalascensis (Sprengel) S.Watson
Argemone corymbosa subsp. arenicola G.B.Ownbey
Gilia congesta var. burleyana (A.Nelson) Constance & Rollins
Zygadenus gramineus Rydb.
Zygadenus elegans Pursh
Eriogonum fendlerianum (Benth.) Small
Frankenia jamesii Torr. ex Gray
Galium coloradoense W.Wight
Hymenoxys depressa (Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray) Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Clematis pseudoalpina (Kuntze) A.Nelson
Cardaria latifolia Spach
Stipa columbiana Macoun
Wyethia ×magna A.Nelson ex W.A.Weber
Carex nebraskensis Dewey
Townsendia rothrockii A.Gray ex Rothr.
Salsola iberica (Sennen & Pau) Botsch. ex Czerep.
Stellaria jamesiana Torr.
Pachystima myrsinites Rafin.
Ceratoides lanata (Pursh) J.T.Howell
Eriogonum divergens Small
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. linifolius (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Camelina rumelica Velen.
Cirsium canescens Nutt.
Cirsium tracyi (Rydb.) Rydb., 1917
Sambucus pubens Michx.
Eriogonum leptocladon Torr. & A.Gray
Cryptantha rudis A.Nelson ex Brand
Polygonum persicarioides Kunth
Cirsium pulcherrimum var. pulcherrimum
Aristida fendleriana Steud.
Echinocactus simpsonii Engelm.
Rosa odorata (Andrews) Sweet
Opuntia rhodantha K.Schum.
Agrostis tenuis T.Bastard ex Roem. & Schult.
Carex capillaris subsp. capillaris
Cyperus hemioccidentalis Goetgh.
Dalbergia L.f.
Lindera (Adans.) Thunb.
Platycarya Siebold & Zucc.
Rhamnites Forbes, 1851
Phytocrene Wall.
Cedrela P.Browne
Celastrus preangulata MacGinitie, 1941
Platanus appendiculata Lesquereux, 1878
Platanophyllum whitneyi (Lesquereux, 1878)
Tilia populifolia Lesquereux
Elaeodendron polymorphum Ward
Juglans crescentia Knowlton, 1899
Persites argutus Hickey, 1977
Cedrelospermum nervosum Newberry, 1883
Pseudosalix L.D.Boucher, S.R.Manchester & W.S.Judd, 2003
Liriodendron hesperia Berry, 1941
Alnus operia MacGinitie, 1941
Acer aequidentatum Lesquereux, 1878
Betula L.
Cercidiphyllum Siebold & Zucc.
Nymphaeaceae
Diospyros L.
Engelhardtia Blume
Platanus raynoldsii Newberry
Dombeya novimundi Hickey, 1977
Pterocarya Kunth
Dryophyllum Debey ex Saporta, 1868
Castanopsis longipetiolata Hickel & A.Camus
Laurus montana Knowlton, 1899
Cyperacites W.P.Schimper, 1870
Rhamnus rectinervis Heer
Laurus californica Lesquereux
Mimosites Bowerbank, 1840
Hydrangea L.
Macginitiea gracilis Wolfe & Wehr, 1987
Keratosperma allenbyense Cevalloz-Ferriz & Stockey, 1988
Rhamnus calyptus MacGinitie, 1941
Cupania oregona Chaney & Sanborn, 1933
Menispermites L.Lesquereux, 1874
Arecaceae
Celastrophyllum Göppert, 1854
Ulmaceae
Zelkova Spach
Parthenocissus Planch.
Salix elongata Web
Utricularia L.
Ulmus L.
Sassafras J.Presl
Hypserpa Miers
Cercidiphyllum elongatum Brown, 1939
Pongamia ovata MacGinitie, 1941
Hicoria Raf.
Arbutus L.
Quercus distincta Lesquereux, 1878
Liquidambar L.
Zizyphus Linnaeus
Diospyros stenosepala Heer
Penosphyllum cordatum (Manchester, 2014)
Laurocarpum E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Castanopsis (D.Don) Spach
Nyssa Gronov. ex L.
Vauquelinia Corrêa ex Humb. & Bonpl.
Cinnamomum dilleri Knowlton, 1902
Rhamnidium chaneyi Potbury, 1935
Aralia notata Lesquereux, 1878
Chrysobalanus eoicaco MacGinitie, 1941
Magnolia dayana Cockerell, 1910
Canarium californicum (Lesquereux, 1878)
Credneria pachyphylla Knowlton, 1899
Laurus perdita Knowlton, 1899
Leguminosae
Averrhoites affinis (Hickey, 1977)
Ocotea Aubl.
Palmae
Oleaceae
Cryptocarya praesamarensis Sanborn, 1935
Plafkeria J.A.Wolfe, 1977
Ficus densifolia Knowlton, 1899
Cedrela eolancifolia MacGinitie, 1941
Amelanchier Medik.
Campanulaceae
Sapindopsis magnifolia Fontaine, 1906
Sapindopsis Fontaine, 1889
Zizyphoides Seward & Conway, 1935
Cyclocarya Iljinsk.
Fagopsis Hollick, 1909
Macaranga Thouars
Holmskioldia Retz.
Quercus weedii Knowlton, 1899
Sapindus L.
Thouinopsis myricaefolia (Lesquereux, 1878)
Aralia serrulata Knowlton, 1899
Protophyllum Lesquereux, 1874
Araliaephyllum Fontaine, 1889
Laurophyllum fremontensis (Berry, 1930)
Terminalia estamina MacGinitie, 1941
Tilia L.
Ficus asiminaefolia Lesquereux
Exbucklandia R.W.Br.
Ampelopsis acerifolia Brown, 1962
Franseria bryantii Curran
Silene laciniata subsp. brandegeei C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Lupinus nanus var. vallicola (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Astragalus accidens var. hendersonii M.E.Jones
Muhlenbergia argentea Vasey
Medicago lupulina var. lupulina
Elionurus tripsacoides Willd.
Pennisetum karwinskyi Schrad.
Schizachyrium Nees
Leptochloa fusca (L.) Kunth
Juncus cyperoides Laharpe
Helianthemum nutans Brandegee
Ericameria cooperi var. bajacalifornica (Urbatsch & Wussow) Urbatsch
Echinochloa oplismenoides (E.Fourn.) Hitchc.
Artemisia laciniata Willd.
Pectis rosei Fernald
Sericocarpus oregonensis var. oregonensis
Eupatorium integrifolium Bertero ex Spreng.
Acer glabrum subsp. diffusum (Greene) A.E.Murray
Chylismia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Brahea elegans (Franceschi ex Becc.) H.E.Moore
Viguiera dentata var. brevipes (DC.) S.F.Blake
Schizachyrium brevifolium (Sw.) Buse
Acanthaceae
Eritrichium elongatum (Rydb.) Wight
Cathestecum brevifolium var. brevifolium
Pedicularis paysoniana Pennell
Atriplex cuneata A.Nelson
Haplopappus sonoriensis (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Phyllostachys reticulata (Rupr.) K.Koch
Buddleja corrugata M.E.Jones
Oenothera howardii (A.Nelson) M.E.Jones ex Prain
Sorghum Moench
Gamochaeta subfalcata (Cabrera) Cabrera
Bouteloua curtipendula var. curtipendula
Viguiera revoluta (Meyen) S.F.Blake
Setaria geminata (Forssk.) Veldkamp
Elymus pseudorepens (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Ipomopsis sonorae (Rose) A.D.Grant
Luzula glabrata (Hoppe) Desv.
Ayenia paniculata Rose
Viguiera parishii Greene
Populus brandegeei var. glabra Wiggins
Oxytropis DC.
Bothriochloa Kuntze
Horkelia hispidula Rydb.
Aristida adscensionis var. nigrescens (J.Presl) Beetle
Tissa marina (L.) Britton
Tripsacum L.
Rojasianthe superba Standl. & Steyerm.
Samolus valerandi var. americanus A.Gray
Eragrostis tephrosanthos Schult.
Bumelia lanuginosa var. rigida A.Gray
Sapium biloculare (S.Watson) Pax
Viguiera tomentosa A.Gray
Verbena bajacalifornica Moldenke
Rhynchelytrum repens (Willd.) C.E.Hubb.
Sericotheca microphylla Rydb.
Mirabilis bigelovii A.Gray
Polygonum coccineum Muhl. ex Willd.
Scrophulariaceae
Chaetopappa aurea (Nutt.) D.D.Keck
Poa trivialis subsp. trivialis
Muhlenbergia lucida Swallen
Echinochloa P.Beauv.
Coreopsis californica (Nutt.) H.Sharsm.
Pseudoeriocoma Romasch., P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Poa arnowiae Soreng
Agrostis varians Trin.
Bouteloua barbata var. sonorae (Griffiths) Gould
Ribes oxyacanthoides subsp. oxyacanthoides
Cynanchum arizonicum (Gray) Shinners
Toxicodendron radicans subsp. divaricatum (Greene) Gillis
Festuca microstachys var. pauciflora Beal
Monardella lagunensis M.E.Jones
Cirsium ochrocentrum subsp. martinii Barlow-Irick
Trifolium ultramontanum Greene
Solidago speciosa Nutt.
Apodanthera palmeri S.Watson
Trifolium alexandrinum L.
Eriogonum brevicaule var. caelitum Reveal
Macrosiphonia hesperia I.M.Johnst.
Paspalum inops var. majus Vasey ex Beal
Paspalum tenellum Willd.
Hedera hibernica (G.Kirchn.) Carrière
Phyllostachys flexuosa Rivière & C.Rivière
Erysimum menziesii subsp. concinnum (Eastw.) R.A.Price
Brachiaria fasciculata (Sw.) Parodi
Muhlenbergia cenchroides (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) P.M.Peterson
Astragalus flavus Torr. & A.Gray
Agastache rupestris (Greene) Standl.
Ribes menziesii var. leptosmum (Coville) Jeps.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. sparsifolia C.L.Hitchc.
Agrostis hiemalis subsp. hiemalis
Dicliptera Juss.
Galium ambiguum W.Wight
Lupinus bicolor var. microphyllus (S.Watson) C.P.Sm.
Setaria gracilis Kunth
Penstemon parishii Gray
Orobanche parishii (Jeps.) Heckard
Lupinus bicolor var. tridentatus Eastw. ex C.P.Sm.
Loeflingia squarrosa var. squarrosa
Chorizanthe xanti subsp. xanti
Chorizanthe ventricosa Goodman
Gilia caruifolia Abrams
Gilia capitata var. achilleifolia H.Mason
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi var. coactilis Fernald & J.F.Macbr.
Aliciella ripleyi (Barneby) J.M.Porter
Solanum heterodoxum Dunal
Gilia latifolia S.Watson
Helxine soleirolii Req.
Polypogon imberbis (Phil.) Johow
Penstemon cordifolius Benth.
Plantago fastigiata Morris
Plantago hookeriana var. californica (Greene) Poe
Cryptantha nevadensis var. rigida I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum diclinum Reveal
Arctostaphylos pringlei var. drupacea Parry
Lupinus benthamii var. benthamii
Plantago bigelovii subsp. californica (Greene) Bassett
Dicentra chrysantha (Hook. & Arn.) Walp.
Eriogonum nervulosum (S.Stokes) Reveal
Eriogonum marifolium var. apertum S.Stokes
Cryptantha micrantha subsp. micrantha
Cryptantha ramosissima (A.Gray) Greene
Streptanthus platycarpus A.Gray
Streptanthus arizonicus S.Watson
Eriogonum panamintense var. mensicola (S.Stokes) Reveal
Eriogonum panamintense var. panamintense
Eriogonum prattenianum Durand
Eriogonum plumatella var. plumatella
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. vineum (Small) Jeps.
Eriogonum truncatum A.Gray
Croton californicus var. mohavensis A.M.Ferguson
Acacia farnesiana (L.) Willd.
Solanum melongena L.
Euphorbia palmeri Engelm. ex S.Watson
Lupinus bicolor subsp. tridentatus (Eastw. ex C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Lupinus bicolor var. pipersmithii (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Caesalpinia virgata Fisher
Cassia armata S.Watson
Cassia covesii A.Gray
Syrmatium decumbens (Benth.) Greene
Lotus davidsonii Greene
Ottleya argyraea (Greene) D.D.Sokoloff
Genista canariensis L.
Dalea fremontii Torr. ex A.Gray
Lupinus albifrons var. eminens (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus alpestris A.Nelson
Lathyrus brownii Eastw.
Lupinus magnificus var. magnificus
Lupinus ruber A.Heller
Lupinus subvexus C.P.Sm.
Circaea alpina var. pacifica (Asch. & Magnus) M.E.Jones
Vicia dasycarpa Ten.
Populus balsamifera var. candicans (Aiton) A.Gray
Eriogonum parryi A.Gray
Salvia marci Epling
Camissonia dentata (Cav.) Reiche
Oenothera dentata Cav.
Pyrola secunda var. secunda
Soliva daucifolia Nutt.
Pyrola picta subsp. dentata (Sm.) Piper
Camissonia brevipes subsp. brevipes
Berberis pinnata Lag.
Boisduvalia glabella (Nutt.) Walp.
Arctostaphylos canescens subsp. sonomensis (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Populus trichocarpa var. ingrata (Jeps.) Jeps.
Gilia australis (Mason & A.D.Grant) V.E.Grant
Stylomecon heterophylla (Benth.) G.Taylor
Salix laevigata var. araquipa (Jeps.) C.R.Ball
Radicula nasturtium-aquaticum (L.) Britten & Rendle
Thalictrum polycarpum (Torr.) S.Watson
Salvia greatai Brandegee
Haplopappus cuneatus Gray
Haplopappus ericoides (Less.) DC.
Aplopappus Cass.
Astragalus leucopsis (Torr. & A.Gray) Torr.
Haplopappus arborescens (A.Gray) Hall
Brickellia multiflora Kellogg
Aster alpigenus var. andersonii (A.Gray) M.Peck
Baccharis viminea DC.
Astragalus flavus var. candicans A.Gray
Astragalus jaegerianus Munz
Astragalus kentrophyta var. tegetarius (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Baileya multiradiata var. pleniradiata (A.Gray) Coville
Atriplex tularensis Coville
Ambrosia psilostachya subsp. californica (Rydb.) Blake
Lomatium foeniculaceum subsp. inyoense (Mathias & Constance) W.L.Theob.
Spermolepis echinata (Nutt.) A.Heller
Erigeron foliosus var. covillei (Greene) G.R.Compton
Erigeron hartwegi Greene
Erigeron salsuginosus (Richardson) A.Gray
Dipogon lignosus (L.) Verdc.
Amelanchier pallida Greene
Erigeron compositus subsp. trifidus (Hook.) A.Gray
Lupinus propinquus Greene
Polygonum capitatum Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Haplopappus parishii (Greene) S.F.Blake
Haplopappus pinifolius A.Gray
Brickellia vollmeri Wiggins
Lessingia filaginifolia var. filaginifolia
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. peirsonii M.L.Canby
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. albicaulis (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Calodendrum capense (L.fil.) Thunb.
Ericameria parryi var. monocephala (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. hololeucus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. gnaphalodes (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Sambucus caerulea Raf.
Dodecatheon clevelandii subsp. clevelandii
Buddleja saligna Willd.
Crinum L.
Sambucus glauca Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray
Galium andrewsii subsp. intermedium Dempster & Stebbins
Ceanothus arboreus var. glabra Jeps.
Oxalis rubra A.St.-Hil.
Zigadenus fremontii (Torr.) Torr. ex S.Watson
Eucalyptus macrandra F.Muell. ex Benth.
Dodecatheon alpinum subsp. majus H.J.Thomps.
Dodecatheon jeffreyi subsp. jeffreyi
Coreopsis bigelovii (A.Gray) Hall
Convolvulus soldanella L.
Chamaesyce serpillifolia subsp. hirtula (Engelm. ex S.Watson) Koutnik
Gypsophila elegans var. elegans
Ipomoea mutabilis Lindl.
Ciclospermum leptophyllum (Pers.) Sprague ex Britton & P.Wilson
Senecio breweri Burtt Davy
Asclepias mexicana Cav.
Eschscholzia tenuisecta Greene
Arabis sparsiflora var. californica Rollins
Sanguisorba minor subsp. muricata (Spach) Briq.
Lewisia disepala Rydb.
Linanthus liniflorus subsp. pharnaceoides (Benth.) H.Mason
Chlorophytum comosum (Thunb.) Jacques
Chamaesyce melanadenia (Torr. & A.Gray) Millsp.
Trifolium ciliatum Nutt.
Draba californica (Jeps.) Rollins & R.A.Price
Penstemon glaber Pursh
Penstemon secundiflorus Benth.
Mentzelia mojavensis H.J.Thomps. & J.E.Roberts
Eriogonum trichopodum Benth.
Draba cruciata Payson
Godetia viminea (Douglas) Spach
Penstemon palmeri var. grinnellii (Eastw.) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Orobanche ludoviciana Nutt.
Mirabilis multiflora subsp. pubescens Munz, 1935
Abronia nana var. covillei (Heimerl) Munz
Dudleya cymosa var. agourensis K.M.Nakai, 1987
Matthiola longipetala subsp. bicornis (Sm.) P.W.Ball
Penstemon glandulosus Douglas
Rhamnus crocea subsp. insula (Kellogg) C.B.Wolf
Penstemon fruticiformis subsp. amargosae D.D.Keck
Galium hilendiae subsp. carneum (Hilend & J.T.Howell) Dempster & Ehrend.
Capsella procumbens var. davidsonii Munz
Jamesia americana var. californica (Small) Jeps.
Potentilla drummondii subsp. breweri (S.Watson) Ertter
Euclidium syriacum (L.) W.T.Aiton
Erysimum insulare subsp. suffrutescens (Abrams) R.A.Price
Pentstemon W.Aiton, 1789
Heterodraba unilateralis (M.E.Jones) Greene
Eruca sativa Mill.
Draba pterosperma Payson
Styrax officinalis var. fulvescens (Eastw.) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Physalis angulata var. lanceifolia (Nees) Waterf.
Lippia wrightii A.Gray
Trifolium bolanderi A.Gray
Trifolium polyodon Greene
Asclepiodora decumbens (Nutt.) Gray
Apocynum sibiricum var. salignum (Greene) Fernald
Quercus aaata C.H.Mull.
Lithocarpus densiflorus f. densiflorus
Dyssodia pentachaeta (DC.) B.L.Rob.
Porophyllum crassifolium S.Watson
Ribes victoris Greene
Gentiana fremontii Torr.
Pseudognaphalium attenuatum (DC.) Anderb.
Hemizonia kelloggii Greene
Deinandra greeneana subsp. peninsularis (Moran) B.G.Baldwin
Hemizonia paniculata A.Gray
Gilia setosissima (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Dudleya pulverulenta var. arizonica (Rose) S.L.Welsh
Ottleya rigida (Benth.) D.D.Sokoloff
Lathyrus laetiflorus subsp. alefeldii (T.G.White) Bradshaw
Hedeoma nana subsp. nana
Monardella leucocephala A.Gray
Oenothera leptocarpa Greene
Oenothera hookeri subsp. grisea (Bartlett) Munz
Wisteria Nutt.
Plantago insularis Eastw.
Trifolium kingii subsp. productum (Greene) D.Heller
Grindelia camporum var. bracteosa (Howell) M.A.Lane
Helianthus annuus subsp. lenticularis (Douglas ex Lindl.) Cockerell
Trifolium olivaceum Greene
Lagophylla ramosissima subsp. ramosissima
Quercus howellii Tucker
Trifolium variegatum var. trilobatum (Jeps.) McDermott
Trifolium monanthum var. eastwoodianum J.S.Martin
Rhamnus crocea subsp. ilicifolia (Kellogg) C.B.Wolf
Cynanchum utahense (Engelm.) Woodson
Sarcostemma cynanchoides subsp. hartwegii (Vail) R.W.Holm
Lomatium ravenii Mathias & Constance
Lomatium inyoense Mathias & Constance
Lomatium engelmannii Mathias
Gilia leptalea (A.Gray) Greene
Lomatium congdonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Perideridia bolanderi subsp. involucrata T.I.Chuang & Constance
Arnica viscosa A.Gray
Rhamnus rubra Greene
Rhamnus rubra subsp. yosemitana C.B.Wolf
Frangula rubra subsp. rubra
Cercocarpus betuloides var. multiflorus Jeps.
Cercocarpus betuloides var. macrourus (Rydb.) Jeps.
Eriastrum sapphirinum subsp. ambiguum (M.E.Jones) H.Mason
Gilia virgata var. dasyantha (Brand) T.T.Craig
Gilia filifolia var. diffusa A.Gray
Brickellia watsonii B.L.Rob.
Ivesia lycopodioides var. megalopetala (Rydb.) Ertter & Reveal
Petrophytum caespitosum var. caespitosum
Chorizanthe coriacea Goodman
Erigeron aequifolius H.M.Hall
Rosa woodsii var. glabrata (Parish) D.Cole
Calochortus panamintensis (Ownbey) Reveal
Juncus balticus var. montanus Engelm.
Juncus tenuis var. congestus Engelm.
Galium angustifolium var. bernardinum Hilend & J.T.Howell
Galium hilendiae subsp. kingstonense (Dempster) Dempster & Ehrend.
Phlox superba Brand
Phlox diffusa subsp. scleranthifolia (Rydb.) Wherry
Gilia gracilis Douglas ex Hook.
Microsteris gracilis subsp. humilis (Greene) Brand
Gilia atractyloides var. foliacea Munz
Gilia atractyloides var. macrantha Munz
Chenopodium multifidum L.
Leptodactylon nuttallii (A.Gray) Rydb.
Siphonella nuttallii (A.Gray) A.Heller
Arabis holboellii var. fendleri S.Watson
Arabis holboellii var. arcuata (Nutt.) Jepson
Epilobium adenocaulon var. parishii (Trel.) Munz
Monardella pringlei A.Gray
Oxytheca emarginata H.M.Hall
Polygonum alpinum All.
Mentzelia inyoensis H.J.Thomps. & Prigge
Nolina wolfii (Munz) Munz
Lonicera involucrata subsp. ledebourii (Eschsch.) Jeps.
Sphaeralcea ambigua subsp. ambigua
Cuscuta obtusiflora var. glandulosa Engelm.
Malvastrum splendidum Kellogg
Clarkia jolonensis D.R.Parn.
Clarkia australis E.Small
Mirabilis greenei S.Watson
Linanthus laxus (Vasey & Rose) Wherry
Arenaria paludicola B.L.Rob.
Malacothamnus palmeri var. involucratus (B.L.Rob.) Kearney
Clarkia mosquinii E.Small
Keckiella breviflora var. breviflora
Clarkia lingulata H. & Lewis
Camissonia claviformis subsp. peirsonii (Munz) P.H.Raven
Clarkia borealis E.Small
Clarkia exilis F.H.Lewis & Vasek
Hypoestes aristata (Vahl) Sol. ex Roem. & Schult.
Physalis flava Wiggins
Heteropyxis natalensis Harv.
Lathyrus laetiflorus Greene
Oenothera avita subsp. avita
Syrmatium watsonii (Vasey & Rose) Brand
Clarkia mosquinii subsp. xerophila E.Small
Clarkia borealis subsp. arida E.Small
Clarkia borealis subsp. borealis
Cistanthe monandra (Nutt.) Hershk.
Sporobolus rigens (Trin.) É.Desv.
Allium abramsii (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) McNeal
Gaura sinuata Nutt. ex Ser.
Gentiana newberryi var. tiogana (A.Heller) J.S.Pringle
Lupinus arizonicus var. barbatulus (Thornber) I.M.Johnst.
Antirrhinum coulterianum subsp. orcuttianum (A.Gray) Pennell
Atriplex lentiformis subsp. torreyi (S.Watson) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. barbatulus Thornber ex C.P.Sm.
Agoseris heterophylla var. turgida (H.M.Hall) Jeps.
Brodiaea californica subsp. leptandra (Greene) J.C.Pires
Coreopsis calliopsidea (DC.) A.Gray
Dombeya ×cayeuxii André
Eucalyptus maculata Hook.
Brachychiton bidwillii Hook.
Melaleuca hypericifolia Sm.
Billardiera heterophylla (Lindl.) L.W.Cayzer & Crisp
Ilex cornuta Lindl. & Paxton
Erigeron miser A.Gray
Gutierrezia lucida Greene
Eriophyllum latilobum Rydb.
Haplopappus palmeri subsp. pachylepis H.M.Hall
Stachys ciliata Douglas ex Benth.
Lorandersonia peirsonii (D.D.Keck) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Hazardia whitneyi var. discoidea (J.T.Howell) W.D.Clark
Salix anglorum Cham.
Hemizonia congesta subsp. tracyi Babc. & H.M.Hall
Hymenoclea salsola var. patula (A.Nelson) K.M.Peterson & W.W.Payne
Lupinus olive-brownae C.P.Sm.
Madia nutans (Greene) D.D.Keck
Harmonia hallii (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Layia jonesii A.Gray
Packera eurycephala var. eurycephala
Anisocarpus scabridus (Eastw.) B.G.Baldwin
Pectocarya penicillata var. heterocarpa I.M.Johnst.
Delphinium gypsophilum subsp. parviflorum Lewis & Epling
Jepsonia heterandra Eastw.
Stachys ajugoides var. quercetorum (A.Heller) A.Heller
Heuchera rubescens var. pachypoda (Greene) Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Cryptantha roosiorum Munz
Tracyina rostrata S.F.Blake
Senecio ganderi T.M.Barkley & Beauch.
Hemizonia parryi subsp. australis D.D.Keck
Stephanomeria pauciflora var. pauciflora
Gnaphalium leucocephalum A.Gray
Allocarya bracteata Howell
Mimulus inconspicuus A.Gray
Mimulus filicaulis S.Watson
Stachys californica Benth.
Phlox austromontana subsp. vera Wherry
Castilleja oreopola Greenm.
Eriogonum fasciculatum subsp. fasciculatum
Castilleja linariifolia f. omnipubescens Pennell
Castilleja lutea A.Heller
Castilleja latifolia subsp. mendocinensis Eastw.
Castilleja montana Congdon
Castilleja disticha Eastw.
Castilleja dixonii Fernald
Lupinus nanus var. latifolius Benth. ex Torr.
Castilleja gyroloba Pennell
Rhamnus tomentella subsp. tomentella
Castilleja jepsonii Bacig. & Heckard
Castilleja clokeyi Pennell
Potentilla lindleyi Greene
Lupinus horizontalis var. platypetalus C.P.Sm.
Holodiscus discolor var. franciscanus (Rydb.) Jeps.
Castilleja douglasii Benth.
Briza media L.
Protea neriifolia R.Br.
Rotheca myricoides (Hochst.) Steane & Mabb.
Caltha howellii Huth
Callistemon viminalis (Sol. ex Gaertn.) Cheel
Clematis terniflora DC.
Hakea salicifolia (Vent.) B.L.Burtt
Grewia caffra Meisn.
Cuphea micropetala Kunth
Cobaea scandens Cav.
Distichlis spicata var. stricta (Torr.) Scribn.
Eriogonum eximium Tidestr.
Syzygium borbonicum J.Guého & A.J.Scott
Jussiaea californica (S.Watson) Jeps.
Leucadendron rubrum Burm.fil.
Leucadendron argenteum (L.) R.Br.
Protea obtusifolia H.Buek ex Meisn.
Oenothera avita subsp. arizonica (Munz) W.M.Klein
Lobelia splendens Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Lobelia cardinalis subsp. graminea (Lam.) McVaugh
Lupinus densiflorus var. aureus (Kellogg) Munz
Lupinus densiflorus var. glareosus (Elmer) C.P.Sm.
Lupinus concinnus subsp. orcuttii (S.Watson) D.B.Dunn
Apocynum ×medium var. lividum (Greene) Woodson
Symphyotrichum subulatum var. ligulatum S.D.Sundb.
Cuniculotinus gramineus (H.M.Hall) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Osteospermum fruticosum (L.) Norl.
Stephanomeria spinosa (Nutt.) Tomb
Betula fontinalis Sarg.
Mimulus moschatus var. longiflorus A.Gray
Draba corrugata var. saxosa (Davidson) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Solidago lepida var. salebrosa (Piper) Semple
Piptocalyx circumscissus (Hook. & Arn.) Torr.
Mimulus nudatus Curran ex Greene
Mimulus pygmaeus A.L.Grant
Mimulus rupicola Coville & A.L.Grant
Campanula wilkinsiana Greene
Nemacladus gracilis Eastw.
Salvia polystachia Cav.
Wyethia Nutt.
Myosotis scorpioides subsp. palustris (L.) F.Herm.
Minuartia nuttallii var. gregaria (A.Heller) Rabeler & R.L.Hartm.
Agoseris alpestris (A.Gray) Kuntze
Penstemon newberryi var. berryi (Eastw.) N.H.Holmgren
Rhodiola rosea L.
Plagiobothrys scopulorum (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Veratrum speciosum Rydb.
Trichophorum pumilum (Vahl) Schinz & Thell.
Cryptantha clevelandii var. hispidissima (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Salvia riparia Kunth
Cryptantha jamesii var. abortiva (Greene) Payson
Linnaea americana Forbes
Celtis douglasii Planch.
Chenopodium macrospermum var. farinosum (S.Watson) J.T.Howell
Tropidocarpum gracile var. dubium (Davidson) Jeps.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. setchellii (Jeps.) Moran
Yucca mohavensis Sarg.
Agave pelona Gentry
Lepidium latipes var. latipes
Satureja chamissonis (Benth.) Briq.
Castilleja pratensis A.Heller
Castilleja psittacina (Eastw.) Pennell
Malacothrix californica var. glabrata D.C.Eaton ex A.Gray
Castilleja wightii subsp. rubra Pennell
Helianthus annuus subsp. jaegeri (Heiser) Heiser
Salvia verbenacea L.
Eragrostis megastachya (Koeler) Link
Poa incurva Scribn. & T.A.Williams
Monardella linoides subsp. anemonoides (Greene) Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Bromus sitchensis var. carinatus (Hook. & Arn.) R.E.Brainerd & Otting
Eriophyllum nevinii A.Gray
Erigeron concinnus var. aphanactis Gray
Erigeron uncialis S.F.Blake
Leptochloa uninervia (J.Presl) Hitchc. & Chase
Erigeron petiolaris Vierh.
Festuca rigida (L.) Raspail
Monanthochloe littoralis Engelm.
Lappula nervosa Greene
Lappula floribunda (Lehm.) Greene
Stipa kingii Bol.
Puccinellia parishii Hitchc.
Acacia neriifolia A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Grevillea lanigera A.Cunn. ex R.Br.
Ficus disticha Blume
Bistorta (L.) Scop.
Acacia calamifolia Sweet ex Lindl.
Acacia pravissima F.Muell. ex Benth.
Tasmannia lanceolata (Poir.) A.C.Sm.
Portulacaceae
Callistemon macropunctatus (Dum.Cours.) Court
Trollius L.
Capsicum L.
Acacia aculeatissima J.F.Macbr.
Anotis DC.
Nassella (Trin.) É.Desv.
Coleoptera Linnaeus, 1758
Cyperus dentoniae G.C.Tucker
Nissolia schottii A.Gray
Caesalpinia standleyi (Britton & Rose) Standl.
Euphorbia mayurnathanii Croiz.
Dalea exserta (Rydb.) Gentry
Agave vexans Trel.
Sebastiania Spreng.
Carex infirminervia Naczi
Nolina matapensis Wiggins
Prunus serotina var. rufula (Wooton & Standl.) Mc Vaugh
Agave jaiboli Gentry
Aristida laxa Cav.
Schoenoplectus kuekenthalianus (Junge) D.H.Kent
Euphorbia monacantha Pax
Euphorbia sonorae Rose
Washingtonia sonorae S.Watson
Agave goldmaniana Trel.
Euphorbia makallensis S.Carter
Carex turbinata Liebm.
Arundinella palmeri Vasey, 1896
Astragalus emoryanus (Rydb.) Cory
Bothriochloa saccharoides (Sw.) Rydb.
Argythamnia serrata Brandegee
Tabebuia impetiginosa Mart ex DC
Lupinus arizonicus subsp. setosissimus (C.P.Sm.) J.A.Christian & D.B.Dunn
Lupinus indutus Greene ex C.F.Baker
Yucca peninsularis McKelvey
Lotus nevadensis Coult.
Johanneshowellia crateriorum Reveal
Acalypha papillosa Rose
Carex pachycarpa Mack.
Schoenoplectus triqueter (L.) Palla
Eriochloa gracilis (E.Fourn.) Hitchc.
Senna hirsuta var. leptocarpa (Benth.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Euphorbia macropus (Klotzsch & Garcke) Boiss.
Caesalpinia bonduc Linnaeus, 1753
Ruellia peninsularis (Rose) I.M.Johnst.
Digitaria insularis (L.) Mez ex Ekman
Mimosa laxiflora Benth.
Acaciella tequilana var. crinita (Brandegee) L.Rico
Euphorbia bracteata Jacq.
Manfreda scabra (Ortega) McVaugh
Carex leucodonta Holm
Cyperus oxylepis Nees ex Steud.
Ruellia nudiflora (Engelm. & Gray) Urb.
Lathyrus laetiflorus subsp. glaber C.L.Hitchc.
Eragrostis erosa Scribn. ex Beal
Eriogonum corymbosum var. heilii Reveal
Eriogonum codium Reveal, Caplow & K.A.Beck
Desmodium plicatum Schltdl. & Cham.
Euphorbia succulenta (Schweick.) Bruyns
Prosopis juliflora var. articulata (S.Watson) Wiggins
Mimosa brandegeei B.L.Rob.
Euphorbia eyassiana P.R.O.Bally & S.Carter
Trichophorum caespitosum (L.) Hartman
Echinochloa colonum Linnaeus, 1759
Digitaria adscendens (Kunth) Henrard
Juncus acutus var. sphaerocarpus Engelm.
Euphorbia sinaloensis Brandegee
Carex emoryi Dewey
Cyperus amabilis Vahl
Agave nelsonii Trel.
Carex percostata F.J.Herm.
Commelina erecta var. erecta
Carex gynodynama Olney
Carex scirpoidea subsp. stenochlaena (Holm) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Crotalaria longirostrata Hook. & Arn.
Euphorbia elegantissima P.R.O.Bally & S.Carter
Echinodorus andrieuxii (Hook. & Arn.) Small
Carex wootonii Mack.
Lotus glabra Torr.
Cnidoscolus angustidens subsp. angustidens
Euphorbia vandermerwei R.A.Dyer
Euphorbia halipedicola L.C.Leach
Croton pottsii var. pottsii
Elionurus barbiculmis Hack. ex Scribn.
Lupinus arizonicus subsp. sonorensis J.A.Christian & D.B.Dunn
Muhlenbergia brevis Goodd.
Tillandsia exserta Fernald
Photinia Lindl.
Aloe barbadensis Mill.
Desmodium retinens Schltdl.
Croton flavescens Greenm.
Megathyrsus maximus (Jacq.) B.K.Simon & S.W.L.Jacobs
Carex micropoda C.A.Mey.
Opuntia tesajo Engelm. ex Coult.
Senegalia wrightii (Benth.) Britton & Rose
Aeschynomene villosa var. villosa
Cenchrus pauciflorus Benth.
Cyperus hypopitys G.C.Tucker
Cyperus lanceolatus Poir.
Andropogon fastigiatus Sw.
Crotalaria incana L.
Crotalaria lupulina Kunth
Euphorbia viduiflora L.C.Leach
Agave pacifica Trel.
Euphorbia ocymoidea L.
Euphorbia densiflora (Klotzsch) Klotzsch
Agropyron arizonicum Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Dalea seemannii subsp. seemannii
Tephrosia thurberi (Rydb.) C.E.Wood
Henrya insularis Nees
Bouteloua oligostachya (Nutt.) Torr. ex A.Gray
Euphorbia magnifica (E.A.Bruce) Bruyns
Adelia cinerea (Wiggins & Rollins) A.Cerv., V.W.Steinm. & Flores Olv.
Euphorbia waterbergensis R.A.Dyer
Euphorbia memoralis R.A.Dyer
Euphorbia ambroseae L.C.Leach
Aeschynomene amorphoides Rose ex B.L.Rob.
Lupinus brandegeei Eastw.
Crotalaria mollicula Kunth
Allium kunthii G.Don
Lotus greenei Kearney & Peebles
Desmodium prehensile Schltdl.
Agrostis verticillata Thuill.
Argythamnia gentryi J.W.Ingram
Justicia mexicana (Seem.) Rose
Chloris brandegeei (Vasey) Swallen
Distichlis palmeri (Vasey) Fassett ex I.M.Johnst.
Tradescantia semisomna Standl.
Lotus niveus Greene
Dalembertia populifolia Baill.
Tephrosia leiocarpa A.Gray
Potentilla anserina var. anserina
Agave shrevei subsp. matapensis Gentry
Euphorbia laikipiensis S.Carter
Mimosa wrightii A.Gray
Aristida glabrata (Vasey) Hitchc.
Euphorbia asthenacantha S.Carter
Acalypha induta AiryShaw
Carex tenera Dewey
Digitaria filiformis (L.) Koeler
Cercocarpus eximius (C.K.Schneid.) Rydb.
Euphorbia lindenii (S.Carter) Bruyns
Cyperus flavicomus Schltdl.
Aegopogon tenellus (DC.) Trin.
Carex fissuricola Mack.
Commelina scabra Benth.
Phaseolus maculatus subsp. ritensis (M.E.Jones) Freytag
Ditaxis guatemalensis var. guatemalensis
Crotalaria quercetorum Brandegee
Neottia caurina (Piper) Szlach.
Desmanthus Willd.
Euphorbia incerta Brandegee
Euphorbia carteriana P.R.O.Bally
Alvordia glomerata var. insularis A.M.Carter
Agave shawii var. sebastiana (Greene) Gentry
Aristida barbata Fourn.Mex.Pl.Enum.Gram.
Tillandsia L.
Muhlenbergia annua (Vasey) Swallen
Chamaecrista nictitans var. jaliscensis (Greenm.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Agave murpheyi Gibson
Dalea wislizeni A.Gray
Phaseolus pauciflorus Sessé & Moc. ex G.Don
Heteranthera rotundifolia (Kunth) Griseb.
Juncus dichotomus Elliott
Euphorbia neovirgata Bruyns
Carex spissa var. ultra (L.H.Bailey) Kük.
Lipocarpha R.Br.
Croton pseudoniveus Lundell
Eriosema grandiflorum (Schltdl. & Cham.) G.Don
Alchemilla procumbens Rose
Hypoxis mexicana Schult. & Schult.f.
Digitaria induta Swallen
Cryptantha gypsophila Reveal & C.R.Broome
Elionurus muticus var. barbiculmis (Hack. ex Scribn.) Beetle
Euphorbia major (Pax) Bruyns
Dalea wrightii A.Gray
Eriocaulon pringlei S.Watson
Tauschia spellenbergii Constance & Affolter
Tripogandra purpurascens (S.Schauer) Handlos
Euphorbia borenensis M.G.Gilbert
Sebastiania pavoniana (Müll.Arg.) Müll.Arg.
Pseudostellaria sierrae Rabeler & R.L.Hartm.
Mariosousa millefolia (S.Watson) Seigler & Ebinger
Carex flacca Schreb.
Lotus lathyroides (Durand & Hilg.) Greene
Euphorbia complexa R.A.Dyer
Carex montereyensis Mack.
Euphorbia tenuispinosa var. robusta P.R.O.Bally & S.Carter
Euphorbia wrightii Torr. & A.Gray
Lemna perpusilla Torr.
Lotus chihuahuanus (S.Watson) Greene
Tinantia erecta (Jacq.) Fenzl
Carex foenea Willd.
Pachycereus schottii (Engelm.) D.R.Hunt
Pachycereus gatesii (M.E.Jones) D.R.Hunt
Drymaria gracilis Cham. & Schltdl.
Phyllostachys bambusoides Siebold & Zucc.
Sieversia turbinata (Rydb.) Greene
Montanoa hexagona B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Iva ambrosiifolia (A.Gray) A.Gray
Perityle robusta Rydb.
Mirabilis wrightiana Gray ex Britton & Kearney
Muhlenbergia monticola Buckley
Datura metel L.
Elymus longifolius (J.G.Sm.) Gould
Leucaena palmeri Britton & Rose
Festuca octoflora var. hirtella Piper
Heuchera glabella Torr. & A.Gray
Rhynchosia senna Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.
Vitis giradiana Munson
Ptilagrostis kingii (Bol.) Barkworth
Carex siccata Dewey
Scleria ciliata var. ciliata
Kosteletzkya hispidula (Spreng.) Garcke
Arnica longifolia subsp. genuina Maguire
Ericameria nauseosa subsp. consimilis (Greene) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Sorbus pumilus Raf.
Allium siskiyouense Ownbey ex Traub
Sphaeromeria martirensis (Wiggins) A.H.Holmgren, L.M.Shultz & Lowrey
Ottleya wrightii (A.Gray) D.D.Sokoloff
Viguiera carterae E.E.Schill.
Drymocallis fissa (Nutt.) Rydb.
Elymus caput-medusae L.
Drymaria polystachya Brandegee
Synthyris Benth.
Euphorbia deightonii Croizat
Astragalus leucopsis var. fastidius (Kellogg) M.E.Jones
Croton L.
Albizia Durazz.
Lotus oroboides (Kunth) Kearney & Peebles
Carex agastachys L.f.
Brongniartia minutifolia S.Watson
Melochia tomentella (C.Presl) Hemsl.
Lupinus barkeri Lindl.
Calliandra emarginata (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Benth.
Euphorbia williamsonii L.C.Leach
Euphorbia decliviticola L.C.Leach
Cyperus cuspidatus Kunth
Bouteloua filiformis (E.Fourn.) Griffiths
Commelina dianthifolia var. dianthifolia
Euphorbia genoudiana Ursch & Leandri
Dalea ordiae A.Gray
Euphorbia vulcanorum S.Carter
Sporobolus compositus (Poir.) Merr.
Euphorbia saxorum P.R.O.Bally & S.Carter
Dalea neomexicana subsp. mollissima (Rydb.) Wiggins
Carterothamnus anomalochaeta R.M.King
Achnatherum robustum (Vasey) Barkworth
Croton pedicellatus Kunth
Euphorbia nigrispina N.E.Br.
Euphorbia vajravelui Binojk. & N.P.Balakr.
Bernardia gentryana Croizat
Carex gynocrates Wormsk.
Chloris Sw.
Croton lindquistii V.W.Steinm.
Enneapogon cenchroides (Licht.) C.E.Hubb.
Croton corymbulosus Rothr.
Coursetia barrancana Lavin
Tephrosia purpurea (L.) Pers.
Phaseolus maculatus subsp. maculatus
Carex arenaria L.
Caesalpinia eriostachys Benth.
Calochortus venustulus Greene
Ditaxis manzanilloana (Rose) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Justicia ovata (Walter) Lindau
Agave sisalana Perrine
Prosopis juliflora var. velutina (Wooton) Sarg.
Agave shrevei subsp. magna Gentry
Lupinus pallidus Brandegee
Lotus watsonii (Vasey & Rose) Greene
Carex specuicola J.T.Howell
Lupinus sparsiflorus subsp. pondii (Greene) Dziek. & D.B.Dunn
Euphorbia confinalis subsp. confinalis
Carex pelocarpa F.J.Herm.
Euphorbia heteropodum Pax
Desmodium crassum M.E.Jones
Aristida capillacea Lam.
Euphorbia pseudostellata Bruyns
Lotus cedrosensis Greene
Agrostis castellana Boiss. & Reut.
Dalea revoluta S.Watson
Euphorbia inculta P.R.O.Bally
Machaerium Pers.
Acaciella ferrisiae Britton & Rose
Syringodium filiforme Kütz.
Euphorbia nubigena var. rutilans L.C.Leach
Najas guadalupensis var. guadalupensis
Dalea evanescens Brandegee
Astragalus douglasii var. piscinus (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Alopecurus howellii Vasey
Euphorbia misella S.Watson
Desmodium indentum MacGinitie, 1941
Euphorbia stictospora Engelm.
Euphorbia umfoloziensis Peckover
Hoffmannseggia densiflora A.Gray
Lupinus subcarnosus Hook.
Andropogon hirtiflorus (Nees) Kunth
Lupinus sparsiflorus subsp. inopinatus (C.P.Sm.) Dziek. & D.B.Dunn
Ayenia L.
Phaseolus carteri Freytag & Debouck
Carex hirsutella Mack.
Eriosema palmeri S.Watson
Sebastiania cornuta McVaugh
Eriogonum artificis Reveal
Agave shrevei Gentry
Eragrostis viscosa (Retz.) Trin.
Euphorbia serendipita L.E.Newton
Euphorbia torrei (L.C.Leach) Bruyns
Chloris chloridea (J.Presl) Hitchc.
Desmodium cinerascens A.Gray
Bouteloua sonorae Griffiths
Cerastium brachypetalum Desf. ex Pers.
Euphorbia tenuispinosa var. tenuispinosa
Yucca whipplei subsp. eremica Epling & A.L.Haines
Adelia obovata Wiggins & Rollins
Euphorbia yaquiana Tidestr.
Rhynchosia macrocarpa Benth.
Commelina crispa Wooton
Carex mesochorea Mack.
Eleocharis schaffneri Boeckeler
Prosopis juliflora var. torreyana L.D.Benson
Euphorbia griseola Pax
Eriosema diffusum (Kunth) G.Don
Euphorbia neoarborescens Bruyns
Isolepis R.Br.
Eragrostis ciliaris (L.) R.Br.
Havardia Small
Lotus distichus (Greene) Greene
Agave roseana Trel.
Aeschynomene rosei C.V.Morton
Dalea pogonanthera A.Gray
Euphorbia neospinescens Bruyns
Philadelphus microphyllus var. madrensis (Hemsl.) Henrickson
Macroptilium (Benth.) Urb.
Pickeringia montana subsp. tomentosa (Greene) Abrams
Euphorbia awashensis M.G.Gilbert
Phaseolus carterae Freytag & Debouck
Euphorbia tetracanthoides Pax
Fimbristylis annua Link, 1829
Euphorbia ballyi S.Carter
Bauhinia pauletia Pers.
Senna uniflora (Mill.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Euphorbia rayturneri V.W.Steinm. & Jercinovic
Euphorbia pseudolaevis Bruyns
Barleria micans Nees
Euphorbia tescorum S.Carter
Euphorbia neomontana Bruyns
Dudleya attenuata subsp. orcuttii (Rose) Moran
Euphorbia perplexa L.C.Leach
Carex lagunensis M.E.Jones
Malaxis myurus (Lindl.) Kuntze
Euphorbia nivulia Buch.-Ham.
Zigadenus virescens (Kunth) J.F.Macbr.
Euphorbia villifera Scheele
Justicia insolita var. insolita
Euphorbia nocens (L.C.Wheeler) V.W.Steinm.
Croton leucophyllus Müll.Arg.
Euphorbia cuprispina S.Carter
Oenothera deserticola (Loes.) Munz
Lotus repens (G.Don) Sessé & Moc. ex G.Don, 1832
Dichanthelium implicatum (Scribn.) Kerguélen
Euphorbia dichroa S.Carter
Commelina leiocarpa Benth.
Crotalaria polyphylla L.Riley
Malaxis brachyrrhynchos (Rchb.f.) Ames
Caesalpinia intricata (Brandegee) Fisher
Bulbostylis juncoides (Vahl) Kük. ex Herter
Coreopsis crawfordii Mesfin
Calliandra Benth.
Ruellia tuberosa L.
Galphimia vestita S.Watson
Astragalus didymocarpus var. obispensis (Rydb.) Jeps.
Potentilla pinetorum Wiggins
Cyperus prolixus Kunth
Prosopis globosa var. mexicana Dressler
Calochortus barbatus (Kunth) Painter
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. insignitus C.P.Sm.
Nemastylis tenuis (Herb.) S.Watson
Tanacetum bajacalifornicum Moran
Prosopis globosa Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.
Justicia salviiflora Kunth
Allium glandulosum Link & Otto
Siphonoglossa ramosa Oerst.
Jouvea straminea E.Fourn.
Senegalia roemeriana (Scheele) Britton & Rose
Eriogonum mitophyllum Reveal
Euphorbia fluminis S.Carter
Lotus nuttallianus Greene
Euphorbia clavigera N.E.Br.
Euphorbia neogossweileri Bruyns
Euphorbia whellanii L.C.Leach
Euphorbia bisellenbeckii Bruyns
Dalea oligophylla (Torr.) Shinners
Lippia L.
Aristida ternipes var. minor (Vasey) Hitchc.
Carex leavenworthii Dewey
Euphorbia qarad Deflers
Euphorbia neogracilis Bruyns
Cyperus aschenbornianus Boeckeler
Euphorbia neriifolia L.
Psoralea californica S.Watson
Haematoxylon
Haplopappus gracilis (Nutt.) A.Gray
Lysiloma microphyllum Benth.
Porophyllum scoparium A.Gray
Piqueria trinervia Cav.
Viguiera chenopodina Greene
Solanum nodiflorum Jacq.
Erigeron pubescens Kunth
Zinnia citrea A.M.Torres
Cohniella leptotifolia Cetzal & Carnevali
Epilobium paniculatum var. jucundum (A.Gray) Trel.
Hulsea vestita var. pygmaea A.Gray
Dodecatheon pubescens Rydb.
Cleomella longipes var. grandiflora S.Watson
Gayophytum strictum A.Gray
Heuchera williamsii D.C.Eaton
Arctostaphylos pungens var. platyphylla A.Gray
Castilleja stricta Rydb.
Oxytheca parishii Parry
Melica acuminata Bol.
Primula angustifolia var. cusickiana A.Gray
Haplopappus paniculatus var. virgatus A.Gray
Lepidium oreganum T.J.Howell ex Greene
Aristida oligantha var. nervata Beal
Peucedanum circumdatum S.Watson
Cordylanthus pilosus var. bolanderi A.Gray
Potamogeton pusillus var. interruptus (Kit.) J.Presl & C.Presl
Collomia tenella A.Gray
Silene monantha S.Watson
Potamogeton marinus var. occidentalis J.W.Robbins
Thelypodium nuttallii S.Watson
Erigeron stenophyllus Eaton
Rosa californica var. ultramontana S.Watson
Silene campanulata var. greenei S.Watson
Arabis purpurascens T.J.Howell ex Greene
Balsamorhiza bolanderi A.Gray
Geranium carolinianum var. longipes S.Watson
Trichostema lanatum var. denudatum A.Gray
Callitriche bolanderi Hegelm.
Oenothera whitneyi A.Gray
Orthocarpus purpurascens var. latifolius S.Watson
Leucocrinum montanum var. majus Baker
Epilobium glaucum Howell
Phlox hirsuta E.Nelson
Isopyrum stipitatum A.Gray
Silene hookeri subsp. bolanderi (A.Gray) Abrams
Oxytheca caryophylloides Parry
Audibertia capitata A.Gray
Orthocarpus erianthus var. roseus A.Gray
Helianthus giganteus var. utahensis Eaton
Cnicus breweri A.Gray
Krynitzkia watsonii A.Gray
Allocarya hispidula Greene
Gilia bolanderi A.Gray
Lappula leptophylla Rydb.
Brickellia oblongifolia var. abbreviata A.Gray ex D.C.Eaton
Gilia pluriflora A.Heller
Braya oregonensis A.Gray
Opuntia polyacantha var. watsonii J.M.Coult.
Haplopappus bloomeri var. angustatus A.Gray
Prunus salicifolia var. acutifolia S.Watson
Chrysopsis brandegeei B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Epicampes rigens Benth.
Aster occidentalis var. intermedius Gray
Micropus californicus var. subvestitus A.Gray
Eupatorium rothrockii A.Gray
Coursetia microphylla A.Gray
Haplopappus watsonii A.Gray
Draba subsessilis S.Watson
Lupinus bridgesii A.Gray ex S.Watson
Tonella collinsioides Nutt. ex A.Gray
Salix monica Bebb
Oenothera scapoidea var. claviformis (Torr. & Frém.) S.Watson
Centaurium nuttallii (S.Watson) A.Heller
Orobanche californica var. parishii Jeps.
Chrysopsis bolanderi Gray
Arenaria brevifolia var. californica A.Gray
Viola monticola Rydb.
Baeria macrantha var. pauciaristata A.Gray
Orogenia fusiformis S.Watson
Eriogonum kingii var. laxifolium Torr. & A.Gray
Holodiscus dumosus subsp. saxicola (A.Heller) Abrams
Calandrinia nevadensis A.Gray
Salix nevadensis S.Watson
Solidago guiradonis var. spectabilis D.C.Eaton
Scirpus nevadensis S.Watson
Agrostis howellii Scribn.
Gilia campanulata A.Gray
Gilia aristella A.Gray
Lathyrus albus S.Watson
Baeria carnosa Greene
Heuchera pilosella Rydb.
Galium asperrimum var. asperulum A.Gray
Monolopia bahiifolia var. pinnatifida A.Gray, 1876
Calais aphantocarpha A.Gray
Cardamine gemmata Greene
Cuscuta subinclusa var. abbreviata Engelm.
Calyptridium pygmaeum Parish ex Rydb.
Gilia breweri A.Gray
Aster foliaceus var. eatonii Gray
Aulospermum watsonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Lathyrus nevadensis subsp. cusickii (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Cardamine lyallii S.Watson
Cyperus inflexus Muhl.
Polemonium carneum var. luteum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Calamagrostis scribneri Beal
Lonicera canadensis Bartram ex Marshall
Echinospermum redowskii var. occidentale S.Watson
Haplopappus tenuicaulis D.C.Eaton
Cotyledon oregonensis S.Watson
Eriogonum harfordii Small
Calais bolanderi A.Gray
Eunanus coulteri var. angustatus Gray
Oenothera scapoidea var. aurantiaca (Munz) S.Watson
Linosyris viscidiflora var. puberula D.C.Eaton
Peucedanum bicolor S.Watson
Delphinium ornatum Greene
Anisocarpus bolanderi A.Gray
Polemonium helleri Brand
Viola nuttallii var. venosa S.Watson
Eritrichium californicum var. subglochidiatum A.Gray
Lupinus meionanthus var. heteranthus S.Watson
Sprengeria watsoniana Greene
Urtica dioica var. occidentalis S.Watson
Synthyris reniformis var. cordata A.Gray
Evax acaulis (Kellogg) Greene
Astragalus lectulus S.Watson
Homalobus bicristatus (A.Gray) Rydb.
Vesicaria kingii S.Watson
Fragaria ovalis (Lehm.) Rydb.
Evax caulescens var. brevifolia A.Gray
Peucedanum kingii S.Watson
Quamoclidion multiflorum (Torr.) Torr. ex A.Gray
Senecio mendocinensis A.Gray
Grindelia robusta var. rigida A.Gray
Opuntia basilaris var. ramosa Parish
Calandrinia tweedyi A.Gray
Calais eriocarpha A.Gray
Solidago subviscosa Greene
Mirabilis coccinea f. scabridata Heimerl, 1901
Astragalus nudus S.Watson
Eriogonum baileyi var. tomentosum S.Watson
Schoberia occidentalis S.Watson
Actinolepis multicaulis var. papposa A.Gray
Juncus falcatus var. paniculatus Engelm.
Brewerina suffrutescens A.Gray
Stephanomeria pentachaeta D.C.Eaton
Thelypodium lasiophyllum var. inalienum B.L.Rob.
Hymenoxys quinquesquamata Rydb.
Geranium ×oxonianum P.F.Yeo
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi var. leobreweri Roof
Prosartes parvifolia S.Watson
Luzula glabrata var. hitchcockii (Hämet-Ahti) Dorn
Spiraea prunifolia Siebold & Zucc.
Caragana frutex (L.) K.Koch
Dittrichia viscosa (L.) Greuter
Geijera parviflora Lindl.
Aliciella caespitosa (A.Gray) J.M.Porter
Carex brevicaulis Thouars
Castilleja cryptantha Pennell & G.N.Jones
Erigeron compositus subsp. discoideus (A.Gray) Piper
Eriocoma pinetorum (M.E.Jones) Romasch.
Senna hirsuta (L.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Mertensia tweedyi Rydb.
Corymbia citriodora (Hook.) K.D.Hill & L.A.S.Johnson
Oxytropis deflexa var. foliolosa (Hook.) Barneby
Oxalis metcalfei (Small) R.Knuth
Asclepias mirifica Woodson
Astragalus ampullarioides (S.L.Welsh) S.L.Welsh
Calochortus umpquaensis subsp. umpquaensis
Lomatium laevigatum (Nutt.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Bistorta officinalis Raf.
Euthamia graminifolia (L.) Nutt.
Calystegia ×lucana (Ten.) G.Don
Sporobolus pyramidalis P.Beauv.
Corydalis solida (L.) Clairv.
Phlox douglasii Hook.
Brassica oleracea var. botrytis L.
Eriogonum ochrocephalum var. ochrocephalum
Echinacea purpurea (L.) Moench
Passiflora ×kewensis Goldring
Calystegia sepium subsp. sepium
Tulipa gesneriana L.
Asclepias uncialis Greene
Tillandsia erubescens Schltdl.
Arctostaphylos parryana subsp. tumescens J.E.Keeley, L.Boykin & Massihi
Sairocarpus vexillocalyculatus subsp. breweri (A.Gray) Barringer
Leycesteria formosa Wall.
Pennellia tricornuta (Rollins) R.A.Price, C.D.Bailey & Al-Shehbaz
Convolvulus sabatius subsp. mauritanicus (Boiss.) Murb.
Camissonia kernensis (Munz) Raven
Salicornia perennis Mill.
Parthenocissus tricuspidata (Siebold & Zucc.) Planch.
Ruellia blechum L.
Cynoglossaceae
Leucospora multifida (Michx.) Nutt.
Castilleja elata Piper
Hartmaniella sierrae (Rabeler & R.L.Hartm.) M.L.Zhang
Polygonum hickmanii H.R.Hinds & Rand.Morgan
Erigeron breweri var. jacinteus (Hall) Cronquist
Lepidium integrifolium var. integrifolium
Adlumia fungosa (Aiton) Greene ex Britton, Stern & Poggenb.
Astragalus peckii Piper
Cirsium remotifolium var. odontolepis Petr.
Allium hoffmanii Ownbey ex Traub
Eucalyptus grossa F.Muell. ex Benth.
Arum italicum subsp. italicum
Apocynum androsaemifolium subsp. androsaemifolium
Echinomastus johnsonii var. lutescens (Parish) Wiggins
Opuntia pubescens H.L.Wendl.
Pentachaeta aurea subsp. allenii Keil
Astragalus hallii A.Gray
Tithonia rotundifolia (Mill.) S.F.Blake
Echinocereus scopulorum subsp. pseudopectinatus (N.P.Taylor) W.Blum & Mich.Lange
Lasiopogon glomerulatus (Harv.) Hilliard
Cirsium undulatum var. undulatum
Pyrrhopappus pauciflorus (D.Don) DC.
Malacothamnus fasciculatus var. catalinensis (Eastw.) Kearney
Delphinium californicum subsp. californicum
Foeniculum vulgare var. dulce (Mill.) Batt. & Trab.
Calystegia malacophylla subsp. malacophylla
Ionoxalis Small
Hebecarpa barbeyana (Chodat) J.R.Abbott
Malacothamnus arcuatus (Greene) Greene
Amorpha californica var. napensis Jeps.
Githopsis pulchella subsp. serpentinicola Morin
Calochortus longibarbatus var. longibarbatus
Ferocactus cylindraceus subsp. lecontei (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Aphyllon californicum subsp. jepsonii (Munz) A.C.Schneid.
Ceanothus velutinus var. laevigatus Torr. & A.Gray
Carduus acanthoides subsp. acanthoides
Sclerocactus nyensis Hochstätter
Castilleja puberula Rydb.
Platystemon californicus var. californicus
Enemion hallii (A.Gray) J.R.Drumm. & Hutch.
Mentzelia paradoxensis J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Claytonia crawfordii Stoughton
Cakile Mill.
Telesonix heucheriformis Rydb.
Rosa ×harisonii Rivers
Escobaria vivipara var. rosea (Clokey) D.R.Hunt
Cylindropuntia kleiniae (DC.) F.M.Knuth
Scilla mischtschenkoana Grossh.
Artemisia potentilloides A.Gray
Petrorhagia saxifraga (L.) Link
Dichanthelium thermale (Bol.) J.R.Thomas
Catananche caerulea L.
Anemonoides ranunculoides (L.) Holub
Boechera glaucovalvula (M.E.Jones) Al-Shehbaz
Luzula nivea (L.) DC.
Neottia borealis (Morong) Szlach.
Desmodium procumbens var. neomexicanum (A.Gray) H.Ohashi
Trichocereus spachianus (Lem.) Riccob.
Sedum paradisum (Denton) Denton ex B.L.Wilson
Prunus persica (L.) Stokes
Balsamorhiza sericea W.A.Weber
Persicaria hydropiper (L.) Spach
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi var. suborbiculata W.Knight
Helianthella californica subsp. nevadensis (Greene) W.A.Weber
Centromadia parryi subsp. parryi
Eremocrinum albomarginatum (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Pedicularis pulchella Pennell
Lithospermum occidentale (Mack.) Weakley
Archontophoenix cunninghamiana (H.Wendl.) H.Wendl. & Drude
Mammillaria miegiana Earle
Ferocactus chrysacanthus subsp. chrysacanthus
Primula maguirei L.O.Williams
Harmonia doris-nilesiae (T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson) B.G.Baldwin
Hackelia diffusa var. arida (Piper) R.L.Carr
Sesuvium humifusum (Turpin) Bohley & G.Kadereit
Cardamine pattersonii L.F.Hend.
Pennellia longifolia (Benth.) Rollins
Pedicularis rigginsiae D.J.Keil
Trifolium rollinsii J.M.Gillett
Yucca filamentosa L.
Ericameria compacta (H.M.Hall) G.L.Nesom
Erythranthe acutidens (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Fumaria vaillantii Loisel.
Sarracenia flava L.
Erythranthe rhodopetra N.S.Fraga
Echinocereus sanpedroensis Raudonat & Rischer
Harmonia guggolziorum B.G.Baldwin
Lomatium rollinsii Mathias & Constance
Navarretia rosulata Brand
Carex comans Berggr.
Catapodium rigidum (L.) C.E.Hubb.
Calochortus syntrophus Callahan
Crataegus ×cogswellii K.I.Chr. & T.A.Dickinson
Yosemitea repanda (S.Watson) P.J.Alexander & Windham
Narcissus L.
Heuchera cylindrica var. cylindrica
Phlox alyssifolia Greene
Chylismia walkeri A.Nelson
Chamaenerion angustifolium subsp. angustifolium
Eriogonum umbellatum var. humistratum Reveal
Heterotheca joshuana G.L.Nesom
Penstemon bicolor subsp. bicolor
Trifolium dedeckerae J.M.Gillett
Papaver pygmaeum Rydb.
Limnobium laevigatum (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Heine
Prunus virginiana var. virginiana
Eupatorina R.M.King & H.Rob.
Ipomoea coccinea L.
Douglasia idahoensis Douglass M.Hend.
Coccinia grandis (L.) Voigt
Lewisia cotyledon var. heckneri (C.V.Morton) Munz
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. setosa (Brand) R.B.Kelley
Berberis claireae Moran
Rubus flagellaris Willd.
Echinocereus bacanorensis (W.Rischer & Trocha) W.Blum
Cyperus aristulatus (Coville) Bauters
Physalis angulata L.
Lotus argophyllus var. argenteus Dunkle
Lycium richii A.Gray
Nicotiana trigonophylla Dunal
Spondias purpurea L.
Datura lanosa Barclay
Dyschoriste bilabiata (Seem.) Kuntze
Haplopappus rosaricus Moran
Helictotrichon canescens (Buckley) Clayton
Sphaeralcea violacea Rose
Ottleya utahensis (Ottley) D.D.Sokoloff
Coulteria Kunth
Haplopappus odontolepis Moran
Dicliptera formosa Brandegee
Comocladia engleriana Loesen
Echeandia leptophylla Benth.
Hesperelaea palmeri A.Gray
Stipa shoshoneana Curto & Douglass M.Hend.
Fragaria crinita Rydb.
Eugenia capuli var. capuli
Chloroleucon (Benth.) Record
Lycium andersonii var. deserticola (C.L.Hitchc. ex Munz) Jeps.
Ruellia L.
Justicia L.
Bursera lancifolia (Schltdl.) Engl.
Ditaxis adenophora (A.Gray) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Lonchocarpus lanceolatus Benth.
Diplacus aurantiacus subsp. aurantiacus
Dodonaea viscosa subsp. arizonica (A.Nelson) A.E.Murray
Cercidium microphyllum (Torr.) Rose & I.M.Johnst.
Hyacinthoides Heist. ex Fabr.
Salsola tragus subsp. pontica (Pall.) Rilke
Magnolia sieboldii K.Koch
Cucurbita californica Torr. ex S.Watson
Cytisus canariensis (L.) Steud.
Tremula Dumort.
Porophyllum Adans.
Cotula L.
Draba grandis Langsd. ex Fisch.
Amelanchier ×lamarckii F.G.Schroed.
Crepis bakeri subsp. cusickii (Eastw.) Babc. & Stebbins
Juncus pelocarpus E.Mey.
Cotoneaster symondsii T.Moore
Cicerbita muralis (L.) Wallr.
Amborella trichopoda Baill.
Pectiantia ovalis (Greene) Rydb.
Thinopyrum intermedium subsp. barbulatum (Schur) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Crepis bakeri subsp. idahoensis Babc. & Stebbins
Crupina vulgaris var. vulgaris
Aster laurentianus Fernald
Sporobolus anglicus (C.E.Hubb.) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Crepis modocensis subsp. modocensis
Antennaria aromatica Evert
Agropogon lutosus (Poir.) P.Fourn.
Crepis bakeri subsp. bakeri
Lysimachia clethroides Duby
Atriplex nudicaulis Boguslaw
Euphorbia chamberlinii I.M.Johnst.
Lupinus bingenensis Suksd.
Diplachne brandegeei Vasey
Draba abajoensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Alvordia glomerata Brandegee
Grindelia paludosa Greene
Calamagrostis canadensis var. robusta Vasey
Parrya nudicaulis (L.) Regel
Castilleja hispida Benth. ex Hook.
Hilaria Kunth
Grindelia chiloensis (Cornel.) Cabrera
Eriogonum wrightii var. pringlei (J.M.Coult. & Fisher) Reveal
Haplopappus arenarius Benth.
Eriogonum ursinum var. erubescens Reveal & J.D.Knorr
Cuphea llavea var. llavea
Bouteloua media (E.Fourn.) Gould & Kapadia
Arnica cordifolia var. cordifolia
Argentina grandis Piper
Mimulus cordatus Greene
Hieracium parryi Zahn
Poa kelloggii Vasey
Androsace septentrionalis subsp. subumbellata (A.Nelson) G.T.Robbins
Panicum ghiesbreghtii E.Fourn.
Leontodon taraxacoides subsp. longirostris Finch & P.D.Sell
Vernonanthura serratuloides (Kunth) H.Rob.
Schizachyrium sanguineum var. brevipedicellatum (Beal) S.L.Hatch
Piptochaetium virescens (Kunth) Parodi
Aristida pansa Wooton & Standl.
Piptatheropsis shoshoneana (Curto & Douglass M.Hend.) Romasch., P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Brickellia sonorana B.L.Turner
Pappophorum vaginatum Phil.
Eriogonum douglasii var. elkoense Reveal
Poa multnomae Piper
Sporobolus trichodes Hitchc.
Eriocoma nelsonii subsp. dorei (Barkworth & J.R.Maze) Romasch.
Artemisia afra Jacq. ex Willd., 1803
Chylismia scapoidea subsp. brachycarpa (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Agave capensis Gentry
Leptorhoeo tenuifolia Rose
Pleurocoronis laphamioides var. pauciseta (I.M.Johnst.) R.M.King
Gaillardia Foug.
Balsamorhiza Hook.
Helichrysum splendidum (Thunb.) Less.
Ericameria cuneata var. spathulata H.M.Hall
Muhlenbergia strictior Beal
Rumex transitorius Rech.fil.
Circaea pacifica Asch. & Magnus
Muhlenbergia pectinata Goodd.
Senecio weinmannifolius Cuatrec.
Oxytropis campestris var. cusickii (Greenm.) Barneby
Pedicularis angustifolia Benth.
Coreopsis hamiltonii (Elmer) H.Sharsm.
Cleome L.
Poa wallowensis Soreng
Asclepiadaceae
Sagina crassicaulis S.Watson
Lycurus setosus (Nutt.) C.Reeder
Cardiospermum cuchujaquense Ferrucci & Acev.-Rodr.
Linanthastrum Ewan
Aster eatonii (A.Gray) Howell
Tagetes nelsonii Greenm.
Argythamnia serrata (Torr.) Müll.Arg.
Koeleria spicata (Linnaeus) Barberá, Quintanar, Soreng & P.M.Peterson
Zexmenia fruticosa Rose
Montanoa tomentosa subsp. xanthiifolia (Sch.Bip.) V.A.Funk
Dalea aurea C.Fraser
Dalea enneandra Nutt.
Linanthus pygmaeus subsp. continentalis P.H.Raven
Pectis multiceps Urb.
Crepis gracilis Hook.f. & Thomson, 1876
Andropogon L.
Rubus melanolasius Dieck
Crusea subulata (DC.) A.Gray
Eriocoma occidentalis subsp. pubescens (Vasey) Romasch.
Muhlenbergia ciliata (Kunth) Trin.
Vaseyanthus insularis var. brandegeei (Cogn.) I.M.Johnst.
Allium punctum L.F.Hend.
Aristida gibbosa (Nees) Kunth
Ornithopus roseus Dufour
Cathestecum erectum Vasey & Hack.
Vaccinium microcarpum (Turcz. ex Rupr.) Schmalh. ex Busch
Helianthus uniflorus Nutt.
Rumex lapponicus (Hiitonen) Czernov
Crepis barbigera Leiberg ex Coville
Thysanocarpus curvipes var. longistylus Jeps.
Potentilla gordonii Baill.
Crataegus atrovirens J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Streptopus
Persicaria nepalensis (Meisn.) H.Gross
Boechera evadens Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Cleomella serrulata (Pursh) Roalson & J.C.Hall
Draba standleyi J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Crepis atribarba subsp. atribarba
Crataegus chrysocarpa var. piperi (Britton) Kruschke
Atriplex gmelinii C.A.Mey.
Chenopodium polyspermum L.
Crataegus macracantha Koehne
Emex spinosa Linnaeus, 1753
Potentilla supina L.
Penstemon spectabilis var. subviscosus (D.D.Keck) Mc Minn
Marah macrocarpus var. micranthus Stocking
Vaseyanthus insularis var. palmeri (S.Watson) Gentry
Dieterlea fusiformis E.J.Lott
Sechiopsis triqueter (Ser.) Naudin
Cucumis melo subsp. agrestis (Naudin) Pangalo
Apodanthera crispa Cogn.
Cyclanthera dieterleana C.E.Jones & Kearns
Psidium cattleianum Afzel. ex Sabine
Fimbristylis dichotoma (L.) Vahl
Hemicarpha micrantha (Vahl) Pax
Mimulus diffusus A.L.Grant
Agrostis blasdalei var. marinensis Crampton
Opuntia ramosissima Engelm.
Lotus strigosus var. tomentellus (Greene) Isely
Lotus scoparius subsp. brevialatus (Ottley) Abrams
Grindelia camporum var. camporum
Bromus trinii É.Desv.
Muilla clevelandii (S.Watson) Hoover
Aster subulatus var. ligulatus Shinners
Ocimum L.
Dicentra ochroleuca Engelm.
Aristida orcuttiana Vasey
Lotus stipularis (Benth.) Greene
Diospyros sonorae Standl.
Epilobium angustifolium subsp. circumvagum Mosquin
Hemizonia pungens subsp. septentrionalis D.D.Keck
Chorizanthe californica (Benth.) Gray
Lessingia filaginifolia (Hook. & Arn.) M.A.Lane
Amsinckia spectabilis var. sancti-nicolai (Eastw.) I.M.Johnst.
Psoralea orbicularis Lindl.
Isomeris arborea var. insularis Jeps.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. bernardinus (H.M.Hall) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Camissonia intermedia Raven
Arabis sparsiflora Nutt.
Haplopappus venetus (Kunth) S.F.Blake
Cnicus benedictus L.
Heterotheca villosissima (DC.) G.L.Nesom
Trisetum projectum Louis-Marie
Arabis repanda var. repanda
Menodora scoparia Engelm. ex A.Gray
Heliopsis parvifolia var. rubra (T.R.Fisher) Wiggins
Jacquemontia azurea (Richard) Choisy
Aster bernardinus H.M.Hall
Lotus argophyllus (A.Gray) Greene
Collinsia parviflora var. grandiflora (Douglas ex Lindl.) Ganders & G.R.Krause
Calystegia fulcrata (A.Gray) Brummitt
Mimulus aridus (Abrams) A.L.Grant
Lotus hamatus Greene
Muhlenbergia racemosa (Michx.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Marina capensis Barneby
Galinsoga semicalva (A.Gray) H.St.John & D.White
Potentilla neumanniana Rchb.
Cryptantha micrantha var. micrantha
Lotus wrangelianus Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Lotus nevadensis var. davidsonii (Greene) Isely
Plectritis ciliosa subsp. insignis (Suksd.) Morey
Salvia coccinea Buc'hoz ex Etl.
Haplopappus acradenius (Greene) S.F.Blake
Gilia triodon Eastw.
Elymus junceus Fisch.
Physaria pendula (Rollins) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Plagiobothrys scouleri var. hispidulus (Greene) Dorn
Cordylanthus mollis subsp. hispidus (Pennell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Mimulus bigelovii (Gray) Gray
Atriplex canescens subsp. linearis (S.Watson) Hall & Clem.
Gilia leptomeria var. micromeria (A.Gray) Cronquist
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. arenarius (L.C.Anderson) S.L.Welsh
Sechiopsis triquetra (Moc. & Sesse ex Ser.) Naudin
Amsinckia intermedia var. eastwoodiae (J.F.Macbr.) Jeps. & Hoover
Navarretia Ruiz & Pav.
Trifolium truncatum Greene
Brodiaea congesta Sm.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. asprella (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Solidago canadensis subsp. elongata (Fernald) D.D.Keck
Festuca octoflora var. hirtella (Piper) Hitchc.
Camissoniopsis W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Lupinus formosus var. hyacinthinus (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Horkelia tridentata subsp. tridentata
Plantago indica L.
Chloris pilosa Schumach.
Camissonia pallida subsp. pallida
Lepidium montanum var. cinereum (C.L.Hitchc.) Rollins
Aster integrifolius Nutt.
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. reflexa (Greene) D.D.Keck
Aster foliaceus var. hesperius (A.Gray) Jeps.
Gymnosperma Less.
Filago depressa A.Gray
Gnaphalium canescens DC.
Cryptantha hispidula Greene ex Brand
Allium
Oxytheca parishii var. parishii
Senecio ionophyllus Greene
Mirabilis bigelovii var. bigelovii
Cleomella arborea var. angustata (Parish) J.C.Hall & Roalson
Verbena rigida Spreng.
Plectritis ciliosa subsp. ciliosa
Monardella glauca Greene
Gnaphalium canescens subsp. thermale (E.Nelson) Stebbins & D.J.Keil
Hemizonia mohavensis D.D.Keck
Aster subulatus hort. ex Steud.
Gilia splendens Douglas ex H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. ashlandica (Greene) D.D.Keck
Tripterocalyx micranthus (Torr.) Hook.
Agrostis semiverticillata (Forssk.) C.Chr.
Lepidium fremontii var. fremontii
Mimulus mephiticus Greene
Potentilla drummondii subsp. drummondii
Camissonia walkeri subsp. tortilis (Jeps.) P.H.Raven
Navarretia pauciflora Mason
Lomatium mohavense subsp. mohavense
Mirabilis bigelovii var. retrorsa (A.Heller) Munz
Bromus anomalus var. lanatipes (Shear) Hitchc.
Nemacladus rubescens var. tenuis McVaugh
Monolepis pusilla Torr. & S.Watson
Conyza sumatrensis (Retz.) E.Walker
Cortaderia Stapf
Fraxinus pennsylvanica subsp. velutina (Torr.) G.N.Mill.
Lemna minuscula Herter
Lotus procumbens (Greene) Greene
Chenopodium rubrum subsp. rubrum
Cordylanthus kingii subsp. kingii
Polemonium filicinum Greene
Disporum hookeri (Torr.) G.Nicholson
Aliciella subacaulis (Rydb.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Mollugo cerviana (L.) Ser.
Gilia splendens subsp. splendens
Linum lewisii var. alpicola Jeps.
Chorizanthe procumbens var. albiflora Goodman
Crassula colligata subsp. lamprosperma Toelken
Ceanothus tomentosus subsp. olivaceus (Jeps.) Munz
Pelargonium ×domesticum L.H.Bailey
Gilia aliquanta subsp. aliquanta
Arnica parryi subsp. sonnei (Greene) Maguire
Philadelphus microphyllus subsp. argenteus (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Festuca microstachys var. ciliata A.Gray
Selinocarpus nevadensis (Standl.) Fowler & Turner
Aster occidentalis var. occidentalis
Sibara pectinata (Greene) Greene
Streptanthus tortuosus var. suffrutescens (Greene) Jeps.
Mimulus jepsonii A.L.Grant
Polygonum phytolaccifolium Meisn. ex Small
Polygala cornuta var. cornuta
Salvia seemannii Fernald
Verbena pulchella Sweet
Symphoricarpos rivularis Suksd.
Horkelia tridentata subsp. flavescens (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Sclerocactus johnsonii (Parry ex Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Streptanthus cordatus var. duranii Jeps.
Lotus argophyllus var. argophyllus
Isocoma Nutt.
Eschscholzia minutiflora subsp. twisselmannii C.Clark & M.Faull
Rumex salicifolius var. denticulatus Torr.
Erigeron breweri var. bisanctus G.L.Nesom
Grindelia hirsutula var. davyi (Jeps.) M.A.Lane
Camissonia ignota (Jeps.) Raven
Aster oregonensis (Nutt.) Cronquist
Oenothera deltoides subsp. ambigua (S.Watson) W.M.Klein
Galium hypotrichium A.Gray
Penstemon papillatus Howell
Erigeron jonesii Cronquist
Hemizonia DC.
Dodecatheon clevelandii subsp. patulum (Greene) H.J.Thomps.
Lotus nevadensis var. nevadensis
Callitriche heterophylla var. heterophylla
Wisteria frutescens (L.) Poir.
Aster foliaceus var. parryi (D.C.Eaton) A.Gray
Lotus haydonii (Orcutt) Greene
Astragalus pseudiodanthus Barneby
Madia rammii Greene
Hemizonia pungens subsp. laevis D.D.Keck
Plagiobothrys distantiflorus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Endolepis covillei Standl.
Physalis minuta Griggs
Isomeris arborea var. globosa Coville
Cryptantha similis K.Mathew & Raven
Gutierrezia Lag.
Arabis repanda S.Watson
Penstemon grinnellii subsp. grinnellii
Githopsis tenella Morin
Claytonia lanceolata var. peirsonii Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Viola pinetorum var. pinetorum
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. ewanii D.D.Keck
Potentilla anserina subsp. anserina
Brickellia lemmonii A.Gray
Spiraea densiflora Nutt. ex Greenm.
Potentilla bruceae Rydb.
Leucosyris arida (B.L.Turner & D.B.Horne) Pruski & R.L.Hartm.
Cucurbita moschata Duchesne
Stylocline citroleum Morefield
Zigadenus brevibracteatus (M.E.Jones) H.M.Hall
Erythranthe discolor (A.L.Grant) N.S.Fraga
Erigeron eatonii var. sonnei (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Boechera acutina (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Chamomilla occidentalis (Greene) Rydb.
Yucca whipplei var. whipplei
Actinidia chinensis Planch.
Ilex latifolia Thunb. ex A.Murray
Dicliptera suberecta (André) Bremek.
Pleiogynium timorense (DC.) Leenh.
Senecio petasitis (Sims) DC.
Acanthus ilicifolius L.
Fraxinus holotricha Koehne
Sarcopoterium spinosum (L.) Spach
Pithecoctenium cynanchoides DC.
Epiphyllum Haw.
Schinus L.
Thymus vulgaris L.
Trifolium ligusticum Balb. ex Loisel.
Casuarina lepidophloia F.Muell.
Atriplex halimus L.
Ipomoea lobata (Cerv.) Thell.
Ipomoea trifida (Kunth) G.Don
Crassula lycopodioides var. pseudolycopodioides (Dinter & Schinz) Walther ex Jacobsen
Echeveria DC.
Cunonia L.
Codiaeum Rumph. ex A.Juss.
Acacia lineata A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Acacia victoriae Benth.
Bossiaea linophylla R.Br.
Cassia odorata R.Morris
Cicer judaicum Boiss.
Prosopis nigra (Griseb.) Hieron.
Quercus coccinea Münchh.
Virgilia oroboides (P.J.Bergius) T.M.Salter
Illicium parvifolium Merr.
Physostegia virginiana (L.) Benth.
Cuphea ignea A.DC.
Buddleja L.
Gossypium anomalum Wawra ex Wawra & Peyr.
Phymosia umbellata (Cav.) Kearney
Monochaetum humboldtianum (Kunth & Bouché) Kunth ex Walp.
Ficus L.
Ficus insipida subsp. insipida
Ficus ovata Vahl
Ficus urceolaris Welw. ex Hiern
Acmena DC.
Callistemon citrinus (Curtis) Skeels
Eucalyptus crebra F.Muell.
Eucalyptus kessellii Maiden & Blakely
Eucalyptus preissiana Schauer
Melaleuca lanceolata Otto
Forsythia viridissima Lindl.
Ligustrum henryi Hemsl.
Grevillea diminuta L.A.S.Johnson
Hakea trifurcata (Sm.) R.Br.
Delphinium ajacis L.
Aeglopsis chevalieri Swingle
Citrus hystrix DC.
Eremocitrus glauca (Lindl.) Swingle
Microcitrus australis (Planch.) Swingle
Severinia buxifolia (Poir.) Ten.
Hebe venustula (Colenso) Cockayne
Datura suaveolens Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Solanum sisymbriifolium Lam.
Guichenotia macrantha Turcz.
Camellia sasanqua Thunb.
Philodendron selloum K.Koch
Tradescantia ohiensis Raf.
Dierama pendulum (L.f.) Baker
Dichopogon fimbriatus (R.Br.) J.F.Macbr.
Stypandra glauca R.Br.
Oryzopsis coerulescens (Desf.) Hack.
Loropetalum chinense (R.Br.) Oliv.
Mammillaria sonorensis R.T.Craig
Trifolium obscurum Savi
Aegilops comosa Sm.
Aegilops ovata L.
Aegilops speltoides var. ligustica (Savign.) Fiori
Aegilops triaristata subsp. attenuata E.Schiem.
Aegilops uniaristata Vis.
Triticum aestivum subsp. macha (Dekapr. & Menabde) McKey
Triticum monococcum L.
Triticum turgidum L.
Phaseolus acutifolius A.Gray
Ipomoea suffulta (Kunth) G.Don
Camissonia cardiophylla subsp. cardiophylla
Diospyros xolocotzii Madrigal & Rzed.
Astartea fascicularis (Labill.) A.Cunn. ex DC.
Persea cinerascens Blake
Pterocephalus Vaill. ex Adans.
Pelargonium echinatum Curtis
Festuca ampla Hack.
Ficus benghalensis L.
Citrus ×aurantium L.
Citrus ×paradisi Macfad.
Eucalyptus desmondensis Maiden & Blakely
Dysophylla auricularia (L.) Blume
Dalbergia sissoo Roxb. ex DC.
Aloe burgersfortensis Reynolds
Aloe pluridens Haw.
Aloe virens Haw.
Berberidopsis corallina Hook.fil.
Calliandra tweedii Benth.
Salvia dolomitica Codd
Duranta erecta L.
Plectranthus ciliatus E.Mey.
Phytolacca dioica L.
Anemone japonica Houtt.
Solanum wendlandii Hook.fil.
Cornus florida L.
Distictis buccinatoria (DC.) A.H.Gentry
Euphorbia lambii Svent.
Uncarina (Baill.) Stapf
Quercus macrocarpa Michx.
Eysenhardtia Kunth
Bidens L.
Carpinus betulus L.
Schefflera J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Glycosmis mauritiana (Lam.) Tanaka
Cleistocactus hyalacanthus Rol.-Goss.
Eleusine africana Kenn.-O'Byrne
Sida abutilifolia Mill.
Hosackia lathyroides Durand & Hilg.
Caltha leptosepala var. biflora (DC.) G.Lawson
Crotalaria L.
Disocactus amazonicus (K.Schum.) D.R.Hunt
Glottiphyllum N.E.Br.
Aliciella humillima (Brand) J.M.Porter
Arctostaphylos purissima subsp. purissima
Origanum vulgare subsp. hirtum (Link) A.Terracc.
Acer glabrum subsp. torreyi (Greene) A.E.Murray
Bidens tenuisecta A.Gray
Lomatium nevadense var. pseudorientale (M.E.Jones) Munz
Siphonoglossa longiflora (Torr.) Gray
Froelichia gracilis (Hook.) Moq.
Erigeron superbus Greene
Machaeranthera boltoniae (Greene) B.L.Turner & Horne
Melampodium strigosum Stuessy
Hemizonia floribunda A.Gray
Heterotheca psammophila B.Wagenkn.
Hymenoclea monogyra Torr. & A.Gray
Machaeranthera asteroides (Torr.) Greene
Pectis palmeri S.Watson
Viguiera microphylla Vasey & Rose
Arabis glaucovalvula M.E.Jones
Arabis johnstonii Munz
Boechera peirsonii Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Cardamine californica var. cardiophylla (Greene) Rollins
Draba verna var. aestivalis Lej.
Physaria kingii subsp. bernardina (Munz) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Atriplex minuscula Standl.
Elatine gracilis Mason
Lesquerella purpurea (A.Gray) S.Watson
Astragalus trichopodus subsp. antiselli (A.Gray ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson) Thorne
Lotus heermannii var. eriophorus (Greene) Ottley
Gentianella Moench
Salvia bernardina Parish ex Greene
Sphaeralcea ambigua var. monticola (Kearney) Kearney
Lilium vollmeri Eastw.
Solanum fendleri A.Gray ex Torr.
Antennaria aprica Greene
Bidens ferulifolia (Jacq.) Sweet
Chrysothamnus parryi (A.Gray) Greene
Cirsium proteanum J.T.Howell
Cirsium clokeyi S.F.Blake
Gutierrezia bracteata Abrams
Haplopappus vernicosus Brandegee
Heterotheca martirensis Moran
Machaeranthera tephrodes (A.Gray) Greene
Gnaphalium thermale E.Nelson
Haplopappus menziesii Torr. & A.Gray
Layia paniculata D.D.Keck
Pectis purpurea var. sonorae Keil
Psilostrophe tagetina var. lanata A.Nelson
Cryptantha hendersonii (A.Nelson) J.C.Nelson
Arabis koehleri var. stipitata Rollins
Caulanthus lasiophyllus var. rigidus (Greene) Payson
Lepidium virginicum var. virginicum
Carex festivella Mack.
Tunica prolifera (L.) Scop.
Coronilla valentina subsp. glauca (L.) Batt.
Calochortus coeruleus var. westonii (Eastw.) Ownbey
Sphaeralcea rusbyi subsp. eremicola (Jeps.) Kearney
Draba sphaeroides Payson
Acourtia patens (A.Gray) Reveal & R.M.King
Erigeron concinnus var. condensatus D.C.Eaton
Delphinium andersonii subsp. andersonii
Ditaxis californica (Brandegee) A.Heller
Proboscidea arenaria (Engelm.) Decne.
Madia elegans subsp. wheeleri (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Erigeron velutipes Hook. & Arn.
Eupatorium palmeri var. palmeri
Helianthus deserticola Heiser
Lasianthaea fruticosa var. alamosana K.M.Becker
Hemizonia clementina Brandegee
Lessingia pectinata var. tenuipes (J.T.Howell) Markos
Montanoa leucantha var. arborescens (DC.) B.L.Turner
Senecio mexicanus McVaugh
Tridax yecorana B.L.Turner
Cardamine debilis D.Don
Herniaria cinerea DC.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. idriensis M.E.Jones
Monardella crispa Elmer
Limnanthes gracilis subsp. parishii (Jeps.) R.M.Beauch.
Begonia palmeri S.Watson
Cirsium loncholepis Petr.
Hemizonia increscens (Hall ex D.D.Keck) Tanowitz
Coreopsis L.
Silene andersonii Clokey
Galvezia juncea var. juncea
Erysimum capitatum var. bealianum (Jeps.) Rossbach
Haplopappus orcuttii A.Gray
Croton corymbulosus Engelm.
Alternanthera repens (L.) Link
Clarkia deflexa (Jeps.) Lewis & Lewis
Chorizanthe polygonoides subsp. longispina (Goodman) Munz
Sphenopholis obtusata var. obtusata
Orobanche fasciculata var. lutea (Parry) Achey
Penstemon discolor D.D.Keck
Ampelodesmos mauritanicus (Poir.) T.Durand & Schinz
Gilia capillaris Kellogg
Eragrostis tef (Zuccagni) Trotter
Aquilegia formosa var. pauciflora (Greene) Boothman
Ranunculus californicus var. austromontanus L.D.Benson
Ceanothus foliosus subsp. vineatus (McMinn) C.L.Schmidt
Ceanothus integerrimus var. puberulus (Greene) Abrams
Ceanothus insularis Eastw.
Horkelia californica subsp. dissita (Crum) Ertter
Salix coulteri Andersson
Saxifraga punctata subsp. arguta (D.Don) Hultén
Keckiella antirrhinoides subsp. antirrhinoides
Mimulus laciniatus A.Gray
Mimulus viscidus subsp. viscidus
Nierembergia hippomanica Miers
Viola quercetorum M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Distichlis spicata var. stolonifera Beetle
Eragrostis curvula var. curvula
Festuca californica var. parishii (Piper) Hitchc.
Leptochloa fascicularis (Lam.) A.Gray
Dichanthelium acuminatum subsp. fasciculatum (Torr.) Freckmann & Lelong
Psoralea tenuiflora Pursh
Sitanion hansenii (Scribn.) J.G.Sm.
Sitanion longifolium J.G.Sm.
Stipa elmeri Piper & Brodie ex Scribner
Berberis pimana Laferr. & Marroq.
Dalea nana Torr. ex A.Gray
Meconella linearis (Benth.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Thelypodiopsis linearifolia (A.Gray) Al-Shehbaz
Monarda menthifolia Graham
Physaria cordiformis Rollins
Opuntia phaeacantha var. major Engelm.
Opuntia violacea Engelm.
Pachistima myrsinites Raf.
Ibervillea tenuisecta (Gray) Small
Sphaeralcea coccinea subsp. dissecta (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Kearney
Abronia crux-maltae Kellogg
Camissonia claviformis (Torr. & Frém.) Raven
Phlox rigida Benth.
Galium rothrockii A.Gray
Penstemon moriahensis N.H.Holmgren
Scutellaria tessellata Epling
Ayenia pusilla L.
Opuntia versicolor Engelm. ex J.M.Coult.
Selenicereus vagans Britton & Rose
Lobelia goldmanii (Fernald) T.J.Ayers
Glyceria pauciflora J.Presl
Camissonia confusa Raven
Polemonium flavum Greene
Atriplex wrightii S.Watson
Polygonum kelloggii Greene
Portulaca parvula A.Gray
Ceanothus mogollonicus Greene
Purshia ×subintegra (Kearney) Henrickson
Oldenlandia greenei A.Gray
Penstemon barbatus subsp. barbatus
Sicyos sinaloae Brandegee
Larrea divaricata subsp. tridentata (DC.) Felger & C.H.Lowe
Euphorbia dioscoreoides Boiss.
Cracca aletes Standl. & Steyerm.
Brongniartia tenuifolia Standl.
Calliandra formosa (Kunth) Benth.
Trichachne californica (Benth.) Chase
Cercidium praecox (Ruiz & Pav.) Harms
Desmanthus palmeri (Britton & Rose) B.L.Turner
Pithecellobium mexicanum Rose
Stylosanthes humilis Kunth
Hydrolea spinosa L.
Krameria parvifolia Benth.
Persea podadenia S.F.Blake
Lotus junceus (Benth.) Greene
Sida cordifolia L.
Lavatera lindsayi Moran
Camissonia crassifolia (Greene) Raven
Stegnosperma watsonii D.J.Rogers
Plantago nivea Kunth
Loeselia pumila (Mart. & Galeotti) Walp.
Talinum triangulare (Jacq.) Willd.
Linanthus melingii (Wiggins) V.E.Grant
Penstemon ovatus Douglas ex Hook.
Rhamnus californica subsp. tomentella (Benth.) C.B.Wolf
Horkelia bolanderi subsp. clevelandii (Greene) D.D.Keck
Galphimia brasiliensis f. angustifolia Chodat ex Nied.
Lotus salsuginosus var. salsuginosus
Sidalcea hickmanii Greene
Centaurium muehlenbergii (Griseb.) W.Wight ex Piper
Lamourouxia viscosa Kunth
Hemizonia corymbosa subsp. macrocephala (Nutt.) D.D.Keck
Antirrhinum cyathiferum Benth.
Leucospora Nutt.
Penstemon dolius M.E.Jones ex Pennell
Trifolium gymnocarpon Nutt.
Cordylanthus orcuttianus A.Gray
Galvezia juncea (Benth.) Ball
Helicteres baruensis Jacq.
Lippia umbellata Cav.
Verbena pumila Rydb.
Tripogandra purpurascens subsp. purpurascens
Bulbostylis juncoides (Vahl) Kük.
Zinnia pumila A.Gray
Chaetopappa exilis (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Hordeum jubatum var. caespitosum (Scribn.) Hitchc.
Juncus marginatus var. odoratus Torr.
Spiranthes polyantha Rchb.f.
Silene parishii var. parishii
Lasiacis procerrima (Hack.) Hitchc.
Schizachyrium scoparium var. neomexicanum (Nash) Hitchc.
Antigonon Endl.
Potamogeton foliosus var. genuinus Fernald
Scirpus americanus Pers.
Sitanion jubatum J.G.Sm.
Camissonia angelorum (S.Watson) Raven
Agropyron parishii var. laeve Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Langloisia matthewsii (A.Gray) Greene
Gilia splendens subsp. grantii (Brand) V.E.Grant & A.D.Grant
Sphaeralcea subhastata var. subhastata
Vulpia octoflora var. glauca (Nutt.) Fernald
Phyllanthus galeottianus Baill.
Cardamine californica var. integrifolia (Nutt.) Rollins
Verbena gracilis Desf.
Machaeranthera pinnatifida var. chihuahuana B.L.Turner & R.L.Hartm.
Cryptantha cinerea (Greene) Cronquist
Rhamnus californica subsp. ursina (Greene) C.B.Wolf
Ribes watsonianum Koehne
Bougainvillea glabra Choisy
Castilleja nivea Pennell & Ownbey
Buddleja asiatica Lour.
Machaeranthera canescens subsp. canescens
Ottelia alismoides (L.) Pers.
Eriogonum inerme var. hispidulum Goodman
Rhamnus tomentella Benth.
Githopsis diffusa subsp. robusta Morin
Arenaria nuttallii subsp. gracilis (B.L.Rob.) Maguire
Ligusticum californicum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Penstemon azureus subsp. angustissimus (Gray) D.D.Keck
Silene californica Durand
Saxifraga aprica Greene
Sanguisorba annua (Nutt.) Nutt.
Pleuropogon californicus var. davyi (L.D.Benson) But
Xanthium silphiifolium Greene
Dichanthelium acuminatum subsp. thermale (Bol.) Freckmann & Lelong
Baccharis malibuensis R.M.Beauch. & Henrickson
Elymus macounii Vasey
Madia bolanderi (A.Gray) A.Gray
Eucalyptus camaldulensis var. camaldulensis
Tetradymia nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Streptanthus tortuosus var. tortuosus
Brickellia arguta var. arguta
Chenopodium vulvaria L.
Camissonia claviformis subsp. lancifolia (A.Heller) P.H.Raven
Lotus salsuginosus var. brevivexillus Ottley
Pleuraphis rigida Thurb.
Chromolaena DC.
Dyssodia anomala (Canby & Rose) B.L.Rob.
Haplopappus macronema A.Gray
Camissonia claviformis subsp. yumae (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Festuca microstachys var. microstachys
Astragalus racemosus var. treleasei Ced.Porter
Najas graminea Delile
Rorippa palustris subsp. palustris
Gnaphalium canescens subsp. beneolens (Davidson) Stebbins & D.J.Keil
Sorbaria arborea C.K.Schneid.
Boerhavia erecta var. intermedia (M.E.Jones) Kearney & Peebles
Eschscholzia lemmonii subsp. lemmonii
Rhamnus tomentella subsp. cuspidata (Greene) Sawyer
Cardamine breweri var. breweri
Coryphantha alversonii (Coult.) Orcutt
Alnus oregana Nutt.
Arenaria congesta var. subcongesta (S.Watson) S.Watson
Peperomia pellucida (L.) Kunth
Lupinus nanus subsp. nanus
Arabis platysperma var. platysperma
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. puberulus (D.C.Eaton) Jeps.
Mentzelia multicaulis var. uintahensis N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. globosa D.D.Keck
Cryptantha fastigiata I.M.Johnst.
Penstemon heterodoxus var. cephalophorus (Greene) N.H.Holmgren
Navarretia sinistra subsp. pinnatisecta (H.Mason & A.D.Grant) L.A.Johnson
Erigeron biolettii Greene
Cotoneaster gamblei Klotz
Stylocline Nutt.
Hieracium glomeratum Froel.
Microseris D.Don
Diospyros reinae B.Walln.
Euryops multifidus (Thunb.) DC.
Caesalpinia drepanocarpa (A.Gray) Fisher
Utricularia inflata Walter
Eriogonum thornei (Reveal & Henrickson) L.M.Shultz
Mentzelia involucrata var. involucrata
Erythranthe Spach
Diplacus ×lompocensis McMinn
Cleomella arborea var. globosa (Coville) J.C.Hall & Roalson
Koeleria phleoides Pers.
Cryptantha hoffmannii I.M.Johnst.
Amaryllis L.
Justicia brandegeeana Wassh. & L.B.Sm.
Haemanthus L.
Sageretia thea (Osbeck) M.C.Johnst.
Persea donnell-smithii Mez
Limnobium spongia subsp. laevigatum (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Lowden
Odontonema strictum (Nees) Kuntze
Clytostoma callistegioides (Cham.) Baill.
Buxus harlandii Hance
Pereskia Mill.
Ipomoea fimbriosepala Choisy
Ipomoea pes-tigridis L.
Cornus macrophylla Wall.
Diospyros kaki Thunb.
Corokia cotoneaster Raoul
Jatropha integerrima Jacq.
Acacia cordifolia R.Br. ex N.Lémon
Acacia spinescens Benth.
Lablab purpureus (L.) Sweet
Pelargonium odoratissimum (L.) L'Hér.
Pterocarya fraxinifolia (Poir.) Spach
Plectranthus fruticosus L'Hér.
Cryptocarya R.Br.
Magnolia ×soulangiana Soul.-Bod.
Gossypium bickii (F.M.Bailey) Prokh.
Alyogyne huegelii (Endl.) Fryxell
Turraea obtusifolia Hochst.
Ficus aurea Nutt.
Ficus geniculata Kurz
Ficus lyrata Warb.
Ficus drupacea var. pubescens (Roth) Corner
Ficus pumila L.
Ficus virens W.T.Aiton
Angophora intermedia A.Cunn. ex DC.
Callistemon salignus (Sm.) Colvill ex Sweet
Eucalyptus stricklandii Maiden
Eucalyptus transcontinentalis Maiden
Eucalyptus caesia Benth.
Eucalyptus ebbanoensis Maiden
Eucalyptus ficifolia F.Muell.
Eucalyptus ovularis Maiden & Blakely
Melaleuca viridiflora var. rubriflora Pancher ex Brongn. & Gris
Jasminum humile L.
Ligustrum sempervirens (Franch.) Lingelsh.
Pittosporum phillyreoides DC.
Monnina salicifolia Ruiz & Pav.
Grevillea thelemanniana Hügel
Trymalium spathulatum Ostenf.
Eriobotrya deflexa (Hemsl.) Nakai
Pyrus pashia Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Spiraea trichocarpa Nakai
Clausena excavata Burm.fil.
Feroniella oblata Swingle
Dodonaea triquetra J.C.Wendl.
Philadelphus L.
Cestrum reflexum Sendtn.
Firmiana simplex (L.) W.Wight
Edgeworthia chrysantha Lindl.
Cissus capensis Willd.
Bromelia balansae Mez
Ophiopogon japonicus (Thunb.) Ker Gawl.
Epidendrum obrienianum Rolfe
Alpinia zerumbet (Pers.) B.L.Burtt & R.M.Sm.
Trifolium echinatum M.Bieb.
Trifolium diffusum Ehrh.
Aegilops bicornis (Forssk.) Jaub. & Spach
Aegilops columnaris Zhuk.
Aegilops crassa Boiss.
Aegilops kotschyi Boiss.
Aegilops umbellulata Zhuk.
Aegilops ventricosa Tausch
Heteranthelium piliferum (Sol.) Hochst. ex Jaub. & Spach
Triticum aestivum subsp. vulgare Thell
Triticum aestivum subsp. spelta (L.) Thell.
Triticum aestivum subsp. sphaerococcum (Percival) Mac Key
Triticum timopheevii (Zhuk.) Zhuk.
Acacia pubescens (Vent.) R.Br.
Hamelia patens Jacq.
Cuphea lanceolata W.T.Aiton
Strumaria discifera Marloth ex Snijman
Persea skutchii C.K.Allen
Diospyros digyna Jacq.
Cassia eremophila A.Cunn. ex Vogel
Acacia aroma Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.
Aloe plicatilis (L.) Burm.f.
Aloe ballyi Reynolds
Viburnum opulus subsp. roseum L.
Ficus neriifolia Sm.
Citrus ×aurantiifolia (Christm.) Swingle
Aloe verdoorniae Reynolds
Aloe fosteri Pillans
Aloe
Pavonia Cav.
Streptocarpus Lindl.
Liriope muscari (Decne.) L.H.Bailey
Teucrium L.
Grevillea R.Br.
Cajanus cajan (L.) Huth
Sedum morganianum Walther
Cantua candelilla Brand
Aeonium Webb & Berthel.
Quercus mongolica Fisch. ex Ledeb.
Tristaniopsis laurina (Sm.) Paul G.Wilson & J.T.Waterh.
Maytenus Molina
Euclea undulata Thunb.
Persicaria amphibia subsp. laevimarginata (Hultén) Soják
Penstemon rydbergii var. varians (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Gasteria Duval
Cleomella arborea (Nutt.) Roalson & J.C.Hall
Onopordum acanthium subsp. acanthium
Eriogonum microthecum var. alpinum Reveal
Arctostaphylos gabrielensis P.V.Wells
Agoseris arizonica (Greene) Greene
Ammi visnaga (L.) Lam.
Aster ledophyllus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Macrosiphonia brachysiphon (Torr.) A.Gray
Sphenosciadium capitellatum var. scabrum Jeps.
Dyssodia thurberi (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Erigeron divergens subsp. cinereus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Erigeron macranthus Nutt.
Machaeranthera Nees
Parthenium confertum var. lyratum (A.Gray) Rollins
Plummera floribunda A.Gray
Senecio harfordii Greenm.
Viguiera deltoidea A.Gray
Thysanocarpus curvipes var. curvipes
Lonicera subspicata var. johnstonii D.D.Keck
Houstonia L.
Brassica kaber var. schkuhriana (Rchb.) L.C.Wheeler
Tragia stylaris Müll.Arg.
Amorpha fruticosa var. occidentalis (Abrams) Kearney & Peebles
Sedum griffithsii Rose
Drymaria fendleri S.Watson
Astragalus purshii var. longilobus M.E.Jones
Gentiana tenella Rottb.
Allium hickmanii Eastw.
Sphaeralcea emoryi subsp. nevadensis Kearney
Schoenolirion album Durand
Clarkia calientensis Vasek
Ambrosia trifida var. texana Scheele
Aster occidentalis var. yosemitanus (A.Gray) Cronquist
Matelea petiolaris (A.Gray) Woodson
Chrysopsis villosus (Pursh) Nutt.
Cirsium pastoris J.T.Howell
Eupatorium pycnocephalum Less.
Eupatorium odoratum L.
Hofmeisteria urenifolia (Hook. & Arn.) Walp.
Lactuca tatarica subsp. pulchella (Pursh) Breitung
Gazania longiscapa DC.
Heterotheca rudis (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Senecio multicapitatus Greenm.
Senecio douglasii var. longilobus (Benth.) L.D.Benson
Stevia trifida Lag.
Trigonospermum annuum Mc Vaugh & Lask.
Wedelia greenmanii B.L.Turner
Agave utahensis var. utahensis
Yucca brevifolia var. herbertii (J.M.Webber) Munz
Sagina saginoides var. hesperia Fernald
Atriplex davidsonii Standl.
Chenopodium inamoenum Standl.
Salsola damascena Botsch.
Cuscuta californica var. breviflora Engelm.
Lotus grandiflorus var. mutabilis Ottley
Lupinus bicolor subsp. pipersmithii (A.Heller) D.B.Dunn
Hesperolinon didymocarpum H.Sharsm.
Camassia quamash subsp. linearis Gould
Erythronium howellii S.Watson
Blechum brownei Juss.
Ruellia cordata Thunb.
Tetramerium hispidum Nees
Linum perenne subsp. lewisii (Pursh) Hultén
Atriplex subtilis Stutz & G.L.Chu
Erigeron galeottii (Hemsl.) Greene
Erigeron peregrinus var. hirsutus Cronquist
Descurainia obtusa subsp. adenophora (Wooton & Standl.) Detling
Senecio parryi A.Gray
Arabis hirshbergiae S.Boyd
Yucca whipplei subsp. caespitosa (M.E.Jones) A.L.Haines
Symphoricarpos acutus (A.Gray) Howell
Crassula connata var. eremica (Jeps.) M.Bywater & Wickens
Juncus covillei var. obtusatus C.L.Hitchc.
Cyperus retrorsus Chapm.
Abronia nana subsp. covillei (Heimerl) Munz
Grindelia hirsutula subsp. hirsutula
Psilocarphus tenellus var. globiferus (Bertero ex DC.) Morefield
Eriastrum Wooton & Standl.
Machaeranthera pinnatifida var. incisifolia (I.M.Johnst.) B.L.Turner & R.L.Hartm.
Artemisia carruthii var. wrightii (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Pyracantha crenulata (D.Don) Roem.
Calliandra rosei Wiggins
Haplopappus berberidis A.Gray
Mentzelia procera (Wooton & Standl.) J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Sporobolus patens Swallen
Lavatera olbia L.
Chorizanthe leptoceras (Gray) S.Watson
Navarretia divaricata subsp. divaricata
Polygala subspinosa var. subspinosa
Kochia americana var. vestita S.Watson
Eclipta alba (L.) Hassk.
Claytonia peirsonii subsp. yorkii Stoughton
Delphinium parishii subsp. purpureum F.H.Lewis & Epling
Ceanothus divergens subsp. confusus (J.T.Howell) Abrams
Potentilla gracilis subsp. nuttallii (Lehm.) D.D.Keck
Galium munzii subsp. munzii
Galium trifidum var. pacificum Wiegand
Philadelphus microphyllus subsp. pumilus (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Calamagrostis foliosa Kearney
Castilleja applegatei var. fragilis (Zeile) Holmgren
Mimulus primuloides var. pilosellus (Greene) Smiley
Mimulus purpureus A.L.Grant
Penstemon laetus subsp. sagittatus D.D.Keck
Nierembergia frutescens Durieu
Lathyrus lanzwertii var. laetivirens (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh, 1978
Vitaceae
Lupinus lemmonii C.P.Sm.
Sparganium erectum subsp. stoloniferum (Buch.-Ham. ex Graebn.) H.Hara
Dalea greggii A.Gray
Cordylanthus maritimus subsp. palustris (Behr) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Acmispon junceus var. junceus
Bouvardia glaberrima Engelm.
Lessingia filaginifolia var. californica (DC.) M.A.Lane
Carex thurberi Dewey
Arabis fernaldiana var. fernaldiana
Lepidium medium Greene
Opuntia phaeacantha var. discata (C.Z.Nelson) Benson & Walk.
Echeveria rusbyi (Greene) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Pneumonanthe affinis (Griseb.) W.A.Weber
Monardella villosa subsp. sheltonii (Torr. ex Durand) Epling
Ammocodon chenopodioides (Gray) Standl.
Linanthus nuttallii (A.Gray) Greene ex Milliken
Ceiba aesculifolia (Kunth) Britten & Baker fil.
Salvia microphylla var. wislizeni A.Gray
Hedyotis rubra (Cav.) A.Gray
Penstemon humilis subsp. obtusifolius (Pennell) D.D.Keck
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. georginum (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Echinocereus scheeri var. scheeri
Lobelia cordifolia Hook. & Arn.
Trifolium longipes var. rusbyi (Greene) H.D.Harr.
Lobelia laxiflora Kunth
Eschscholzia mexicana Greene
Stipa perplexa (Hoge & Barkworth) Wipff & S.D.Jones
Hypericum moranense Kunth
Ipomoea leptotoma Torr.
Echinopepon peninsularis Gentry
Galium wrightii var. rothrockii (A.Gray) Ehrend. ex Ferris
Dodonaea angustifolia Blanco, 1837
Verbena bipinnatifida var. bipinnatifida
Desmodium scopulorum S.Watson
Elyonurus barbiculmis Hack.
Acacia russelliana (Britton & Rose) Lundell
Erioneuron grandiflorum (Vasey) Tateoka
Leptochloa filiformis (Pers.) P.Beauv.
Sitanion hystrix var. brevifolium (J.G.Sm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Dalea scandens (Houst. ex Mill.) R.T.Clausen
Marina crenulata (Hook. & Arn.) Barneby
Phaseolus albinervus Freytag & Debouck
Pithecellobium leucospermum Brandegee
Quercus subspathulata Trel.
Krameria palmeri Rose
Gaudichaudia schiedeana A.Juss.
Dorstenia drakena Vell.
Ficus trigonata L.
Camissonia cardiophylla (Torr.) Raven
Plumbago scandens L.
Linanthus androsaceus (Benth.) Greene
Atriplex rhagodioides F.Muell.
Salix caudata (Nutt.) A.Heller
Condalia correllii M.C.Johnst.
Gouania mexicana Sessé & Moc.
Kalmia polifolia subsp. microphylla (Hook.) Calder & R.L.Taylor
Brickellia chlorolepis (Wooton & Standl.) Shinners
Mentzelia hirsutissima subsp. stenophylla (Urb. & Gilg) I.M.Johnst.
Abronia gracilis subsp. platyphylla (Standl.) Ferris
Chenopodium ×borbasii Murr
Rubia tinctoria L.
Eucalyptus megacornuta C.A.Gardner
Diodia teres var. angustata A.Gray
Lycium berlandieri subsp. peninsulare C.L.Hitchc.
Verbena gooddingii var. nepetifolia Tidestr.
Verbena officinalis subsp. halei (Small) S.C.Barber
Callisia monandra (Sw.) Schult. & Schult.f.
Fimbristylis pallidula Kral
Lotus heermannii var. orbicularis (A.Gray) Isely
Delphinium decorum subsp. tracyi Ewan
Digitaria argillacea (Hitchc. & Chase) Fernald
Crepis vesicaria subsp. taraxacifolia (Thuill.) Thell.
Poa orcuttiana Vasey
Ipomoea heterophylla Ortega
Arabis furcata S.Watson
Epilobium exaltatum Drew
Stephanomeria blairii Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Solanum heterodoxum var. setigeroides Whalen
Cuscuta brachycalyx (Yunck.) Yunck.
Festuca arida Elmer
Galvezia speciosa (Nutt.) A.Gray
Lindernia dubia var. dubia
Malaxis soulei L.O.Williams
Oxytheca parishii var. goodmaniana Ertter
Viguiera triangularis M.E.Jones
Pyrus kawakamii Hayata
Lotus argophyllus var. decorus Ottley
Elytrigia pontica (Podp.) Holub
Viguiera longifolia (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) S.F.Blake
Hemizonia pungens subsp. pungens
Cymopterus Raf.
Gilia hutchinsifolia Rydb.
Astragalus preussii var. latus M.E.Jones
Monotropa hypopithys subsp. latisquama (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Angelica L.
Lesquerella kingii (S.Watson) S.Watson
Oxytheca parishii var. cienegensis Ertter
Cuscuta indecora var. neuropetala Hitchc.
Malacothrix DC.
Byttneria aculeata (Jacq.) Jacq.
Ceanothus velutinus subsp. velutinus
Navarretia sinistra subsp. sinistra
Lotus argophyllus var. fremontii Ottley
Sitanion hystrix var. hystrix
Populus ×parryi Sarg.
Acalypha brachystachya Hornem.
Malacothrix foliosa A.Gray
Cleome isomeris Greene
Lilium washingtonianum var. washingtonianum
Coreopsis californica subsp. californica
Euphorbia exstipulata var. exstipulata
Navarretia plieantha Mason
Prosopis chilensis (Molina) Stuntz
Arabis pulchra var. pulchra
Camissonia pallida subsp. hallii (Davidson) P.H.Raven
Festuca brachyphylla subsp. breviculmis Fred.
Camissonia claviformis subsp. aurantiaca (S.Watson) P.H.Raven
Lotus procumbens var. procumbens
Ageratum corymbosum Zucc.
Rorippa curvipes var. truncata (Jeps.) Rollins
Calyptridium parryi var. martirense Guilliams, M.G.Simpson & Rebman
Medicago orbicularis (L.) Bartal.
Madia yosemitana Parry ex A.Gray
Eriogonum pyrolifolium Hook.
Eupatorium palmeri A.Gray
Mammillaria microcarpa Engelm.
Helenium amarum (Raf.) H.Rock
Allionia choisyi Standl.
Amaranthus crassipes var. warnockii (I.M.Johnst.) Henrickson
Delphinium pratense Eastw.
Chlorogalum (Lindl.) Kunth
Festuca ovina var. ingrata Beal
Silene krantzii Stoughton
Navarretia divaricata subsp. vividior (Jeps. & V.L.Bailey) H.Mason
Leontodon taraxacoides subsp. taraxacoides
Stipa coronata var. coronata
Hemizonia parryi subsp. parryi
Quercus cerris L.
Eryngium vaseyi var. vaseyi
Portulaca oleracea subsp. impolita Danin & H.G.Baker
Xanthisma grindelioides var. grindelioides
Crataegus okanaganensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Ranunculus aquatilis var. harrisii L.D.Benson
Phlox stansburyi var. brevifolia (A.Gray) E.E.Nelson
Navarretia linearifolia subsp. linearifolia
Elymus glaucus subsp. jepsonii (Burtt Davy) Gould
Acer oblongum Wall. ex DC.
Fatsia japonica (Thunb.) Decne. & Planch.
Mandevilla ×amabilis (Backh.) Dress
Farfugium Lindl.
Myriocephalus stuartii (F.Muell. & Sond.) Benth.
Tagetes patula L.
Eucharis grandiflora Planch. & Linden
Persea americana var. floccosa (Mez) Scora
Ocotea botrantha Rohwer
Sasa borealis (Hack.) Makino & Shibata
Chimonanthus praecox (L.) Link
Trifolium reflexum L.
Trifolium berytheum Boiss. & Blanche
Corynocarpus laevigata Forst.
Diospyros austroafricana DeWinter
Acalypha wilkesiana Müll.Arg.
Manihot grahamii Hook.
Acacia aspera Lindl.
Acacia verniciflua A.Cunn.
Bauhinia punctata Bolle
Calpurnia aurea (Aiton) Benth.
Cercis siliquastrum L.
Lens culinaris Medik.
Medicago doliata Carmign.
Trigonella foenum-graecum L.
Geraniaceae
Poliomintha longiflora A.Gray
Nepeta faassenii Bergmans ex Stearn
Gossypium sturtianum var. nandewarense (Derera) Fryxell
Hibiscus heterophyllus Vent.
Ficus kingiana Hemsl.
Ficus monckii Hassl.
Ficus superba (Miq.) Miq.
Myoporum tenuifolium G.Forst.
Angophora cordifolia Cav.
Callistemon sieberi DC.
Eucalyptus brockwayi C.A.Gardner
Eucalyptus exserta F.Muell.
Eucalyptus foecunda Schauer
Leptospermum flavescens J.E.Sm.
Leptospermum scoparium Forst.
Passiflora ×alatocaerulea Lindl.
Macadamia tetraphylla L.A.S.Johnson
Casimiroa tetrameria Millsp.
Citrus medica var. ethrog Engl.
Heterodendrum oleifolium Desf.
Deutzia Thunb.
Saxifraga sarmentosa L.fil.
Solandra guttata D.Don
Tetrastigma voinieranum (Baltet) Pierre ex Gagnep.
Yucca recurvifolia Salisb.
Aglaonema commutatum Schott
Asparagus virgatus Baker
Avena hirtula Lag.
Zoysia matrella (L.) Merr.
Trifolium lappaceum L.
Aegilops biuncialis Vis.
Triticum aestivum subsp. compactum (Host) Mackey
Triticum boeoticum Boiss.
Triticum timopheevii var. viticulosum Zhuk.
Triticum zhukovskyi Menabde & Erizin
Triticum turgidum subsp. georgicum (Dekapr. & Menabde) Mackey
Phaseolus acutifolius var. acutifolius
Persea indica (L.) Spreng.
Hibiscus tiliaceus L.
Moraea fergusoniae L.Bolus
Babiana angustifolia Sweet
Aloe marlothii A.Berger
Salvia lavanduloides Kunth
Ipomoea aquatica Forssk.
Erythrina lysistemon Hutch.
Dalea capitata S.Watson
Nemesia strumosa (Benth.) Benth.
Boehmeria Jacq.
Citrus ×bergamia Risso
Limonia acidissima L.
Atalantia monophylla (Roxb.) A.DC.
Eucalyptus formanii C.A.Gardner
Boissiera pumilio (Trin.) Stapf
Aloe suprafoliata Pole-Evans
Aloe dyeri Schönland
Aloe spicata L.f.
×Chitalpa tashkentensis T.S.Elias & Wisura
Babiana Ker Gawl.
Solanum jasminoides Paxton
Pueraria lobata (Willd.) Ohwi
Dombeya Cav.
Stevia rebaudiana (Bertoni) Bertoni
Persicaria odorata (Lour.) Soják
Impatiens balsamina L.
Liatris spicata (L.) Willd.
Agastache cana (Hook.) Wooton & Standl.
Tagetes L.
Dalechampia convolvuloides Lam.
Diospyros palmeri Eastw.
Cattleya Lindl.
Thelocactus rinconensis (Poselg.) Britton & Rose
Drimia maritima (L.) Stearn
Nicotiana obtusifolia var. obtusifolia
Quercus texana Buckley
Dithyrea californica var. californica
Bromus sitchensis var. marginatus (Nees ex Steud.) B.Boivin
Sibara deserti (M.E.Jones) Rollins
Arctostaphylos mewukka subsp. mewukka
Schkuhria multiflora var. multiflora
Iresine hartmanii Uline
Matelea altatensis (Brandegee) Woodson
Sanicula simulans Hoover
Sarcostemma clausum (Jacq.) Roem. & Schult.
Chrysanthemum L.
Oxybaphus comata (Small) Weath.
Ericameria diffusum Benth.
Machaeranthera pattersonii (A.Gray) Greene
Isocoma menziesii var. diabolica G.L.Nesom
Stevia serrata var. ivaefolia (Willd.) B.L.Rob., 1930
Trichocoronis wrightii (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Zexmenia podocephala (A.Gray) A.Gray
Caulanthus major var. major
Caulostramina jaegeri (Rollins) Rollins
Carex brevipes W.Boott ex Mack.
Carex teneriformis Mack.
Scirpus cernuus var. californicus (Torr.) Beetle
Allium peninsulare var. crispum (Greene) Jeps.
Cercocarpus breviflorus A.Gray
Aster commutatus (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Calea urticifolia (Mill.) DC.
Calycadenia ciliosa Greene
Iresine celosia L.
Cirsium grahamii A.Gray
Encelia virginensis var. virginensis
Gaillardia pinnatifida var. linearis (Rydb.) Biddulph
Haplopappus whitneyi A.Gray
Pectis imberbis A.Gray
Senecio quercetorum Greene
Zinnia angustifolia Kunth
Streptanthus brachiatus subsp. brachiatus
Thelypodium howellii subsp. howellii
Lupinus nanus subsp. latifolius (Benth. ex Torr.) D.B.Dunn
Gomphrena viridis Wooton & Standl.
Oxytheca luteola Parry
Gnaphalium pringlei A.Gray
Encelia argophylla (D.C.Eaton) A.Gray
Hofmeisteria standleyi (S.F.Blake) R.King & H.Rob.
Hemizonia minthornii Jeps.
Pectis uniaristata var. uniaristata
Viguiera reticulata S.Watson
Spergularia atrosperma R.Rossbach
Mentzelia involucrata var. megalantha I.M.Johnst.
Habenaria dilatata var. leucostachys (Lindl.) Ames
Lasianthaea ceanothifolia var. gradata (S.F.Blake) K.M.Becker
Chamaesyce polycarpa var. hirtella (Boiss.) Millsp.
Ilex L.L.
Verbena ambrosifolia Rydb.
Atriplex erecticaulis Stutz, G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.
Polygala L.
Abronia umbellata subsp. alba (Eastw.) Munz
Orobanche uniflora var. purpurea (A.Heller) Achey
Sphaeralcea subhastata var. thyrsoidea (Kearney) Kearney
Distichlis Raf.
Polygonum douglasii subsp. johnstonii (Munz) J.C.Hickman
Aquilegia formosa var. hypolasia (Greene) Munz
Ranunculus canus var. laetus (Greene) L.D.Benson
Malus sylvestris Mill.
Drymocallis cuneifolia var. ewanii (D.D.Keck) Ertter
Potentilla wheeleri var. wheeleri
Lithophragma affine subsp. mixtum R.L.Taylor
Philadelphus lewisii subsp. californicus (Benth.) Munz
Castilleja ambigua subsp. insalutata (Jeps.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Mimulus barbatus Greene
Petunia axillaris (Lam.) Britton
Kummerowia stipulacea (Maxim.) Makino
Lotus mearnsii (Britton) Greene
Deschampsia danthonioides var. gracilis (Vasey) Munz
Mimosa grahamii var. lemmonii (A.Gray) Kearney & Peebles
Dalea pogonathera A.Gray
Aster aquifolius (Greene ex Wooton & Standl.) S.F.Blake
Horkelia fusca subsp. tenella (S.Watson) D.D.Keck
Lepidium medium var. pubescens (Greene) B.L.Rob.
Mammillaria heyderi var. macdougalii (Rose) L.D.Benson
Lobelia laxiflora var. angustifolia A.DC.
Eucalyptus amplifolia Naudin
Astragalus gilensis Greene
Lupinus cutleri Eastw.
Ditaxis cyanophylla Wooton & Standl.
Mentzelia pumila var. multiflora (Nutt.) Urb. & Gilg
Eriogonum zionis Howell
Coreopsis douglasii (DC.) Hall
Astragalus famelicus E.Sheld.
Viola papilionacea Pursh
Sphaeralcea fendleri subsp. fendleri
Opuntia cholla F.A.C.Weber
Streptopus curvipes Vail
Agropyron cristatum var. desertorum (Fisch. ex Link) Dorn
Isomeris arborea var. angustata Parish
Navarretia saximontana S.C.Spencer
Calylophus hartwegii (Benth.) Raven
Trifolium monanthum var. grantianum (A.Heller) Parish
Gilia rigidula Benth.
Polygala macradenia A.Gray
Sparganium chlorocarpum Rydb.
Hypericum formosum subsp. scouleri (Hook.) C.L.Hitchc.
Samolus vagans Greene
Delphinium amabile Tidestr.
Ptelea angustifolia Benth.
Castilleja laxa A.Gray
Physalis hederifolia var. cordifolia (A.Gray) Waterf.
Carex geophila Mack.
Euphorbia graminea var. graminea
Malaxis porphyrea (Ridl.) Kuntze
Andropogon cirratus Hack.
Andropogon wrightii Hack.
Aristida adscensionis var. abortiva A.Beetle
Aristida parishii Hitchc.
Bouteloua chondrosioides (Kunth) Benth.
Leptoloma cognata (Schult.) Chase
Canavalia villosa Benth.
Dalea tomentosa var. mota Barneby
Hedeoma Pers.
Mentzelia longiloba var. pinacatensis J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Cladocolea mcvaughii Kuijt
Thelypodium flavescens S.Watson
Ficus maxima Mill.
Maclura tinctoria (L.) D.Don ex Steud.
Salpianthus purpurascens (Lag.) Hook. & Arn.
Camissonia lewisii Raven
Oserya coulteriana Tul.
Linanthus aureus (Nutt.) Greene
Colubrina glabra S.Watson
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. multiscapum Gand.
Bromus breviaristatus Buckley
Cephalanthus salicifolius Humb. & Bonpl.
Machaeranthera canescens subsp. ziegleri Munz
Gilia brecciarum subsp. jacens (A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant) A.G.Day
Eragrostis diffusa Buckley
Lesquerella peninsularis Wiggins
Thouinia villosa DC.
Penstemon linarioides subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Capraria biflora L.
Scoparia dulcis L.
Melochia pyramidata L.
Ophiocephalus angustifolius Wiggins
Laurentia fluviatilis (R.Br.) E.Wimm.
Castela Turpin
Celtis monoica Hemsl.
Urtica chamaedryoides Pursh
Agrostis microphylla var. intermedia Beetle
Cyperus aggregatus (Willd.) Endl.
Bouteloua quiriegoensis Beetle
Eragrostis maypurensis (Kunth) Steud.
Nolana acuminata (Miers) Miers ex Dunal
Populus fremontii var. macdougallii (Rose) Jeps.
Iresine interrupta Benth.
Monardella breweri subsp. glandulifera (I.M.Johnst.) Elvin
Lotus crassifolius var. otayensis Moran ex Isely
Phalaris brachystachys Link
Monardella viridis subsp. saxicola (I.M.Johnst.) Ewan
Castilleja linoides A.Gray
Lotus strigosus var. hirtellus Ottley
Lactuca muralis (L.) E.Mey.
Lepidium ramosissimum var. bourgeauanum (Thell.) Rollins
Menodora scabra var. ramosissima Steyerm.
Cardamine californica var. cuneata (Greene) Rollins
Bernardia Houst. ex Mill.
Sida procumbens Sw.
Calliandra reticulata A.Gray
Philadelphus madrensis Hemsl.
Pediocactus Britton & Rose
Iresine R.Br.
Lotus argophyllus subsp. decorus (I.M.Johnst.) Munz
Tagetes minuta L.
Polygonum pensylvanicum L.
Agoseris glauca var. monticola (Greene) Q.Jones
Tillandsia usneoides (L.) L.
Echinopepon Naudin
Zigadenus micranthus var. fontanus (Eastw.) O.S.Walsh ex McNeal
Cynodon Rich.
Raillardella scabrida Eastw.
Poa tenerrima Scribn.
Allophyllum violaceum (A.Heller) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia capitata subsp. tomentosa (Eastw. ex Brand) V.E.Grant
Sarcostemma crispum Benth.
Coronilla L.
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. hansenii (Greene) D.D.Keck
Ratibida columnaris (Sims) Raf.
Lotus procumbens var. jepsonii (Ottley) Ottley
Descurainia paradisa subsp. paradisa
Rhamnus tomentella subsp. ursina (Greene) Sawyer
Myoporaceae
Apacheria chiricahuensis C.T.Mason
Ranunculus aquatilis var. subrigidus (W.B.Drew) Breitung
Heuchera rubescens var. rydbergiana Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Lepidium latipes var. heckardii Rollins
Pseudognaphalium canescens subsp. thermale (E.E.Nelson) Kartesz
Delphinium occidentale var. cucullatum (A.Nelson) R.J.Davis
Claytonia perfoliata var. utahensis (Rydb.) Poelln.
Astragalus zionis var. vigulus S.L.Welsh
Artemisia tridentata var. parishii (A.Gray) Jeps.
Myrtaceae
Lupinus bicolor subsp. bicolor
Elytrigia intermedia subsp. intermedia
Cryptantha circumscissa var. rosulata J.T.Howell
Galium trifidum var. pusillum A.Gray
Cirsium scariosum var. scariosum
Gilia nemophilophylla J.M.Porter
Erigeron chrysopsidis subsp. chrysopsidis
Potentilla wheeleri var. rimicola Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Sedum sexangulare L.
Eryngium aristulatum var. hooveri M.Y.Sheikh
Lotus argophyllus var. ornithopus (Greene) Ottley
Leontodon saxatilis Lam.
Asclepias physocarpa (E.Mey.) Schltr.
Malcolmia maritima (L.) W.T.Aiton
Acer paxii Franch.
Huernia zebrina N.E.Br.
Thevetia thevetioides (Kunth) K.Schum.
Coreopsis grandiflora Hogg ex Sw.
Brachychiton australis (Schott & Endl.) Terracino
Persea palustris Sarg.
Liabum polycephalum Urb. & Ekman
Capsicum frutescens L.
Clerodendrum bungei Steud.
Platanus orientalis L.
Chorisia insignis Kunth
Sarcococca ruscifolia Stapf
Opuntia stricta (Haw.) Haw.
Fuchsia thymifolia Kunth
Lonicera hildebrandtiana Collett & Hemsl.
Euonymus japonicus var. aureovariegatus Regel
Ipomoea sagittata Poir.
Kalanchoe luciae Raym.-Hamet
Echeveria rubromarginata Rose
Escallonia ingrami Hort.
Acacia brachybotrya Benth.
Cyamopsis tetragonoloba (L.) Taub.
Gleditsia sinensis Lam.
Mimosa polycarpa Kunth
Castanea Mill.
Pelargonium quercifolium (L.) L'Hér.
Abutilon megapotamicum (A.Spreng.) A.St.-Hil. & Naudin
Gossypium triphyllum (Harv.) Hochr.
Hibiscus mutabilis L.
Melianthus minor L.
Moraceae
Ficus hederacea Roxb.
Ficus nekbudu Warb.
Ficus watkinsiana F.M.Bailey
Eremophila decipiens Ostenf.
Callistemon brachyandrus Lindl.
Callistemon speciosus (Sims) Sweet
Eucalyptus melliodora A.Cunn. ex Schauer
Eucalyptus calycogona Turcz.
Eucalyptus forrestiana Diels
Eucalyptus papuana F.Muell.
Melaleuca decussata R.Br.
Psidium L.
Jasminum humile var. revolutum (Sims) Stokes
Passiflora alata Curtis
Banksia ericifolia L.fil.
Polygonum aubertii L.Henry
Hovenia dulcis Thunb.
Prunus campanulata Maxim.
Spiraea nipponica Maxim.
Tetradium daniellii (Benn.) T.G.Hartley
Fortunella obovata hort. ex Tanaka
Orixa japonica Thunb.
Triphasia trifoliata (L.) DC.
Lycium halimifolium Mill.
Ternstroemia gymnanthera (Wight & Arn.) Sprague
Zelkova serrata (Thunb.) Makino
Ampelopsis brevipedunculata Maxim. ex Trautv.
Aristea ecklonii Baker
Asparagus scandens Thunb.
Hymenocallis littoralis (Jacq.) Salisb.
Trifolium clusii Godr.
Aegilops peregrina var. brachyathera (Boiss.) Maire & Weiller
Triticum dicoccoides (Asch. & Graebn.) Schweinf.
Cyrtanthus herrei (F.M.Leight.) R.A.Dyer
Apocynaceae
Aloe ramosissima Pillans
Hydrocotyle L.
Salvia purpurea Cav.
Persea pachypoda Nees
Diospyros rekoi Standl.
Hedysarum coronarium L.
Chasmanthe aethiopica (L.) N.E.Br.
Lachenalia unicolor Jacq.
Dicentra eximia (Ker Gawl.) Torr.
Tabebuia chrysotricha (Mart. ex DC.) Standl.
Citrus reticulata Blanco
Murraya paniculata (L.) Jack
Eucalyptus tintinnans (Blakely & Jacobs) L.A.S.Johnson & K.D.Hill
Aloe immaculata Pillans
Aloe chabaudii var. verekeri Christian
Aloe dumetorum B.Mathew & Brandham
Brugmansia Pers.
Moraea Mill.
Dombeya calantha K.Schum.
Syringa laciniata (L.) Mill.
Tanacetum balsamita L.
Perilla frutescens (L.) Britton
Begonia L.
Dendranthema indicum (L.) Des Moul.
Magnolia champaca (L.) Baill. ex Pierre
Harpullia cupanioides Roxb.
Saintpaulia H.Wendl.
Casuarina verticillata Lam.
Quillaja saponaria Molina
Meliosma pinnata subsp. barbulata (Cufod.) Beusekom ex Welzen
Microcitrus australasica var. sanguinea (F.M.Bailey) Swingle
Erigeron chrysopsidis var. austiniae (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Narcissus boutignyanus Philippe
Utricularia vulgaris subsp. macrorhiza (Leconte) Clausen
Camissonia boothii subsp. condensata (Munz) P.H.Raven
Eucalyptus parviflora F.Muell.
Calendula tripterocarpa Rupr.
Amphipappus fremontii subsp. spinosus (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Acer glabrum var. neomexicanum (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Ageratina yecorana B.L.Turner
Aster pauciflorus Nutt.
Funastrum cynanchoides var. cynanchoides
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. stenophyllus (A.Gray) L.C.Anderson
Erigeron colomexicanus A.Nelson
Eupatorium solidaginifolium A.Gray
Helenium mexicanum Kunth
Machaeranthera arenaria (Benth.) Shinners
Haplopappus brickellioides S.F.Blake
Tetradymia canescens var. inermis (Rydb.) Payson
Townsendia sericea Hook.
Xanthocephalum wrightii (A.Gray) A.Gray
Arabis parishii S.Watson
Stanleya pinnata subsp. inyoensis Munz & J.C.Roos
Acer saccharum subsp. grandidentatum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Desmarais
Gaultheria Kalm ex L.
Acalypha lindheimeri Müll.Arg.
Acmispon strigosus var. hirtellus (Greene) D.W.Taylor
Calia secundiflora (Ortega) Yakovlev
Allium nevadense subsp. cristatum (S.Watson) Traub & Ownbey
Monardella villosa subsp. subserrata (Greene) Epling
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. celata (Jeps.) C.L.Hitchc.
Cordylanthus wrightii subsp. tenuifolius (Pennell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Amaranthus powellii x retroflexus
Arnica parryi var. sonnei (Greene) Cronquist
Chrysothamnus axillaris D.D.Keck
Decachaeta scabrella (B.L.Rob.) R.King & H.Rob.
Egletes viscosa (L.) Less.
Haplopappus martirensis (Wiggins) S.F.Blake
Machaeranthera pinnatifida subsp. pinnatifida
Haplopappus racemosus (Nutt.) Torr.
Schkuhria wislizeni var. frustrata S.F.Blake
Viguiera dentata var. dentata
Carex angustior Mack.
Salvia dorrii subsp. gilmanii (Epling) Abrams
Chlorogalum purpureum var. reductum Hoover
Sidalcea malviflora var. uliginosa C.L.Hitchc.
Acmella radicans var. radicans
Xanthosoma hoffmannii (Schott) Schott
Pteryxia hendersonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Cornus sericea var. sericea
Aristolochia sinaloae Brandegee
Calylophus hartwegii subsp. toumeyi (Small) Towner & P.H.Raven
Machaeranthera pinnatifida var. scabrella (Greene) B.L.Turner & R.L.Hartm.
Hemizonia arida D.D.Keck
Viguiera lanata (Kellogg) A.Gray
Carex paucicostata Mack.
Astragalus funereus M.E.Jones
Chrysanthemum segetum L.
Evolvulus alsinoides var. acapulcensis (Willd. ex Schult.) Ooststr.
Carex heteroneura var. heteroneura
Chylismia brevipes subsp. pallidula (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Linanthus jaegeri (Munz) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Penstemon clevelandii subsp. connatus (Munz & Johnst.) D.D.Keck
Gilia inconspicua var. sinuata (Douglas ex Benth.) A.Gray
Linanthus dianthiflorus subsp. farinosus (Brand) H.Mason
Eriogonum cernuum var. viminale (S.Stokes) Reveal
Polygonum cuspidatum Siebold & Zucc.
Dodecatheon hansenii (Greene) H.J.Thomps.
Isopyrum occidentale Hook. & Arn.
Ranunculus canus var. ludovicianus (Greene) L.D.Benson
Ceanothus integerrimus var. californicus (Kellogg ex Durand & B.D.Jacks.) G.T.Benson
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. nevadensis (S.Watson) D.D.Keck
Heuchera micrantha var. erubescens (A.Br. & Bouché) Rosend.
Heuchera rubescens var. glandulosa Kellogg
Saxifraga fragarioides Greene
Cordylanthus hansenii (Ferris) J.F.Macbr.
Penstemon eatonii subsp. eatonii
Penstemon rattanii subsp. kleei (Greene) D.D.Keck
Fremontodendron californicum subsp. obispoense (Eastw.) Munz
Nemacladus australis (Munz) Morin
Lotus oroboides (Kunth) Ottley
Saccharum ravennae (L.) L.
Festuca grayi (Abrams) Piper
Festuca tracyi Hitchc.
Poa epilis Scribn.
Rhynchosia edulis Griseb.
Cologania longifolia A.Gray
Oenothera deltoides var. deltoides
Lomatium ciliolatum var. ciliolatum
Chrysanthemum maximum Ramond
Ivesia lycopodioides subsp. megalopetala (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Cryptantha capitata (Eastw.) I.M.Johnst.
Cardaria Desv.
Mammillaria milleri (Britton & Rose) Boed.
Stanleya integrifolia E.James
Dichondra brachypoda Wooton & Standl.
Magnolia grandiflora L.
Melianthus major L.
Agastache pallidiflora subsp. neomexicana (Briq.) Lint & Epling
Mentzelia asperula Wooton & Standl.
Abutilon sonorae A.Gray
Oenothera avita (W.M.Klein) W.M.Klein
Polemonium pulcherrimum subsp. delicatum (Rydb.) Brand
Rubus idaeus subsp. sachalinensis (H.Lév.) Focke
Cordylanthus kingii subsp. densiflorus T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Penstemon confusus subsp. patens (M.E.Jones) D.D.Keck
Dithyrea californica var. clinata (J.F.Macbr. & Payson) Wiggins
Opuntia prolifera Engelm.
Oxybaphus coccineus Torr.
Drymaria polystachya var. diffusa (Rose) Wiggins
Ipomoea meyeri (Spreng.) G.Don
Sideroxylon lanuginosum subsp. rigidum (A.Gray) T.D.Penn.
Merremia quinquefolia (L.) Hallier fil.
Verbena pinetorum Moldenke
Tradescantia scopulorum Rose
Cyperus manimae var. asperrimus (Liebm.) Kük.
Manihot rubricaulis subsp. isoloba (Standl.) D.J.Rogers & Appan
Stipa neomexicana (Thurb.) Scribn.
Centrosema virginianum (L.) Benth.
Crotalaria cajanifolia Kunth
Dalea peninsularis (Rose) Bullock
Diphysa suberosa S.Watson
Lotus alamosanus (Rose) Gentry
Phaseolus micranthus Hook. & Arn.
Pithecellobium sonorae S.Watson
Rhynchosia Lour.
Quercus epileuca Trel.
Ardisia revoluta Kunth
Fraxinus greggii A.Gray
Gongylocarpus rubricaulis Cham. & Schltdl.
Loeselia ciliata L.
Polygala berlandieri S.Watson
Lotus benthamii Greene
Pteryxia terebinthina var. californica (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Pectis L.
Populus monticola Mert. ex Loudon
Dichanthelium oligosanthes subsp. scribnerianum (Nash) Freckmann & Lelong
Castilleja ambigua subsp. humboldtiensis (D.D.Keck) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Russelia sonorensis Carlson
Solanum gracile Otto ex W.Baxter
Alchemilla arvensis (L.) Scop.
Cissus mayoensis Gentry
Guaiacum coulteri var. coulteri
Trifolium microdon var. pilosum Eastw.
Myosurus minimus var. filiformis Greene
Packera layneae (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Anthericum durangense Greenm.
Lomatium ciliolatum var. hooveri Mathias & Constance
Diectomis fastigiata (Sw.) P.Beauv.
Aristida barbata E.Fourn.
Setaria longipila E.Fourn.
Urera baccifera (L.) Gaudich. ex Wedd.
Danthonia americana Scribn.
Polygonum polygaloides subsp. esotericum (Wheeler) J.C.Hickman
Horkelia californica subsp. californica
Valerianella locusta (L.) Betcke
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. zacaensis (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Strelitzia reginae Banks
Cardamine pachystigma var. pachystigma
Boerhavia scandens L.
Piper L.
Cyperus schweinitzii Torr.
Senecio bernardinus Greene
Eleocharis montevidensis var. parishii (Britton) V.E.Grant
Bacopa rotundifolia (Michx.) Wettst.
Carex deweyana subsp. leptopoda (Mack.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Coryphantha vivipara var. rosea (Clokey) L.D.Benson
Rorippa gambellii (S.Watson) Rollins & Al-Shehbaz
Elymus virescens Piper
Saxifraga ferruginea Graham
Matricaria maritima L.
Chaenomeles speciosa (Sweet) Nakai
Agrostis californica Trin.
Dendromecon rigida subsp. rigida
Lepidium fremontii var. stipitatum Rollins
Yucca whipplei var. caespitosa M.E.Jones
Monardella australis subsp. gabrielensis Elvin & A.C.Sanders
Atriplex joaquinana A.Nelson
Coryphantha chlorantha (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Gnaphalium canescens subsp. canescens
Crepis pulchra L.
Trimorpha lonchophylla (Hook.) G.L.Nesom
Sapium sebiferum (L.) Roxb.
Brodiaea californica var. californica
Pseudognaphalium canescens subsp. beneolens (Davidson) Kartesz
Limnanthes striata Jeps.
Artemisia nova var. duchesnicola S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Mimulus viscidus Congd.
Senecio cineraria DC.
Stephanomeria cinerea (S.F.Blake) S.F.Blake
Ludwigia erecta (L.) Hara
Linanthus grandiflorus (Benth.) Greene
Keckiella breviflora subsp. glabrisepala (D.D.Keck) Straw
Chamaesyce abramsiana (L.C.Wheeler) Koutnik
Antirrhinum orontium L.
Astragalus praelongus var. avonensis (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) S.L.Welsh
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. occidentalis (Greene) Stuckey
Lewisia glandulosa (Rydb.) Dempster
Artemisia tridentata subsp. arbuscula (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Sphaeralcea gierischii N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh
Microseris laciniata subsp. laciniata
Antennaria pulchella Greene
Armeria arenaria (Pers.) Schult.
Astragalus pycnostachyus var. lanosissimus (Rydb.) Munz
Acokanthera oppositifolia (Lam.) Codd
Ceropegia sandersonii Decne.
Justicia leonardii Wassh.
Craspedia uniflora G.Forst.
Parthenium fruticosum Less.
Pimpinella anisum L.
Sansevieria lavranii Webb & Myklebust
Berberis thunbergii var. atropurpurea Chenault
Viburnum odoratissimum Ker Gawl.
Cistus incanus subsp. incanus
Ipomoea lapathifolia Hallier fil.
Ipomoea tricolor Cav.
Elaeagnus pungens Thunb.
Enkianthus campanulatus (Miq.) G.Nicholson
Acacia caven (Molina) Molina
Acacia dietrichiana F.Muell.
Acacia jonesii F.Muell. & Maiden
Acacia undulata Willd. ex H.L.Wendl.
Cicer bijugum Rech.f.
Cicer pinnatifidum Jaub. & Spach
Virgilia divaricata Adamson
Scaevola crassifolia Labill.
Lavandula pinnata Lundmark
Neocinnamomum delavayi (Lecomte) H.Liou
Lavatera thuringiaca L.
Tibouchina urvilleana (DC.) Cogn.
Ficus thonningii Blume
Ficus obliqua var. petiolaris (Benth.) Corner
Ficus ulmifolia Lam.
Eremophila serrulata (A.DC.) Druce
Eucalyptus morrisii R.T.Baker
Eucalyptus bancroftii (Maiden) Maiden
Eucalyptus concinna Maiden & Blakely
Eucalyptus sessilis (Maiden) Blakely
Melaleuca huegelii Endl.
Melaleuca wilsonii F.Muell.
Osmanthus fortunei Carrière
Dryandra quercifolia Meisn.
Hakea muelleriana J.M.Black
Helleborus corsicus Mabille
Diosma ericoides Lam.
Hesperethusa crenulata (Roxb.) Roem.
Populus tomentosa Carrière
Iochroma lanceolatum Miers
Keraudrenia hillii F.Muell. ex Benth.
Gordonia lasianthus L. ex Ellis
Duranta stenostachya Tod.
Spathiphyllum Schott
Asparagus
Eucomis pole-evansii N.E.Br.
Dichanthium sericeum (R.Br.) A.Camus
Melaleuca lateritia Otto & A.Dietr.
Trifolium strictum L.
Aegilops caudata var. polyathera Boiss.
Aegilops comosa subsp. heldreichii (Boiss.) Eig
Aegilops longissima Schweinf. & Muschl.
Elymus nodosus (Steven ex Griseb.) Melderis
Ipomoea argentifolia A.Rich.
Euphorbia cymbifera (Schltdl.) V.W.Steinm.
Persea floccosa Mez
Aloe littoralis Baker
Cantua coerulea (Brand) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Oryzopsis holciformis (M.Bieb.) Hack.
Geum chiloense Balb. ex Ser.
Ficus benjamina var. comosa (Roxb.) Kurz
Eucalyptus loxophleba Benth.
Aloe parvibracteata Schönland
Liliaceae
Dyschoriste Nees
Salvia chiapensis Fernald
Quercus coccifera L.
Allium giganteum Regel
Aleurites fordii Hemsl.
Perovskia atriplicifolia Benth.
Rhapis humilis Blume
Esenbeckia runyonii Morton
Atalantia ceylanica (Arn.) Oliv.
Triphasia trifolia (Burm.fil.) P.Wilson
Senecio barbertonicus Klatt
Senecio articulatus (L.fil.) Sch.Bip.
Lobivia hertrichiana Backeb.
Townsendia montana var. caelilinensis S.L.Welsh
Setaria verticillata var. ambigua (Guss.) Parl.
Perityle Benth.
Crotalaria eriocarpa var. viminalis (Rose) Windler & S.G.Skinner
Malacothamnus palmeri var. palmeri
Artemisia pacifica Nutt.
Centaurea rothrockii Greenm.
Ilex rubra S.Watson
Sanicula peckiana J.F.Macbr.
Chrysopsis viscida (A.Gray) Greene
Eatonella congdonii A.Gray
Eupatorium quadrangulare DC.
Tanacetum potentilloides (A.Gray) A.Gray
Arabis breweri var. breweri
Allium obtusum var. obtusum
Lilium wigginsii Beane & Vollmer
Verbena neomexicana Small
Acmella oppositifolia var. oppositifolia
Mandevilla stans (A.Gray) J.K.Williams
Chaetopappa fragilis (Brandegee) D.D.Keck
Hemizonia perennis (Greene) D.D.Keck
Erigeron bloomeri var. pubens D.D.Keck
Simsia setosa S.F.Blake
Tonestus peirsonii (D.D.Keck) G.L.Nesom & D.R.Morgan
Viguiera deltoidea var. deltoidea
Campanula elatines L.
Ageratella microphylla (Sch.Bip.) A.Gray ex S.Watson
Acer grandidentatum var. brachypterum (Wooton & Standl.) Palmer
Lomatium nuttallii var. alpinum (S.Watson) Mathias
Cercocarpus ledifolius var. ledifolius
Phlox viridis subsp. viridis
Funastrum hartwegii (Vail) Schltr.
Cirsium rhaphilepis (Hemsl.) Petr.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus var. hitchcockii Munz
Isocoma pluriflora (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Solidago L.
Osteospermum ecklonis (DC.) Norl.
Parthenium tomentosum var. stramonium (Greene) Rollins
Draba lemmonii var. lemmonii
Lupinus odoratus var. pilosellus C.P.Sm.
Hemizonia multicaulis subsp. vernalis D.D.Keck
Machaeranthera parviflora A.Gray
Linanthus bernardinus N.S.Fraga & D.S.Bell
Oenothera deltoides subsp. eurekensis Munz & J.C.Roos
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. tenuifolia (Nutt.) H.M.Hall
Chorizanthe angustifolia var. eastwoodiae Goodman
Sphaeralcea fendleri subsp. venusta Kearney
Eriogonum cithariforme var. cithariforme
Agrostis clivicola Crampton
Eriogonum parvifolium var. paynei (C.B.Wolf ex Munz) Reveal
Delphinium gypsophilum subsp. gypsophilum
Cordylanthus eremicus (Coville & C.V.Morton) Munz
Petunia ×atkinsiana (Sweet) D.Don ex W.H.Baxter
Distichlis spicata var. nana Beetle
Elymus saundersii Vasey
Oryzopsis webberi (Thurb.) Benth. ex Vasey
Psoralea mephitica S.Watson
Spartina densiflora Brongn.
Oxybaphus linearis var. decipiens (Standl.) Kearney & Peebles
Lesquerella montana (A.Gray) S.Watson
Coryphantha vivipara var. arizonica (Engelm.) W.T.Marshall
Neolloydia intertexta (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Ipomoea purpurea var. diversifolia (Lindl.) O'Donell
Potentilla fissa Nutt.
Galium serpenticum subsp. serpenticum
Astragalus ceramicus var. filifolius (A.Gray) F.J.Herm.
Penstemon unilateralis Rydb.
Carex ormantha (Fernald) Mack.
Ferocactus acanthodes (Lem.) Britton & Rose
Maianthemum bifolium var. kamtschaticum (J.F.Gmel.) Trautv. & C.A.Mey.
Opuntia violacea var. gosseliniana (F.A.C.Weber) L.D.Benson
Boerhavia megaptera Standl.
Oxalis grayii (Rose) R.Knuth
Muhlenbergia curtifolia Scribn.
Phlox cluteana A.Nelson
Panicum arizonicum Scribn. & Merr.
Samolus floribundus Kunth
Condalia ericoides (A.Gray) M.C.Johnst.
Potentilla thurberi var. atrorubens (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Cucurbita cylindrata L.H.Bailey
Penstemon barbatus subsp. trichander (Gray) D.D.Keck
Ibervillea fusiformis (E.J.Lott) Kearns
Urtica gracilenta Greene
Pappophorum vaginatum Buckley
Desmodium scorpiurus (Sw.) Desv.
Achimenes grandiflora (Schiede) A.DC.
Krameria secundiflora DC.
Elymus hispidus subsp. hispidus
Royena lycioides Desf. ex A.DC.
Crusea coronata B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Camissoniopsis hardhamiae (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Stemodia pusilla Benth.
Physalis wrightii A.Gray
Talinum validulum Greene
Ipomoea coccinea var. hederifolia (L.) A.Gray
Urera Gaudich.
Streptanthus albidus subsp. peramoenus (Greene) Kruckeb.
Commelina tuberosa L.
Bulbostylis Kunth
Dalea brachystachya A.Gray
Navarretia viscidula subsp. purpurea (Greene) Mason
Hierochloe occidentalis Buckley
Encyclia adenocarpa (Lex.) Schltr.
Aristida jorullensis Kunth
Muhlenbergia tenella (Kunth) Trin.
Lycium carolinianum Walter
Caulanthus amplexicaulis var. amplexicaulis
Lippia nodiflora (L.) Michx.
Watsonia marginata (L.f.) Ker Gawl.
Scirpus cyperinus var. brachypodus (Fernald) Gilly
Oxalis corniculata subsp. pilosa (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Lourteig
Arenaria saxosa A.Gray
Furcraea Vent.
Aliciella Brand
Machaeranthera tortifolia var. tortifolia
Haplopappus zionis L.C.Anderson
Lupinus holmgrenianus C.P.Sm.
Gilia latiflora subsp. excellens (Brand) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Coronopus squamatus (Forssk.) Asch.
Hieracium argutum var. parishii (A.Gray) Jeps.
Rudbeckia klamathensis P.B.Cox & Urbatsch
Limnanthes gracilis Howell
Hieracium diaphanum Fr.
Layia ziegleri Munz
Piptochaetium setosum Arechav.
Argemone munita subsp. robusta G.B.Ownbey
Euphorbia loricata Lam.
Opuntia parishii Orcutt
Keckiella rothrockii subsp. jacintensis (Abrams) Straw
Polygonum prolificum (Small) B.L.Rob.
Trichocoronis wrightii var. wrightii
Lomatium scabrum var. tripinnatum Goodrich
Aster foliaceus Lindl. ex DC.
Lycopus L.
Centaurium Hill
Persicaria bicornis (Raf.) Nieuwl.
Senecio arizonicus Greene
Melica geyeri var. geyeri
Isocoma acradenia subsp. acradenia
Sedum sanhedrinum A.Berger
Navarretia nigelliformis subsp. radians (J.T.Howell) A.G.Day
Calochortus purdyi Mast.
Luzula orestera Sharsm.
Diaperia verna var. verna
Elymus multiflorus (Banks & Sol. ex Hook.f.) Á.Löve & Connor
Cordylanthus Nutt. ex Benth.
Celosia argentea L.
Hoya carnosa (L.fil.) R.Br.
Gynura sarmentosa (Blume) A.DC.
Persea hintonii C.K.Allen
Orchidaceae
Salvia divinorum Epling & Játiva
Trifolium apertum Bobrov
Dalechampia roezliana Müll.Arg.
Restio Rottb.
Bixa orellana L.
Euonymus fortunei var. radicans (Siebold ex Miq.) Rehder
Combretum erythrophyllum (Burch.) Sond.
Ipomoea platensis Ker Gawl.
Coriaria L.
Escallonia bifida Link & Otto ex Engl.
Homalanthus populifolius Graham
Acacia myrtifolia (Sm.) Willd.
Acacia steedmanii Maiden & Blakely
Geoffroea decorticans (Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.) Burkart
Phaseolus coccineus L.
Robinia viscosa Michx. ex Vent.
Mentha citrata Ehrh.
Laurus canariensis Webb & Berthel.
Magnolia stellata (Siebold & Zucc.) Maxim.
Gossypium capitis-viridis Mauer
Hibiscus moscheutos L.
Melianthus L.
Ficus auriculata Lour.
Ficus capreifolia Delile
Ficus gnaphalocarpa Steud. ex Miq.
Ficus macrophylla subsp. columnaris (C.Moore) P.S.Green
Eremophila alternifolia R.Br.
Callistemon viridiflorus (Sieber ex Sims) Sweet
Eucalyptus botryoides Sm.
Eucalyptus mannifera Mudie
Eucalyptus macrocarpa Hook.
Eugenia brasiliensis Lam.
Melaleuca radula Lindl.
Monnina xalapensis Kunth
Hakea Schrad.
Pyrus pyrifolia (Burm.fil.) Nakai
Fortunella crassifolia Swingle
Gnidia polystachya P.J.Bergius
Billbergia Thunb.
Anigozanthos flavidus Redouté
Aloe bakeri Scott Elliot
Ornithogalum arabicum L.
Cymbidium canaliculatum var. sparkesii (Rendle) F.M.Bailey
Avena murphyi Ladiz.
Salvia leucantha Cav.
Aegilops speltoides var. speltoides
Haynaldia villosa (L.) Schur
Triticum araraticum Jakubz.
Bauhinia divaricata L.
Nerine sarniensis (L.) Herb.
Ulmus alata Michx.
Ipomoea murucoides Roem. & Schult.
Hedysarum carnosum Desf.
Schefflera pueckleri (K.Koch) Frodin
Bulbine Wolf
Manfreda Salisb.
Leucaena glauca Benth.
Lonicera fragrantissima Lindl. & Paxton
Hibiscus cannabinus L.
Aloe gracilis Haw.
Aloe microstigma Salm-Dyck
Aloe bulbillifera H.Perrier
Alyssum saxatile L.
Viburnum suspensum Lindl.
Anigozanthos Labill.
Dendriopoterium pulidoi Svent.
Urera caracasana (Jacq.) Griseb.
Begonia boliviensis A.DC.
Chrysactinia mexicana A.Gray
Cantua Juss. ex Lam.
Clymenia polyandra (Tanaka) Swingle
Murraya ovatifoliolata (Engl.) Domin
Sedum citrinum Zika
Delphinium scaposum var. andersonii (A.Gray) S.L.Welsh
Viola nuttallii var. praemorsa (Douglas) S.Watson
Eriogonum brevicaule var. cottamii (S.Stokes) Reveal
Sidalcea hickmanii subsp. napensis S.R.Hill
Astragalus laxmannii var. robustior (Hook.) Barneby & S.L.Welsh
Pediocactus peeblesianus (Croizat) L.D.Benson
Erythranthe pardalis (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Nicotiana obtusifolia var. palmeri (A.Gray) Kartesz
Carex cryptosperma Zika, D.S.Bell & L.J.Gross
Acer glabrum var. torreyi (Greene) Smiley
Brickellia diffusa (Vahl) A.Gray
Sarcostemma pannosum Decne.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. speciosus (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. pumilus (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Dyssodia concinna (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Haplopappus acradenius subsp. eremophilus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Hemizonia paniculata subsp. increscens Hall ex D.D.Keck
Schkuhria wislizenii Gray
Polygala obscura Benth.
Astragalus filipes var. residuus Jeps.
Frasera albicaulis var. nitida (Benth.) C.L.Hitchc.
Trillium rivale S.Watson
Arnica venosa Hall
Aster subspicatus Nees
Cymopterus ibapensis M.E.Jones
Donnellsmithia ternata (S.Watson) Mathias & Constance
Rhus kearneyi F.A.Barkley
Stemmadenia tomentosa var. palmeri (Rose & Standl.) Woodson
Eriophyllum mohavense (I.M.Johnst.) Jeps.
Melampodium divaricatum (Rich.) DC.
Pectis stenophylla var. rosei (Fernald) D.J.Keil
Senecio hartwegii Benth.
Senecio douglasii DC.
Streptanthus morrisonii subsp. elatus F.W.Hoffm.
Streptanthus purpureus Sánchez Mata, Fuente, Rufo, Nuria Rodr. & Amils
Callitriche marginata var. longipedunculata (Morong) Jeps.
Euphorbia ocellata var. rattanii (S.Watson) L.C.Wheeler
Juncus effusus var. gracilis Hook.
Psoralea castorea S.Watson
Buddleja officinalis Maxim.
Antennaria obovata E.Nelson
Androsace septentrionalis var. puberulenta (Rydb.) R.Knuth
Chenopodium sandersii Benet-Pierce
Pelargonium panduriforme Eckl. & Zeyh.
Tulipa clusiana Redouté
Ipomoea L.
Eupatorium pauperculum A.Gray
Physalis virginiana Mill.
Lotus dendroideus var. traskiae (Eastw. ex Abrams) Isely
Cotula mexicana (DC.) Cabrera
Eriogonum microthecum var. lacusursii Reveal & A.Sand.
Ranunculus pusillus Poir.
Ceanothus papillosus subsp. papillosus
Salix lutea var. watsonii (Bebb) Jeps.
Saxifraga ferruginea var. vreelandii (Small) Engl. & Irmsch.
Mimulus douglasii (Benth.) Gray
Celtis laevigata Willd.
Acacia koa A.Gray
Erysimum capitatum var. argillosum (Greene) R.J.Davis
Coryphantha scheeri var. robustispina (Schott ex Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Coryphantha scheeri (Muehlenpf.) L.D.Benson
Opuntia erinacea var. erinacea
Arenaria compacta Coville
Silene nachlingerae Tiehm
Evolvulus pilosus Nutt.
Croton fruticulosus Torr.
Salvia apiana var. compacta Munz
Cryptantha pusilla (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Agastache pallidiflora subsp. pallidiflora
Carex tuckermanii Dewey
Lobelia fenestralis Cav.
Wislizenia refracta var. mamillata (Rose ex Greene) Wiggins, 1950
Oxybaphus pumilus (Standl.) Standl.
Silene laciniata var. angustifolia C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Chenopodium berlandieri var. boscianum (Moq.) Wahl
Langloisia schottii (Torr.) Greene
Ipomoea minutiflora (M.Martens & Galeotti) House
Houstonia nigricans (Lam.) Fernald
Mimulus cardinalis var. verbenaceus (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Penstemon fendleri Torr. & Gray
Lippia lanceolata Michx.
Erythroxylum mexicanum Kunth
Ditaxis guatemalensis (Müll.Arg.) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Astragalus palmeri var. palmeri
Bothriochloa ischaemum var. songarica (Rupr. ex Schrenk) Celarier & J.R.Harlan
Acacia occidentalis Rose
Phaseolus lunatus L.
Vigna caracalla (L.) Verdc.
Centaurium nudicaule (Engelm.) B.L.Rob.
Cinnamomum hartmannii (I.M.Johnst.) Kosterm.
Psittacanthus calyculatus (DC.) G.Don
Cuphea P.Browne
Bunchosia sonorensis Rose
Allosidastrum hilarianum (C.Presl) Krapov., Fryxell & D.M.Bates
Petiveria alliacea L.
Polygala fishiae Parry
Perityle ambrosiifolia Greene ex A.M.Powell & Yarb.
Engelmannia pinnatifida Torr. & A.Gray ex Nutt.
Castilleja tenuifolia M.Martens & Galeotti
Datura lanosa Barclay ex Bye
Commelina caroliniana Walter
Cyperus mutisii (Kunth) Griseb.
Cyperus tenerrimus Liebm.
Dioscorea Plum. ex L.
Chloris verticillata Nutt.
Wyethia bolanderi (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Oncidium cebolleta (Jacq.) Sw.
Arabis breweri S.Watson
Hilaria cenchroides Kunth
Muhlenbergia leptoura (Piper) Hitchc.
Panicum stramineum Hitchc. & Chase
Eichhornia azurea (Sw.) Kunth
Eriochloa lemmonii var. gracilis (E.Fourn.) Gould
Eriogonum umbellatum var. canifolium Reveal
Plectritis macrocera subsp. macrocera
Navarretia minima Nutt.
Hemizonia increscens subsp. increscens
Leucaena leucocephala var. glauca (L.) Dewit
Pyrrocoma hirta (A.Gray) Greene
Robinia hispida L.
Ononis alopecuroides L.
Fallugia paradoxa var. acuminata Wooton
Polanisia trachysperma Torr. & A.Gray
Ratibida mexicana (S.Watson) Sharp
Talinum gooddingii P.Wilson
Valeriana acutiloba Rydb.
Camissonia scapoidea var. utahensis (Raven) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus subvexus var. transmontanus C.P.Sm.
Viguiera deltoidea var. townsendii Vasey & Rose
Mertensia oblongifolia var. amoena (A.Nelson) L.O.Williams
Aster wasatchensis (M.E.Jones) S.F.Blake
Centipeda minima (L.) A.Br. & Asch.
Amaranthus caudatus L.
Thlaspi L.
Plantago elongata subsp. pentasperma Bassett
Cordylanthus maritimus Nutt. ex Benth.
Pyracantha crenatoserrata (Hance) Rehder
Polygonum douglasii subsp. austiniae (Greene) A.E.Murray
Polygonum amphibium var. stipulaceum N.Coleman
Astragalus pulsiferae var. coronensis S.L.Welsh, Ondricek & G.Clifton
Chrysothamnus parryi var. nevadensis (A.Gray) Kittell
Myoporum rapense F.Br.
Cryptantha mariposae I.M.Johnst.
Cordylanthus involutus Wiggins
Limonium tataricum (L.) Mill.
Vicia americana subsp. minor (Hook.) Piper & Beattie
Polypogon Desf.
Euphorbia aaron-rossii A.H.Holmgren & N.H.Holmgren
Anticlea mogollonensis (W.J.Hess & Sivinski) Zomlefer & Judd
Calamagrostis inexpansa A.Gray
Galium trifidum var. subbiflorum Wiegand
Desmodium cajanifolium (Kunth) DC.
Euphorbia characias subsp. wulfenii (Hoppe ex W.D.J.Koch) Radcl.-Sm.
Ludwigia L.
Githopsis Nutt.
Pulicaria Gaertn.
Ligusticum verticillatum (Geyer) J.M.Coult. & Rose ex Rose
Cleomella plocasperma var. mojavensis (Payson) Crum ex Jeps.
Androsace elongata L.
Boechera covillei (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Ageratum houstonianum Mill.
Barleria cristata L.
Cussonia paniculata Eckl. & Zeyh.
Justicia adhatoda L.
Stapelia leendertziae N.E.Br.
Montanoa bipinnatifida (Kunth) C.Koch
Senecio rowleyanus M.Jacobs, 1968
Casuarina acutivalvis F.Muell.
Justicia carnea Lindl.
Nemesia Vent.
Trifolium scutatum Boiss.
Trifolium nigrescens Viv.
Ipomoea turbinata Lag.
Acacia crassiuscula H.L.Wendl.
Acacia linearis Sims
Acacia wilhelmiana F.Muell.
Bauhinia variegata L.
Senna splendida (Vogel) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Sesbania virgata (Cav.) Poir.
Medicago arborea L.
Quercus glauca Thunb.
Vigna aconitifolia (Jacq.) Maréchal
Lepechinia hastata (A.Gray) Epling
Persea Mill.
Byrsonima Rich. ex Kunth
Gossypium areysianum (Deflers) J.B.Hutch., Silow & S.G.Stephens
Gossypium raimondii Ulbr.
Pavonia hastata Cav.
Ficus altissima Blume
Ficus sarmentosa Buch.-Ham. ex J.E.Sm.
Acmena smithii (Poir.) Merr. & L.M.Perry
Callistemon pachyphyllus var. viridis Cheel
Calothamnus asper Turcz.
Eucalyptus curtisii Blakely & C.T.White
Eucalyptus kruseana F.Muell.
Eucalyptus nicholii Maiden & Blakely
Eucalyptus pruinosa Schauer
Eucalyptus trabuti Vilm.
Nepenthes gracilis Korth.
Syzygium jambos (L.) Alston
Ligustrum indicum (Lour.) Merr.
Cantua pyrifolia Juss.
Muehlenbeckia platyclada (F.Muell.) Lindau
Clematis ×jackmanii T.Moore
Prunus padus var. commutata Dippel
Atalantia citroides Pierre ex Engl. & Prantl
Evodia elegans Sander
Microcitrus warburgiana (F.M.Bailey) Tanaka
Chrysophyllum oliviforme L.
Hebe ×andersonii (Lindl. & Paxton) Cockayne
Pilea involucrata (Sims) Urb.
Yucca elephantipes Regel
Dieffenbachia Schott
Canna L.
Freesia refracta (Jacq.) Klatt
Lycoris radiata (L'Hér.) Herb.
Danae racemosa (L.) Moench
Coix lacryma-jobi L.
×Stiporyzopsis caduca (Beal) B.L.Johnson & Rogler
Trifolium spumosum L.
Pentas bussei K.Krause
Aegilops sharonensis Eig
Aegilops triuncialis var. persica (Boiss. ex Hohen.) Eig
Aegilops triaristata var. vulgaris Eig
Agropyron elongatum (Host) P.Beauv.
Ornithogalum longibracteatum Jacq.
Acacia salicina Lindl.
Monarda punctata var. arkansana (E.M.McClint. & Epling) Shinners
Solanum pimpinellifolium L.
Gladiolus dalenii Van Geel
Persea steyermarkii C.K.Allen
Diospyros undulata var. cratericalyx (Craib) Bakh.
Trifolium leucanthum M.Bieb.
Evodia daniellii (Benn.) F.B.Forbes & Hemsl.
Zephyranthes grandiflora Lindl.
Ficus glumosa Delile
Salvia sagittata Ruiz & Pav.
Eucalyptus oleosa F.Muell. ex Miq.
Aloe petrophila Pillans
Aloe candelabrum A.Berger
Cyrilla L.
Callistemon rigidus R.Br.
Oxalis bowiei Herb. ex Lindl.
Euphorbia leucocephala Lotsy
Salvia farinacea Benth.
Malva verticillata L.
Corchorus olitorius L.
Clivia miniata (Lindl.) Verschaff.
Crinodendron patagua Molina
Ceropegia L.
Aeschynomene indica L.
Afraegle gabonensis (Swingle) Engl.
Paramignya lobata Burkill
Severinia disticha (Blanco) Swingle
Poa glauca var. glauca
Trichocereus candicans (Salm-Dyck) Britton & Rose
Cleistocactus hildegardiae F.Ritter
Citrus neocaledonica Guillaumin
Acmispon tomentosus (Hook. & Arn.) Govaerts
Volutaria canariensis Wagenitz
Tropidocarpum californicum (Al-Shehbaz) Al-Shehbaz
Hulsea vestita subsp. inyoensis (D.D.Keck) Wilken
Mimosa xanti A.Gray
Morus microphilyra Greene
Bombax ceiba L.
Momipites R.P.Wodehouse, 1933
Acer glabrum subsp. douglasii (Hook.) Wesm.
Scilla peruviana L.
Clematis orientalis L.
Lomatium piperi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Mentzelia collomiae Christy
Fritillaria affinis var. tristulis (A.L.Grant ex Jeps.)
Erythranthe calciphila (Gentry) G.L.Nesom
Hydrangea macrophylla (Thunb.) Ser.
Oreostemma alpigenum var. alpigenum
Myosurus sessilis S.Watson
Parapholis strigosa (Dumort.) C.E.Hubb.
Nemastylis tenuis subsp. pringlei (S.Watson) Goldblatt
Sairocarpus virga (A.Gray) D.A.Sutton
Opuntia laevis Coult.
Aeschynomene villosa Poir.
Lewisia kelloggii K.Brandegee
Eriocoma thurberiana (Piper) Romasch.
Galium kamtschaticum Steller ex Schult. & Schult.f.
Lupinus angustifolius L.
Mammillaria estebanensis G.E.Linds.
Limnanthes douglasii subsp. ornduffii E.G.Buxton
Fagus sylvatica L.
Empetrum nigrum subsp. hermaphroditum (Hagerup) Böcher
Ocimum tenuiflorum L.
Carex microglochin Wahlenb.
Calochortus umpquaensis subsp. confertus Callahan
Hymenoxys subintegra Cockerell
Sairocarpus kingii (S.Watson) D.A.Sutton
Zeltnera G.Mans.
Euphorbia exigua L.
Begonia gracilis Kunth
Fritillaria biflora var. ineziana Jeps.
Erythranthe cordata (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Ipomoea pedicellaris Benth.
Malacothamnus helleri (Eastw.) Kearney
Sphaeralcea caespitosa var. williamsiae N.H.Holmgren
Iris tenuis S.Watson
Dudleya gnoma S.Mc Cabe
Acaena novae-zelandiae Kirk
Cestrum elegans (Brongn.) Schltdl.
Lomatium hendersonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Trifolium suffocatum L.
Penstemon deustus var. suffrutescens L.F.Hend.
Geranium columbinum L.
Schizachyrium scoparium subsp. scoparium
Polemonium pulcherrimum subsp. lindleyi (Wherry) V.E.Grant
Solanum torvum Sw.
Oxytropis besseyi var. besseyi
Erigeron engelmannii var. davisii (Cronquist) Cronquist
Aizoon pubescens Eckl. & Zeyh.
Astragalus didymocarpus var. milesianus (Rydb.) Jeps.
Allium cepa var. proliferum (Moench) Regel
Petradoria pumila var. graminea (Wooton & Standl.) S.L.Welsh
Carex kelloggii var. limnophila (Holm) B.L.Wilson & R.E.Brainerd
Sambucus nigra f. laciniata (West.) Schwer
Bidens odorata Dum.Cours.
Lygodesmia grandiflora var. arizonica (Tomb) S.L.Welsh
Castilleja flava var. flava
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. elegans (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Galeopsis bifida Boenn.
Eriogonum marifolium var. marifolium
Astragalus claranus Jeps.
Gladiolus ×hortulanus L.H.Bailey
Aldama congesta (Rose) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Lewisia columbiana var. columbiana
Lantana urticoides Hayek
Malus ×dawsoniana Rehder
Navarretia vividior (V.L.Bailey & Jeps.) L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Veronica plantaginea Benth.
Berberis piperiana (Abrams) McMinn
Sporobolus rigidus (Buckley) P.M.Peterson
Dermatophyllum secundiflorum (Ortega) Gandhi & Reveal
Erigeron arizonicus A.Gray
Vachellia schaffneri (S.Watson) Seigler & Ebinger
Janusia californica Benth.
Rudbeckia alpicola Piper
Erythranthe ptilota G.L.Nesom
Navarretia myersii subsp. myersii
Streptanthus glandulosus subsp. hoffmanii (Kruckeb.) M.S.Mayer & D.W.Taylor
Lomatium cookii Kagan
Selenicereus undatus (Haw.) D.R.Hunt
Muhlenbergia capillaris (Lam.) Trin.
Ferocactus chrysacanthus subsp. grandiflorus (G.E.Linds.) N.P.Taylor
Malacothamnus lucianus (Kearney) K.Morse
Astragalus conjunctus var. rickardii S.L.Welsh, K.A.Beck & Caplow
Crateva tapia L.
Persicaria pensylvanica (L.) M.Gómez
Castilleja sessiliflora Pursh
Oxytropis campestris var. wanapum Joyal
Rudbeckia amplexicaulis Vahl
Acanthocereus tetragonus (L.) Hummelinck
Penstemon laetus var. sagittatus (D.D.Keck) Mc Minn
Astragalus filicaulis Fisch. & C.A.Mey. ex Ledeb.
Ribes uva-crispa L.
Cirsium inamoenum (Greene) D.J.Keil
Mandevilla nacapulensis (Felger & Henrickson) A.O.Simões, Kin.-Gouv. & M.E.Endress
Asparagaceae
Phlox condensata subsp. covillei (E.E.Nelson) Locklear
Potentilla morefieldii Ertter
Veronica polita Fr.
Polygonum bolanderi W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray
Silene bolanderi A.Gray
Eriogonum congdonii (S.Stokes) Reveal
Pediomelum megalanthum var. epipsilum (Barneby) J.W.Grimes
Blitum capitatum subsp. hastatum (Rydb.) Mosyakin
Perityle gilensis var. gilensis
Abronia alpina Brandegee
Allamanda blanchetii A.DC.
Camassia leichtlinii subsp. leichtlinii
Dymondia margaretae Compton
Sabulina nuttallii var. fragilis (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Crinum asiaticum L.
Calystegia atriplicifolia subsp. atriplicifolia
Juncus ranarius Songeon & E.P.Perrier
Sairocarpus watsonii (Vasey & Rose) D.A.Sutton
Ceanothus decornutus V.T.Parker
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. hispidula (W.M.Sharp) Cronquist
Lophostemon confertus (R.Br.) Paul G.Wilson & J.T.Waterh.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. erecta J.E.Keeley, M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Lathyrus japonicus var. japonicus
Alnus alnobetula subsp. crispa (Aiton) Raus
Navarretia miwukensis D.Gowen & L.A.Johnson
Viburnum carlesii var. bitchiuense (Makino) Nakai
Schinus areira L.
Mammillaria petrophila K.Brandegee
Ceanothus thyrsiflorus var. obispoensis D.O.Burge
Ibicella lutea (Lindl.) Van Eselt.
Coryphantha robustispina subsp. scheeri (Lem.) N.P.Taylor
Glossopetalon clokeyi (Ensign) H.St.John
Inula helenium L.
Encelia nutans Eastw.
Cherleria biflora (L.) A.J.Moore & Dillenb.
Erigeron greenei G.L.Nesom
Rosa gymnocarpa var. serpentina Ertter & W.H.Lewis
Artemisia potentilloides var. nitrophila (Cronquist) C.R.Hobbs & B.G.Baldwin
Cotoneaster Medik.
Ericameria discoidea var. winwardii Dorn & Delmatier
Boechera atrorubens (Suksd. ex Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Chorizanthe minutiflora R.Morgan, Styer & Reveal
Agnorhiza bolanderi (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Polemonium pauciflorum subsp. pauciflorum
Boechera fernaldiana subsp. vivariensis (S.L.Welsh) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Acer tataricum L.
Lathyrus nevadensis var. pilosellus (M.Peck) C.L.Hitchc.
Sagina maxima A.Gray
Thaumatophyllum bipinnatifidum (Schott ex Endl.) Sakur., Calazans & Mayo
Howelliella ovata (Eastw.) Rothm.
Aloe striata Haw.
Agave toumeyana var. bella Breitung
Corymbia maculata (Hook.) K.D.Hill & L.A.S.Johnson
Cylindropuntia ×vivipara (Rose) F.M.Knuth
Eriogonum vimineum var. vimineum
Stanleya Nutt.
Penstemon leonardii var. patricus (Holmgren) Neese
Hylotelephium H.Ohba
Morus indica Mace
Geranium pyrenaicum Burm.f.
Lotus corniculatus subsp. corniculatus
Cymopterus basalticus M.E.Jones
Lomatium donnellii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Senecio spartioides var. granularis Maguire & A.H.Holmgren ex Cronquist
Eriogonum lewisii Reveal
Eriogonum compositum var. leianthum Hook.
Castilleja miniata var. fulva (Pennell) J.M.Egger
Sandbergia whitedii (Piper) Greene
Artemisia nuttallii (Torr. & A.Gray) Mosyakin, L.M.Shultz & G.V.Boiko
Guardiola arguta (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Pedicularis densiflora subsp. aurantiaca E.F.Sprague
Ambrosia hispida Pursh
Gomphrena globosa L.
Ipomopsis pringlei (Gray) Henrickson
Lupinus tegeticulatus var. tegeticulatus
Solidago rigida L.
Echinocereus bristolii W.T.Marshall
Cornus kousa Bürger ex Hance
Jatropha dioica Sessé
Nemesia fruticans (Thunb.) Benth.
Hibiscus lasiocarpos Cav.
Trifolium owyheense Gilkey
Penstemon pinorum L.M.Shultz & J.S.Shultz
Drosanthemum hispidum (L.) Schwantes
Platanthera yosemitensis Colwell, Sheviak & P.E.Moore
Schoenoplectus pungens var. pungens
Cassia fistula L.
Trifolium friscanum (S.L.Welsh) S.L.Welsh
Silene hookeri subsp. hookeri
Aethusa cynapium L.
Cirsium neomexicanum var. utahense (Petr.) S.L.Welsh
Viola renifolia A.Gray
Peniocereus marianus (Gentry) Sánchez-Mej.
Achillea millefolium var. arenicola (A.Heller) Nobs
Agastache mearnsii Wooton & Standl.
Bromelia alsodes H.St.John
Quercus garryana var. semota Jeps.
Astragalus concordius S.L.Welsh
Spiraea douglasii f. douglasii
Berberis trifoliolata Moric.
Sarracenia psittacina Michx.
Liquidambar formosana Hance
Glandora prostrata (Loisel.) D.C.Thomas
Erythranthe arenaria (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Pyrus kawakamii T.S.Liu & H.J.Su
Erigeron subtrinervis Rydb.
Ceanothus divergens Parry
Agave utahensis subsp. utahensis
Sarracenia purpurea subsp. purpurea
Cotinus coggygria Scop.
Malephora lutea (Haw.) Schwantes
Erythranthe jungermannioides (Suksd.) G.L.Nesom
Erucastrum gallicum (Willd.) O.E.Schulz
Ruscus aculeatus L.
Albizia lebbeck (L.) Benth.
Waldsteinia idahoensis Piper
Agave felgeri Gentry
Knautia macedonica Griseb.
Ferocactus pottsii (Salm-Dyck) Backeb.
Ericameria nauseosa var. juncea (Greene) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Gutierrezia serotina Greene
Delosperma cooperi (Hook.fil.) L.Bolus
Parthenium tomentosum DC.
Aphyllon ludovicianum (Nutt.) A.Gray
Proboscidea louisianica subsp. fragrans (Lindl.) Bretting
Penstemon clutei A.Nelson
Dudleya cymosa subsp. costatifolia Bartel & Shevock
Narcissus tazetta subsp. italicus (Ker Gawl.) Baker
Claytonia sibirica var. sibirica
Ranunculus austrooreganus L.D.Benson
Platanthera elegans subsp. decurtata (Rand.Morgan & Glic.) R.M.Bateman
Ranunculus sardous Crantz
Gunnera tinctoria (Molina) Mirb.
Streptanthus brachiatus subsp. hoffmanii R.W.Dolan & LaPré
Sedum oreganum var. tenue (R.T.Clausen) H.Ohba
Ivesia baileyi var. setosa S.Watson
Sedum leibergii Britton
Trifolium leibergii A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Cirsium cymosum var. canovirens (Rydb.) D.J.Keil
Iris thompsonii R.C.Foster
Papaver ×pseudo-orientale E.G.Camus
Ipomoea arborescens var. pachylutea Gentry
Clarkia mildrediae (A.Heller) H. & Lewis
Eriocapitella ×hybrida (L.H.Bailey) Christenh. & Byng
Polemonium viscosum subsp. lemmonii (Brand) Wherry
Trillium albidum subsp. albidum
Iris sanguinea Donn ex Hornem.
Lonicera dioica var. glaucescens (Rydb.) Butters
Oreocarya capitata Eastw.
Ceanothus foliosus var. medius Mc Minn
Hesperantha coccinea (Backh. & Harv.) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Tilia cordata Mill.
Sidalcea oregana var. calva C.L.Hitchc.
Misopates orontium (L.) Raf.
Streptanthus gracilis Eastw.
Tephrocactus articulatus (Pfeiff. ex Otto) Backeb.
Cylindropuntia molesta subsp. clavellina (Engelm. ex J.M.Coult.) U.Guzmán
Silene suksdorfii Rob.
Chorizanthe biloba Goodman
Tricyrtis hirta (Thunb.) Hook.
Perityle vandevenderi B.L.Turner
Tradescantia virginiana L.
Calystegia atriplicifolia subsp. buttensis Brummitt
Passiflora subpeltata Ortega
Salvia monantha Brandegee ex Epling
Penstemon crandallii A.Heller
Galinsoga parviflora var. semicalva A.Gray
Malva alcea L.
Mentzelia holmgreniorum J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Andropogon eremicus Wipff & Shaw
Prunus virginiana var. melanocarpa (A.Nelson) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Epithelantha micromeris (Engelm.) F.A.C.Weber
Solanum betaceum Cav.
Graptopetalum filiferum (S.Watson) Whitehead
Phlox amabilis Brand
Sarcococca confusa Sealy
Phlox kelseyi Britton
Iris tenax subsp. klamathensis L.W.Lenz
Chorizanthe eastwoodiae (Goodman) D.Gowen & L.A.Johnson
Oxytropis besseyi (Rydb.) Blank.
Salvia dorrii var. incana (Benth.) Strachan
Chenopodium berlandieri var. zschackei (Murr) Murr
Sidalcea oregana subsp. valida (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Cardamine nuttallii var. nuttallii
Sedum spathulifolium subsp. spathulifolium
Sairocarpus subcordatus (A.Gray) D.A.Sutton
Vinca L.
Commelina communis L.
Mimulus ringens L.
Cucumis melo var. inodorus H.Jacq.
Libertia ixioides (G.Forst.) Spreng.
Aronia arbutifolia (L.) Pers.
Acer grandidentatum var. grandidentatum
Drymaria cordata (L.) Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Ribes rubrum L.
Sabulina nuttallii var. gregaria (A.Heller) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Eriogonum microtheca var. panamintense S.Stokes
Pseudobombax ellipticum (Kunth) Dugand
Cotoneaster nitens Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Lathyrus grimesii Barneby
Polemonium pectinatum Greene
Eriogonum pulchrum Eastw.
Cirsium cymosum var. cymosum
Trichocereus huascha (F.A.C.Weber) F.Ritter
Agnorhiza invenusta (Greene) W.A.Weber
Yucca glauca var. glauca
Gnaphaliaceae
Drosera filiformis Raf.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. maricopae Barneby
Eriogonum arizonicum Stokes ex M.E.Jones
Opuntia cymochila Engelm. & Bigelow
Digitaria cognata (Schult.) Pilg.
Cymopterus glomeratus DC.
Frasera albicaulis var. columbiana (H.St.John) C.L.Hitchc.
Castilleja purpurascens Greenman
Solanum crispum Ruiz & Pav.
Ferocactus wislizeni subsp. ajoensis Fencl & Kalas
Dichondra repens J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Juglans ×intermedia Dippel
Erythranthe howaldiae G.L.Nesom
Astragalus kentrophyta subsp. danaus (Barneby) W.A.Weber
Veronica paysonii (Pennell & L.O.Williams) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Aquilegia fosteri (S.L.Welsh) S.L.Welsh
Erythranthe glabrata (Kunth) G.L.Nesom
Arctostaphylos manzanita subsp. roofii (Gankin) P.V.Wells
Thelypodium sagittatum (Nutt.) Endl.
Calystegia sepium subsp. limnophila (Greene) Brummitt
Lupinus latifolius subsp. dudleyi (C.P.Sm.) Kenny & D.B.Dunn
Packera Á.Löve & D.Löve
Trifolium incarnatum var. incarnatum
Allium membranaceum Ownbey ex Traub
Sisymbrium linifolium (Nutt.) Nutt.
Rubus leucodermis var. leucodermis
Aesculus glabra var. glabra
Rosa nutkana subsp. nutkana
Astrantia major L.
Torilis arvensis subsp. arvensis
Nyctocereus serpentinus (Lag. & Rodr.) Britton & Rose
Eremogone kingii var. rosea (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Saponaria ocymoides L.
Potentilla basaltica Tiehm & Ertter
Arachis hypogaea L.
Lathyrus japonicus var. maritimus (L.) J.T.Kartesz & Gandhi
Arctocrania Nakai
Rosa glauca Pourr.
Wyethia longicaulis A.Gray
Downingia concolor subsp. concolor
Salvia yangii B.T.Drew
Diplachne fusca (L.) P.Beauv. ex Roem. & Schult.
Oenothera drummondii subsp. thalassaphila (Brandegee) W.Dietr. & W.L.Wagner
Jacquemontia evolvuloides (Moric.) Meisn.
Lactuca ludoviciana (Nutt.) Riddell
Amsinckia grandiflora (Kleeb. ex A.Gray) Kleeb. ex Greene
Sporobolus montevidensis (Arechav.) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Cymopterus glomeratus var. fendleri (A.Gray) R.L.Hartm.
Eremogone congesta var. charlestonensis (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Erythranthe ampliata (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Smilax jamesii G.A.Wallace
Baccharis neglecta Britton & A.Br.
Oxalis pes-caprae f. pleniflora (Lowe) Sunding
Agave yavapaiensis W.C.Hodgs. & Salywon
Allium schoenoprasum subsp. schoenoprasum
Ceanothus impressus var. nipomensis Mc Minn
Ceanothus jepsonii var. jepsonii
Linaria grandiflora Desf.
Pedicularis oederi Vahl
Centaurea gerstlaueri Erdner
Leptosiphon oblanceolatus (Brand) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Astragalus whitneyi var. lenophyllus (Rydb.) Barneby
Erythranthe eastwoodiae (Rydb.) G.L.Nesom & N.S.Fraga
Navarretia torreyella L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Iris unguicularis Poir.
Solidago altissima subsp. gilvocanescens (Rydb.) Semple
Bartlettia scaposa A.Gray
Triodanis Raf.
Stenocereus standleyi (J.G.Ortega) Buxb.
Aurinia saxatilis (L.) Desv.
Xanthisma grindelioides var. depressum (Maguire) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Corylus americana Walter
Clerodendrum chinense (Osbeck) Mabb.
Frangula alnus Mill.
Eriocoma richardsonii (Link) Romasch.
Astragalus kentrophyta subsp. ungulatus (M.E.Jones) W.A.Weber
Lathyrus nissolia L.
Kalmia microphylla var. occidentalis (Small) Ebinger
Oenothera hispida (Benth.) W.L.Wagner, Hoch & Zarucchi
Typha lesquereuxi Cockerell, 1908
Quercus similata Gand.
Arbutus prexalapensis Axelrod, 1939
Salix ×stoderana Dürrnb.
Fraxinus caudata J.L.Wu
Palmoxylon Schenk, 1882
Eugenia americana Hort.Makoy ex É.Morren
Ficus tesselata Warb.
Celastrus L.
Magnoliophyllum Conwentz, 1886
Dombeyopsis F.J.A.N.Unger, 1850
Daphnogene F.J.A.N.Unger, 1850
Styrax L.
Allophyllus Gleditsch, 1764
Convallaria L.
Cardiospermum L.
Tillandsia recurvata (Gaudich.) Baker
Urochloa P.Beauv.
Steinchisma hians (Elliott) Nash
Sarcoglottis schaffneri (Rchb.f.) Ames
Muhlenbergia scoparia Vasey
Cardiospermum corindum var. corindum
Muhlenbergia longiglumis Vasey
Muhlenbergia elongata Scribn., 1896
Schiedeella transversalis (A.Rich. & Galeotti) Schltr.
Psychotria mexiae Standl.
Tillandsia achyrostachys É.Morren ex Baker
Urochloa fasciculata (Sw.) R.D.Webster
Brachystele affinis (C.Schweinf.) Burns-Bal. & R.González
Sisyrinchium convolutum Nocca
Leucaena lanceolata var. lanceolata
Panicum sphaerocarpon Elliott
Clethra palmeri Britton
Dioscorea remotiflora Kunth
Acalypha microphylla Klotzsch
Muhlenbergia macroura (Kunth) Hitchc.
Leptochloa mucronata (Michx.) Kunth
Schizachyrium scoparium var. scoparium
Poa bulbosa var. vivipara Koch
Tradescantia occidentalis var. scopulorum (Rose) E.S.Anderson & Woodson
Packera bolanderi var. harfordii (Greenm.) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Lessingia nemaclada var. albiflora (Eastw.) J.T.Howell
Sonchus arvensis var. uliginosus (M.Bieb.) Trautv.
Haplopappus ericoides (Less.) Hook. & Arn., 1841
Achillea millefolium subsp. lanulosa (Nutt.) Piper
Agoseris glauca var. parviflora Rydb.
Laphamia stansburii A.Gray
Corethrogyne DC.
Artemisia franserioides Greene
Crataegus rivularis Nutt.
Haplopappus palmeri A.Gray
Aster elegans var. engelmannii D.C.Eaton
Chrysanthemum parthenium (L.) Bernh.
Heterotheca latifolia Buckley
Aster integrifolius (Turcz. ex DC.) Franch.
Calendula L.
Brickellia scabra (A.Gray) A.Nelson ex B.L.Rob., 1909
Spraguea umbellata Torr.
Petrorhagia velutina (Guss.) P.W.Ball & Heywood
Salicornia virginica Scholler
Rumex triangularis (Danser) Rech.f.
Atriplex littoralis L.
Boechera languida (Rollins) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Sidalcea cusickii subsp. purpurea C.L.Hitchc.
Tamarix pentandra Pall.
Chimaphila umbellata subsp. umbellata
Caulanthus glaber (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Corylus californica (DC.) Rose
Ranunculus maximus Greene
Brodiaea coronaria (Salisb.) hort., 1895
Ranunculus scleratus
Peucedanum grayi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Platanthera hyperborea var. hyperborea
Paxistima myrsinites subsp. myrsinites
Astragalus sclerocarpus Popov
Astragalus miser var. crispatus (M.E.Jones) Cronquist
Pteryxia terebinthina var. terebinthina
Astragalus miser Douglas
Peucedanum macrocarpum (Hook. & Arn.) Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray
Peucedanum nevadense S.Watson
Medicago hispida Gaertn.
Vicia articulata Hornem.
Sedum douglasii Hook.
Oenothera decorticans (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Zauschneria californica C.Presl
Oenothera caespitosa var. jonesii Munz
Oenothera psammophila (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) W.L.Wagner, Stockh. & W.M.Klein
Hesperoyucca whipplei (Torr.) Baker
Linnaea borealis var. americana (J.Forbes) Rehder
Hedeoma nana subsp. typica W.S.Stewart
Phlox andicola E.Nelson
Apocynum hypericifolium Aiton
Madronella purpurea (Howell) A.Nelson
Symphoricarpos acutus (A.Gray) Dieck
Bouvardia triphylla Salisb.
Linanthus filipes (Benth.) Greene
Orthocarpus erianthus var. micranthus (Greene ex A.Heller) Jeps.
Asclepias tuberosa subsp. terminalis Woodson
Lepechinia calycina Epling ex Munz, 1935
Lachnagrostis filiformis (G.Forst.) Trin.
Deyeuxia pringlei Scribn.
Mertensia coronata A.Nelson
Lithospermum arvense Thunb.
Chamaesaracha conioides (Moric. ex Dunal) Britton
Panicum capillare subsp. hillmanii (Chase) Freckmann & Lelong
Muhlenbergia cuspidata (Torr. ex Hook.) Rydb.
Muhlenbergia microsperma (DC.) Trin.
Bothriochloa laguroides (DC.) Herter
Elymus trachycaulus var. trachycaulus
Madia capitata Nutt.
Chrysanthemum leucanthemum subsp. pinnatifidum Lecoq & Lamotte
Hemizonia lobbii Greene
Solidago missouriensis var. tolmieana (A.Gray) Cronquist
Haplopappus croceus A.Gray
Artemisia mexicana Willd. ex Spreng.
Madia gracilis subsp. pilosa D.D.Keck
Aster spinosus Benth.
Potentilla gracilis var. glabrata (Lehm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Spiraea L.
Agoseris retrorsa (Benth.) Kuntze
Eriogonum jamesii var. jamesii
Eriogonum microthecum var. foliosum (Torr. & A.Gray) Reveal
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. foliolosum S.Stokes, 1910
Arabis nubigena J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Sphaeralcea ambigua subsp. monticola Kearney
Atriplex nuttalii S.Watson
Populus deltoides subsp. wislizenii (S.Watson) Eckenw.
Calandrinia pygmaea F.Muell.
Mentzelia wrightii A.Gray
Sidalcea hartwegii A.Gray
Kosteletzkya J.Presl
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi subsp. monoensis Roof
Cleomella macbrideana Payson
Salix sandbergii Rydb.
Dithyrea californica var. maritima Davidson
Boechera lignifera (A.Nelson) W.A.Weber
Lyrocarpa palmeri S.Watson
Aquilegia formosa Hook.f.
Lathyrus sativus L.
Lupinus albicaulis Torr. ex Stansb.
Medicago turbinata (L.) All.
Thermopsis rhombifolia var. ovata (B.L.Rob. ex Piper) Isely
Vicia hybrida L.
Astragalus beckwithii var. sulcatus Barneby
Lathyrus brachycalyx var. eucosmus (Butters & H.St.John) S.L.Welsh
Trifolium monanthum subsp. parvum (Kellogg) J.M.Gillett
Erodium botrys Hohen.
Gaura hexandra Ortega
Ribes setosum Lindl.
Mentha penardii (Briq.) Rydb.
Cordylanthus pilosus subsp. bolanderi (A.Gray) Munz
Mertensia Roth
Cuscuta gronovii Willd. ex Schult.
Synthyris reniformis (Douglas ex Benth.) Benth.
Allium membranaceum Munz & Keck ex Ownbey
Trisetum interruptum Buckley
Damasonium californicum Torr. ex Benth., 1857
Xanthocephalum sericocarpum A.Gray
Senecio andersonii Hook.fil.
Aster rubrotinctus S.F.Blake
Juncus arcticus var. mexicanus (Willd. ex Schult. & Schult.fil.) Balslev
Thelesperma subnudum var. marginatum (Rydb.) Cronquist
Erechtites minimus (Poir.) DC.
Crepis runcinata subsp. glauca (Nutt.) Babc. & Stebbins
Hemizonia congesta Hook. & Arn.
Geum triflorum var. campanulatum (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Spergularia media (L.) C.Presl
Claytonia lanceolata var. sessilifolia (Torr.) A.Nelson
Prunus padifolia (Greene) A.Nelson
Eriogonum inflatum var. fusiforme (Small) Reveal
Arenaria franklinii Douglas ex Hook.
Horkelia congesta subsp. nemorosa D.D.Keck
Rubus glaucifolius var. glaucifolius
Dodecatheon pauciflorum (Durand) Greene
Arctostaphylos andersonii var. pajaroensis J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. depressum Blank.
Lesquerella utahensis Rydb.
Androsace filiformis Retz.
Boechera gracilenta (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Cardamine integrifolia Nasarow
Malva moschata f. alba Moldenke
Aconitum lutescens A.Nelson
Musineon divaricatum var. hookeri (Torr. & A.Gray) Mathias
Eryngium vaseyi var. castrense (Jeps.) Hoover ex Mathias & Constance
Peucedanum ambiguum (Nutt.) Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Peucedanum simplex Nutt. ex S.Watson
Selinum capitellatum (A.Gray) Benth. & Hook.f.
Lathyrus annuus L.
Astragalus cusickii Rydb.
Psoralea L.
Hedysarum uintahense A.Nelson
Lupinus tracyi Eastw.
Glossopetalon stipuliferum H.St.John
Gaura glabra Lehm.
Lespedeza juncea (L.f.) Pers.
Rhamnus crocea var. ilicifolia (Kellogg) Greene
Lathyrus pauciflorus var. utahensis (M.E.Jones) M.Peck
Oenothera alyssoides Hook. & Arn.
Oenothera scapoidea var. typica Munz
Zauschneria latifolia (Hook.) Greene
Sullivantia oregana S.Watson
Mimulus angustatus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Mimulus longiflorus (Nutt) A.L.Grant ex L.H.Bailey
Saxifraga integrifolia var. claytoniifolia Rosend.
Prunella lanceolata Barton
Gilia aurea Nutt.
Schinopsis Engl.
Valerianaceae
Plantago heterophylla Nutt.
Myosotis sylvatica Ehrh.
Cryptantha nana (Eastw.) Payson
Gentiana simplex Gray
Bouvardia jacquinii Kunth
Cryptantha thyrsiflora (Greene) Payson
Penstemon personatus D.D.Keck
Sida hederacea (Douglas ex Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Petasites speciosus (Nutt.) Piper
Allium fimbriatum Schischk.
Melica bulbosa Thurb.
Melica porteri var. laxa Boyle
Lactuca canadensis var. longifolia (Michx.) Farw.
Xanthium saccharatum Wallr.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. viscidula (Greene) D.D.Keck
Hymenoclea salsola var. fasciculata (Nelson) K.M.Peterson & Payne
Solidago petradoria S.F.Blake
Aster elegans Hook.fil. & Thomson ex C.B.Clarke
Hemizonia macradenia DC.
Amelanchier alnifolia var. florida (Lindl.) C.K.Schneid.
Haplopappus nanus (Nutt.) D.C.Eaton
Erigeron pumilus var. euconcinnoides Cronquist
Erigeron uintahensis Cronquist
Aster occidentalis var. delectabilis (H.M.Hall) Ferris
Rubus parviflorus var. grandiflorus Farw.
Rosa durandii Crép.
Erigeron lemmonii A.Gray
Axyris L.
Claytonia heterophylla (Torr. & A.Gray) Swanson
Draba ventosa A.Gray
Sibara virginica (L.) Rollins
Arctostaphylos pseudopungens Roof
Streptanthus heterophyllus Nutt.
Vaccinium occidentale Gray
Dodecatheon conjugens Greene
Urtica dioica var. procera (Willd.) Wedd.
Salix wolfii var. idahoensis C.R.Ball
Allium suaveolens Jacq.
Allium biceptrum S.Wats.
Anemone grayi Behr ex Kellogg
Hoffmannseggia densiflora Benth.
Vicia macrocarpa (Moris) Bertol.
Linum leptopodum A.Nelson
Cologania lemmonii A.Gray
Medicago echinus DC.
Trifolium fendleri Greene
Trigonella radiata Linnaeus, 1753
Astragalus lentiginosus var. kernensis (Jeps.) Barneby
Medicago falcata Lam.
Epilobium suffruticosum Nutt.
Boykinia heucheriformis (Rydb.) Rosend.
Saxifraga marshallii Greene
Saxifraga arguta D.Don
Ribes parishii A.Heller
Linanthus pharnaceoides (Benth.) Greene
Cryptantha pattersonii (A.Gray) Greene
Valeriana pubicarpa Rydb.
Orthocarpus erianthus Benth.
Orthocarpus pusillus Benth.
Cuscuta umbrosa Beyr. ex Hook.
Gentiana detonsa Rottb.
Coprosma lucida J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Orobanche pinorum Geyer ex Hook.
Collinsia sparsiflora var. brucae (M.E.Jones) Newsom
Amelanchier florida Lindl.
Potentilla pacifica Howell
Vulpia microstachys var. confusa (Piper) Lonard & Gould
Pseudobahia bahiifolia var. pinnatifida A.Gray
Laphamia dissecta subsp. lemmonii (A.Gray) W.E.Niles
Aster lemmonii A.Gray
Haplopappus laricifolius A.Gray
Centaurea L.
Chaptalia nutans (L.) Hemsl.
Mentzelia dispersa var. latifolia (Rydb.) J.F.Macbr.
Salix cordata Michx.
Quercus diversicolor Trel.
Adonis annua L.
Argemone platyceras Link & Otto
Angelica roseana L.F.Hend.
Sanicula tracyi R.H.Shan & Constance
Lupinus argenteus var. tenellus (Douglas ex G.Don) D.B.Dunn
Medicago orbicularis (L.) All.
Callistemon citrinus (Curtis) Stapf
Grevillea pectinata R.Br.
Condalia parryi (Torr.) Weberb.
Chrysosplenium glechomaefolium Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Onagra ornata A.Nelson
Orthocarpus lacerus Benth.
Polemonium pauciflorum S.Watson
Holacantha emoryi A.Gray
Leonotis leonurus (L.) R.Br.
Caprifoliaceae
Trisetum filifolium Scribn., 1896
Scirpus pendulus Muhl.
Madia glomerata var. ramosa (Piper) Jeps.
Pyrrocoma integrifolia (Porter ex A.Gray) Greene
Agoseris heterophylla var. californica (Nutt.) Davidson, Moxley & Jeps.
Anaphalis subalpina (A.Gray) Rydb.
Erigeron evermannii Rydb.
Abronia micrantha Torr.
Arctostaphylos andersonii var. auriculata (Eastw.) Jeps.
Lepidium montanum var. spathulatum (B.L.Rob.) C.L.Hitchc.
Yucca treculeana Carrière
Zigadenus micranthus Eastw.
Croton tenuis S.Watson
Lathyrus pauciflorus var. brownii (Eastw.) Piper
Vicia leucophaea Greene
Polygala californica Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Saxifraga cespitosa var. emarginata (Small) Rosend.
Ribes sativum Syme
Onagra macbrideae A.Nelson
Swertia montana (Mulford) H.St.John
Galium spurium var. echinospermum (Wallr.) Hayek
Pteromonnina wrightii (A.Gray) B.Eriksen
Malpighiaceae
Rubus procerus P.J.Müll.
Bothriochloa laguroides var. torreyana (Steud.) M.Marchi & Longhi-Wagner
Lasthenia macrantha (A.Gray) Greene
Grindelia integrifolia var. macrophylla (Greene) Cronquist
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. elegans (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Cowania mexicana D.Don
Eriogonum pedunculatum S.Stokes
Talinum parviflorum Nutt.
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi subsp. stipitata Packer & Denford
Sterculia diversifolia (R.Br.) G.Don
Populus alba var. alba
Sphaeralcea coccinea subsp. elata (Baker fil.) Kearney
Hymenolobus procumbens (L.) Nutt. ex Schinz & Thell.
Spermolepis echinatus (Nutt.) F.Heller
Astragalus adanus A.Nelson
Medicago rotata Boiss.
Clarkia quadrivulnera (Douglas) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Oenothera bistorta Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Proboscidea Juss. ex Schmidel
Penstemon jamesii Benth.
Solanum xanti var. intermedium Parish
Macromeria thurberi (A.Gray) Mack.
Conopholis mexicana Gray ex S.Watson
Ranunculus alpeophilus A.Nelson
Allium tolmiei var. platyphyllum (Tidestr.) Ownbey
Madia elegans D.Don ex Lindl.
Tagetes tenuifolia Millsp.
Brickellia squamulosa A.Gray
Aster alpigenus var. haydenii (Porter) Cronquist
Agoseris heterophylla subsp. normalis Piper
Rosa californica E.Willm.
Opuntia tuna (L.) Mill.
Lewisia Pursh
Eriogonum acaule Nutt.
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. umbellatum
Sidalcea neomexicana subsp. crenulata (A.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Viola sarmentosa Douglas ex Hook.
Thelypodium laciniatum var. streptanthoides (Leiberg ex Piper) Payson
Corylus californica hort. ex K.Koch, 1873
Peucedanum graveolens (L.) B.D.Jacks., 1894
Lupinus arcticus var. subalpinus (Piper & B.L.Rob.) C.P.Sm.
Mimulus moschatus var. sessilifolius A.Gray
Duranta repens L.
Ipomopsis depressa (M.E.Jones) V.E.Grant
Castilleja rubiginosa J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Piptatherum exiguum (Thurb.) Dorn
Acer douglasii Hook.
Schkuhria anthemoidea (DC.) Coult.
Gymnolomia multiflora (Nutt.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hemsl.
Erigeron eatonii var. plantagineus (Greene) Cronquist
Artemisia tilesii Ledeb.
Artemisia caudata Michx.
Opuntia serpentina Engelm.
Rumex mexicanus Meisn.
Acanthochiton wrightii Torr.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa var. trichoclada (DC.) Munz
Viola occidentalis (A.Gray) Howell
Sphaeralcea emoryi var. variabilis (Cockerell) Kearney
Caulanthus barnebyi Rollins & P.K.Holmgren
Salix stenophylla Rydb.
Salix fendleriana Andersson
Sisyrinchium capillare E.P.Bicknell
Eryngium phyteumae F.Delaroche
Osmorhiza brachypoda Torr.
Vicia grandiflora Scop.
Lupinus micranthus Douglas ex Lindl.
Linum micranthum A.Gray
Gayophytum helleri var. glabrum Munz
Saxifraga nuttallii Small
Lonicera hispidula var. californica Rehder
Gentiana thermalis Kuntze
Galium cymosum Wiegand
Phlox longifolia var. longipes (M.E.Jones) M.Peck
Cytisus monspessulanus L.
Agrostis tolucensis Kunth
Verbesina encelioides var. exauriculata B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Lessingia nemaclada var. mendocina (Greene) J.T.Howell
Laphamia coronopifolia (A.Gray) Hemsl.
Evax multicaulis var. multicaulis
Aster perelegans A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Prunus dulcis Mill. ex Rchb.
Potentilla pentandra Engelm. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Eriogonum grayi Reveal
Polygonum watsonii Small
Silene scouleri subsp. grandis (Eastw.) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Lesquerella alpina var. spatulata (Rydb.) Payson
Arctostaphylos ×jepsonii Eastw.
Camassia howellii S.Watson
Vicia striata M.Bieb.
Vicia ervilia (L.) Willd.
Eugenia myrtifolia Sims
Epilobium tetragonum L.
Orthocarpus densiflorus var. gracilis (Benth.) D.D.Keck
Lantana involucrata L.
Gentianella detonsa subsp. superba (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Tillaea viridis S.Watson
Vaccinium oxycoccus L.
Lathyrus nuttallii S.Watson
Madia hallii D.D.Keck
Sphaeromeria diversifolia (D.C.Eaton) A.Heller, 1900
Solidago nemoralis Aiton
Crepis nana subsp. ramosa Babc.
Filipendula ×purpurea Maxim.
Saponaria hispanica Mill.
Arabis pycnocarpa M.Hopkins
Descurainia pinnata var. halictorum (Cockerell) M.Peck
Lepidium montanum subsp. alyssoides (A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium montanum var. eastwoodiae (Wooton) C.L.Hitchc.
Ranunculus pilosus Kunth ex DC.
Trifolium eriocephalum var. arcuatum (Piper) M.Peck
Vicia angustifolia L.
Valeriana dioica subsp. sylvatica (S.Watson) F.G.Mey.
Phyla nodiflora var. rosea (D.Don) Moldenke
Cressa depressa Goodd.
Penstemon attenuatus Douglas ex Lindl.
Micromeria chamissonis (Benth.) Greene
Myosotis alpestris Hegetschw.
Mimulus bifidus Pennell
Osmaronia cerasiformis (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Elymus multisetus (J.G.Sm.) M.E.Jones
Phyllostachys aureosulcata McClure
Senecio ambrosioides var. indivisus Greenm.
Gnaphalium bourgovii A.Gray
Rubus ulmifolius var. inermis (Willd.) Focke
Rubus idaeus subsp. melanolasius Focke
Rubus nigerrimus (Greene) Rydb.
Spiraea idahoensis A.Nelson
Mammillaria goodridgii Scheer
Eriogonum deflexum var. turbinatum (Small) Reveal
Eriogonum puberulum S.Watson
Salix mackenziana Barratt ex Hook.
Betula nana L.
Aquilegia truncata Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Pteryxia terebinthina var. foeniculacea (Torr. & Gray) Mathias
Tetrapanax papyriferus (Hook.) K.Koch
Nyssa sylvatica Marshall
Lathyrus ochrus (L.) DC.
Astragalus succumbens Torr. & A.Gray
Medicago scutellata (L.) Mill.
Dalea emoryi A.Gray
Astragalus mulfordae M.E.Jones
Gayophytum helleri Rydb.
Oenothera caespitosa var. purpurea (S.Watson) Munz
Ceanothus prostratus var. grandiflorus (Torr.) Jeps.
Ptelea baldwinii Young
Rhus laurina Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Mertensia campanulata A.Nelson
Peltiphyllum peltatum (Torr. ex Benth.) Engl.
Anthoxanthum hirtum (Schrank) Y.Schouten & Veldkamp
Schedonnardus paniculatus (Nutt.) Trel.
Gymnosperma corymbosum DC.
Crepis setosa Hallier fil.
Salix agrophylla Nutt.
Allium fimbriatum var. parryi (S.Watson) Ownbey & Aase
Ranunculus lemmonii A.Gray
Lomatium humile (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Hoover ex Mathias & Constance
Sophora arizonica S.Watson
Trifolium appendiculatum Lojac.
Caesalpinia jamesii (Torr. & A.Gray) Fisher
Philadelphus gordonianus Lindl.
Choisya dumosa var. arizonica (Standl.) L.D.Benson
Linanthus liniflorus (Benth.) Greene
Galium angustifolium var. siccatum (W.Wight) Hilend & J.T.Howell
Galium nuttallii subsp. ovalifolium (Dempster) Dempster & Stebbins
Hermidium alipes S.Watson
Allium howellii var. clokeyi Ownbey & Aase
Juncus falcatus var. sitchensis Buchenau
Senecio spartioides var. multicapitatus (Greenm. ex Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Helianthella californica var. shastensis W.A.Weber
Aster scopulorum A.Gray
Crepis exilis subsp. typica Babc. & Stebbins, 1938
Prunus domestica
Mentzelia nitens var. jonesii (Urb. & Gilg) J.Darl.
Lesquerella alpina subsp. parvula (Greene) Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Ranunculus pyrenaeus L.
Hedysarum boreale var. utahense (Rydb.) Rollins
Vicia agrigentinum Link
Geranium retrorsum L'Hér. ex DC.
Ceanothus hearstiorum Hoover & Roof
Oxalis amplifolia (Trel.) R.Knuth
Hosackia glabra (Vogel) Torr.
Castanopsis sempervirens (Kellogg) Dudley
Scorzonella procera (A.Gray) Greene
Ribes nigrum L.
Lithocarpus korthalsii (Endl.) Soepadmo
Vicia gigantea Bunge
Lathyrus vestitus Torr. & A.Gray
Gilia intertexta (Benth.) Steud.
Prunus demissa (Nutt.) D.Dietr.
Brassica rapa subsp. oleifera (DC.) Metzg.
Crataegus erythropoda Ashe
Antirrhinum L.
Photinia arbutifolia A.Gray
Beta L.
Senecio bicolor subsp. cineraria (DC.) Chater
Vaccinium L.
Festuca confinis Vasey
Fuchsia L.
Prunus serotina var. capuli (Cav.) Hatus.
Micranthes nelsoniana subsp. nelsoniana
Robinia pseudacacia L.
Quercus hypoleuca Miq.
Rhododendron L.
Acer palmatum var. amoenum (Carrière) Ohwi
Elymus caninus (L.) L.
Elymus repens subsp. repens
Allium bolanderi var. mirabile (L.F.Hend.) McNeal
Allium columbianum (Ownbey & Mingrone) P.M.Peterson, Annable & Rieseberg
Allium paniculatum L.
Brassica rapa var. oleifera DC.
Chenopodium ×hybridum E.H.L.Krause
Elymus elymoides subsp. hordeoides (Suksd.) Barkworth
Lactuca tatarica var. pulchella (Pursh) Breitung
Lathyrus pauciflorus subsp. brownii (Eastw.) Piper
Lathyrus nevadensis var. cusickii (S.Watson) Broich
Lupinus garfieldensis C.P.Sm.
Malus zumi (Matsum.) Rehder
Pennisetum glaucum (L.) R.Br.
Potentilla anserina var. groenlandica Tratt.
Ribes oxyacanthoides subsp. cognatum (Greene) Q.P.Sinnott
Rubus chloocladus W.C.R.Watson
Setaria italica subsp. viridis (L.) Thell.
Lupinus abramsii C.P.Sm.
Diospyros kaki L.f.
Rubus sachalinensis H.Lév.
Ipomoea alba L.
Gossypium robinsonii F.Muell.
Citrus ×wilsonii Tanaka
Ipomoea wightii (Wall.) Choisy
Triticum timopheevii subsp. armeniacum (Á.Löve) van Slageren
Triticum monococcum subsp. aegilopoides (Link) Thell.
Aegilops crassa Boiss. ex Hohen.
Aegilops searsii Feldman & Kislev
Aegilops comosa var. subventricosa Boiss.
Aegilops speltoides subsp. speltoides
Aegilops squarrosa Willd., 1806
Prunus serotina var. virens (Wooton & Standl.) Mc Vaugh
Persea caerulea (Ruiz & Pav.) Mez
Rubus discolor Godr.
Prunus ilicifolia subsp. occidentalis (Brandegee) A.E.Murray
Thinopyrum pycnanthum (Godr.) Barkworth
Lathyrus vestitus subsp. laevicarpus Broich
Sinapis arvensis var. arvensis
Lathyrus biflorus T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Potentilla cristae Ferlatte & Strother
Solanum xanti var. montanum Munz
Chenopodium album var. missouriense (Aellen) Bassett & Crompton
Echinochloa oryzoides (Ard.) Fritsch
Lupinus brevior (Jeps.) J.A.Christian & D.B.Dunn
Solanum peruvianum L.
Potentilla grayi S.Watson
Medicago sativa var. falcata (L.) Urb., 1873
Rorippa alpina (S.Watson) Rydb.
Lathyrus laetivirens Greene ex Rydb.
Helianthus neglectus Heiser
Phaseolus pedicellatus Benth.
Thinopyrum junceiforme (Á.Löve & D.Löve) Á.Löve
Prunus nigra Aiton
Acer davidii Franch.
Fragaria xananassa (Weston) Duchesne ex Rozier
Fragaria chiloensis subsp. lucida (Vilm.) Staudt
Lupinus sulphureus var. subsaccatus (Suksd.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lupinus latifolius subsp. viridifolius (A.Heller) Kenny & D.B.Dunn
Lupinus retrorsus L.F.Hend.
Malus pumila Kitam.
Potentilla convallaria Rydb.
Potentilla intermedia L.
Ribes erythrocarpum Coville & Leiberg
Solanum cochabambense Bitter
Ficus ingens (Miq.) Miq.
Lupinus latifolius subsp. leucanthus (Rydb.) Kenny & D.B.Dunn
Ipomoea obscura (L.) Ker Gawl.
Vicia villosa subsp. pseudocracca (Bertol.) P.W.Ball
Prunus fasciculata subsp. punctata (Jeps.) A.E.Murray
Ribes californicum subsp. hesperium (Mc Clatchie) Thorne
Brassica arvensis Scheele, 1843
Hordeum vulgare var. vulgare
Lupinus culbertsonii Greene
Lupinus culbertsonii subsp. hypolasius (Greene) B.J.Cox
Echinochloa oryzicola Vasinger
Juglans microcarpa Berl.
Potentilla concinna var. bicrenata (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh & B.C.Johnst.
Hordeum vulgare var. distichon (L.) Alef.
Chenopodium incanum var. elatum D.J.Crawford
Phaseolus parvifolius Freytag
Rubus arcticus subsp. acaulis (Michx.) Focke
Triticum monococcum subsp. monococcum
Allium scorodoprasum L.
Leymus racemosus (Lam.) Tzvelev
Helianthus hirsutus Raf.
Ilex pedunculosa Miq.
Lepidium papilliferum (L.F.Hend.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Lupinus lyallii subsp. washoensis (A.Heller) B.J.Cox
Lupinus sabinianus Douglas ex Lindl.
Lupinus sulphureus var. bingenensis (Suksd.) Gandhi & Vincent
Potentilla glandulosa var. campanulata C.L.Hitchc.
Potentilla paradoxa Schur ex Nyman
Ribes cereum var. colubrinum C.L.Hitchc.
Vicia americana subsp. minor (Hook.) C.R.Gunn
Vicia sepium L.
Lepidium montanum subsp. montanum
Ipomoea jalapa (L.) Pursh
Triticum turgidum subsp. dicoccoides (Asch. & Graebn.) Thell.
Ficus lutea Vahl
Citrus sinensis (Mill.) Pers., 1806
Triticum urartu Thumanjan ex Gandilyan
Aegilops neglecta Req. ex Bertol.
Persea indica Linnaeus, 1753
Allium subhirsutum L.
Avena strigosa Schreb.
Rorippa palustris var. clavata (Rydb.) Stuckey
Allium passeyi N.H.Holmgren & A.H.Holmgren
Triticum L.
Solanum pimpinellifolium Mill. ex Dunal
Helianthus petiolaris subsp. fallax Heiser
Cucurbita argyrosperma var. palmeri (L.H.Bailey) Merrick & D.M.Bates
Rubus macrophyllus Weihe & Nees
Rubus idaeus subsp. idaeus
Leymus Hochst.
Potentilla cryptocaulis Clokey
Acer sterculiaceum subsp. franchetii (Pax) Murray
Allium dictuon H.St.John
Camellia rosiflora Hook.
Chenopodium overi Aellen
Lathyrus nevadensis subsp. lanceolatus (Howell) C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium draba subsp. chalepense (L.) Thell.
Lupinus arcticus subsp. canadensis (C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Lupinus volcanicus Greene
Potentilla ×valida Greene
Pyrus L.
Triticum pyramidale Delile ex Schult.
Prunus eremophila Prigge
Allium fimbriatum var. denticulatum Ownbey & Aase ex Traub
Elymus stebbinsii subsp. septentrionalis Barkworth
Leymus californicus (Boland ex Thurb.) Barkworth
Pyrus hybr
Rubus parvifolius L.
Triticum turgidum subsp. durum (Desf.) Husn.
Crambe maritima L.
Helianthus grosseserratus M.Martens
Malus toringo (Siebold ex Regel) Siebold ex DeVriese
Panicum miliaceum subsp. ruderale (Kitag.) Tzelev
Vaccinium coccinium Piper
Vicia tenuifolia Roth
Aegilops tauschii subsp. strangulata (Eig) Tzvelev
Ribes californicum subsp. californicum
Lathyrus vestitus subsp. laetiflorus (Greene) Broich
Lathyrus jepsonii var. jepsonii
Lupinus sinaloensis C.P.Sm.
Ficus crocata (Miq.) Mart. ex Miq.
Potentilla millefolia var. klamathensis (Rydb.) Jeps.
Lupinus argenteus var. hillii (Greene) Barneby
Zea mays subsp. amylacea (Sturtev.) Zhuk.
Acer rufinerve Siebold & Zucc.
Elymus bakeri (E.E.Nelson) Á.Löve
Lupinus cusickii S.Watson
Malus prunifolia (Willd.) Borkh.
Setaria pumila subsp. subtesselata (Buse) B.K.Simon
Solanum ferrugineum Jacq.
Solanum demissum Lindl.
Aegilops triuncialis subsp. typica Zhuk
Brassica rapa subsp. chinensis (L.) Hanelt
Citrullus colocynthis (L.) Schrader
Ribes nelsonii Coville & Rose
Lepidium barnebyanum Reveal
Potentilla angelliae N.H.Holmgren
Lupinus ostiofluminis C.P.Sm.
Allium constrictum (Ownbey & Mingrone) P.M.Peterson, Annable & Rieseberg
Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme (Dunal) D.M.Spooner, G.J.Anderson & R.K.Jansen
Vigna unguiculata (L.) Walp.
Rhynchosia minima var. minima
Ribes nevadaense var. grantii (A.Heller) A.Berger
Agropyron spicatum var. spicatum
Lepidium bonariense L.
Lupinus caudatus subsp. argophyllus (A.Gray) E.Phillips
Vaccinium parviflorum A.Gray
Chenopodium neomexicanum var. palmeri (Standl.) T.W.Walters
Lupinus congdonii (C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Allium obtusum var. conspicuum Mortola & McNeal
Pistacia L.
Allium bigelovii S.Watson
Chenopodium capitatum Wats.
Helianthus winteri J.C.Stebbins
Leymus hybr
Cucumis melo subsp. melo
Acer wuyuanense W.P.Fang & Y.T.Wu
Allium ramosum L.
Lupinus sabinii Douglas ex Hook.
Malus baccata (L.) Moench
Pisum sativum subsp. arvense (L.) Asch. & Graebn.
Prunus incisa Thunb.
Thinopyrum junceum (L.) Á.Löve
Sorghum drummondii (Nees ex Steud.) Millsp. & Chase
Beilschmiedia riparia Miranda
Lupinus sellulus var. medius (Detling) B.J.Cox
Potentilla hassei Rydb.
Panicum vaseyanum Scribn. ex Beal
Lupinus hybr
Helianthus divaricatus L.
Acer japonicum Thunb.
Lupinus magnificus var. hesperius C.P.Sm.
Acer pectinatum subsp. maximowiczii (Pax) A.E.Murray
Sinapis alba subsp. alba
Leymus arenarius (L.) Hochst.
Lathyrus vestitus subsp. bolanderi (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Lupinus rivularis var. latifolius (Lindl. ex J.Agardh) S.Watson
Lupinus oreganus var. kincaidii C.P.Sm.
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. glabrata (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Potentilla hypartica Malte
Rubus tricolor Focke
Vicia americana subsp. linearis S.Watson
Aegilops speltoides subsp. ligustica (Savign.) Zhuk.
Potentilla bolanderi Greene
Ficus rubiginosa Desf.
Setaria sphacelata (Schumach.) Stapf & C.E.Hubb. ex Moss
Corylus L.
Elymus lanceolatus var. riparius (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Dorn
Fragaria vesca f. helleri (Holz.) Staudt
Ilex fargesii Franch.
Lepidium pubescens Desv.
Lupinus amphibius Suksd.
Malus sargentii Rehder
Medicago sativa var. varia (Martyn) Urb.
Potentilla vulgaris Kitt.
Aegilops markgrafii (Greuter) K.Hammer
Aegilops comosa subsp. eucomosa Eig
Lupinus mexicanus Cerv. ex Lag.
Potentilla glandulosa f. hansenii (Greene) Th.Wolf
Ipomoea lacunosa L.
Aegilops juvenalis (Thell.) Eig
Chenopodium incanum var. incanum
Triticum aestivum subsp. aestivum
Medicago ciliaris Linnaeus, 1753
Glycine max (L.) Merr.
Manihot caudata Greenm.
Acer tataricum subsp. ginnala (Maxim.) Wesm.
Allium howellii var. sanbenitense (Traub) Ownbey & Aase
Potentilla reptans L.
Prunus domestica subsp. insititia (L.) Bonnier & Layens
Rubus ursinus subsp. ursinus
Setaria glauca Kunth, 1816
Vicia narbonensis L.
Pennisetum purpureum Schumach.
Amblyopyrum muticum var. muticum
Castanea pumila (L.) Mill.
Ribes tularense (Coville) Standl.
Ilex pernyi Franch.
Acacia coulteri A.Gray
Heteropterys eglandulosa A.Juss.
Abutilon Hill
Acmispon grandiflorus var. macranthus (Greene) Brouillet
Eriogonum nutans var. glabratum Reveal
Arum palaestinum Boiss.
Pentachaeta bellidiflora Greene
Redfieldia flexuosa (Thurb.) Vasey
Heuchera micrantha var. micrantha
Ranunculus hispidus Michx.
Oreocarya spiculifera Piper
Xanthisma spinulosum var. gooddingii (A.Nelson) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Osteospermum moniliferum subsp. moniliferum
Brassica oleracea var. sabellica L.
Paronychia jamesii Torr. & A.Gray
Opuntia humifusa (Raf.) Raf.
Oenothera grandis (Britton) Rydb.
Platanthera estesii W.J.Schrenk
Pectis angustifolia Torr.
Helleborus lividus subsp. corsicus (Briq.) P.Fourn.
Populus deltoides subsp. monilifera (Aiton) Eckenw.
Symphyotrichum hallii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Leucophyllum candidum I.M.Johnst.
Montanoa rosei B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Trifolium kingii subsp. macilentum (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Castilleja campestris var. succulenta (Hoover) J.M.Egger
Sabulina macrantha (Rydb.) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Eremogone aberrans (M.E.Jones) Ikonn.
Ficus padifolia Kunth
Cylindropuntia californica subsp. delgadilloana (Rebman & Pinkava) U.Guzmán
Erigeron oreophilus Ridl.
Polygonatum multiflorum (L.) All.
Ivesia cryptocaulis (Clokey) D.D.Keck
Hebecarpa obscura (Benth.) J.R.Abbott
Erigeron stanselliae K.L.Chambers
Solidago lepida subsp. lepida
Ferocactus alamosanus Britton & Rose
Arctous rubra (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Nakai
Viola umbraticola Kunth
Eucalyptus globulus subsp. globulus
Escobaria missouriensis (Sw.) D.R.Hunt
Psoralea pinnata L.
Symphytum orientale L.
Pedicularis cystopteridifolia Rydb.
Daucus carota subsp. carota
Opuntia confusa Griffiths
Aristolochia fimbriata Cham.
Epilobium foliosum Nutt. ex Torr & Gray
Ibervillea macdougalii (Rose) Lira, Dávila & Legaspi
Streptanthus vernalis R.O'Donnell & R.Dolan
Eriogonum lachnogynum Torr. ex Benth.
Packera contermina (Greenm.) J.F.Bain
Lorandersonia pulchella (A.Gray) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Ceanothus ×arcuatus Mc Minn
Lippia alba (Mill.) N.E.Br. ex Britton & P.Wilson
Cuscuta gronovii Willd.
Berberis oiwakensis (Hayata) Laferr.
Penstemon gracilis Nutt.
Solidago guiradonis A.Gray
Sedum oreganum subsp. oreganum
Thermopsis gracilis var. ovata (B.L.Rob. ex Piper) M.G.Mendenh.
Aralia racemosa subsp. bicrenata (Wooton & Standl.) S.L.Welsh & J.T.Atwood
Astragalus ertterae Barneby & Shevock
Libidibia coriaria (Jacq.) Schltdl.
Hymenoclea pentalepis Rydb.
Bacopa repens (Sw.) Wettst.
Grindelia maritima (Greene) Steyerm.
Alnus viridis var. sinuata Regel
Antheropeas wallacei (A.Gray) Rydb.
Melochia tomentosa var. speciosa (Watson) Goldberg
Iliamna rivularis var. rivularis
Muhlenbergia flavida Vasey
Paspalum L.
Ochrosia brownii (Fosberg & Sachet) Lorence & Butaud
Rhus integrifolia (Nutt.) Benth. & Hook.f. ex Rothr.
Achillea lanulosa Nutt.
Alternanthera stellata var. glabrata (Rose) Uline & W.L.Bray
Senecio mandraliscae (Tineo) Jacobsen
Cynodon aristulatus Caro & E.A.Sánchez
Simmondsia Nutt.
Potentilla glandulosa Boulay
Castilleja crista-galli Rydb.
Heliopsis rubra T.R.Fisher
Poa unilateralis subsp. unilateralis
Helichrysum dasyanthum Sweet
Ribes menziesii var. senile (Coville) Jeps.
Anemone deltoidea Douglas
Telanthophora cobanensis (Coult.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Museniopsis ternata var. filifolia J.M.Coult. & Rose
Penstemon montanus Greene
Arnica cordifolia subsp. genuina Maguire
Machaeranthera wigginsii (S.F.Blake) R.L.Hartm.
Eleocharis torticulmis S.G.Sm.
Poa banffiana (Soreng) Soreng & L.J.Gillespie
Verbascum speciosum Schrad.
Lomatium simplex var. simplex
Sporobolus interruptus Vasey
Fagonia barclayana Rydb.
Cynodon dactylon var. pilosus Caro & E.A.Sánchez
Critonia peninsularis (Brandegee) R.King & H.Rob.
Trisetum filifolium var. aristatum Scribn. ex Beal
Ranunculus aquatilis var. typicus L.D.Benson
Quercus basaseachicensis C.H.Mull.
Trisetum viride (Kunth) Kunth
Anthoxanthum L.
Lessingia glandulifera var. pectinata (Greene) Jeps.
Horkelia daucifolia (Greene) Rydb.
Oenothera havardii S.Watson
Agoseris laciniata (Nutt.) Greene
Linanthus ambiguus (Rattan) Greene
Erythronium citrinum var. citrinum
Leptinella scariosa Cass.
Arnica amplexifolia subsp. genuina Maguire
Pluchea carolinensis (Jacq.) D.Don
Eriogonum chrysocephalum A.Gray
Eriogonum arcuatum Greene
Blepharandra Griseb.
Bouteloua aristidoides var. arizonica M.E.Jones
Trachypogon Nees
Ipomoea pes-caprae (L.) R.Br.
Pattalias palmeri S.Watson
Sericocarpus oregonensis var. californicus (Durand) G.L.Nesom
Daucus carota subsp. sativus (Hoffm.) Schübl. & Martens
Mimosa pigra L.
Quercus ewanii I.M.Turner
Sedum stenopetalum subsp. ciliosum (Howell) R.T.Clausen
Arundo donax var. versicolor (Mill.) Stokes
Cirsium eatonii var. viperinum D.J.Keil
Spiraea ×vanhouttei (Briot) Zabel
Geranium phaeum L.
Salix fragilis f. vitellina (L.) I.V.Belyaeva
Piptatheropsis micrantha (Trin. & Rupr.) Romasch., P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Leptochloa crinita (Lag.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Impatiens hawkeri W.Bull
Lomatium fusiformis (S.Watson) J.F.Sm. & Mansfield
Ribes madrense Coville & Rose
Cotula turbinata L.
Draba ramulosa Rollins
Alnus cordata (Loisel.) Duby
Ecballium elaterium (L.) A.Rich.
Petasites frigidus var. vitifolius (Greene) Chern.
Monardella venosa (Torr.) A.C.Sanders & Elvin
Navarretia crystallina L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Aquilegia canadensis L.
Echinocereus maritimus subsp. hancockii (E.Y.Dawson) W.Blum & Rutow
Pithecellobium unguis-cati (L.) Benth.
Mammillaria canelensis R.T.Craig
Veronica utahensis M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. arenicola (L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh) R.B.Kelley
Mertensia cusickii Piper
Streptanthus batrachopus J.L.Morrison
Sesbania vesicaria (Jacq.) Elliott
Psilocarphus chilensis Reiche, 1902
Hesperevax acaulis var. robustior Morefield
Beloperone guttata Brandegee
Ericameria nauseosa var. arenaria (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Sairocarpus vexillocalyculatus subsp. intermedius (D.M.Thomps.) Barringer
Primula standleyana A.R.Mast & Reveal
Erigeron basalticus Hoover
Chorizanthe robusta var. hartwegii (Benth.) Reveal & R.Morgan
Carum carvi L.
Heuchera richardsonii R.Br.
Linanthus dichotomus subsp. meridianus (Eastw.) H.Mason
Tara cacalaco (Bonpl.) Molinari & Sánchez Och.
Festuca valesiaca Schleich. ex Gaudin
Forestiera shrevei Standl.
Brugmansia versicolor Lagerh.
Pilosella officinarum Vaill.
Salvia amissa Epling
Morinda citrifolia L.
Echinocereus scheeri subsp. scheeri
Eriogonum natum Reveal
Cypripedium parviflorum var. pubescens (Willd.) O.W.Knight
Astragalus pulsiferae var. suksdorfii (J.T.Howell) Barneby
Lepidium jaredii subsp. album Hoover
Opuntia discata Griffiths
Rudbeckia laciniata var. ampla (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Thermopsis montana var. montana
Clematis columbiana var. tenuiloba (A.Gray) J.S.Pringle
Argentina egedii subsp. egedii
Tithonia fruticosa Canby & Rose
Draba paucifructa Clokey & C.L.Hitchc.
Rhododendron ponticum subsp. ponticum
Cordylanthus pilosus subsp. trifidus (Rob. & Greenm.) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Eriogonum thompsoniae S.Watson
Cotoneaster bullatus Bois ex Bilm. & Bois
Tradescantia crassifolia Cav.
Draba longisquamosa O.E.Schulz
Allium oreophilum C.A.Mey.
Carlowrightia linearifolia (Torr.) A.Gray
Yucca whipplei var. parishii M.E.Jones
Heuchera flabellifolia Rydb.
Alkanna orientalis (L.) Boiss.
Eryngium tricuspidatum L.
Yucca whipplei subsp. intermedia A.L.Haines
Eryngium parishii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Heuchera micrantha var. pacifica Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Taraxacum vulgare Schrank
Calochortus caeruleus (Kellogg) S.Watson
Hydrastis canadensis L.
Scutellaria tuberosa Vaniot
Erigeron grandiflorus Willd. ex Spreng.
Heuchera leptomeria var. peninsularis Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Eryngium serbicum Pancic
Symphyotrichum novi-belgii var. novi-belgii
Salvia miltiorrhiza Bunge
Eryngium vesiculosum Labill.
Nothofagus Blume
Puccinellia grandis Swallen
Heuchera parvifolia var. flavescens (Rydb.) Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Ocimum africanum Lour.
Conioselinum chinense (L.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Trientalis europaea L.
Haplopappus arborescens subsp. peninsularis Moran
Chrysosplenium glechomifolium Nutt.
Descurainia incana var. viscosa (Rydb.) Dorn
Achnatherum wallowaensis Maze & K.A.Robson
Ciliaria austromontana (Wiegand) W.A.Weber
Heterotheca fulcrata var. amplifolia (Rydb.) Semple
Puccinellia airoides S.Watson & J.M.Coult.
Aristolochia elegans Mast.
Eriogonum mortonianum Reveal
Eriogonum ammophilum Reveal
Haplopappus hallii A.Gray
Michelia doltsopa Buch.-Ham. ex DC.
Erigeron andersonii A.Gray
Thelypodium Endl.
Heuchera rubescens var. truncata Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Potentilla beanii Clokey
Coreocarpus arizonicus var. arizonicus
Eryngium chamissonis Urb.
Eriogonum capistratum var. muhlickii Reveal
Haplopappus juarezensis Moran
Tanacetum compactum H.M.Hall
Erysimum cheiranthus Pers.
Calochortus maweanus Leichtlin
Jasminum sambac (L.) Aiton
Crusea hispida (Mill.) B.L.Rob.
Tradescantia sillamontana Matuda
Opuntia debreczyi Szutorisz
Mertensia fendleri A.Gray
Populus ×jackii Sarg.
Physaria occidentalis (S.Watson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Chenopodiastrum hybridum (L.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Oxalis corniculata var. repens (Thunb.) Zucc.
Ribes oxyacanthoides var. setosum (Lindl.) Dorn
Eriastrum eremicum subsp. zionis (T.T.Craig) S.J.De Groot
Echinocereus klapperi W.Blum
Leibnitzia lyrata (Sch.Bip.) G.L.Nesom
Escobaria missouriensis var. marstonii (Clover) D.R.Hunt
Viburnum ×bodnantense Aberc. ex Stearn
Monardella villosa subsp. franciscana (Elmer) Jokerst
Delphinium andesicola Ewan
Crocus chrysanthus (Herb.) Herb.
Erigeron serpentinus G.L.Nesom
Salvia iodantha Fernald
Echinocereus subinermis subsp. subinermis
Carissa bispinosa (L.) Desf. ex Brenan
Eremogone kingii var. compacta (Coville) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Cyclamen persicum Mill.
Potentilla effusa Douglas ex Lehm.
Petrophytum caespitosum subsp. acuminatum (Rydb.) Munz
Agastache parvifolia Eastw.
Fleischmannia sonorae (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Albizia occidentalis Brandegee
Leptosiphon jepsonii (Schemske & Goodw.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Sphaeralcea fumariensis (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh
Eriogonum pendulum S.Watson
Prunus mume (Siebold) Siebold & Zucc.
Buddleja marrubiifolia Benth.
Bidens xanti (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Robertium Picard
Cotoneaster miniatus (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Flinck & Hylmö
Camassia cusickii S.Watson
Carex rhynchophysa Fisch., C.A.Mey. & Avé-Lall.
Centaurea monktonii C.E.Britton
Teesdalia nudicaulis (L.) R.Br.
Apocynum androsaemifolium subsp. pumilum (A.Gray) B.Boivin
Ceratochloa carinata (Hook. & Arn.) Tutin
Festuca clementei Boiss.
Poa poiformis (Labill.) Druce
Najas minor All.
Festuca washingtonica E.B.Alexeev
Sambucus nigra var. caerulea (Raf.) B.L.Turner
Juncus covillei var. covillei
Schoenoplectiella supina (L.) Lye
Corrigiola litoralis L.
Aristolochia clematitis L.
Lupinus lepidus var. ashlandensis (B.J.Cox) Isely
Potentilla jepsonii Ertter
Calamagrostis breviligulata (Fernald) Saarela
Veronica dissecta (Rydb.) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Ozomelis trifida (Graham) Rydb.
Crepis atribarba subsp. cytotaxonomicorum (Boivin) W.A.Weber
Fumaria martinii Calv.
Juncus hemiendytus F.J.Herm.
Sorbus L.
Argentina anserina subsp. anserina
Eriogonum umbellatum var. vernum Reveal
Polygonum douglasii subsp. engelmannii (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Lathyrus sulphureus var. sulphureus
Verbascum nigrum L.
Senna corymbosa (Lam.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Utricularia bisquamata Schrank
Dorstenia drakena L.
Zizania palustris f. palustris
Heterotheca shevockii (Semple) Semple
Boltonia asteroides (L.) L'Hér.
Potentilla canadensis L.
Astragalus humillimus A.Gray
Oreocarya leucophaea (Douglas) Greene
Dimorphotheca jucunda E.Phillips
Sabulina nuttallii var. nuttallii
Pulmonaria officinalis L.
Physalis caudella Standl.
Quercus chrysolepis var. chrysolepis
Sophora leachiana M.E.Peck
Thorneochloa diegoensis (Swallen) Romasch.
Primula pauciflora var. shoshonensis (A.Nelson) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Festuca octoflora subsp. hirtella Piper
Veronica longifolia L.
Lilium pardalinum subsp. pitkinense (Beane & Vollmer) M.W.Skinner
Lupinus ×hybridus Lem.
Freesia leichtlinii subsp. alba (G.L.Mey.) J.C.Manning & Goldblatt
Platanthera colemanii (Rand.Morgan & Glic.) R.M.Bateman
Actaea laciniata (S.Watson) J.Compton
Bignonia capreolata L.
Astragalus xiphoides (Barneby) Barneby
Astragalus pinonis M.E.Jones
Lathyrus vernus (L.) Bernh.
Noccaea perfoliata (L.) Al-Shehbaz
Oxytropis borealis DC.
Yucca harrimaniae var. gilbertiana Trel.
Gleditsia triacanthos f. inermis (L.) C.K.Schneid.
Gentianella propinqua (Richardson) J.M.Gillett
Porophyllum punctatum (Mill.) S.F.Blake
Aliciella cliffordii J.M.Porter
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. matthewii J.M.Porter
Delphinium consolida L.
Quercus phellos L.
Lotus stipularis var. subglaber Ottley
Corylus rostrata Dippel
Aster menziesii Hook.
Delphinium ×belladonna (Kelway) Bergmans
Symphoricarpus albus
Microseris tenella Greene, 1894
Crepis occidentalis var. occidentalis
Cardaria chalapensis (L.) Hand.-Maz.
Ipomopsis congesta var. congesta
Potamogeton alpinus var. tenuifolius (Raf.) Ogden
Andropogon gerardii var. gerardii
Stipa nelsonii var. nelsonii
Erigeron nematophylloides S.L.Welsh & A.Huber
Stephanomeria tenuifolia var. tenuifolia
Asclepias asperula var. asperula
Haplopappus acaulis var. acaulis
Asclepias cryptoceras var. cryptoceras
Rubus idaeus var. strigosus (Michx.) Maxim.
Chenopodium fremontii var. incanum S.Watson
Senecio streptanthifolius var. streptanthifolius
Rumex maritimus subsp. fueginus (Phil.) Hultén
Senecio werneriifolius var. werneriifolius
Erigeron speciosus var. uintahensis (Cronquist) S.L.Welsh
Gilia pinnatifida Nutt. ex A.Gray
Eriogonum microtheca var. simpsonii (Benth.) Reveal
Viola nuttallii var. major Hook.
Polygonum douglasii var. johnstonii Munz
Geranium viscosissimum var. incisum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) N.H.Holmgren
Scirpus pungens var. longispicatus (Britton) Roy L.Taylor & MacBryde
Mertensia lanceolata var. coriacea (A.Nelson) L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh
Erigeron eatonii subsp. typicus Cronquist
Scirpus paludosus A.Nelson
Veronica anagallis L.
Gilia pinnata (Cav.) Brand
Chrysopsis villosa var. minor Hook.
Panicum lanuginosum Elliott
Erigeron wilkenii O'Kane
Cryptantha humilis var. nana (Eastw.) Higgins
Philadelphus microphyllus subsp. occidentalis (A.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Rorippa palustris subsp. hispida (Desv.) Jonsell
Populus ×intercurrens Goodrich & S.L.Welsh
Fendlera utahensis (S.Watson) Greene
Penstemon humilis subsp. humilis
Erysimum asperum var. purshii Durand
Yucca harrimaniae var. harrimaniae
Atriplex wolfii var. tenuissima (A.Nelson) S.L.Welsh
Artemisia tridentata var. wyomingensis (Beetle & A.L.Young) S.L.Welsh
Artemisia nova var. nova
Festuca ovina var. saximontana (Rydb.) Gleason
Artemisia dracunculus subsp. glauca (Pall. ex Willd.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Penstemon pachyphyllus var. mucronatus (Holmgren) Neese
Salix babylonica f. tortuosa (A.Vilm.) Geerinck
Trachelospermum asiaticum (Siebold & Zucc.) Nakai
Ficus elastica Roxb.
Mammillaria blossfeldiana var. blossfeldiana
Campanula carpatica Jacq.
Actaea elata var. elata
Perityle ajoensis Todsen
Iris ×hybrida Retz.
Eysenhardtia texana Scheele
Weigela hortensis (Siebold & Zucc.) K.Koch
Penstemon grahamii D.D.Keck
Bletia amabilis C.Schweinf.
Vinca major subsp. major
Danthonia decumbens (L.) DC.
Eriogonum microtheca var. microtheca
Asclepias verticillata L.
Chorizanthe robusta Parry
Pedicularis bracteosa var. flavida (Pennell) Cronquist
Aloe ×spinosissima A.Berger
Ranunculus canus var. canus
Lunaria annua subsp. annua
Carex macrocephala var. macrocephala
Perityle gracilis (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Betula papyrifera var. commutata (Regel) Fernald
Asclepias incarnata subsp. incarnata
Silene vulgaris subsp. vulgaris
Anemonastrum canadense (L.) Mosyakin
Crinum moorei Hook.f.
Artemisia inaequifolia Sòn.Garcia, Garnatje, Mc Arthur, Pellicer, S.C.Sand. & Vallès-Xirau
Ibervillea sonorae var. sonorae
Tradescantia spathacea Sw.
Leptosiphon nuttallii subsp. tenuilobus (R.Patt.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Heterotheca oregona var. compacta (D.D.Keck) Semple
Levisticum officinale Koch
Agave potatorum Zucc.
Pimpinella saxifraga L.
Krigia virginica (L.) Willd.
Packera obovata (Muhl. ex Willd.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Populus mexicana Wesm.
Scandosorbus intermedia (Ehrh.) Sennikov
Perymenium sonoranum (B.L.Turner) B.L.Turner
Asteridea Lindl.
Sclerocactus wetlandicus Hochstätter
Teucrium canadense var. occidentale (A.Gray) E.M.McClint. & Epling
Eriogonum strictum var. greenei (Gray) Reveal
Linum catharticum L.
Phemeranthus humilis (Greene) Kiger
Boechera lincolnensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Lomatium watsonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Taraxia breviflora Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1840
Polygonatum biflorum var. biflorum
Carex obtusata Lilj.
Inga eriocarpa Benth.
Houstonia rubra Cav.
Medicago ×varia Martyn
Puschkinia scilloides Adams
Lupinus sericeus var. thompsonianus C.P.Sm.
Physaria arenosa (Richardson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Euphorbia epithymoides L.
Beta vulgaris var. cicla L.
Myoporum laetum var. laetum
Tetraneuris scaposa (DC.) Greene
Geranium viscosissimum var. viscosissimum
Calliandra humilis var. reticulata (A.Gray) L.D.Benson
Tetraneuris grandiflora (Torr. & A.Gray) K.F.Parker
Sclerocactus brevispinus K.D.Heil & J.M.Porter
Cakile maritima subsp. maritima
Mammillaria wrightii subsp. wrightii
Ivesia longibracteata Ertter
Trifolium monanthum subsp. tenerum (Eastw.) J.M.Gillett
Descurainia longepedicellata (E.Fourn.) O.E.Schulz
Dianella ensifolia (L.) Redouté
Carex leersii F.W.Schultz
Oreonana purpurascens Shevock & Constance
Mammillaria blossfeldiana var. shurliana (H.E.Gates) Wiggins
Polemonium nevadense Wherry
Acer grandidentatum var. sinuosum (Rehder) Little
Cichorium intybus subsp. intybus
Prosartes D.Don
Acanthomintha duttonii (Abrams) Jokerst
Packera bolanderi var. bolanderi
Pyrola elliptica Nutt.
Sphaeralcea digitata (Greene) Rydb.
Mentzelia multicaulis var. flumensevera N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Phalaris arundinacea var. picta Muhl. ex W.P.C.Barton, 1815
Physaria hitchcockii (Munz) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Phlox griseola subsp. tumulosa (Wherry) Wherry
Arnica chamissonis var. incana (A.Gray ex Parry) Hultén
Eriogonum umbellatum var. cognatum (Greene) Reveal
Solanum nigrum subsp. nigrum
Aloe perfoliata L.
Aphyllon corymbosum subsp. corymbosum
Cardamine pachystigma var. dissectifolia (Detling) Rollins
Styphnolobium japonicum (L.) Schott
Hordeum vulgare subsp. vulgare
Forsythia suspensa (Thunb.) Vahl
Okenia hypogaea Schltdl. & Cham.
Senecio pattersonensis Hoover
Salix lasiolepis var. bigelovii (Torr.) Bebb
Aphanes macrosepala Rydb.
Aloysia macrostachya (Torr.) Moldenke
Hosackia maritima Nutt.
Calystegia occidentalis var. occidentalis
Aster chilensis var. bernardinus (H.M.Hall) Cronquist
Oenothera specuicola Raven
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. grande (Greene) S.Stokes
Penstemon breviflorus Lindl.
Malva malachroides Hook. & Arn.
Castilleja inflata Pennell
Mimulus cardinalis Douglas
Thlaspi californicum S.Watson
Leucothoe davisiae Torr.
Trifolium willdenowii Spreng.
Compositae
Quercus cornelius-muelleri Nixon & K.P.Steele
Limonium binervosum (G.E.Sm.) C.E.Salmon
Pickeringia montana Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Minuartia nuttallii subsp. gregaria (A.Heller) McNeill
Senecio clevelandi Greene
Mimulus primuloides subsp. linearifolius (A.L.Grant) Munz
Amsinckia vernicosa var. furcata (Suksd.) Hoover
Quercus breweri Engelm.
Senecio greenei A.Gray
Prunus ilicifolia (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) Walp.
Kalmiopsis fragrans Meinke & Kaye
Gonzalezia decurrens (A.Gray) E.E.Schill. & Panero
Clematis montana Buch.-Ham. ex DC.
Clarkia amoena subsp. caurina (Abrams) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Jarilla chocola Standl.
Polygonum aviculare var. depressum Meisn.
Euphorbia ocellata subsp. rattanii (S.Watson) Oudejans
Eutrochium maculatum (L.) E.E.Lamont
Drymaria effusa var. depressa (Greene) J.A.Duke
Euphorbia amygdaloides subsp. robbiae (Turrill) Stace
Sorbus americana Marsh
Ptilagrostiella kingii (Bol.) Romasch.
Linanthus pungens subsp. hookeri (Douglas ex Hook.) J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Lotus subbiflorus Lag.
Corispermum hookeri var. pseudodeclinatum Mosyakin
Astragalus amphioxys var. musimonum (Barneby) Barneby
Dietes grandiflora N.E.Br.
Ipomopsis spicata subsp. robruthiae Wilken & R.L.Hartm.
Ageratum conyzoides L.
Crusea diversifolia (Kunth) W.R.Anderson
Jatropha gossypiifolia L.
Eurybia kingii (D.C.Eaton) G.L.Nesom
Astragalus subvestitus (Jeps.) Barneby
Coleus amboinicus Lour.
Hemieva ranunculifolia (Hook.) Raf.
Clematis viticella L.
Oxybasis macrosperma (Hook.fil.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Acmispon strigosus (Nutt.) D.D.Sokoloff
Avicennia marina var. resinifera (G.Forst.) Bakh.
Allionia incarnata f. incarnata
Coursetia glabella (A.Gray) Lavin
Crataegus sheila-phippsiae J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Cylindropuntia californica subsp. californica
Crataegus aquacervensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Sarcocornia perennis (Mill.) A.J.Scott
Cotoneaster ×watereri Exell
Cerastium fontanum subsp. vulgare Baumg
Telosiphonia nacapulensis Felger & Henrickson
Eriogonum terrenatum Reveal
Dudleya cespitosa (Haw.) Britton & Rose
Camissonia bolanderi N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh
Orostachys japonica A.Berger
Capsicum baccatum L.
Nectouxia formosa Kunth
Phoenix canariensis hort. ex Chabaud
Calliandra humilis var. gentryana Barneby
Justicia furcata (Nees) Jacq.
Justicia wigginsii Leonard
Stelis immersa (Linden & Rchb.f.) Pridgeon & M.W.Chase
Desmanthus pumilus var. pumilus
Capsicum stramoniifolium (Kunth) Kuntze
Solanum xanti var. glabrescens Parish
Rhus hartmanii F.A.Barkley
Haplopappus spinulosus subsp. incisifolius (I.M.Johnst.) H.M.Hall
Jatropha purpurea Rose
Lavatera occidentalis S.Watson
Nicotiana greeneana Rose
Sphaeralcea arcuata (Greene) Arthur
Calochortus purpureus (Kunth) Baker
Solanum eleagnifolium Cav.
Rhus trilobata var. racemulosa (Greene) F.A.Barkley
Rhus radicans var. divaricata Fernald
Gossypium australe F.Muell.
Avena magna H.C.Murphy & Terrell
Lupinus sellulus subsp. ursinus (Eastw.) Munz
Potentilla gracilipes Piper
Allium senescens L.
Allium yosemitense Eastw.
Corylus colurna L.
Lathyrus tracyi Bradshaw
Lupinus laxiflorus var. calcaratus (Kellogg) C.P.Sm.
Prunus pumila var. besseyi (L.H.Bailey) Gleason
Cucurbita argyrosperma var. stenosperma (Pangalo) Merrick & D.M.Bates
Asparagus plumosus Baker
Vaccinium calycinum Sm.
Rubus hawaiensis A.Gray
Acer okamotoanum Nakai
Lupinus aridus subsp. ashlandensis B.J.Cox
Prunus serrula Franch.
Ribes glandulosum Grauer
Rubus pentalobus Hayata
Solanum stenophyllidium Bitter
Citrus limonia Osbeck
Ipomoea bonariensis Hook.
Lupinus subhirsutus Davidson
Leymus salina subsp. salmonis (C.L.Hitchc.) R.J.Atkins
Cucumis myriocarpus Naudin
Acer tschonoskii subsp. koreanum A.E.Murray
Camellia cuspidata Hort.
Chenopodium quinoa Willd.
Cinnamomum yabunikkei H.Ohba
Cucumis anguria L.
Lupinus albifrons var. hallii (Abrams) Isely
Ribes oxyacanthoides subsp. hendersonii (C.L.Hitchc.) Q.P.Sinnott
Rubus ferrugineus Wikstr.
Vaccinium cylindraceum Sm.
Vitis hybr
Medicago disciformis DC.
Carica L.
Ipomoea coscinosperma Hochst. ex Choisy
Prunus serrulata f. spontanea (E.H.Wilson) Chin S.Chang
Ribes alpinum L.
Rorippa calycina (Engelm.) Rydb.
Vicia pannonica Crantz
Leymus salina subsp. salina
Malus floribunda Siebold ex Van Houtte
Helianthus laciniatus A.Gray
Citrullus amarus Schrad.
Gossypium L.
Carthamus leucocaulos Sibth. & Sm.
Solanum profundeincisum Bitter
Acer mandshuricum Maxim.
Acer tegmentosum Maxim.
Allium lacunosum var. kernensis McNeal & Ownbey
Lathyrus nevadensis var. puniceus C.L.Hitchc.
Secale strictum (C.Presl) C.Presl
Solanum viarum Dunal
Ipomoea shirambensis Baker
Potentilla arenosa (Turcz.) Juz.
Panicum occidentale Scribn.
Malus hybr
Helianthus arizonensis R.C.Jacks.
Lathyrus pratensis L.
Lupinus strigulosus Gand.
Rubus setchuenensis Bureau & Franch.
Vaccinium bracteatum Thunb.
Gossypium darwinii Watt
Triticum turgidum subsp. dicoccum (Schrank ex Schübl.) Thell.
Aegilops peregrina (Hack.) Maire & Weiller
Pistacia raportae Burnat
Ribes roezlii var. amictum (Greene) Jeps.
Lupinus gracilentus Greene
Lupinus piperi B.L.Rob. ex Piper
Pisum L.
Prunus subhirtella Miq.
Vaccinium corymbosum var. glabrum A.Gray
Ipomoea lindheimeri A.Gray
Ficus luschnathiana (Miq.) Miq.
Pistacia texana Swingle
Acer maximowiczianum Miq.
Elymus hispidus subsp. varnensis (Velen.) Melderis
Ilex bioritsensis Hayata
Lathyrus nevadensis var. nuttallii (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Vicia sativa subsp. cordata (Wulfen ex Hoppe) Batt.
Syzygium cumini (L.) Skeels
Solanum pinnatisectum Dunal
Cinnamomum glanduliferum (Wall.) Nees
Ficus asperifolia Miq.
Hordeum vulgare var. spontaneum (K.Koch) Körn.
Olea europaea subsp. cuspidata (Wall. & G.Don) Cif.
Aegilops triuncialis subsp. eutriuncialis Eig
Aegilops vavilovii (Zhuk.) Chennav.
Secale L.
Ficus bussei Warb. ex Mildbr. & Burret
Persea chamissonis Mez
Echinochloa frumentacea Link
Elymus sibiricus L.
Quercus garryana subsp. breweri (Engelm.) A.E.Murray
Limonium californicum var. mexicanum (S.F.Blake) Munz
Ribes bracteosum Douglas
Lonicera hispida Pall. ex Roem. & Schult.
Clintonia Raf.
Trifolium repens var. repens
Potentilla bicrenata Rydb.
Lewisia longipetala (Piper) Clay
Oenothera serrulata Nutt.
Jatropha podagrica Hook.
Crassula capitella Thunb.
Tauschia glauca (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Mirabilis linearis var. decipiens (Standl.) S.L.Welsh
Grindelia nuda Wood
Actaea rubra subsp. rubra
Hedysarum boreale subsp. boreale
Camassia quamash subsp. intermedia Gould
Holographis pallida Leonard & Gentry
Madia anomala Greene
Opuntia polyacantha var. schweriniana (K.Schum.) Backeb.
Cenchrus cupreus (Thore)
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. pansum Reveal
Tagetes triradiata Greenm.
Opuntia toumeyi Rose
Physaria douglasii subsp. tuplashensis (Rollins, K.A.Beck & Caplow) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Leucaena diversifolia (Schltdl.) Benth.
Dichondra carolinensis Michx.
Ranunculus flabellaris Raf. ex Bigelow
Eriogonum corymbosum var. velutinum Reveal
Horkelia congesta Douglas
Pachira aquatica Aubl.
Iris versicolor L.
Iris tenuissima subsp. tenuissima
Passiflora edulis Sims
Xanthisma DC.
Hydrangea quercifolia Bartram
Camissonia kernensis var. gilmanii (Munz) Cronquist
Actaea spicata L.
Camissonia ovata (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Raven
Gilia inyoensis I.M.Johnst.
Cuscuta salina var. apoda (Yunck.) Yunck.
Cercidium ×sonorae Rose & I.M.Johnst.
Geranium erianthum DC.
Umbelliferae
Philadelphus lewisii var. lewisii
Pedicularis canadensis L.
Acacia cochliacantha Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Bursera hindsiana Brandegee
Evolvulus alsinoides var. angustifolius Torr.
Jacquinia pungens A.Gray
Arabis falcatoria Rollins
Erigeron breweri var. elmeri (Greene) Jeps.
Erigeron modestus A.Gray
Oenothera gauriflora var. caput-medusae H.Lév.
Erysimum radicatum Rydb.
Psorothamnus thompsonae var. thompsonae
Wyethia coriacea A.Gray
Andromeda L.
Mimulus ovatus (A.Gray) Holmgren
Antennaria luzuloides subsp. aberrans (E.E.Nelson) R.J.Bayer & Stebbins
Astragalus cremnophylax var. hevronii Barneby
Tripterocalyx carneus var. wootonii (Standl.) L.A.Galloway
Claytonia multiscapa Rydb.
Echinochloa crus-galli var. macera (Wiegand) Shinners
Astragalus austiniae A.Gray
Silene grandis Eastw.
Panicum brodiei H.St.John
Lomandra longifolia Labill.
Aphanostephus arizonicus Gray
Hymenoxys ivesiana (Greene) K.F.Parker
Phlox piperi E.E.Nelson
Astragalus paysonii (Rydb.) Barneby
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. glareosus (M.E.Jones) Hall
Sedum frigidum Rydb.
Brickellia wrightii A.Gray
Populus besseyana Dode
Penstemon higginsii (Neese) N.H.Holmgren & N.D.Atwood
Astragalus shevockii Barneby
Arabis pinzliae Rollins
Festuca tenella var. aristulata Torr.
Gutierrezia alamanii var. megacephala (Fernald) M.A.Lane
Eriophorum polystachion L.
Oenothera engelmannii (Wooton & Standl.) Munz
Astragalus emoryanus var. emoryanus
Arnica confinis Greene
Astragalus woodruffii M.E.Jones
Thelypodiopsis vaseyi (S.Watson ex B.L.Rob.) Rollins
Rumex paucifolius var. gracilescens Rech.fil.
Potentilla hippiana var. argyrea (Rydb.) Boivin
Pediomelum aromaticum var. barnebyi S.L.Welsh
Hazardia serrata Greene
Eucalyptus fastigata H.Deane & Maiden
Humulus americanus Nutt.
Eriogonum heracleoides var. leucophaeum Reveal
Gilia tenuiflora var. altissima Parish
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. procumbens Stuckey
Thelypodium macropetalum Rydb.
Hymenoxys helenioides (Rydb.) Cockerell
Carex foetida var. vernacula (L.H.Bailey) Kük.
Cordylanthus kingii var. densiflorus (T.I.Chuang & Heckard) N.D.Atwood
Cleomella oocarpa Gray
Atriplex patula var. patula
Atriplex argentea var. argentea
Yucca thompsoniana Trel.
Cyperus pringlei Britton
Ericameria nauseosa var. glabrata (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Bouteloua dactyloides (Nutt.) Columbus
Claytonia caroliniana var. sessilifolia Torr.
Synthyris laciniata (Gray) Rydb.
Astragalus harrisonii Barneby
Fraxinus anomala var. lowellii (Sarg. ex Rehder) Little
Draba pedicellata var. wheelerensis N.H.Holmgren
Astragalus argophyllus var. stocksii Barneby ex Isely
Lupinus argenteus var. argophyllus (A.Gray) S.Watson
Potentilla granulosa T.T.Yu & C.L.Li
Rosa stellata subsp. abyssa A.M.Phillips
Penstemon strictus var. strictus
Sedum obtusatum subsp. paradisum Denton
Oenothera angelorum S.Watson
Penstemon acuminatus var. acuminatus
Abutilon thurberi A.Gray
Lomatium bicolor var. bicolor
Cryptantha alpicola Cronquist
Eriogonum ovalifolium subsp. vineum (Small) S.Stokes
Lepidium montanum var. alpinum S.Watson
Erigeron elatior (A.Gray) Greene
Atriplex gardneri var. utahensis (M.E.Jones) Dorn
Physaria newberryi var. racemosa Rollins
Chrysothamnus oreophilus var. artus A.Nelson
Elymus simplex Scribn. & T.A.Williams
Oenothera acutissima W.L.Wagner
Descurainia incisa var. paysonii (Detling) N.H.Holmgren
Cryptantha cinerea var. arenicola L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh
Hymenoxys richardsonii var. utahensis Cockerell
Xerophyllum asphodeloides (L.) Nutt.
Vilfa depauperata var. filiformis Thurb.
Pedicularis parryi subsp. mogollonica (Greene) G.D.Carr
Scrophularia floribunda Boiss. & Balansa
Achnatherum ×bloomeri (Bol.) Barkworth
Eriogonum macdougalii Gand.
Spergularia marina (L.) Griseb.
Acacia angustissima var. chisosiana Isely
Cercocarpus montanus var. glaber (S.Watson) F.L.Martin
Sambucus neomexicanus Wooton
Juncus triglumis var. albescens Lange
Astragalus micromerius Barneby
Erigeron latus (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Cronquist
Prunus capollin (Ser. ex DC.) Zucc.
Tagetes subulata var. auarantiaca
Hemizonia paniculata subsp. foliosa Hoover
Penstemon distans N.H.Holmgren
Eryngium mathiasiae M.Y.Sheikh
Potentilla permollis Rydb.
Mertensia ciliata var. subpubescens (Rydb.) J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Castilleja rustica Piper
Pedicularis parryi var. purpurea Parry
Maianthemum Weber
Drymaria sperguloides A.Gray
Astragalus eremiticus var. eremiticus
Eriogonum jamesii var. flavescens S.Watson
Castilleja gloriosa Britton
Erythrocoma flavula Greene
Eragrostis lutescens Scribn.
Perityle vigilans Spellenb. & A.M.Powell
Draba burkei (C.L.Hitchc.) Windham & Beilstein
Astragalus scaposus A.Gray
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. brownii (Eastw.) Jeps.
Acrocarpus fraxinifolius Wight & Arn.
Boechera fernaldiana (Rollins) W.A.Weber
Delphinium multiflorum Rydb.
Descurainia brevisiliqua (Detling) Al-Shehbaz & Goodson
Franseria chenopodiifolia Benth.
Pedicularis bracteosa var. siifolia (Rydb.) Cronquist
Aletes macdougallii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Tofieldia glutinosa subsp. montana C.L.Hitchc.
Mammillaria wilcoxii Toumey
Cryptantha nana var. ovina Payson
Dalea tentaculoides Gentry
Draba arida C.L.Hitchc.
Oenothera deltoides var. ambigua Munz
Erigeron cronquistii Maguire
Grevillea vestita (Endl.) Meisn.
Penstemon garrettii Pennell
Eriophyllum harfordii Rydb.
Erigeron bigelovii A.Gray
Delphinium coccineum Torr.
Oenothera procera Wooton & Standl.
Bahia nudicaulis var. desertorum (M.E.Jones) Cronquist
Spiraea caespitosa var. elatior S.Watson
Cuscuta californica var. apodanthera Yunck.
Purpusia saxosa Brandegee
Ericameria nauseosa var. washoensis (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Cerastium fontanum var. vulgare (Hartm.) M.B.Wyse Jacks.
Viguiera ciliata (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) S.F.Blake
Sphaeralcea arizonica A.Heller ex Rydb.
Astragalus microcystis A.Gray
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. micropetala (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Cereus cochal Orcutt
Amelanchier mormonica C.K.Schneid.
Artemisia dracunculoides Pursh
Agoseris apargioides subsp. apargioides
Cirsium nebraskense (Britton) Lunell
Stachys coccinea Jacq.
Cereus pringlei S.Watson
Cynomarathrum scabrum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Xanthium canadense Mill.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. washoensis (L.C.Anderson) Cronquist
Mortonia scabrella var. utahensis Coville ex Trel.
Chamaesyce hyssopifolia (L.) Small
Chrysothamnus bolanderi (A.Gray) Greene
Carex buchananii Berggr.
Mimulus pulsiferae A.Gray
Pediomelum Rydb.
Eriogonum smithii Reveal
Ranunculus fascicularis Muhl. ex Bigelow
Solanum villosum Mill.
Encelia californica var. californica
Penstemon angustifolius var. vernalensis N.H.Holmgren
Eriogonum viscidulum Howell
Cryptantha creutzfeldtii S.L.Welsh
Eriogonum nudicaule subsp. ochroflorum S.Stokes
Erigeron canaani S.L.Welsh
Opuntia angustata Engelm. & Bigelow
Rubus arizonensis Focke
Calliandra houstoniana var. houstoniana
Aegilotriticum sancti-andreae (Degen) Soó
Lesquerella purpurea var. purpurea
Ivesia gordonii var. wasatchensis N.H.Holmgren ex Ertter & Reveal
Eriogonum lancifolium Reveal & Brotherson
Grindelia squarrosa var. quasiperennis Lunell
Ivesia gordonii var. gordonii
Arabis retrofracta Graham
Lupinus charlestonensis C.P.Sm.
Micropuntia pulchella (Engelm.) M.P.Griff.
Fleischmannia standleyi S.F.Blake
Eriogonum rubescens Greene
Amaranthus acanthochiton (Torr.) Sauer
Stellaria longipes var. edwardsii (R.Brown) A.Gray
Carex utahensis Reznicek & D.F.Murray
Orthocarpus brownii Eastw.
Lupinus ornatus Douglas ex Lindl.
Viola chrysantha Hook.
Luzula intermedia (Thuill.) A.Nelson
Perityle specuicola S.L.Welsh & Neese
Oenothera neomexicana (Small) Munz
Lupinus glacialis C.P.Sm.
Grindelia nana var. nana
Townsendia mensana M.E.Jones
Potamogeton foliosus var. fibrillosus (Fernald) R.R.Haynes & Reveal
Eriogonum cusickii M.E.Jones
Phlox collina Rydb.
Hedysarum boreale var. cinerascens (Rydb.) Rollins
Cyperus natalensis Hochst. ex C.Krauss
Astragalus misellus S.Watson
Thelypodium integrifolium subsp. gracilipes (B.L.Rob.) Al-Shehbaz
Deschampsia cespitosa var. confinis Vasey, 1896
Cocculus laurifolius DC.
Astragalus preussii var. cutleri Barneby
Phemeranthus parviflorus (Nutt.) Kiger
Mertensia nutans Howell
Eriastrum sparsiflorum var. sparsiflorum
Dianella tasmanica Hook.f.
Mimulus clementinus Greene
Horsfordia palmeri S.Watson
Hofmeisteria pluriseta var. pauciseta I.M.Johnst.
Amsinckia copelandii Suksd.
Amsinckia glauca Suksd.
Eupatorium berlandieri DC.
Sibara rosulata Rollins
Valeriana acutiloba var. acutiloba
Penstemon peckii Pennell
Yucca torreyi Shafer
Therophon cincinnatum Rosend. & Rydb.
Lepidium simile A.Heller
Townsendia alpina Rydb.
Carex projecta Mack.
Herrickia kingii var. kingii
Physaria lepidota var. membranacea (Rollins) Rollins
Lathyrus bradfieldianus A.Nelson
Elymus simplex var. luxurians Scribn. & T.A.Williams
Juncus falcatus subsp. sitchensis (Buchenau) Hultén
Spergularia diandra (Guss.) Boiss.
Sedum shastense Britton
Penstemon triphyllus var. triphyllus
Mimulus serotinus Suksd.
Kalanchoe fedtschenkoi Raym.-Hamet & Perrier
Osmaronia demissa Greene
Tillandsia secunda Kunth
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. uintahensis L.C.Anderson
Oligomeris glaucescens Cambess.
Zephyranthes longifolia Hemsl.
Dalea urceolata Greene
Arnica chandleri Rydb.
Rosa manca Greene
Potamogeton heterophyllus Schreb.
Cyclanthaceae
Calylophus hartwegii subsp. fendleri (A.Gray) Towner & P.H.Raven
Aquilegia grahamii S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Geum rossii var. rossii
Arabis sparsiflora var. peramoena (Greene) Rollins
Atriplex minuticarpa Stutz & G.L.Chu
Mimulus spissus var. lincolnensis Edwin
Caltha leptosepala var. leptosepala
Penstemon cinicola D.D.Keck
Poa rupicola Nash
Fraxinus pennsylvanica var. pennsylvanica
Conyza coulteri var. tenuisecta A.Gray
Vicia oregana Nutt.
Argythamnia palmeri S.Watson
Astragalus beathii Ced.Porter
Geranium strigosum Rydb.
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. viridis (Cronquist) A.G.Day
Gilia tenuis F.J.Sm. & Neese
Potentilla cottamii N.H.Holmgren
Draba oreibata var. serpentina Tiehm & P.K.Holmgren
Vicia angustifolia subsp. angustifolia
Melica inflata (Bol.) Vasey
Packera cardamine (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Dalea nana var. nana
Franseria acerifolia M.E.Jones
Potamogeton filiformis var. alpinus (Blytt) Asch. & Graebn.
Cymopterus montanus (Nutt.) Torr. & Gray
Arnica latifolia var. latifolia
Saxifraga petiolata A.M.Johnson
Juncus biglumis Krock., 1787
Drosera intermedia Hayne
Baloghia lucida Endl.
Oenothera contorta var. flexuosa (A.Nelson) Munz
Mahonia repens var. scopulatilis S.L.Welsh
Boechera microphylla var. microphylla
Gentiana tenella var. monantha (A.Nelson) J.Rousseau
Rubus pedatus Banks & Sol. ex Lowe
Corydalis caseana subsp. hastata (Rydb.) G.B.Ownbey
Lupinus depressus Rydb.
Abronia salsa Rydb.
Potentilla hallii Rydb.
Sphenosciadium capitellatum var. validum (Congdon) Jeps.
Townsendia jonesii var. jonesii
Cyperus rivularis Kunth
Securidaca longifolia Poepp. & Endl.
Fremontia californica Torr.
Juncus articulatus var. articulatus
Bulbostylis funckii (Steud.) C.B.Clarke
Potentilla subviscosa var. ramulosa (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Chamaemelum fuscatum (Gren. & Godr.) Vasc.
Eritrichium micromeris A.Gray
Potentilla glandulosa var. reflexa Greene
Carduus radicans Roxb.
Lithospermum viride Greene
Senecio bigelovii var. bigelovii
Senecio scalaris Greene
Oenothera pallidula (Munz) Munz
Salpingia Raim.
Betula glandulosa var. glandulosa
Grindelia howellii Steyerm.
Eriogonum hylophilum Reveal & Brotherson
Cymopterus acaulis var. higginsii (Welsh) Goodrich
Astragalus collinus var. laurentii (Rydb.) Barneby
Stanleya pinnata var. gibberosa Rollins
Hymenopappus luteus Nutt.
Acer subserratum Greene
Bicuculla occidentalis Rydb.
Trifolium haydenii Porter
Bigelowia leiosperma A.Gray
Arabis demissa var. russeola Rollins
Aliciella formosa (Greene ex Brand) J.M.Porter
Coreopsis atkinsoniana Douglas ex Lindl.
Penstemon cobaea var. cobaea
Falcaria vulgaris Bernh.
Astragalus diaphanus Douglas ex Hook.
Elyleymus aristatus (Merr.) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Acmispon gracilis A.Heller
Cryptantha grahamii I.M.Johnst.
Elionurus barbiculmis Hack.
Oxytropis multiceps Torr. & A.Gray
Salix geyeriana var. argentea (Bebb) C.K.Schneid.
Artemisia diversifolia Rydb.
Convolvulus incanus Vahl
Hackelia venusta (Piper) H.St.John
Carex sprengelii Dewey ex Spreng.
Hymenoclea salsola var. pentalepis (Rydb.) L.D.Benson
Trifolium andersonii var. friscanum S.L.Welsh
Atriplex saccaria var. asterocarpa (Stutz, G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.) S.L.Welsh
Galium serpenticum subsp. wenatchicum Dempster & Ehrend.
Physaria occidentalis subsp. cinerascens (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Astragalus adsurgens Pall.
Draba breweri var. cana (Rydb.) Rollins
Rudbeckia laciniata var. laciniata
Arabis confinis S.Watson
Aligera intermedia Suksd.
Amsonia longiflora Torr.
Gilia lemmoni A.Gray
Descurainia incisa var. viscosa (Rydb.) G.A.Mulligan
Chorizanthe pungens var. hartwegii (Benth.) Goodman
Draba reptans var. reptans
Liparis nutans (Ames) Ames
Myosotis sylvatica var. sylvatica
Atriplex orbicularis S.Watson
Salix caudata var. parvifolia C.R.Ball
Sorbus dumosa Greene
Lepidium montanum var. wyomingense (C.L.Hitchc.) C.L.Hitchc.
Hieracium rydbergii Zahn
Rosa helleri Greene
Bahia nudicaulis var. nudicaulis
Arctostaphylos vestita Eastw.
Senecio cardamine Greene
Rauvolfia javanica Koord. & Valeton
Phaca nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Gentiana rusbyi Greene
Russelia elongata Carlson
Populus tremuloides var. aurea (Tidestr.) Daniels
Eremogone macradenia var. ferrisiae (Abrams) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Plagiobothrys scouleri subsp. penicillatus (Greene) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Draba maguirei C.L.Hitchc.
Sophia sonnei (B.L.Rob.) Greene
Penstemon glaucinus Pennell
Gaura lindheimeri Engelm. & Gray
Salix ligulifolia (C.R.Ball) C.R.Ball
Lithophragma tenellum var. floridum Suksd.
Salvia ballotiflora Benth.
Dalea lachnostachya A.Gray
Onagra strigosa Rydb.
Corydalis aurea subsp. occidentalis (Engelm. ex A.Gray) G.B.Ownbey
Astragalus vaccarum A.Gray
Sida elliottii Torr. & A.Gray
Salix wyomingensis Rydb.
Agastache pallidiflora var. gilensis R.W.Sanders
Eriogonum strictum var. proliferum (Torr. & A.Gray) Reveal
Troximon plebeium Greene
Poa cuspidata Nutt.
Thelypodium lilacinum Greene
Neomammillaria armillata Britton & Rose
Acacia elongata Sieber ex DC.
Lesquerella hitchcockii subsp. tumulosa Barneby
Vancouveria concolor Greene
Erigeron glabellus subsp. pubescens (Hook.) Cronquist
Myosotis micrantha Pall. ex Lehm.
Dichaeta tenella Nutt.
Aletes filifolius Mathias, Constance & Theob.
Hymenopappus flavescens var. canotomentosus Gray
Eremogone kingii var. plateauensis (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Senecio suaveolens Gilib.
Eriogonum sulcatum S.Watson
Mentzelia mollis M.Peck
Lepidium crenatum (Greene) Rydb.
Eucalyptus grossa F.Muell.
Franseria cordifolia A.Gray
Sphaeromeria potentilloides var. potentilloides
Sisyrinchium segetum E.P.Bicknell
Apocynum angustifolium Wooton
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. spatulata Stuckey
Opuntia intricata Griffiths
Nemacladus rigidus var. interior Munz
Phlox tumulosa Wherry
Antennaria rosea subsp. pulvinata (Greene) R.J.Bayer
Phlox longifolia var. stansburyi (Torr.) A.Gray
Isocoma ×decumbens Greene
Potentilla norvegica subsp. monspeliensis (L.) Asch. & Graebn.
Opuntia abyssi Hester
Delphinium menziesii var. fulvum A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Carduus lacerus Rydb.
Orthocarpus densiusculus Gand.
Salix pendulina var. pendulina
Trifolium splendens A.Heller
Dodecatheon uniflorum Rydb.
Stachys rothrockii A.Gray
Petalostemon sonorae Rydb.
Astragalus webberi A.Gray
Cardamine cordifolia var. pubescens A.Gray ex O.E.Schulz
Houstonia arenaria Rose
Lupinus bicolor var. bicolor
Lepidium acutidens var. microcarpum Thell.
Boechera sparsiflora var. sparsiflora
Artemisia campestris var. caudata (Michx.) E.J.Palmer & Steyerm., 1935
Thelypodium eucosmum B.L.Rob.
Heuchera rubescens var. abramsii (Rydb.) M.G.Stewart
Eriogonum pauciflorum Pursh
Carex pseudoscirpoidea Rydb.
Carex microptera var. microptera
Cirsium virginianum (L.) Michx.
Potentilla paucijuga Rydb.
Hieracium alpinum L.
Tetracoccus engelmannii S.Watson
Physaria occidentalis var. goodrichii (Rollins) S.L.Welsh
Platanthera sparsiflora var. brevifolia (Greene) Luer
Quercus standleyi Trel.
Polygonum ramosissimum var. prolificum Small
Salix reticulata var. saximontana (Rydb.) Kelso
Fendlerella utahensis var. utahensis
Anisacanthus puberulus (Torr.) Henrickson & E.J.Lott
Astragalus atratus var. phyllophorus M.E.Jones
Astragalus eurylobus (Barneby) Barneby
Microsteris macdougalii A.Heller
Eriogonum ostlundii M.E.Jones
Potamogeton hagstromii A.Benn.
Amsinckia angulata Suksd.
Thelypodium paniculatum A.Nelson
Calycadenia multiglandulosa var. cephalotes (DC.) Jeps.
Trithrinax acanthocoma Drude
Eucalyptus parvifolia Cambage
Eriogonum medium Rydb.
Zingiberaceae
Erigeron chrysopsidis var. brevifolius Piper
Dianella ensifolia (L.) DC.
Astragalus brevidens (Gand.) Rydb.
Eucalyptus leucoxylon subsp. megalocarpa Boland
Lesquerella paysonii Rollins
Astragalus greenei A.Gray
Dudleya collomiae Rose
Menziesia ferruginea var. ferruginea
Laphamia A.Gray
Macronema glomeratum A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Silene menziesii subsp. dorrii (Kellogg) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Troximon heterophyllum var. glabratum Suksd.
Physaria chambersii var. membranacea Rollins
Robinia breviloba Rydb.
Marina calycosa (A.Gray) Barneby
Trifolium eriocephalum var. villiferum (House) J.S.Martin
Navarretia paradoxiclara L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Symphyotrichum laeve (L.) A, 1982
Sida diploscypha Torr. & A.Gray
Descurainia nelsonii (Rydb) Al-Shehbaz & Goodson
Diascia Link & Otto
Rubus bifrons Vest
Heterotheca hirsutissima (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Oenothera cespitosa var. marginata (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) Munz
Physaria lepidota Rollins
Haplopappus ferrisiae S.F.Blake
Lesquerella S.Watson
Viola macloskeyi var. pallens (Banks ex Ging.) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex jepsonii J.T.Howell
Erigeron chrysopsidis var. chrysopsidis
Dalea brachystachys A.Gray
Potentilla lateriflora Engl. ex Rydb.
Pyrrocoma crocea var. genuflexus (Greene) Mayes
Astragalus castaneiformis var. consobrinus Barneby
Gymnolomia brevifolia Greene
Bahia biternata A.Gray
Monardella robusta Elmer
Machaeranthera canescens var. ambigua B.L.Turner
Orobanche arizonica L.T.Collins
Trifolium andersonii var. andersonii
Muhlenbergia tenuifolia (Kunth) Kunth
Hymenoxys argentea (A.Gray) K.F.Parker
Stevia salicifolia var. salicifolia
Marah micrantha Dunn
Allium cristatum S.Watson
Euphorbia brachycera var. robusta (Engelm.) Dorn
Salix brachystachys Benth.
Amaranthus wrightii S.Watson
Polygonum tenue Michx.
Machaeranthera asteroides var. lagunensis (D.D.Keck) B.L.Turner
Heterotheca villosa var. pedunculata (Greene) V.L.Harms
Boechera glareosa Dorn
Convolvulus saxicola Eastw.
Isocoma drummondii (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Bowiea volubilis Harv. ex Hook.f.
Pediomelum aromaticum var. tuhyi S.L.Welsh
Verbena ciliata var. pubera (Greene) L.M.Perry
Antennaria flavescens Rydb.
Boechera selbyi (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Penstemon tweedyi Canby & Rose
Acacia lemmonii Rose
Draba monoensis Rollins & R.A.Price
Carex trichocarpa Schur
Erysimum parviflorum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Solidago canadensis var. scabra (Muhl. ex Willd.) Torr. & A.Gray
Acer negundo subsp. californicum (Torr. & A.Gray) Wesm.
Castilleja leonardii Rydb.
Polygonum polygaloides subsp. polygaloides
Gomphocarpus tomentosus var. xanti A.Gray
Ranunculus adoneus var. caespitosus (F.J.F.Fisher, J.A.Rowley & C.J.Marchant) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Rubus macropetalus Douglas ex Hook.
Hydastylus brachypus E.P.Bicknell
Nasturtium laxum S.Watson
Echinocereus engelmannii var. chrysocentrus (Engelm. & Bigelow) Engelm. ex Rümpler
Howeia forsteriana (C.Moore & F.Muell.) Becc.
Corydalis caseana subsp. brachycarpa (Rydb.) G.B.Ownbey
Clematis columbiana var. dissecta C.L.Hitchc.
Balsamorhiza tomentosa Rydb.
Erysimum capitatum var. amoenum (Greene) R.J.Davis
Eriogonum clutei Rydb.
Silene scouleri var. leptophylla C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Stropholirion californicum Torr.
Penstemon clevelandii var. angelicus I.M.Johnst.
Arenaria lithophila (Rydb.) Rydb.
Viola helleriana W.Becker
Atriplex gardneri var. welshii (C.A.Hanson) S.L.Welsh
Solanum interius Rydb.
Peucedanum L.
Dichanthelium (Hitchc. & Chase) Gould
Antennaria chlorantha Greene
Giliastrum rigidulum Rydb.
Stephanomeria fluminea Gottlieb
Ranunculus triternatus A.Gray
Artemisia pedatifida Nutt.
Silene rectiramea B.L.Rob.
Liriope graminifolia (L.) Baker
Brachyris californica DC.
Eriophyllum lanatum var. achillioides (DC.) Jeps., 1925
Astragalus leibergii M.E.Jones
Polygonum phytolaccifolium Meisn.
Marantaceae
Eschscholzia confinis Greene
Eleocharis lanceolata Fernald
Mahonia harrisoniana (Kearney & Peebles) Li
Gaura mollis E.James
Krascheninnikovia lanata var. subspinosa (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Trifolium andinum var. podocephalum Barneby
Viola venosa Piper
Poa purpurascens Vasey
Chamaesyce polycarpa var. polycarpa
Lupinus elongatus Greene ex A.Heller
Eriogonum cognatum Greene
Croton longipes M.E.Jones
Linanthus glaber (R.Patt. & Yoder-Will.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Claytonia parviflora var. rupestris Suksd.
Carex sonomensis Stacey
Lappula cottoni Piper
Viguiera subincisa Benth.
Xanthocephalum alamanii (A.Gray) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Franseria strigulosa Rydb.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. bryantii (Barneby) J.A.Alexander
Galium multiflorum var. subalpinum (Hilend & J.T.Howell) Cronquist
Townsendia aprica S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Alisma subcordatum Raf.
Chrysothamnus molestus (S.F.Blake) L.C.Anderson
Delphinium caprorum Ewan
Passiflora foetida var. arida Mast. & Rose
Jacaranda acutifolia Humb. & Bonpl.
Synthyris pinnatifida var. canescens (Pennell) Cronquist
Allocarya corrugata Piper
Meliaceae
Circaea alpina subsp. alpina
Crepis runcinata var. andersonii (A.Gray) Cronquist
Erythronium utahense Rydb.
Cornus stolonifera var. stolonifera
Hymenoxys lapidicola S.L.Welsh & Neese
Rumex patientia subsp. patientia
Hedysarum gremiale Rollins
Betula alba L.
Allium incisum A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Ledum glandulosum var. columbianum (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Acacia xanthophloea Benth.
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. purpureum A.Nelson, 1902
Eriogonum pharnaceoides var. cervinum Reveal
Asclepias angustifolia Sessé & Moc.
Opulaster pubescens Rydb.
Salix melanopsis var. bolanderiana (Rowlee) C.K.Schneid.
Symphyotrichum laeve var. laeve
Draba spectabilis var. spectabilis
Bambusa vulgaris Schrad. ex J.C.Wendl.
Vaccinium shastense J.K.Nelson & Lindstrand
Camissonia heterochroma subsp. monoensis (Munz) P.H.Raven
Lycopus virginicus var. pauciflorus Benth.
Grevillea victoriae F.Muell.
Rubus hesperius Piper
Elymus subsecundus (Link) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Ceanothus greggii var. franklinii S.L.Welsh
Juncus apiculatus Adamson
Penstemon gibbensii Dorn
Cyperus serrulatus S.Watson
Astragalus welshii Barneby
Draba douglasii var. crockeri (Lemmon) C.L.Hitchc.
Pectocarya chilensis var. californica Torr.
Parrotia persica (DC.) C.A.Mey.
Hosackia brachycarpa Benth.
Lesquerella cinerea S.Watson
Arabis beckwithii S.Watson
Schkuhria multiflora Hook. & Arn.
Hydrocotyle verticillata var. verticillata
Andropogon gerardii subsp. hallii (Hack.) Wipff
Desmanthus illinoensis (Michx.) MacMill. ex B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Primula cusickiana var. cusickiana
Eleocharis parvula (Roem. & Schult.) Link
Homalocladium platycladum (F.Muell.) L.H.Bailey
Lomatium attenuatum Evert
Oxypolis fendleri (A.Gray) A.Heller
Deweya arguta Torr. & Gray
Eriogonum umbellatum var. lautum Reveal
Hymenoclea hemidioica A.Nelson
Cnemidophacos knowlesianus Rydb.
Astragalus proimanthus Barneby
Lonicera albiflora var. dumosa (A.Gray) Rehder
Gentiana frigida Hänke
Buddleja pringlei A.Gray
Banksia baueri R.Br.
Calamintha ilicifolia A.Gray
Antennaria dioica (L.) Gaertn.
Allocarya charaxata Piper
Crepis barberi Greenm.
Cerastium axillare Correll
Eriogonum chrysocephalum subsp. desertorum Maguire
Penstemon tidestromii Pennell
Astragalus cremnophylax var. myriorrhaphis Barneby
Brickellia brachyphylla (A.Gray) A.Gray
Actinella biennis A.Gray
Etlingera elatior (Jack) R.M.Sm.
Penstemon vaseyanus Greene
Potentilla gordonii (Hook.) Greene
Rubus procumbens Muhl.
Carex misandra R.Br.
Bambusa multiplex (Lour.) Raeusch. ex Schult.f.
Arabis sparsiflora var. columbiana (Macoun) Rollins
Obione pusilla Torr. ex S.Watson
Kuhnia oreithales B.L.Rob.
Erigeron canus A.Gray
Tilia ×europaea L.
Erigeron carringtoniae S.L.Welsh
Amsonia hirtella Standl.
Minuartia nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Hosackia nana S.Watson
Arnica aprica Greene
Stachys ciliata subsp. macrantha Piper
Astragalus junceus var. attenuatus M.E.Jones
Marina scopa Barneby
Franseria sanctae-gertrudis Rydb.
Montia humilis Suksd.
Dicoria clarkae Kennedy, 1908
Astragalus crassicarpus var. cavus Barneby
Physaria cobrensis (Rollins & E.A.Shaw) N.H.Holmgren
Eriogonum lonchophyllum var. intermontanum (Rev.) Reveal
Flaveria mcdougallii Theroux, Pinkava & D.J.Keil
Gnaphalium exilifolium A.Nelson
Dasylirion longissimum Lem.
Sambucus cerulea var. velutina (Durand & Hilg.) Schwer.
Crepis nana var. ramosa (Babc.) Cronquist
Barbarea R.Br.
Dalea purpurea var. purpurea
Packera dimorphophylla var. dimorphophylla
Scutellaria nana var. sapphirina Barneby
Erysimum capitatum subsp. angustatum (Rydb.) R.A.Price
Ditaxis diversiflora Clokey
Muhlenbergia sylvatica Torr.
Euphorbia arkansana Engelm. & A.Gray
Lappula redowskii var. desertorum (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Chamaesyce ocellata var. arenicola (Parish) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Verbesina encelioides (Cav.) Benth. & Hook.
Heterotheca villosa var. nana (A.Gray) Semple
Dondia taxifolia Standl.
Brongniartia trifoliata Brandegee
Psorothamnus polydenius var. jonesii Barneby
Sphaeralcea munroana var. munroana
Primula cusickiana var. maguirei (L.O.Williams) N.H.Holmgren & S.Kelso
Fragaria vesca var. crinita (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium montanum subsp. canescens (Thell.) C.L.Hitchc.
Arabis drummondii var. oxyphylla (Greene) M.Hopkins
Cymopterus constancei R.L.Hartm.
Mimulus deflexus S.Watson
Trifolium macilentum Greene
Iris amabilis Eastw.
Astragalus sophoroides M.E.Jones
Isocoma azteca G.L.Nesom
Poa nevadensis Vasey
Eriogonum darrovii Kearney
Gilia filipes Benth.
Hedycarya angustifolia A.Cunn.
Echinocereus engelmannii (Parry ex Engelm.) F.Seitz, 1870
Astragalus lancearius A.Gray
Carex heleonastes Ehrh. ex L.f.
Lychnis drummondii (Hook.) S.Watson
Erythronium hartwegii S.Watson
Eriogonum annuum Nutt.
Mulgedium pulchellum (Pursh) G.Don
Bromus cebadilla Steud.
Epilobium paniculatum var. paniculatum
Neltuma pazensis Britton & Rose
Salix monochroma Ball
Pyrola virens Schweigg.
Musineon lineare (Rydb.) Mathias
Lupinus plumosus Douglas
Xylorhiza glabriuscula var. linearifolia T.J.Watson
Aster potosinus A.Gray
Plagiobothrys scouleri var. cusickii (Greene) Higgins
Heuchera ovalifolia var. orbicularis Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Euphorbia portulana S.Watson
Musineon tenuifolium Nutt.
Arabis holboellii var. collinsii (Fernald) Rollins
Penstemon cinereus Piper
Silene occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Carex aperta f. hydroessa Holm
Cirsium ochrocentrum var. townsendii Petr.
Vleckia occidentalis Piper
Centaurium namophilum var. nevadense C.R.Broome
Cleomella hillmanii var. goodrichii (S.L.Welsh) P.K.Holmgren
Lesquerella cordiformis (Rollins) Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Thelypodiopsis ambigua var. ambigua
Aphyllon minutum Suksd.
Glossopetalon meionandrum Koehne
Lygodesmia dianthopsis (Eaton ex King) Tomb
Psorothamnus thompsonae var. whitingii (Kearney & Peebles) Barneby
Orthocarpus linearilobus Benth.
Eriogonum brevicaule var. micranthum (Nutt.) Reveal
Ledum palustre subsp. groenlandicum (Oeder) Hultén
Echinopepon confusus Rose
Aragallus majusculus Greene
Caulanthus stenocarpus Payson
Camissonia munzii (Raven) Raven
Senecio willowensis Greenm.
Deschampsia cespitosa var. cespitosa
Oenothera deltoides var. decumbens (S.Watson) Munz
Datura candida (Pers.) Saff.
Rorippa microtitis (B.L.Rob.) Rollins
Gilia pungens var. squarrosa A.Gray
Geranium viscosissimum var. album Suksd.
Cryptantha leptophylla Rydb.
Fritillaria kamtschatcensis Torr.
Matthiola longipetala (Vent.) Markgr.
Abronia argillosa S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Salix bebbiana var. perrostrata (Rydb.) C.K.Schneid.
Erigeron sionis var. trilobatus (Maguire ex Cronquist) S.L.Welsh
Epilobium altissimum Suksd.
Geum oregonense (Scheutz) Rydb.
Viola vallicola var. major (Hook.) Fabijan
Peucedanum nevadense var. cupulatum M.E.Jones
Polygala lindheimeri var. parvifolia Wheelock
Glyceria flavescens M.E.Jones
Hydrocotyle prolifera Kellogg
Eriogonum corymbosum var. albogilvum Reveal
Rorippa islandica var. glabra (O.E.Schulz) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Hemizonia parryi Greene
Ivesia rhypara Ertter & Reveal
Coreopsis paludosa M.E.Jones
Microsisymbrium lasiophyllum var. dasycarpum O.E.Schulz
Lepidium montanum f. wyomingense C.L.Hitchc.
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. vulcanicus (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Arenaria congesta Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Sedum edule Nutt.
Cenchrus latifolius (Spreng.) Morrone
Potentilla multifoliolata (Torr.) Kearney & Peebles
Mimosa fuertensis Britton
Arctostaphylos bakeri Eastw.
Penstemon triphyllus var. infernalis N.H.Holmgren
Draba densifolia var. decipiens S.L.Welsh
Silene obtusifolia Willd.
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. ochroleucum (Small ex Rydb.) M.Peck
Cordylanthus palmatus (Ferris) J.F.Macbr.
Ipomopsis havardii (A.Gray) V.E.Grant
Astragalus albulus Wooton & Standl.
Astragalus purshii var. lagopinus (Rydb.) Barneby
Epilobium californicum Hausskn.
Draba densifolia var. apiculata (C.L.Hitchc.) S.L.Welsh
Aster jessicae Piper
Errazurizia rotundata (Wooton) Barneby
Astragalus newberryi var. escalantinus Barneby
Penstemon procerus var. modestus (Greene) Holmgren
Astragalus sterilis Barneby
Amsinckia longituba Brand
Pyrola uliginosa Torr. & A.Gray
Muhlenbergia multiflora Columbus
Opuntia bernardina Engelm.
Parosela barberi Rose
Eurybia merita (A.Nelson) G.L.Nesom
Polygonum esotericum L.C.Wheeler
Oenothera nyctaginiifolia Small
Adenanthera pavonina L.
Allium mirabile L.F.Hend.
Schoenocrambe barnebyi (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) Rollins
Draba quadricostata Rollins
Astragalus cobrensis var. cobrensis
Aquilegia formosa var. truncata (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) M.E.Jones
Ranunculus gelidus Kar. & Kir.
Pectis vandevenderi B.L.Turner
Rhamnus lanceolata Pursh
Castanopsis chrysophylla var. minor (Benth.) A.DC.
Mertensia amoena A.Nelson
Lupinus jonesii Rydb.
Salix matsudana Koidz.
Calamintha palmeri A.Gray
Coreopsis stillmanii (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Senecio integerrimus var. integerrimus
Oenothera albicaulis var. pallida (Lindl.) H.Lév.
Cirsium scopulorum Cockerell
Gilia aggregata subsp. euaggregata Brand
Senecio lapidum Greenm.
Agrostis stolonifera var. stolonifera
Cardamine cordifolia var. cordifolia
Lupinus arcticus var. tetonensis (E.E.Nelson) C.P.Sm.
Ipomoea arborescens var. arborescens
Sidalcea oregana subsp. eximia (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Sabulina stolonifera (T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Saxifraga stolonifera Curtis
Achlys DC.
Hesperidanthus barnebyi (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) Al-Shehbaz
Ceanothus foliosus var. vineatus Mc Minn
Saxifraga cespitosa subsp. cespitosa
Limnanthes floccosa subsp. pumila (Howell) Arroyo
Solidago simplex var. nana (A.Gray) G.S.Ringius
Ruprechtia fusca Fernald
Ipomopsis tenuituba subsp. tenuituba
Lathyrus jepsonii subsp. jepsonii
Draba demareei Wiggins
Euphorbia mellifera Aiton
Aucuba japonica Thunb.
Camonea umbellata (L.) A.R.Simões & Staples
Tragopogon L.
Erigeron oreganus A.Gray
Triplasis purpurea (Walter) Chapm.
Adenophyllum porophyllum (Cav.) Hemsl.
Gazania ×splendens Hend. & A.A.Hend.
Rubus arcticus L.
Sidalcea calycosa subsp. calycosa
Gouania lupuloides (L.) Urb.
Prunus domestica var. domestica
Zizania palustris L.
Sassafras albidum (Nutt.) Nees
Bryonia cretica L.
Nymphaea rubra Roxb. ex Salisb.
Opuntia arizonica Griffiths
Lasthenia californica subsp. bakeri (J.T.Howell) R.Chan
Dicoria canescens subsp. wetherillii (Eastw.) Kartesz
Heterotheca jonesii (S.F.Blake) S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Draba jaegeri Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Pseudognaphalium pringlei (A.Gray) Anderb.
Sedum dendroideum Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Lupinus argenteus var. laxiflorus (Douglas ex Lindl.) Dorn
Cirsium drummondii Torr. & A.Gray
Orthocarpus bicolor A.Heller
Chenopodium leptophyllum (Nutt. ex Moq.) B.D.Jacks.
Euphorbia simulans (L.C.Wheeler) Warnock & M.C.Johnst.
Sphaeralcea arizonica A.Heller
Carex bigelowii Torr. ex Schwein.
Cirsium flodmanii (Rydb.) Arthur
Mahonia nevinii (A.Gray) Fedde
Polygonum bistorta L.
Oenothera platanorum Raven & D.R.Parn.
Xylorhiza scopulorum A.Nelson
Euphorbia L.
Lupinus caespitosus Benth.
Thalictrum latiusculum Greene
Asclepias linifolia Kunth
Salix glaucops Andersson
Stylophyllum insulare Rose
Chamaesyce gooddingii Millsp.
Frangula purshiana subsp. annonifolia (Greene) Sawyer & S.W.Edwards
Lupinus brevicaulis Griseb.
Euphorbia velutina Greene
Salix glauca var. acutifolia (Hook.) C.K.Schneid.
Salix mackenzieana (Hook.) Barratt ex Andersson
Lupinus sellulus var. lobbii (A.Gray ex S.Watson) B.J.Cox
Sparganium androcladum (Engelm.) Morong
Gentiana L.
Lupinus alcis-temporis C.P.Sm.
Eriogonum greenei A.Gray
Solidago nemoralis subsp. nemoralis
Orthocarpus venustus A.Heller
Epilobium pringleanum Hausskn.
Corallorhiza leimbachiana Suksd.
Croton ciliatoglandulosus Ortega
Veronica beccabunga var. americana Raf.
Listera convallarioides (Sw.) Nutt. ex Elliott
Tetramerium nervosum var. hispidum (Nees) Torr.
Microseris howellii A.Gray
Carex bebbii Olney, 1871
Rhysopterus plurijugus J.M.Coult. & Rose
Salix lemmonii var. sphaerostachya Bebb
Hylotelephium telephioides (Michx.) H.Ohba
Salix austinae Bebb
Carex trichocarpa Muhl. ex Willd.
Sedella leiocarpa H.Sharsm.
Poa suksdorfii (Beal) Piper
Vaccinium caespitosum var. angustifolium A.Gray
Juncus obtusatus Engelm.
Bistorta vivipara (L.) Gray
Lupinus proximus A.Heller
Lythrum linearifolium (A.Gray) Small
Epilobium ciliatum × glandulosum
Impatiens pallida Nutt.
Lupinus pusillus subsp. rubens (Rydb.) D.B.Dunn
Stachys gracilenta A.Heller
Carex novae-angliae Schwein.
Cirsium arizonicum var. rothrockii (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Actaea arizonica (S.Watson) Compton
Habenaria thurberi A.Gray
Juncus badius Suksd.
Epilobium rigidum Hausskn.
Carex saliniformis Mack.
Carex hookeriana Dewey
Lupinus wyethii subsp. wyethii
Ribes ambiguum S.Watson
Lupinus bicolor var. umbellatus (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Cirsium remotifolium var. rivulare Jeps.
Lupinus arizonicus var. arizonicus
Dodecatheon cylindrocarpum Rydb.
Euphorbia campestris Schltdl. & Cham.
Amsonia kearneyana Woodson
Lupinus monticola Rydb.
Salix commutata var. sericea Bebb
Calycadenia hispida subsp. reducta D.D.Keck
Stemodia arizonica Pennell
Trichloris blanchardiana E.Fourn. ex Scribn.
Lycium rickardii C.H.Mull.
Lupinus lilacinus (A.Heller) A.Heller
Hesperanthes albomarginata M.E.Jones
Lupinus mucronulatus Howell
Salix pseudolapponum Seem.
Sanicula tripartita Suksd.
Lupinus latifolius subsp. longipes (Greene) Kenny & D.B.Dunn
Bromus brachyphyllus Merr.
Madia filipes var. macrocephala Suksd., 1900
Aster umbraticus E.Sheld.
Lupinus nanus var. carnosulus C.P.Sm.
Lupinus aridus Lindl.
Gilia parryae A.Gray
Mimulus clivicola Greenm.
Lythrum alatum Pursh
Salix myrtilloides L.
Lupinus sellulus var. sellulus
Dichanthelium acuminatum var. thermale (Bol.) Freckmann
Eriogonum pringlei Coult. & Fisher
Amsinckia hispidissima Suksd.
Penstemon rothrockii A.Gray
Carex stricta Lam.
Vicia americana var. pallida Suksd.
Vaccinium caespitosum var. arbuscula A.Gray
Limnanthes versicolor var. parishii Jeps.
Ceanothus masonii McMinn
Solidago rigida subsp. humilis (Porter) S.B.Heard & Semple
Lupinus plattensis S.Watson
Sedum laxum var. eastwoodiae (Britton) H.Ohba
Plantago parishii J.F.Macbr.
Veronica humifusa Dicks.
Cryptantha arenicola A.Heller
Carex willdenowii Schkuhr
Lupinus silvicola A.Heller
Potamogeton fibrillosus Fernald
Oenothera cardiophylla var. petiolaris M.E.Jones
Cedronella breviflora A.Gray
Juncus balticus var. littoralis Engelm.
Streptanthus albidus Greene
Cladothrix oblongifolia S.Watson
Epilobium chilense f. latifolium Hausskn.
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. serratum S.Stokes
Panicum pacificum Hitchc. & Chase
Thalictrum papyraceum Greene
Aphyllon sedi Suksd.
Carum howellii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Podagrostis aequivalvis (Trin.) Scribn. & Merr.
Peucedanum hassei J.M.Coult. & Rose
Trifolium amoenum Greene
Orthocarpus tolmiei subsp. holmgreniorum T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Echinocereus fendleri (Engelm.) Rümpler
Plantago shastensis Greene
Lupinus multitinctus A.Nelson
Hackelia diffusa var. diffusa
Eatonia annua Suksd.
Palmerella debilis var. serrata A.Gray
Lupinus fragrans A.Heller
Sedum spathulifolium var. spathulifolium
Lobelia loretensis M.E.Jones
Habenaria dilatatiformis Rydb.
Cactus radiosus var. alversonii Coult.
Salix thurberi Rowlee
Lupinus pinetorum A.Heller
Lupinus adsurgens var. lilacinus A.Heller ex C.P.Sm.
Chamaesyce rothrockii Millsp.
Rosa macdougalii Holz.
Taraxia tikurana A.Nelson
Lupinus sericeus var. flexuosus (Lindl. ex J.Agardh) C.P.Sm.
Penstemon brachyanthus Pennell
Montia alpina Eastw.
Cymopterus davisii R.L.Hartm.
Ranunculus tenuipes A.Heller
Campanula linnaeifolia A.Gray
Streptanthus niger Greene
Lobelia cotensis M.E.Jones
Eriogonum kennedyi subsp. pinorum S.Stokes
Artemisia ludoviciana var. incompta (Nutt.) Cronquist
Carex castanea Wahlenb.
Clematis arizonica A.Heller
Salix pennata C.R.Ball
Carex marcida var. debilis L.H.Bailey
Lupinus argenteus subsp. spathulatus (Rydb.) L.W.Hess & D.B.Dunn
Hoffmannseggia falcaria var. capitata Fisher
Carex podocarpa R.Br. ex Richardson
Githopsis filicaulis Ewan
Stylophyllum hassei Rose
Chlorogalum purpureum Brandegee
Grindelia hirsutula var. subintegra Steyerm.
Lupinus densiflorus var. menziesii C.P.Sm.
Juncus columbianus Coville
Phlox longifolia var. filifolia A.Nelson
Polygonum ramosissimum subsp. prolificum (Small) Costea & Tardif
Lupinus bicolor var. trifidus (S.Watson) C.P.Sm.
Eriogonum barbatum Elmer
Lupinus acutilobus A.Heller
Peperomia galioides Kunth
Astragalus clarianus Jeps.
Poa sylvestris A.Gray
Euphorbia cinerascens Engelm.
Eriogonum elatum var. limonifolium Gand.
Dalea lemmonii Parry ex A.Gray
Euphorbia jonesii Millsp.
Opuntia phaeacantha var. camanchica (Engelm. & Bigelow) L.D.Benson
Euphorbia uniglandulosa S.Watson
Carex haydenii Dewey
Rumex utahensis Rech.fil.
Lupinus lyallii var. danaus (A.Gray) S.Watson
Velaea howellii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Carex hallii Olney
Spiraea discolor var. glabrescens Greenm.
Thermopsis montana subsp. ovata B.L.Rob.
Toxicodendron ×lobadioides Greene
Trifolium confusum Rydb.
Saxifraga fragosa var. leucandra Suksd.
Hemizonia wheeleri A.Gray
Calypso bulbosa var. occidentalis (Holz.) B.Boivin
Carex laxiflora Lam.
Juncus nodosus var. megacephalus Torr.
Toxicoscordion arenicola A.Heller
Cleomella cornuta Rydb.
Navarretia densifolia var. jacumbana Brand
Asclepias macrotis Torr.
Horkelia brevibracteata Wiggins
Hedysarum L.
Peucedanum sandbergii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Ranunculus occidentalis var. laevicaulis Suksd.
Listera R.Br.
Juglans elaeopyren Dode
Salix curtiflora Andersson
Mimulus guttatus subsp. arenicola Pennell
Carex pseudojaponica C.B.Clarke
Jepsonia neonuttalliana Millsp.
Habenaria brevifolia Greene
Astragalus austinae A.Gray
Euphorbia blepharostipula Millsp., 1890
Sanicula howellii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Saxifraga cephalantha A.Heller, 1916
Elymus angustifolius Burtt Davy
Epilobium fastigiatum (Nutt.) Piper
Senecio saliens Rydb.
Ditaxis mercurialina (Nutt.) J.M.Coult.
Echidiocarya californica A.Gray
Croton monanthogynus Michx.
Lupinus holosericeus Nutt.
Salix exigua var. virens Rowlee
Polygonum aviculare subsp. aviculare
Chorizanthe obovata f. prostrata Goodman
Poa argentea Howell
Eriogonum rydbergii Greene
Carex umbellata Willd.
Asclepias rothrockii Greene
Orthocarpus rarior Suksd.
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. pubescens Thell., 1906
Lysimachia quadriflora f. albescens Steyerm.
Calhounia nelsonae A.Nelson
Solidago uliginosa Nutt.
Solanum chenopodioides Lam.
Rothrockia cordifolia A.Gray
Lupinus holmgrenanus C.P.Sm.
Abronia suksdorfii J.M.Coult. & Fisher
Euphorbia palmeri Engelm.
Stemmadenia tomentosa Greenm.
Euphorbia leptocera Engelm. ex Boiss.
Euphorbia serpillifolia var. consanguinea Boiss.
Calamagrostis lactea Beal
Scirpus rubiginosus Beetle
Schmaltzia oregana Greene
Peucedanum vaseyi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Juncus brevicaudatus (Engelm.) Fernald
Phlox costata Rydb.
Dendromecon myrtifolia Fedde
Cracca edwardsii var. sericea A.Gray
Lessingia ramulosa var. tenuis A.Gray
Eriogonum thymoides var. pallens Gand.
Adhatoda longiflora Torr.
Eriogonum roseiflorum Gand.
Epilobium drummondii Hausskn.
Chorizanthe staticoides var. latiloba Goodman
Montia interrupta Suksd.
Apocynum ×viarum A.Heller
Salix pseudomyrsinites Andersson
Euphorbia involuta Millsp.
Callitriche sepulta S.Watson
Euphorbia greenei Millsp.
Salix conjuncta Bebb
Salix perrostrata Rydb.
Lupinus arvensi-plasketti C.P.Sm.
Aster macdougalii J.M.Coult. & Fisher
Delphinium diversifolium subsp. harneyense Ewan
Salix bella Piper
Bidens alamosana Rose
Carex brevior (Dewey) Mack.
Lupinus arboreus var. arboreus
Lupinus desertorum A.Heller
Penstemon Mitch.
Penstemon roezlii var. violaceus Brandegee
Eriogonum palmeri S.Watson
Eschscholzia thermophila Greene
Anogra longiflora A.Heller
Rhus tepetate Standl. & F.A.Barkley
Mentzelia urens Parry
Cypripedium fasciculatum Kellogg ex S.Watson
Hedeoma blepharodonta Greene
Saxifraga bracteosa var. micropetala Suksd.
Lupinus argenteus subsp. rubricaulis (Greene) L.W.Hess & D.B.Dunn
Solanum emulans Raf.
Polygonum sawatchense subsp. oblivium Costea & Tardif
Montia parviflora var. rupestris Suksd.
Zauschneria villosa Greene
Carex crawei Dewey
Lesquerella kingii var. nevadensis Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Peucedanum triternatum var. brevifolium J.M.Coult. & Rose
Lupinus elmeri Greene
Veratrum viride var. escholtzianoides O.Loes.
Solanum fendleri subsp. arizonicum Hawkes
Delphinium scopulorum var. stachydeum A.Gray
Solidago confertiflora Nutt.
Myosotis alpina Lapeyr.
Cystium cornutum Rydb.
Campanula angustiflora Eastw.
Solidago speciosa subsp. pallida (Porter) Semple
Fritillaria grayana Rchb.f. & Baker
Poa annua var. stricta Vasey ex Scribn.
Listera cordata var. nephrophylla (Rydb.) Hultén
Oxytropis blankinshipii (A.Nelson) K.Schum.
Solidago hispida Muhl. ex Willd.
Oryzopsis swallenii C.L.Hitchc. & Spellenb.
Eriogonum ursinum var. confine S.Stokes
Eriogonum junceum Greene
Trifolium pauciflorum var. parvum Kellogg
Euphorbia rafinesquei Greene
Pinguicula lutea Walter
Lipocarpha aristulata (Coville) G.C.Tucker
Heuchera racemosa S.Watson
Boisduvalia macrantha A.Heller
Claytonia depressa var. silvatica Suksd.
Furcraea gigantea Vent.
Eriogonum piperi var. ochrocephalum Gand.
Lupinus suksdorfii B.L.Rob. ex Piper
Velaea parishii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Cerastium variabile Goodd.
Astragalus aboriginum var. fastigiorum M.E.Jones
Stenotus acaulis var. kennedyi Jeps.
Lupinus saxosus var. subsericeus (B.L.Rob.) C.P.Sm.
Oenothera cheradophila Bartlett
Trifolium elmeri Greene
Euphorbia versicolor Greene
Eriogonum heracleoides var. multiceps Gand.
Elodea columbiana H.St.John
Coryphantha strobiliformis (Poselg.) Moran
Opuntia mesacantha var. vaseyi Coult.
Leptotaenia purpurea (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eunanus douglasii var. parviflorus Greene
Macrosiphonia hypoleuca (Benth.) Müll.Arg.
Manihot rhomboidea subsp. rhomboidea
Matelea carolinensis (Jacq.) Woodson
Lupinus lyallii subsp. lyallii
Vicia pumila A.Heller
Apocynum nevadense Goodd.
Xanthium varians Greene
Cypripedium guttatum Sw.
Monardella elmeri Abrams
Fallopia japonica var. japonica
Solidago juncea Aiton
Antennaria concolor Piper
Carex arctata Boott
Carex oregonensis Olney, 1872
Monotropa fimbriata A.Gray
Eriogonum tenuissimum Eastw.
Pyrola sparsifolia Suksd.
Lupinus corymbosus A.Heller
Poa fendleriana subsp. albescens (Hitchc.) Soreng
Lupinus purpurascens A.Heller
Opuntia imbricata (Haw.) DC.
Acrolasia catalinensis Millsp.
Montia spathulata var. disciformis Suksd.
Festuca confusa Piper
Monardella discolor Greene
Verbena arizonica Briq.
Trifolium arcuatum var. cusickii Piper
Mirabilis retrorsa A.Heller
Wedelia incarnata subsp. villosa Standl.
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. maritimum Parish
Eriogonum welshii Reveal
Boisduvalia densiflora var. pallescens Suksd.
Pleuropogon hooverianus (G.T.Benson) Howell
Orthocarpus micranthus Greene
Coryphantha vivipara var. deserti (Engelm.) W.T.Marshall
Poa arctica subsp. grayana (Vasey) Á.Löve, D.Löve & B.M.Kapoor
Mentha rubella Rydb.
Listera retusa Suksd.
Asclepias linearis Scheele
Carex scopulorum var. prionophylla (Holm) L.A.Standl.
Thelypodium howellii subsp. spectabilis (M.Peck) Al-Shehbaz
Lupinus lyallii var. fruticulosus (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Quercus tomentella f. conjungens (Trel.) Trel.
Rumex kerneri Borbás
Delphinium variegatum f. superbum Ewan
Opuntia bernardina Engelm. ex Parish
Aster vaccinus Piper
Chenopodium standleyanum Aellen
Wyethia scabra var. canescens W.A.Weber
Metastelma R.Br.
Senecio variifolius Rydb., 1900
Listera borealis Morong
Eriogonum halimioides Gand.
Astragalus remulcus var. chloridae M.E.Jones
Gilia sonorae Rose
Juncus triformis var. brachystylus Engelm.
Erigeron compositus var. breviradiatus (Abrom.) A.Nelson
Sedum obtusatum var. boreale (R.T.Clausen) H.Ohba
Lupinus ×alpestris (A.Nelson) D.B.Dunn & J.M.Gillett
Lupinus densiflorus subsp. lacteus (Kellogg) R.M.Beauch.
Penstemon macbridei A.Nelson
Matelea caudata (A.Gray) Woodson
Lupinus uncialis var. cryptanthus Eastw.
Lilaeopsis recurva A.W.Hill
Arctostaphylos candidissima Eastw.
Silene repens subsp. australis C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Jatropha L.
Phlox longituba A.Heller
Ferocactus covillei Britton & Rose
Lupinus parviflorus subsp. parviflorus
Lupinus leucophyllus var. canescens (Howell) C.P.Sm.
Angelica canbyi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Horkelia purpurascens S.Watson
Polygonum bolanderi W.H.Brewer
Chenopodium cornutum (Torr.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex S.Watson
Audibertia incana var. pachystachya A.Gray
Festuca microstachys var. ciliata Beal
Eunanus layneae Greene
Chenopodium anthelminticum L.
Mertensia umbratilis Greenm.
Platanthera hookeri (Torr.) Lindl.
Acrolasia viridescens A.Heller
Carex aboriginum M.E.Jones
Juncus triformis var. uniflorus Engelm.
Eriogonum pulvinatum Small
Myosotis stricta Link
Godetia bingensis Suksd.
Ribes suksdorfii A.Heller
Mentha verticillata L.
Lupinus mollis A.Heller
Ranunculus saxicola Rydb.
Sidalcea stipularis J.T.Howell & True
Camissonia pygmaea (Douglas ex Lehm.) Raven
Muhlenbergia dumosa Scribn., 1892
Cakile californica A.Heller
Eriogonum ochrocephalum subsp. calcareum S.Stokes
Carex houghtoniana Torr. ex Dewey
Montia parviflora var. hydrophila Suksd.
Eriogonum sericoleucum Greene ex Tidestr.
Microsisymbrium lasiophyllum var. integrifolium O.E.Schulz
Potamogeton montanensis Gand.
Ferocactus Britton & Rose
Galium californicum subsp. sierrae Dempster & Stebbins
Polygonum cascadense W.H.Baker
Eriogonum saxicola A.Heller
Lesquerella kaibabensis Rollins
Chamaesyce aureola Millsp.
Gilia glandulifera A.Heller
Colubrina arborea Brandegee
Euphorbia vermiformis M.E.Jones
Gayophytum humile var. hirtellum Munz
Epilobium atrichum H.Lév.
Cordylanthus mollis subsp. mollis
Arctostaphylos cushingiana Eastw.
Oenothera minor var. cusickii Munz
Sedum oreganum var. oreganum
Salix serissima (Bailey) Fernald
Tillandsia cretacea L.B.Sm.
Sedum nevii A.Gray
Epilobium glandulosum var. adenocaulon (Hausskn.) Fernald
Epilobium smithii H.Lév.
Mammillaria lasiacantha Engelm.
Carex glaucescens Elliott
Oenothera idahoensis Mulford.
Alsine viridula Piper
Rosa jonesii H.St.John
Piper rosei C.DC.
Forestiera neomexicana var. arizonica A.Gray
Cirsium edule var. edule
Prunus occidentalis Sw.
Eriogonum arizonicum Gand.
Elatine williamsii Rydb.
Galium bloomeri var. hirsutum A.Gray
Yucca angustifolia Pursh
Silene tetragyna Suksd.
Lupinus shastensis A.Heller
Hedysarum flavescens J.M.Coult. & Fisher
Spiraea betulifolia var. rosea A.Gray
Juncus longirostris Kuvaev
Calandrinia arizonica Rydb.
Salix melanopsis var. gracilipes C.R.Ball
Limnia guadalupensis Rydb.
Toxicodendron coriaceum Greene
Carex lacunarum Holm
Carex oxycarpa Holm
Monardella diaboli Hardham
Ribes migratorium Suksd.
Peucedanum oreganum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eriogonum heracleoides var. micranthum Gand.
Arenaria gregaria A.Heller
Carex abramsii Mack.
Echinocereus reichenbachii (Terscheck) Haage
Chenopodium salinum Standl.
Limnanthes gracilis var. parishii (Jeps.) C.T.Mason
Chenopodium lanceolatum Muhl. ex Willd.
Thelypodium utahense Rydb.
Peucedanum donnellii Coult. & F.N.Rose
Cleome ephemera Brandegee
Dendromecon arborea Greene
Cirsium edule var. macounii (Greene) D.J.Keil
Sidalcea hydrophila A.Heller
Lesquerella wardii S.Watson
Sedum ternatum Michx.
Lappula coerulescens Rydb.
Salix lemmonii var. macrostachya Bebb
Peucedanum triternatum var. alatum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Godetia dudleyana Abrams
Opuntia engelmannii var. lindheimeri (Engelm.) B.D.Parfitt & Pinkava
Lophanthus cusickii Greenm.
Eriogonum alatum var. macdougalii Gand.
Lupinus parviflorus var. fulvomaculatus (Payson) Harmon
Apocynum androsaemifolium subsp. detonsum Piper
Calochortus monanthus Ownbey
Sisyrinchium sarmentosum Suksd., 1895
Ferocactus bicolor (Galeotti ex Pfeiff.) N.P.Taylor
Centaurium namophilum Reveal, Broome & Beatley
Potentilla ×howellii Greene
Lupinus caudatus subsp. argophyllus (A.Gray) L.Ll.Phillips
Castilleja rubida Piper
Eriogonum glaberrimum Gand.
Onagra strigosa var. subulata Rydb.
Potentilla aperta J.T.Howell
Sarcostemma cynanchoides subsp. cynanchoides
Astragalus microdontus Baker ex Aitch., 1880
Sporobolus cryptandrus var. strictus Scribn.
Lepidium brownii A.Heller
Saxifraga paddoensis Suksd.
Echinopsis ×muelleri Hirscht
Leptotaenia eatonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Glycosma ambiguum A.Gray
Chamaesyce vallis-mortae Millsp.
Cabomba caroliniana A.Gray
Echinocereus pectinatus var. dasyacanthus (Engelm.) W.H.Earle ex N.P.Taylor
Delphinium cardinale var. angustifolium Huth
Chamaesyce sulfurea Millsp.
Zauschneria velutina Eastw., 1920
Carex vitrea Holm
Carex paddoensis Suksd.
Salix chlorophylla Andersson
Juncus castaneus Sm.
Juglans arizonica Dode
Adelia L.
Monardella mollis A.Heller
Castilleja eastwoodiana Pennell
Carex bonplandii Kunth
Vicia washingtonensis Suksd.
Rhamnus obtusissima Greene
Eriogonum variabile A.Heller
Euphorbia serpillifolia var. rugulosa Engelm.
Phaca lanosissima Rydb.
Hemizonia spicata Greene
Senecio solidagoides Rydb., 1900
Senecio glauciifolius Rydb.
Eriogonum subalpinum var. stenophyllum Gand.
Hoita longiloba Rydb.
Castilleja pumicicola Pennell
Peucedanum parishii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eriogonum latum Small ex Rydb.
Ivesia rhypara var. shellyi Ertter
Eriogonum capitatum A.Heller
Cirsium clavatum (M.E.Jones) Petr.
Biscutella mccormickii Millsp.
Carex saximontana Mack.
Oxytheca reddingiana M.E.Jones
Carex inops subsp. heliophila (Mack.) Crins
Stachys quercetorum A.Heller
Trifolium pedunculatum Rydb.
Piper jaliscanum S.Watson
Sphaeralcea caespitosa M.E.Jones
Eschscholzia straminea Greene
Eriogonum revolutum Goodd.
Juncus suksdorfii Rydb.
Oenothera parryi S.Watson
Opuntia californica var. parkeri (J.M.Coult.) Pinkava
Eriogonum rubidum var. frigidum Gand.
Piper palmeri C.DC.
Castilleja oregonensis Gand.
Peucedanum mohavense J.M.Coult. & Rose
Fritillaria phaeanthera Eastw.
Macronema grindelifolium Rydb.
Ceanothus ferrisae McMinn
Agrostis densiflora var. arenaria Vasey
Malvastrum viscidum Abrams
Claytonia depressa var. arenaria Suksd.
Haplopappus mollis A.Gray
Salix macrocarpa var. argentea Bebb
Mozinna cardiophylla Torr.
Calochortus elegans var. oreophilus Ownbey
Sphaeralcea fendleri var. albescens (Kearney) Kearney
Aster inornatus Greene
Corispermum pallidum Mosyakin
Sisyrinchium maritimum A.Heller
Cnicus hallii A.Gray
Trifolium rusbyi Greene
Stellaria washingtoniana B.L.Rob.
Calamagrostis anomala Suksd.
Trifolium insularum P.B.Kenn.
Eulophus pringlei J.M.Coult. & Rose
Peucedanum canbyi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Calycadenia multiglandulosa subsp. robusta D.D.Keck
Grindelia integrifolia f. villosa Steyerm.
Senecio latus Rydb.
Epilobium adscendens Suksd., 1900
Epilobium apricum Suksd.
Valerianella aphanoptera A.Gray
Grindelia nana var. turbinella Steyerm.
Eriogonum wasatchense M.E.Jones
Actaea eburnea Rydb.
Mirabilis aspera Greene
Crossosoma parviflorum B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Pringleophytum lanceolatum A.Gray
Lupinus arenicola A.Heller
Salix boiseana A.Nelson
Solidago sempervirens L.
Aphyllon inundatum Suksd.
Eriogonum polyphyllum Small ex Rydb.
Eschscholzia columbiana Greene
Veratrum caudatum A.Heller
Potentilla glandulosa var. austinae Jeps.
Balsamorhiza platylepis Sharp
Delphinium willametense Suksd.
Antheropeas australe Rydb.
Sisyrinchium birameum Piper
Echinocactus acanthodes Lem.
Chylismia lancifolia A.Heller
Acanthogonum polygonoides var. longispinum Goodman
Lupinus procerus Greene ex A.Heller
Epilobium ×treleasianum H.Lév.
Oreocarya lutea Greene ex Brand
Epilobium sandbergii Rydb.
Gymnanthes riparia (Schltdl.) Klotzsch
Frangula rubra subsp. nevadensis (A.Nelson) Kartesz & Gandhi
Eschscholzia micrantha Greene
Gormania hallii Britton
Eriophyllum aureum Brandegee
Salix bolanderiana Rowlee
Hookera multipedunculata Abrams
Claytonia perfoliata var. amplectens Greene
Xanthium calvum Millsp. & Sherff
Eschscholzia wrigleyana Millsp. & Nutt.
Calochortus longebarbatus S.Watson
Trifolium multipedunculatum P.B.Kenn.
Geranium nemorale Suksd.
Horkelia tenuisecta Rydb.
Cryptantha pumila A.Heller
Eriogonum sulphureum Greene
Trifolium catalinae S.Watson
Epilobium drummondii var. latiusculum Rydb.
Delphinium glaucescens var. multicaule Rydb.
Lepidium bernardinum Abrams
Eriogonum ochroleucum Small ex Rydb.
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. melanacanthus (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Delphinium cyanoreios f. wallowense Ewan
Audibertia incana var. pilosa A.Gray
Euphorbia biserrata Millsp.
Eriogonum juncinellum Gand.
Himantostemma pringlei A.Gray
Mimulus subsecundus Gray
Bromus madritensis var. rubens (L.) Husn.
Corynephorus canescens (L.) P.Beauv.
Kyllinga Rottb.
Chusquea coronalis Soderstr. & C.E.Calderón
Euphorbia antisyphilitica Zucc.
Anoda Cav.
Rostraria cristata (L.) Tzvelev
Acacia acinacea Lindl.
Acacia subulata Bonpl.
Lotus tetragonolobus L.
Acacia verticillata subsp. ruscifolia (A.Cunn. ex G.Don) Court
Acacia ligulata A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Callitriche deflexa A.Braun ex Hegelm.
Amaryllidaceae
Ceanothus caeruleus Lag.
Casuarina cunninghamiana subsp. cunninghamiana
Quercus pennivenia Trel.
Quercus macvaughii Spellenb.
Quercus sideroxyla Bonpl.
Quercus crassifolia Bonpl.
Apocynum ×medium var. floribundum (Greene) Woodson
Plumeria Tourn. ex L.
Oenothera hookeri subsp. angustifolia (R.R.Gates) Munz
Araliaceae
Dieteria canescens subsp. canescens
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. consimilis (Greene) H.M.Hall
Clivia miniata Regel
Caryota urens L.
Rosa neomexicana Cockerell
Camellia sinensis (L.) Kuntze
Collinsonia canadensis L.
Potentilla horrida Rydb.
Chamaelirium luteum (L.) A.Gray
Ostrya virginiana (Mill.) K.Koch
Alomia stenolepis S.F.Blake
Eryngium longifolium Cav.
Commelina erecta f. intercursa Fernald
Ehrendorferia Fukuhara & Lidén
Dithyrea Harv.
Acacia pacensis Rudd & A.M.Carter
Illicium L.
Nardostachys DC.
Aster alpigenus subsp. alpigenus
Passiflora foetida var. arizonica Killip
Rheum palmatum L.
Angelica sinensis (Oliv.) Diels
Grusonia marenae (S.H.Parsons) E.F.Anderson
Encelia californica var. asperifolia S.F.Blake
Perityle grayi Rose
Kallstroemia californica var. brachystylis (Vail) Kearney & Peebles
Asterohyptis stellulata (Benth.) Epling
Rhus integrifolia var. cedrosensis F.A.Barkley
Crotalaria rotundifolia J.F.Gmel.
Melothria pendula L.
Decachaeta haenkeana DC.
Pectis multiflosculosa (DC.) Sch.Bip.
Nopalea karwinskiana (Salm-Dyck) K.Schum.
Lupinus leucophyllus subsp. leucophyllus
Muhlenbergia capillipes (M.E.Jones) P.M.Peterson & Annable
Acer glabrum var. tripartitum (Nutt.) Pax
Leptodactylon pungens subsp. pulchriflorum (Brand) H.Mason
Radermachera sinica (Hance) Hemsl.
Astragalus martinii Spellenb., Van Devender & P.D.Jenkins
Harpagophytum procumbens (Burch.) DC. ex Meisn.
Tinantia macrophylla S.Watson
Ilex paraguariensis A.St.-Hil.
Sphaeralcea californica Rose
Verbesina gentryi Standl.
Franseria Cav.
Salvia marci Epling ex M.E.Jones, 1933
Stylomecon G.Taylor
Asclepias fournieri Woodson
Gossypium klotzschianum var. davidsonii (Kellogg) J.B.Hutch. ex Hutch.
Ceiba aesculifolia subsp. aesculifolia
Hedypnois Hill
Festuca ovina var. polyphylla Beal
Phragmites communis Trin.
Physaria kingii var. parvifolia (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) S.L.Welsh
Nemacladus glanduliferus var. glanduliferus
Tephrosia Pers.
Hordeum distichon L.
Schisandra chinensis (Turcz.) Baill.
Mesona Blume
Linum L.
Matelea wootonii (Vail) Woodson
Gaura mollis Kunth
Piper hispidum Sw.
Ferula assa-foetida L.
Ledebouriella seseloides (Hoffm.) H.Wolff
Rosa laevigata Michx.
Lupinus arizonicus subsp. lagunensis (M.E.Jones) J.A.Christian & D.B.Dunn
Elymus canadensis f. canadensis
Perityle rotundifolia Brandegee
Hackelochloa Kuntze
Poa nuttalliana Schult.
Crassula rogersii Schönl.
Cunonia capensis L.
Artemisia absinthia St.-Lag.
Vaccaria segetalis (Neck.) Asch.
Pulsatilla Mill.
Asarum L.
Abrus cantoniensis Hance
Dendromecon caudata Greene
Krameria parviflora Benth.
Aster commutatus var. crassulus (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Glandularia elegans (Kunth) Umber
Gonolobus cundurango (Rchb.fil.) Triana
Camissonia sceptrostigma (Brandegee) Raven
Scirpus criniger A.Gray
Lagascea decipiens var. decipiens
Krameria erecta Willd.
Coreocarpus Benth.
Panicum capillare var. brevifolium Vasey ex Scribner
Carex decidua Boott
Cyphomeris gypsophiloides (Mart. & Galeotti) Standl.
Acorus calamus L.
Viscainoa pinnata (I.M.Johnst.) Gentry
Pueraria montana (Lour.) Merr.
Cinnamomum verum J.Presl
Piper nigrum L.
Eriogonum strictum var. flavissimum (Gand.) C.L.Hitchc.
Heteropogon contortus (L.) P.Beauv., 1817
Trichilia americana (Sessé & Moc.) T.D.Penn.
Ipomoea pubescens Lam.
Epimedium L.
Oldenlandia diffusa (Willd.) Roxb.
Greenella ramulosa Greene
Centaurea biebersteinii DC.
Callaeum Small
Froelichia interrupta var. alata (S.Watson) R.A.McCauley
Sphaeralcea emoryi subsp. emoryi
Stigmaphyllon A.Juss.
Purshia mexicana var. stansburiana (Torr.) S.L.Welsh
Plagiobothrys glyptocarpus var. glyptocarpus
Neodypsis decaryi Jum.
Fagonia californica var. barclayana Benth.
Commiphora myrrha (Nees) Engl.
Althaea officinalis L.
Euphorbia dioeca Kunth
Euphorbia esuliformis var. subdentata Engelm.
Quassia amara L.
Achyranthes aspera L.
Leptodactylon californicum Hook. & Arn.
Calamagrostis langsdorffii (Link) Trin.
Haplopappus junceus Greene
Phyllostachys nigra var. henonis (Mitford) Rendle
Lupinus andersonii var. sublinearis C.P.Sm.
Hofmeisteria laphamioides Rose
Malpighia umbellata Rose
Sambucus nigra var. cerulea (Raf.) B.L.Turner
Rosa sempervirens L.
Potentilla macounii Rydb.
Verbesina longipes Hemsl.
Machaeranthera canescens var. shastensis (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Opuntia streptacantha Lem.
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa var. ramosa (Peebles) Backeb.
Coffea arabica L.
Protea magnifica Link
Eupatorium L.
Commelina dianthifolia var. longispatha (Torr.) Brashier
Liatris odoratissima (J.F.Gmel.) Willd.
Rheum L.
Paris L.
Rosa woodsii var. arizonica (Rydb.) W.H.Lewis
Passiflora stipulata Aubl.
Bouteloua polystachya (Benth.) Torr.
Dipteronia sinensis Oliv.
Linum pringlei S.Watson
Paullinia cupana Kunth
Heuchera flabellifolia var. subsecta Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Alternanthera Forssk.
Bauera Banks ex Andr.
Boerhavia pterocarpa S.Watson
Geranium wilfordii Maxim.
Cerastium sordidum B.L.Rob.
Habenaria limosa (Lindl.) Hemsl.
Rhynchosia phaseoloides (Sw.) DC.
Carex festiva Dewey
Sutera cordata (Thunb.) Kuntze
Fagonia californica subsp. laevis (Standl.) Wiggins
Allium bakeri Regel
Zanthoxylum simulans Hance
Glycine Willd.
Polygala hemipterocarpa A.Gray
Quercus knoblochii C.H.Mull.
Halenia brevicornis (Kunth) G.Don
Fuchsia campos-portoi Pilg. & G.K.Schulze
Pennellia microsperma (Rollins) R.A.Price, C.D.Bailey & Al-Shehbaz
Phormium tenax J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Asclepias jaliscana B.L.Rob.
Sporobolus neglectus Nash
Ptychopetalum olacoides Benth.
Agrimonia eupatoria L.
Areca catechu L.
Salix longifolia Lam.
Iresine latifolia (Mart. & Galeotti) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Nicolletia A.Gray
Carex bifida Boott
Bromus subvelutinus Shear
Polygonatum Mill.
Randia mollifolia Standl.
Sapindus saponaria subsp. saponaria
Opuntia erinacea var. utahensis (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Froelichia Moench
Serratula L.
Nelumbo nucifera Gaertn.
Polygonum chinense L.
Euphorbia benedicta Greene
Melochia tragiifolia Standl.
Stachys pacifica B.L.Turner
Zinnia L.
Chromolaena collina (DC.) R.King & H.Rob.
Xanthisma spinulosum var. chihuahuanum (B.L.Turner & R.L.Hartm.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Chondrosum polystachyum Benth.
Opuntia vulgaris Mill.
Magnolia officinalis Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Isatis Tourn. ex L.
Chaenactis ×mexicana Stockw.
Bromus inermis var. inermis
Salvia forreri Greene
Poteridium occidentale (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Rydb.
Linum cruciatum Planch.
Quercus alba L.
Asparagus cochinchinensis (Lour.) Merr.
Opuntia kleiniae DC.
Drymaria laxiflora Benth.
Calamagrostis utsutsuensis Otting & B.L.Wilson
Scutellaria barbata D.Don
Stephania sinica Diels
Cereus schottii Engelm.
Coffea L.
Delphinium calcar-equitis Standl.
Senna galegifolia (L.) Barneby & Lourteig
Hymenothrix palmeri var. palmeri
Elymus villosus f. villosus
Passiflora foetida var. longipedunculata Killip
Colletia paradoxa (Spreng.) Escal.
Paspalum tenuissimum M.E.Jones
Vigna speciosa (Kunth) Verdc.
Satureja hortensis L.
Elymus mollis f. mollis
Sanvitalia Gualt. ex Lam.
Gilia sherman-hoytae T.T.Craig
Oenothera kernensis Munz
Antennaria parviflora Nutt.
Psilocarphus caulescens Benth.
Amsinckia curvata Suksd.
Amsinckia interior (J.F.Macbr.) Suksd.
Sabatia stellaris Pursh
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. nudum (Douglas ex Benth.) S.Stokes
Malva incana C.Presl
Hosackia scoparia Nutt.
Hosackia cytisoides var. rubescens Torr. & A.Gray
Polygonum marinense T.R.Mert. & Raven
Poterium sanguisorba var. polygamum (Waldst. & Kit.) Vis.
Carex lasiocarpa subsp. americana (Fernald) Hultén
Carex mertensii Prescott
Phleum pratense subsp. bertolonii (DC.) Bornm.
Menziesia ferruginea subsp. ferruginea
Amaranthus ×budensis Priszter
Triodanis perfoliata var. perfoliata
Juncus alpinoarticulatus subsp. americanus (Farw.) Hämet-Ahti
Phlox bryoides Nutt.
Phlox richardsonii Hook.
Bromus hordeaceus subsp. thominei (Hardouin) Braun-Blanq.
Spiraea lucida Douglas ex Greene
Carex sitchensis Prescott
Artemisia dumosa Poljakov
Veratrum viride var. eschscholzianum (Roemer & Schultes) Breitung
Elyhordeum stebbinsianum (Bowden) Bowden
Hypericum ellipticum Hook.
Erythranthe breviflora (Piper) G.L.Nesom
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi subsp. longipilosa Packer & Denford
Sabulina dawsonensis (Britton) Rydb.
Gunnera manicata Linden
Plantago major subsp. intermedia (DC.) Arcang.
Rhus lancea L.fil.
Arabidopsis thaliana Schur, 1866
Castilleja hispida subsp. hispida
Achnatherum wallowaense J.R.Maze & K.A.Robson
Eriocoma hendersonii (Vasey) Romasch.
Solidago lepida var. lepida
Chenopodium suecicum Murr
Potentilla flabellifolia Hook.
Ranunculus flammula var. flammula
Bromus squarrosus var. villosus Roth
Spergularia salina var. salina
Doronicum willdenowii (Rouy) A.W.Hill
Alchemilla viridiflora Rothm.
Penstemon procerus Douglas
Anemone quinquefolia var. oregana (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Atriplex ×gustafssoniana Tascher.
Oxybasis glauca subsp. salina (Standl.) Mosyakin
Pirus
Senecio jacobaea Loscos & Pardo
Aphyllon uniflorum (L.) Torr. & A.Gray
Elymus dahuricus Griseb.
Danthonia california
Bassia scoparia (L.) Voss
Erythronium oregonum subsp. oregonum
Sphenosciadium A.Gray
Antirrhinum nuttallianum Benth.
Houstonia mucronata (Benth.) B.L.Rob.
Palafoxia leucophylla A.Gray
Ibervillea insularis (Brandegee) Jacobsen
Ibervillea sonorae var. peninsularis (I.M.Johnst.) Wiggins
Cynanchum palmeri (S.Watson) Blake
Ipomoea stolonifera (Cirillo) J.F.Gmel.
Conobea polystachya Minod
Cynanchum peninsulare S.F.Blake
Distichlis spicata subsp. stricta (Torr.) Thorne
Jacquemontia abutiloides var. eastwoodiana (I.M.Johnst.) Wiggins
Aristida adscensionis var. adscensionis
Suaeda fruticosa Forssk. ex J.F.Gmel.
Passiflora arida var. cerralbensis Killip
Mammillaria capensis (H.E.Gates) R.T.Craig
Perityle incompta Brandegee
Eucnide cordata (Kellogg) Kellogg
Passiflora arida var. arida
Haplopappus venetus subsp. furfuraceus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Froelichia interrupta (L.) Moq.
Cercidium floridum subsp. peninsulare (Rose) Carter
Amaranthus fimbriatus (Torr.) Benth.
Tripogandra disgrega (Kunth) Woodson
Erythea aculeata Brandegee
Cyperus spectabilis Link
Sisyrinchium schaffneri S.Watson
Lonicera involucrata (Richards.) Banks
Leontodon nudicaulis (L.) Banks ex Schinz & R.Keller
Veronica americana (Raf.) Schwein.
Lactuca muralis (L.) Gaertn.
Zostera maritima Gaertn.
Stromatocarpus
Acmispon subpinnatus (Lag.) D.D.Sokoloff
Pilosella albiflora (Hook.) Sch.Bip.
Bombycilaena californica (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Holub
Jacobaea leucophylla (DC.) Pelser
Cercidium praecox Manganaro
Salix phylicifolia L.
Eriophorum callitrix Cham. ex C.A.Mey.
Cistanthe umbellata (Torr.) Hershk.
Rhododendron occidentale W.Watson, 1886
Poa szechuensis Rendle
Tripleurospermum maritimum (L.) Koch
Lysichitum americanum Hultén & H.St.John
Taraxacum campylodes Haglund
Cardamine rupicola (O.E.Schulz) C.L.Hitchc.
Gamochaeta rosacea (I.M.Johnst.) Anderb.
Astragalus laxmannii subsp. robustior (Hook.) Podlech
Leptochloa virgata (L.) P.Beauv.
Peyritschia E.Fourn.
Linanthus androsaceus subsp. luteolus (Greene) H.Mason
Viguiera deltoidea var. chenopodina (Greene) S.F.Blake
Oenothera hartwegii subsp. hartwegii
Dalea megalostachya (Rose) Wiggins
Syrmatium tomentosum (Hook. & Arn.) Vogel
Syrmatium distichum (Greene) Greene
Dentaria californica Nutt.
Fraxinus dipetala var. trifoliolata Torr.
Sanicula arguta Greene, 1900
Mitracarpus linearis Benth.
Isocoma felgeri G.L.Nesom
Hastingsia bracteosa var. bracteosa
Sympetaleia tenella I.M.Johnst.
Sambucus nigra subsp. cerulea (Raf.) Bolli
Mimulus decurtatus A.L.Grant
Saxifraga oregana var. subapetala (E.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Talinum guadalupense Dudley
Mimulus patulus Pennell
Syncarpha argyropsis (DC.) B.Nord.
Leontodon leysseri (Wallr.) Beck
Apium leptophyllum (Pers.) F.Muell. ex Benth.
Aristida ternipes var. hamulosa (Henrard) J.S.Trent
Oryzopsis Michx.
Bromus texensis (Shear) Hitchc.
Argythamnia depressa (Greenm.) J.W.Ingram
Haplopappus lyallii Clem. & E.G.Clem., 1914
Parosela alamosana Rydb.
Verbena simplex Lehm.
Rosa stellata Wooton
Cyperus retroflexus var. retroflexus
Zigadenus Michx.
Eriochloa aristata var. boxiana (Hitchc.) R.B.Shaw
Haplopappus armerioides Phil.
Panicum bulbosum subsp. sciaphilum (E.Fourn.) Hitchc. & Chase
Echinops tjanschanicus Bobrov
Carex nelsonii Mack.
Baccharis sagittalis (Less.) DC.
Leibnitzia Cass.
Muhlenbergia diversiglumis Trin.
Lactuca serriola f. serriola
Eriodendron DC.
Calamagrostis aleutica Bong.
Grindelia cuneifolia Nutt.
Poa lucida Vasey
Agropyron occidentale (Scribn.) Scribn.
Senecio aureus L.
Artemisia heterophylla Besser
Uropappus linearifolius (DC.) Nutt.
Astragalus leucophyllus Willd.
Astragalus nigrescens Nutt.
Thysanocarpus radians var. montanus Jepson
Smilacina sessilifolia Nutt. ex Baker
Hypoxis erecta L.
Ranunculus micranthus Nutt.
Nardurus maritimus (L.) Murb.
Godetia epilobioides (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) S.Watson
Boisduvalia densiflora (Lindl.) Bartl.
Zauschneria C.Presl
Zauschneria californica var. microphylla A.Gray
Godetia quadrivulnera (Douglas ex Lindl.) Spach
Corydalis montana Engelm. ex A.Gray
Hymenoxys californica Hook.
Baeria gracilis (DC.) A.Gray
Baeria chrysostoma Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Candollea cuneiformis Labill.
Delphinium decorum var. nudicaule (Torr. & A.Gray) Huth
Cleistocactus baumannii (Lem.) Lem.
Hibiscus paramutabilis L.H.Bailey
Crypsis aculeata (L.) Aiton
Psorothamnus Rydb.
Oncoba routledgei Sprague
Camissonia cardiophylla subsp. cedrosensis (Greene) P.H.Raven
Salix pedicellaris var. hypoglauca Fernald
Arenaria capillaris var. americana (Maguire) R.J.Davis
Chenopodium fremontii var. atrovirens (Rydb.) Fosberg
Melaleuca longicoma Benth.
Agropyron smithii var. molle (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) M.E.Jones
Funastrum cynanchoides subsp. heterophyllum (Engelm. ex Torr.) Kartesz
Opuntia macdougaliana Rose
Ventia crocea subsp. insula (Kellogg) Hauenschild
Deschampsia pringlei Scribn.
Allium fimbriatum var. purdyi (Eastw.) Ownbey & Aase
Delphinium parryi subsp. seditiosum (Jeps.) Ewan
Pomaderris phylicifolia Lodd.
Phlox stansburyi subsp. compacta Brand
Agathosma villosa Willd.
Begonia micranthera var. foliosa L.B.Sm. & B.G.Schub.
Melaleuca preissiana Schauer
Luculia intermedia Hutch.
Daviesia horrida Preiss ex Meisn.
Brodiaea pulchella (Salisb.) Greene
Montia verna Neck.
Ranunculus bongardii Greene
Platystemon Benth.
Dichanthelium acuminatum var. lindheimeri (Nash) Gould & C.A.Clark
Phlox diffusa var. longistylis (Wherry) M.Peck
Iresine diffusa Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Polemonium viscosum subsp. elegans (Greene) Brand
Delphinium tenuisectum subsp. amplibracteatum (Wooton) Ewan
Cryptantha echinoides (M.E.Jones) Payson
Dorycnium hirsutum (L.) Ser.
Corylopsis spicata Siebold & Zucc.
Montiastrum lineare (Douglas ex Hook.) Rydb.
Metrosideros robusta A.Cunn.
Flemingia parviflora Benth.
Abutilon striatum G.F.Dicks. ex Lindl.
Terminalia oliveri Brandis
Heterocentron Hook. & Arn.
Trisetum spicatum var. maidenii (Gand.) Fernald
Brickellia guatemalensis B.L.Rob.
Melaleuca incana R.Br.
Errazurizia Phil.
Bauhinia grandiflora Juss.
Livistona chinensis (Jacq.) R.Br. ex Mart.
Loeselia effusa A.Gray
Habenaria leucostachys (Lindl.) S.Watson
Senecio glastifolius L.fil.
Erythea elegans Franceschi ex Becc.
Ipomoea pauciflora M.Martens & Galeotti
Brachyglottis repanda J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Aruncus vulgaris (Maxim.) Raf.
Morella cerifera (L.) Small
Hofmeisteria pluriseta A.Gray
Lepidium montanum var. alyssoides (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Schotia latifolia Jacq.
Diospyros californica var. tonsa I.M.Johnst.
Silene pratensis (Rafn) Godr.
Hoheria populnea A.Cunn.
Melaleuca brachyandra (Lindl.) Craven
Grevillea ilicifolia (R.Br.) R.Br.
Trifolium spinulosum Hook.
Lewisia pygmaea var. pygmaea
Tomostima cuneifolia (Nutt.) Al-Shehbaz, M.Koch & Jordon-Thaden
Habenaria dilatata (Pursh) Hook.
Sparganium multipedunculatum (Morong) Rydb.
Dombeya acutangula Cav.
Atriplex serenana A.Nelson
Aquilegia eximia Van Houtte
Bedfordia salicina (Labill.) DC.
Berberis truxillensis Turcz.
Stipa californica Merr. & Burtt Davy
Erythronium grandiflorum var. minus Hook.
Abronia aurita Abrams
Chorizema cordatum Lindl.
Caesalpinia sepiaria Roxb.
Cardiospermum hirsutum Willd.
Phlox gracilis subsp. humilis (Greene) H.Mason
Thalictrum fendleri Engelm.
Trymalium spathulatum F.Muell.
Swainsona greyana Lindl.
Delphinium decorum var. patens A.Gray
Aquilegia canadensis subsp. americana Rapaics
Melica bulbosa Geyer
Juncus phaeocephalus var. gracilis Engelm.
Daphne ×burkwoodii Turrill
Malvastrum capense (L.) A.Gray & Harv.
Clianthus puniceus (G.Don) Sol. ex Lindl.
Erica baccans L.
Cyperus michelianus (L.) Link
Mirabilis froebelii var. glabrata (Standl.) Jeps.
Osmanthus fragrans Lour.
Podranea ricasoliana (Tanfani) Sprague
Bauhinia variegata var. candida (Aiton) Buch.-Ham.
Polygonum douglasii var. austinae (Greene) M.E.Jones
Caulanthus coulteri var. lemmonii (S.Watson) Munz
Allocarya chorisiana var. hickmannii (Greene) Jeps.
Hardenbergia violacea (Schneev.) Stearn
Hintonella mexicana Ames
Dinebra panicea subsp. mucronata (Michx.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Hakea orthorrhyncha F.Muell.
Coronilla emerus L.
Hakea dactyloides (C.F.Gaertn.) Cav.
Carex hystericina Muhl.
Salix nivalis var. saximontana (Rydb.) C.K.Schneid.
Sartwellia flaveriae A.Gray
Sagina quitensis Kunth
Hilaria rigida (Thurb.) Benth.
Arundinaria japonica Siebold & Zucc. ex Steud.
Dioclea glycinoides Pasq.
Muhlenbergia firma Beal
Myrrhinium atropurpureum Schott
Brodiaea laxa (Benth.) S.Watson
Dombeya nairobensis Engl.
Metrosideros armillaris Sol. ex Gaertn.
Robinsonella cordata Rose & Baker fil.
Sollya fusiformis (Labill.) Ostenf.
Eriogonum cernuum subsp. tenue (Torr. & A.Gray) S.Stokes
Festuca elatior L.
Hakea invaginata B.L.Burtt
Caesalpinia tinctoria (Kunth) Benth.
Mirabilis froebelii (Behr) Greene
Panicum incurvum L. ex B.D.Jacks.
Bauhinia forficata Link
Temnadenia Miers
Andropogon glomeratus var. pumilus (Vasey) L.H.Dewey
Festuca microstachys var. pauciflora Scribn.
Arenaria pumicola Coville
Abutilon pringlei Hochr.
Xylosma flexuosum (Kunth) Hemsl.
Inga affinis DC.
Chamaesyce setiloba (Engelm. ex Torr.) Millsp.
Atriplex nuttallii var. falcata M.E.Jones
Pomaderris apetala Labill.
Agropyron pringlei (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Hitchc.
Delphinium virescens Nutt.
Montia perfoliata f. angustifolia (Greene) J.T.Howell
Acacia inophloia Maiden & Blakely
Encyclia bractescens (Lindl.) Hoehne
Myrrhinium salicinum Gand.
Brodiaea volubilis (Kellogg) Baker
Kochia scoparia var. subvillosa Moq.
Oenothera cheiranthifolia var. suffruticosa S.Watson
Cytisus Desf.
Ctenodon Baill.
Senna birostris var. hookeriana (Hook.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Salix commutata var. puberula Bebb
Potentilla plattensis var. leucophylla Greene
Eriogonum vimineum var. baileyi (S.Watson) R.J.Davis
Caesalpinia echinata Lam.
Salix pseudocordata (Andersson) Andersson ex Rydb.
Entelea palmata Lindl.
Byrsonima crassifolia (L.) Kunth
Habenaria sparsiflora S.Watson
Millettia Wight & Arn.
Melaleuca linearis Schrad. & J.C.Wendl.
Erythrina ×bidwillii Lindl.
Gaultheria cummingii Sleumer
Kiggelaria africana L.
Bupleurum fruticosum L.
Quercus borealis F.Michx.
Brugmansia sanguinea (Ruiz & Pav.) D.Don
Puya venusta (Baker) Phil.
Agonis marginata (Labill.) Sweet
Encyclia meliosma (Rchb.f.) Schltr.
Begonia dichotoma Jacq.
Hosackia torreyi A.Gray
Polygonum engelmannii Greene
Muhlenbergia glabrata (Kunth) Trin.
Puya chilensis Molina
Habenaria montevidensis Spreng.
Hofmeisteria gentryi Wiggins
Cuphea aequipetala Cav.
Callistemon phoeniceus Lindl.
Myrsine semiserrata Wall.
Kosteletzkya pentasperma (Bertero ex DC.) Griseb.
Urtica lyallii S.Watson
Acacia dawsonii R.T.Baker
Hackelia jessicae (E.A.Mc Gregor) Brand
Amelanchier pumila (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt. ex M.Roem.
Calliandra tweediei Benth.
Brachychiton acerifolius (A.Cunn. ex G.Don) Macarthur & C.Moore
Montia parviflora Douglas
Schotia brachypetala Sond.
Brassica eruca L.
Cenchrus pilosus Kunth
Carex vesicaria var. monile (Tuck.) Fernald
Bauhinia faberi Oliv.
Potentilla brevifolia Nutt.
Anemone patens var. nuttalliana (DC.) A.Gray
Habenaria saccata Greene
Sparrmannia africana L.fil.
Callistemon linearis (Schrad. & J.C.Wendl.) Colvill ex Sweet
Ranunculus oreogenes Greene
Cornus excelsa Kunth
Montia cordifolia (S.Watson) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Luzula comosa var. subsessilis S.Watson
Hebe salicifolia (G.Forst.) Pennell
Stipa occidentalis Thurb.
Cotoneaster glaucophyllus f. serotinus (Hutch.) Stapf
Senna septemtrionalis (Viv.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Azara petiolaris (D.Don) I.M.Johnst.
Fagonia californica var. glutinosa Vail
Habenaria strictissima Rchb.f.
Dryas integrifolia var. canescens Simmons
Polygala virgata Thunb.
Calothamnus quadrifidus R.Br. ex W.T.Aiton
Carmichaelia exsul F.Muell.
Echium simplex DC.
Cupania dentata Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Descurainia pinnata var. paradisa (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) M.Peck
Salvia holwayi S.F.Blake
Itea ilicifolia Oliv.
Malus hupehensis (Pamp.) Rehder
Serjania fuscifolia Radlk.
Hakea varia R.Br.
Boronia denticulata Sm.
Terminalia australis Cambess.
Solanum hispidum Pers.
Cranichis subumbellata A.Rich. & Galeotti
Acacia concurrens Pedley
Melaleuca squamea Labill.
Rumex salicifolius f. transitorius (Rech.f.) J.T.Howell
Cyperus flabelliformis Rottb.
Dombeya dregeana Sond.
Sinocalamus oldhamii (Munro) McClure
Harrisia tortuosa (J.Forbes) Britton & Rose
Oenothera sceptrostigma Brandegee
Melaleuca tenella Benth.
Lisianthius P.Browne
Scheuchzeria palustris subsp. americana (Fernald) Hultén
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. polyanthum (Benth.) S.Stokes
Oenothera claviformis subsp. yumae P.H.Raven
Juncus balticus subsp. pacificus Engelm.
Brachysema lanceolatum Meisn.
Callistemon speciosus (Sims) DC.
Arenaria franklinii var. franklinii
Thelypodium cooperi S.Watson
Erythea edulis (H.Wendl. ex S.Watson) S.Watson
Coccoloba tiliacea Lindau
Carex hepburnii Boott
Melaleuca parviflora Rchb.
Habenaria obtusata (Banks ex Pursh) Richardson
Cristaria glaucophylla Cav.
Bursera bipinnata (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) Engl.
Hymenocarpos circinnatus (L.) Savi
Agrostis aristiglumis Swallen
Juncus saximontanus f. brunnescens (Rydb.) F.J.Herm.
Aquilegia formosa var. caelifax (Payson) Munz
Brodiaea lutea (Lindl.) C.V.Morton
Hordeum nodosum L.
Suttonia salicina Hook.fil.
Coulterophytum laxum B.L.Rob.
Melaleuca nodosa (Gaertn.) Sm.
Arabis hirsuta Linnaeus, 1767
Calliandra portoricensis (Jacq.) Benth.
Carmichaelia hookeri Kirk
Habenaria novemfida Lindl.
Lysiloma thornberi Britton & Rose
Pyrostegia venusta (Ker Gawl.) Miers
Stevia monardifolia Kunth
Stellaria media (L.) Cirillo
Syringa josikaea J.Jacq. ex Rchb.
Ilex integra Thunb.
Poa idahoensis Beal
Callistemon viminalis (Sol. ex Gaertn.) G.Don
Ilex quercetorum I.M.Johnst.
Disporum Salisb.
Cantua buxifolia Juss. ex Lam.
Acacia decurrens var. dealbata (Link) Maiden
Suaeda torreyana var. torreyana
Euphorbia brasiliensis Lam.
Salvia gesneriiflora Lindl. & Paxton
Acokanthera oblongifolia (Hochst.) Codd
Disocactus eichlamii (Weing.) Britton & Rose
Nerine bowdenii W.Watson
Allium sibiricum L.
Anemone multifida var. hirsuta C.L.Hitchc.
Cyperus niger var. capitatus (Britton) O'Neill
Eriogonum angulosum subsp. maculatum (A.Heller) S.Stokes
Polemonium amoenum Piper
Senna bicapsularis (L.) Roxb.
Salix gooddingii var. vallicola (Dudley) C.R.Ball
Elegia hookeriana (Mast.) Moline & H.P.Linder
Acacia leptopetala Benth.
Descurainia pinnata subsp. pinnata
Hakea propinqua A.Cunn.
Bromus stamineus É.Desv.
Bauhinia tomentosa L.
Ipomoea laeta A.Gray
Habenaria laxiflora Poepp. & Endl.
Oxytropis viscida var. viscida
Potentilla nivea var. macrophylla Ser.
Ranunculus pedatifidus var. leiocarpus (Trautv.) Fernald
Juncus effusus subsp. hesperius Piper
Psoralea aphylla L.
Brassica juncea (L.) Coss.
Eugenia apiculata DC.
Erica speciosa Andr.
Carex languinosa Michx.
Trixis wrightii B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Bursaria spinosa Cav.
Quercus agrifolia var. frutescens Engelm.
Salix gooddingii var. variabilis C.R.Ball
Eriogonum microtheca var. macdougalii (Gand.) S.Stokes
Arenaria congesta var. wheelerensis Maguire
Agropyron smithii var. palmeri (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) A.Heller
Alstonia R.Br.
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. trachygonum (Torr.) S.Stokes
Fraxinus trifoliolata W.W.Sm.
Byttneria urticifolia K.Schum.
Carex leptonervia (Fernald) Fernald
Holodiscus dumosus var. glabrescens (Greenm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Yucca angustissima Engelm., 1902
Ludwigia brevipes (Long) Eames
Alnus oregona Nutt.
Ericameria sonorensis B.L.Turner
Astragalus purpusii M.E.Jones
Montia gypsophiloides (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) J.T.Howell
Centaurea americana Nutt.
Croton boregensis M.E.Jones
Dinebra nealleyi (Vasey) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Cameraria retusa Griseb.
Myosurus aristatus subsp. montanus (G.R.Campb.) D.E.Stone
Berteroa incana Linnaeus, 1753
Metrosideros umbellata Cav.
Alhagi camelorum Fisch.
Lupinus nanus Douglas
Puya dyckioides (Baker) Mez
Alstonia yunnanensis Diels
Cytisus linifolius (L.) Lam.
Elymus pauciflorus subsp. pseudorepens (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Gould
Dactyloctenium aegyptium (L.) P.Beauv.
Zizania aquatica var. interior Fassett
Sutherlandia frutescens (L.) R.Br.
Polypogon elongatus Kunth
Potentilla arguta var. glandulosa Cockerell
Escallonia paniculata var. floribunda (Kunth) J.F.Macbr.
Eschscholzia coespitosa
Juncus tenuis var. occidentalis (Wiegand) Coville
Potentilla glaucophylla var. perdissecta (Rydb.) Soják
Crataegus pubescens C.Presl
Asclepias engelmanniana Woodson
Eragrostis secundiflora subsp. oxylepis (Torr.) S.D.Koch
Passiflora coccinea Aubl.
Montanoa myriocephala B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Acacia pruinosa A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Leptospermum lanigerum (Aiton) Sm.
Melica aristata Thurb.
Hedychium gardnerianum Roscoe
Carex tolmiei Boott
Xylosma heterophylla (H.Karst.) Gilg
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. wrightii
Pyracomeles vilmorinii Rehder
Tristania conferta R.Br.
Zeugites munroanus Hemsl.
Allium serratum S.Watson
Scirpus peckii Britton
Abutilon vitifolium (Cav.) G.Don
Tillandsia circinnatioides Matuda
Juncus mertensianus var. gracilis (Engelmann) F.J.Herrman
Cotoneaster frigidus Wall. ex Lindl.
Pilosocereus Byles & G.D.Rowley
Erythea armata (S.Watson) S.Watson
Carex houghtonii Torr.
Oryzopsis miliacea (L.) Benth. & Hook.f.
Acokanthera spectabilis (Sond.) Hook.fil.
Pogonia ophioglossoides (L.) Ker Gawl.
Allocarya chorisiana var. undulata (Piper) Jeps.
Stanleya pinnata subsp. pinnata
Melaleuca ericifolia Sm.
Delphinium cuyamacae Abrams
Brassica japonica (Thunb.) Siebold
Fabiana imbricata Ruiz & Pav.
Carex misandroides Fernald
Eriogonum proliferum Torr. & A.Gray
Drimys lanceolata (Poir.) Baill.
Bauhinia hupehana Craib
Streptopus amplexifolius var. americanus Schult. & Schult.f.
Vulpia pacifica (Piper) Rydb.
Arabis furcata var. purpurascens S.Watson
Echinodorus cordifolius (L.) Griseb.
Edgeworthia tomentosa (Thunb.) Nakai
Tibouchina multiflora (Gard.) Cogn.
Lomatia fraxinifolia F.Muell. ex Benth.
Orchis rotundifolia Banks ex Pursh
Poa pattersonii Vasey
Eryngium comosum F.Delaroche
Azara lanceolata Hook.fil.
Phyla Lour.
Veronica buxifolia Benth.
Aristida divaricata Humb. & Bonpl.
Desmopsis Saff.
Habenaria cooperi S.Watson
Acacia penninervis Sieber ex DC.
Chenopodium desiccatum var. leptophylloides (Murr) Wahl
Ternstroemia tepezapote Schltdl. & Cham.
Phlox speciosa var. occidentalis (Durand) M.Peck
Potamogeton filiformis var. macounii (Morong ex Macoun) Morong
Aquilegia formosa var. truncata (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Baker
Elymus vancouverensis Macoun ex Vasey
Sedum pumilum Benth.
Nuphar lutea (L.) Sibth. & Sm.
Sidalcea eximia Greene
Myrsine juergensenii (Mez) Lundell
Gnidia squarrosa (L.) Druce
Melaleuca leucadendra (L.) L.
Pavonia praemorsa (L.fil.) Cav.
Mimulus guttatus subsp. arvensis (Greene) Munz
Corydalis aurea var. occidentalis Engelm. ex A.Gray
Calothamnus schaueri Lehm.
Avena barbata Brot.
Schrebera tomentella (Welw.) Gilg
Osteomeles schwerinae C.K.Schneid.
Styrax argenteus C.Presl
Chonemorpha fragrans (Moon) Alston
Hypericum hypericoides (L.) Crantz
Acacia buxifolia A.Cunn.
Trichilia havanensis Jacq.
Kallstroemia grandiflora Torr.
Cornus walteri Wangerin
Dryandra baxteri R.Br.
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. haussknechtii (Dammer) S.Stokes
Aquilegia caerulea subsp. pinetorum (Tidestr.) Payson
Atriplex oblanceolata Rydb.
Alnus ferruginea Kunth
Catopheria chiapensis A.Gray ex Benth.
Pitcairnia punicea Scheidw.
Eriogonum reliquum S.Stokes
Dombeya natalensis Sond.
Carex communis L.H.Bailey
Mirabilis bigelovii var. aspera (Greene) Munz
Leptospermum squarrosum Gaertn.
Beaumontia jerdoniana Wight
Schizachyrium hirtiflorum Nees
Salix bonplandiana var. toumeyi (Britton & Shafer) C.K.Schneid.
Ageratina pringlei (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) R.King & H.Rob.
Erythrina falcata Benth.
Jasminum grandiflorum L.
Agropyron inerme (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Rydb.
Ficus macrophylla Pers.
Simsia foetida (Cav.) S.F.Blake
Rhizophora mangle var. samoensis Hochr.
Cryptantha jamesii var. cinerea (Greene) Payson
Ageratina calaminthifolia (Kunth) R.King & H.Rob.
Atriplex expansa var. mohavensis M.E.Jones
Callistemon pinifolius (J.C.Wendl.) Sweet
Solanum umbelliferum var. incanum Torr.
Eucnide bartonioides Zucc.
Oenothera linifolia Nutt.
Deschampsia atropurpurea var. latifolia (Hook.) Scribn.
Nolina erumpens (Torr.) S.Watson
Carex breweri var. breweri
Salix sessilifolia var. hindsiana (Benth.) Andersson
Acer monspessulanum L.
Melaleuca pubescens Schauer
Aristolochia sericea Benth.
Dryas integrifolia Vahl
Rumex occidentalis var. procerus (Greene) J.T.Howell
Pleurothallis chrysantha Lindl.
Ranunculus cardiophyllus var. subsagittatus (A.Gray) L.D.Benson
Lupinus montanus Kunth
Oenothera pycnocarpa Atk. & Bartlett
Hardenbergia monophylla (Vent.) Benth.
Ludwigia peruviana (L.) Hara
Begonia fusca Liebm.
Hovea longifolia R.Br.
Stipa scribneri Vasey
Coutarea pterosperma (S.Watson) Standl.
Chenopodium virgatum (L.) Jess.
Trevoa trinervia Gillies & Hook.
Eucryphia Cav.
Baphia racemosa Hochst.
Oenothera cardiophylla Torr.
Asclepias similis Hemsl.
Erica arborea L.
Salsola iberica Sennen & Pau
Boerhavia annulata Coville
Roldana albonervia (Greenm.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Erythrina corallodendron L.
Piptothrix areolaris (DC.) R.King & H.Rob.
Acronychia baueri Schott
Phlox douglasii var. longifolia A.Gray
Quercus pallescens Trel.
Viminaria denudata Sm.
Vitis bourgaeana Planch.
Physaria reediana O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Amauria Benth.
Alstonia venenata R.Br.
Geranium goldmanii Rose ex Hanks & Small
Draba streptocarpa A.Gray
Calandrinia caulescens Kunth
Salix nuttallii var. brachystachys (Benth.) Sarg.
Delphinium multiplex (Ewan) C.L.Hitchc.
Salix cordata var. lutea (Nutt.) Bebb
Anthericum nanum Baker
Dasynotus daubenmirei I.M.Johnst.
Heleochloa schoenoides (L.) Host
Hardenbergia comptoniana (Andrews) Benth.
Acacia cardiophylla A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Harpagonella palmeri var. arizonica I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum aureum Nutt. ex Rydb., 1906
Chorizema ilicifolium Labill.
Sanguisorba officinalis subsp. microcephala (C.Presl) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Convolvulus aridus subsp. intermedius Abrams
Scirpus atrovirens var. georgianus (R.M.Harper) Fernald
Carmichaelia odorata Colenso ex Hook.f.
Virgilia capensis (L.) Poir.
Cardamine paucisecta Benth.
Hauya elegans subsp. cornuta (Hemsl.) Raven & Breedlove
Senegalia polyphylla (DC.) Britton & Rose
Calytrix tetragona Labill.
Eriogonum heermannii subsp. sulcatum (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Millettia reticulata Benth.
Silene montana Arrond.
Jasminum odoratissimum L.
Oxylobium linariifolium (G.Don) Domin
Potentilla saximontana Rydb.
Oxylobium lanceolatum (Vent.) Druce
Carya palmeri Manning
Spiraea densiflora Nuttall
Echinops exaltatus Schrad.
Agropyron scribneri Vasey
Tilia tomentosa Moench
Eremocarya micrantha var. lepida (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Strophanthus speciosus (Ward & Harv.) Reber
Eriogonum vimineum subsp. nidularium (Coville) S.Stokes
Arenaria fendleri var. brevifolia (Maguire) Maguire
Templetonia retusa (Vent.) R.Br.
Epidendrum coriifolium Lindl.
Hackelia americana (A.Gray) Fernald
Acanthocereus horridus Britton & Rose
Samolus ebracteatus var. cuneatus (Small) Henrickson
Kennedya rubicunda Vent.
Draba micrantha Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Carex trisperma Dewey
Salix exigua var. melanopsis (Nutt.) Cronquist
Arbutus tessellata P.D.Sørensen
Phalaris tuberosa var. stenoptera (Hack.) Hitchc.
Lepidium densiflorum var. pubecarpum (A.Nelson) Thell.
Corynabutilon vitifolium (Cav.) Kearney
Acalypha schiedeana Schltdl.
Argemone corymbosa var. arenicola (G.B.Ownbey) Shinners
Sphaeralcea moorei (S.L.Welsh) N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh
Salix wrightii Andersson
Oenothera scapoidea subsp. brachycarpa P.H.Raven
Papaver coloradense (Fedde) Fedde ex Wooton & Standl.
Astragalus diversifolius A.Gray
Penstemon diphyllus Rydb.
Plagiobothrys californicus var. ursinus (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Synthyris platycarpa Gail & Pennell
Bahia palmeri S.Watson
Opuntia fulgida var. fulgida
Papaver radicatum subsp. kluanensis (D.Löve) D.F.Murray
Lupinus umbellatus Greene
Eriogonum brevicaule var. pumilum S.Stokes ex M.E.Jones
Hymenolobus procumbens (L.) Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Salix ×blanda Andersson
Opuntia molesta Brandegee
Lomatium roseanum Cronquist
Physaria condensata Rollins
Lobelia gruina Cav.
Erioneuron avenaceum var. avenaceum
Oxytropis lagopus var. atropurpurea (Rydb.) Barneby
Arabis lyallii var. lyallii
Arabis microphylla var. thompsonii Rollins
Pedicularis contorta var. ctenophora (Rydb.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Encelia cedrosensis Rose
Eremogone Fenzl
Astragalus giganteus S.Watson
Astragalus hypoxylus S.Watson
Ipomopsis congesta var. palmifrons (Brand) S.L.Welsh
Acacia boormanii Maiden
Orobanche cooperi subsp. latiloba (Munz) T.S.Collins
Dalea californica S.Watson
Condalia hookeri var. hookeri
Toxicodendron laetevirens Greene
Cymopterus coulteri (M.E.Jones) Mathias
Gaura suffulta subsp. suffulta
Philadelphus helleri Rydb.
Astragalus robbinsii var. occidentalis S.Watson
Juncus balticus var. condensatus Suksd.
Atriplex patula var. subspicata (Nutt.) S.Watson
Sisyrinchium occidentale E.P.Bicknell
Symphoricarpos oreophilus var. oreophilus
Navarretia furnissii L.A.Johnson & L.M.Chan
Rhus asplenifolia Greene
Frasera speciosa var. angustifolia Rydb.
Banksia spinulosa var. cunninghamii (Sieber ex Rchb.fil.) A.S.George
Solidago nivea Rydb.
Trifolium hansenii Greene
Mentzelia marginata var. marginata
Chorisiva nevadensis (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Abutilon crispum (L.) Medik.
Hesperastragalus obispensis Rydb.
Brittonastrum pallidiflorum A.Heller
Lupinus suksdorfii B.L.Rob.
Stipa comata var. suksdorfii H.St.John
Coreopsis tinctoria var. atkinsoniana (Douglas ex Lindl.) H.M.Parker ex E.B.Sm.
Penstemon connatifolius A.Nelson
Mammillaria deserti Engelm.
Draba douglasii var. douglasii
Neomammillaria milleri (Boed.) Britton & Rose
Kochia prostrata (L.) Schrad.
Lupinus roseolus Rydb.
Sclerocactus parviflorus subsp. parviflorus
Olsynium inflatum Suksd.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. petrophilus Cronquist
Penstemon cardinalis Wooton & Standl.
Penstemon pseudospectabilis var. pseudospectabilis
Physaria dornii Lichvar
Sedum marmorense Otting & R.E.Brainerd
Boechera sparsiflora var. subvillosa (S.Watson) Dorn
Boechera ophira (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Acalypha glandulosa Cav.
Allocarya nelsoni Greene
Frasera albicaulis subsp. nitida (Benth.) D.M.Post
Boisduvalia sparsiflora A.Heller
Amsinckia subglabricaulis Suksd.
Lupinus marianus Rydb.
Astragalus recurvus Greene
Polygala cucullata Benth.
Lemna polyrhiza L.
Valeriana dioica var. sylvatica (Sol. ex Richards.) S.Watson
Gaura parviflora var. lachnocarpa Weath.
Brickellia brachiata A.Gray
Oenothera confertiflora Raven
Salvia gesneriifolia Lindl. ex Lem.
Scolopia zeyheri (Nees) Harv.
Mentzelia candelariae H.J.Thomps. & Prigge
Dalea pinetorum var. anilantha Barneby
Veltheimia bracteata Harv. ex Baker
Cordylanthus platycephalus Pennell
Antennaria rosea subsp. arida (E.Nelson) R.J.Bayer
Leucaena brandegeei Britton & Rose
Rhinotropis heterorhyncha (Barneby) J.R.Abbott
Iodanthus pinnatifidus (Michx.) Steud.
Ptilomeris mutica Nutt.
Lesquerella gooddingii Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Salvia rosmarinus Spenn.
Castilleja martinii var. ewanii (Eastw.) Holmgren
Adenostoma brevifolium Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Anemone decapetala Ard.
Dyschoriste schiedeana var. prostrata Henrickson
Platystemon subereus Greene
Negundo californicum Torr. & A.Gray
Halimolobos perplexa (L.F.Hend.) Rollins
Piperia colemanii Rand.Morgan & Glic.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. torreyanum (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Eremogone congesta var. prolifera (Maguire) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Tricerastes glomerata C.Presl
Helenium amphibolum A.Gray
Peucedanum triternatum var. platycarpum Torr.
Cenostigma pluviosum var. peltophoroides (Benth.) Gagnon & G.P.Lewis
Saxifraga bryophora var. bryophora
Dalea aurea Nutt. ex Pursh
Ceanothus pauciflorus Moc. & Sessé
Erigeron compactus var. compactus
Festuca tenella Willd.
Senecio rawsonianus Greene
Sparganium simplex var. multipedunculatum Morong
Penstemon virgatus var. asa-grayi (Crosswh.) Dorn
Hebe speciosa (R.Cunn. ex A.Cunn.) Andersen
Penstemon breviflorus subsp. glabrisepalus D.D.Keck
Stanhopea jenischiana F.Kramer ex Rchb.f.
Cuphea wrightii var. nematopetala Bacig.
Bigelowia brachylepis A.Gray
Paspalum paniculatum L.
Opuntia filipendula Engelm.
Salvia azurea var. grandiflora Benth.
Astragalus loanus Barneby
Buchnera pilosa var. arizonica A.Gray
Nolina micrantha I.M.Johnst.
Viola neomexicana Greene
Cerastium arvense subsp. arvense
Schkuhria wrightii A.Gray
Cicuta cinicola A.Nelson
Carex dives Holm
Roemeria refracta DC.
Salvia dorrii var. carnosa (Douglas ex Greene) Cronquist
Wislizenia refracta var. refracta
Browallia speciosa Hook.
Carex simpliciuscula Wahlenb.
Astragalus zionis var. zionis
Eupatorium adenophorum Spreng.
Lesquerella alpina subsp. alpina
Arbutus texana Buckley
Erophila verna (L.) Chevall.
Lupinus parishii Eastw.
Gilia aggregata var. bridgesii A.Gray
Astragalus humistratus var. crispulus Barneby
Rorippa palustris var. hispida (Desv.) Rydb.
Potentilla hippiana var. effusa (Douglas ex Lehm.) Dorn
Bahia absinthifolia var. dealbata (A.Gray) A.Gray
Valeriana puberulenta Rydb.
Senecio candidissimus Greene
Salix rigida var. watsonii (Bebb) Cronquist
Hymenopappus tomentosus Rydb.
Amsinckia canadensis Suksd.
Erigeron tenuis Torr. & A.Gray
Loeflingia squarrosa subsp. cactorum Barneby & Twisselm.
Physaria pycnantha Grady & O'Kane
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum var. fasciculifolium (A.Nelson) S.Stokes
Lepidium zionis A.Nelson
Marina diffusa var. radiolata Barneby
Cornus baileyi J.M.Coult. & W.H.Evans
Cryptantha monosperma Greene
Allium denticulatum (Ownbey & Aase ex Traub) McNeal
Musineon vaginatum Rydb.
Arenaria fendleri var. glabrescens S.Watson
Bloomeria aurea Kellogg
Pedicularis latifolia Pennell
Salix subcoerulea Piper
Bigelowia paniculata A.Gray
Ivesia multifoliolata (Torr.) D.D.Keck
Elymus trachycaulus subsp. glaucus (Pease & A.H.Moore) Cody
Besseya arizonica Pennell
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. planifolius L.C.Anderson
Aster frutescens S.Watson
Microseris laciniata subsp. detlingii K.L.Chambers
Aster grayi Suksd.
Heuchera townsendii Rydb.
Penstemon richardsonii var. curtiflorus (D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Solidago garrettii Rydb.
Aligera glabrior Suksd.
Lesquerella goodrichii Rollins
Atriplex asterocarpa Stutz, G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.
Camissonia lavandulaefolia P.H.Raven
Eriogonum phoeniceum L.M.Shultz
Astragalus canonis M.E.Jones
Chaenactis heterocarpha Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray
Agrostis scabra var. scabra
Descurainia incisa subsp. filipes (A.Gray) Rollins
Acaciella hartwegii (Benth.) Britton & Rose
Phlox longifolia var. tenuifolia A.Gray
Hieracium scouleri var. nudicaule (A.Gray) Cronquist
Amelanchier alnifolia var. pumila (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Nelson
Atriplex decumbens S.Watson
Claytonia rupicola Suksd.
Actaea viridiflora Greene
Astragalus tweedyi Canby
Heterotheca arizonica (Semple) G.L.Nesom
Agrostis virescens Kunth
Carex saxenii Raymond
Trifolium gymnocarpon subsp. plummerae (S.Watson) J.M.Gillett
Alyssum minus subsp. micranthum (C.A.Mey.) Breistr.
Peteria scoparia A.Gray
Trifolium dasyphyllum subsp. uintense (Rydb.) J.M.Gillett
Calochortus douglasianus Schult.f.
Stephanomeria tenuifolia var. myrioclada (D.C.Eaton) Cronquist
Porophyllum tridentatum var. crassifolium (S.Watson) I.M.Johnst.
Hackelia cronquistii J.L.Gentry
Saxifraga chrysantha A.Gray
Cymopterus evertii R.L.Hartm. & R.S.Kirkp.
Silene douglasii var. macrocalyx B.L.Rob.
Acacia brandegeeana I.M.Johnst.
Potamogeton filiformis var. occidentalis (J.W.Robbins) Morong
Symphoricarpos mollis var. acutus A.Gray
Thalictrum revolutum DC.
Dypsis decaryi (Jum.) Beentje & J.Dransf.
Mimulus rubellus var. latiflorus S.Watson
Cymopterus higginsii S.L.Welsh
Sphaerostigma utahense Small
Sisymbrium sophia L.
Penstemon bridgesii A.Gray
Sisymbrium canescens var. californicum Torr. & A.Gray
Mimulus glabratus subsp. fremontii (Benth.) Pennell
Garrya mollis Greene
Eriogonum thurberi var. parishii Gand.
Herrickia kingii var. barnebyana (S.L.Welsh & Goodrich) Brouillet, Urbatsch & R.P.Roberts
Arabis pycnocarpa var. glabrata (Torr. & A.Gray) M.Hopkins
Gomphocarpus hypoleucus A.Gray
Daubentonia thurberi A.Gray
Amsinckia obvallata Greene ex J.F.Macbr.
Allium croceum Torr.
Echeveria elegans Rose
Cnicus arizonicus A.Gray
Sphaeromeria capitata Nutt.
Apocynum palustre Greene
Hackelia davisii Cronquist
Linaria dalmatica subsp. macedonica (Griseb.) D.A.Sutton
Draba helleriana var. patens (A.Heller) O.E.Schulz
Astragalus palousensis Piper
Ebenopsis ebano (Berland.) Barneby & J.W.Grimes
Sphaeralcea subhastata var. martii (Cockerell) Kearney
Thelypodium integrifolium var. affine (Greene) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Knightia excelsa R.Br.
Machaerocereus gummosus (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Lepidium nitidum var. howellii C.L.Hitchc.
Lesquerella tumulosa (Barneby) Reveal
Euphorbia multicaulis Engelm.
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. inopinatus C.P.Sm.
Cerastium graminifolium Rydb.
Dyssodia porophyllum var. cancellata (Cass.) Strother, 1969
Cracca thurberi Rydb.
Downingia mirabilis J.T.Howell
Franseria intricata Rydb.
Allium geyeri var. chatterleyi S.L.Welsh
Koenigia islandica L.
Thelesperma longipes A.Gray
Mimulus glabratus var. utahensis Pennell
Calamagrostis tacomensis K.L.Marr & Hebda
Thelypodium integrifolium subsp. longicarpum Al-Shehbaz
Macronema obovatum Rydb.
Senecio lyonii A.Gray, 1884
Euphorbia dulcis L.
Erigeron gilensis Wooton & Standl.
Centaurium muehlenbergii var. albiflorum Suksd.
Echinopepon insularis Watson
Arabis lemmonii var. drepanoloba (Greene) Rollins
Lupinus labiatus Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1840
Hydastylus borealis E.P.Bicknell
Townsendia smithii L.M.Schultz & A.H.Holmgren
Cassiope mertensiana subsp. gracilis Piper
Artemisia arachnoidea E.Sheld.
Acacia angustissima var. texensis (Torr. & A.Gray) Isely
Eriogonum longifolium Nutt.
Lepidium ramosum A.Nelson
Franseria confertiflora (DC.) Rydb.
Hamosa imperfecta Rydb.
Sidalcea neomexicana var. parviflora (Greene) Roush
Rubus oligospermus Thornber ex Rydb.
Anchusa arvensis (L.) M.Bieb.
Hemizonia frutescens A.Gray
Juncus alpinus var. fuscescens Fernald
Tulipa sylvestris L.
Tiarella californica (Kellogg) Rydb.
Aletes macdougalii subsp. breviradiatus W.L.Theob. & C.C.Tseng
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. pseudorupestris (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Hymenoxys rusbyi (A.Gray) Cockerell
Erigeron tweedyanus Canby & Rose
Delphinium occidentale subsp. occidentale
Thermopsis montana var. venosa (Eastw.) Jeps.
Mammillaria mazatlanensis K.Schum.
Transberingia virgata (Nutt.) N.H.Holmgren
Jumellea arachnantha (Rchb.f.) Schltr.
Linum sulcatum Riddell
Penstemon thompsoniae subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Sisyrinchium eastwoodiae E.P.Bicknell
Trixis michuacana var. longifolia (D.Don) C.E.Anderson
Sphaeralcea angustifolia var. oblongifolia (A.Gray) Shinners
Dicliptera torreyi A.Gray
Caragana aurantiaca Koehne
Penstemon duchesnensis (Holmgren) Neese
Thelesperma pubescens Dorn
Physaria kingii subsp. kaibabensis (Rollins) O'Kane
Ribes inebrians Lindl.
Leucophyllum laevigatum Standl.
Rumex altissimus Wood
Erigeron oblanceolatus Rydb.
Gilia heterostyla S.Cochrane & A.G.Day
Populus deltoides var. deltoides
Malaxis ehrenbergii (Rchb.f.) Kuntze
Micranthes brachypus Small
Dianthera sonorae S.Watson
Lessingia bakeri Greene
Microstylis corymbosa S.Watson
Grevillea juniperina R.Br.
Poa fendleriana var. arizonica T.A.William
Poa nematophylla Rydb.
Epilobium glaberrimum var. glaberrimum
Astragalus cobrensis var. maguirei Kearney
Bahia parviflora A.Gray
Mariosousa Seigler & Ebinger
Geranium lentum Wooton & Standl.
Geranium aequale (Bab.) Aedo
Geranium charucanum Standl.
Geranium trolliifolium Small
Geranium niveum S.Watson
Geranium seemannii subsp. seemannii
Geranium texanum (Trel.) A.Heller
Geranium pyrenaicum subsp. pyrenaicum
Geranium gentryi H.E.Moore
Gilia gilioides (Benth.) Greene
Linanthus watsonii subsp. laccolithicus J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Glycyrrhiza lepidota Nutt.
Iris watsoniana Purdy
Castilleja neglecta Zeile
Comarostaphylis longifolia (Benth.) Klotzsch
Paeonia coriacea Boiss.
Microseris leucocarpha Greene
Quercus laeta Liebm.
Androsace montana (A.Gray) Wendelbo
Krynitzkia torreyana A.Gray
Plectritis aphanoptera (A.Gray) Suksd.
Ilex laevigata (Pursh) A.Gray
Mimulus guttatus var. depauperatus (A.Gray) A.L.Grant
Aconitum fischeri Rchb.
Cornus alba subsp. stolonifera (Michx.) Wangerin
Oreocarya thyrsiflora Greene
Trifolium involucratum Ortega
Aristida palmeri Vasey
Ranunculus ficaria L.
Rudbeckia triloba L.
Peperomia obtusifolia (L.) A.Dietr.
Salix purpurea L.
Crassula ovata E.Mey. ex Harv. & Sond.
Lilium bulbiferum L.
Senna artemisioides (Gaudich. ex DC.) Isely
Salvia pratensis L.
Rubus odoratus L.
Pilea microphylla (L.) Liebm.
Imperata cylindrica (L.) P.Beauv.
Lilium humboldtii Roezl & Leichtlin ex Duch.
Acer henryi Pax
Acer caudatifolium Hayata
Rubus alceifolius Poir.
Persea liebmannii Mez
Phaseolus amabilis Standl.
Elymus stebbinsii subsp. stebbinsii
Ficus coronata Spin
Acer heldreichii Orph.
Malus prattii (Hemsl.) C.K.Schneid.
Potentilla tabernaemontani Asch.
Prunus sargentii Rehder
Rubus occidentalis L.
Asparagus retrofractus L.
Prunus rivularis Scheele
Potentilla cascadensis Rydb.
Lupinus arbustus subsp. neolaxiflorus D.B.Dunn
Digitaria nuda Schumach.
Acer velutinum var. van-volxemii (Mast.) Rehder
Allium canadense var. canadense
Camellia forrestii (Diels) Cohen-Stuart
Lupinus alpicola L.F.Hend., 1906
Potentilla anserina var. grandis Torr. & A.Gray
Rubus incurvatus Bab.
Avena abyssinica Hochst.
Solanum calvum Bitter
Acer stachyophyllum subsp. stachyophyllum
Potentilla longifolia Willd.
Syzygium Gaertn.
Triticum dicoccon Schrank
Setaria megaphylla (Steud.) T.Durand & Schinz
Lupinus densiflorus var. lacteus (Kellogg) C.P.Sm.
Acer crataegifolium Siebold & Zucc.
Digitaria villosa (Walter) Pers.
Pennisetum orientale Rich.
Potentilla pseudorupestris Rydb.
Potentilla johnstonii Soják
Lepidium apetalum Willd.
Lupinus texensis Hook.
Prunus davidiana (Carrière) Franch.
Prunus gracilis Engelm. & Gray
Ficus racemosa L.
Diospyros austroafricana De Winter
Prunus zingii Standl.
Setaria poiretiana (Schult.) Kunth
Asparagus Tourn. ex L.
Acer erianthum Schwer.
Allium angulosum L.
Helianthus giganteus L.
Ribes klamathense (Coville) Fedde
Avena clauda Durieu
Vitis rupestris Scheele
Potentilla patellifera Howell
Acer sempervirens L.
Allium nigrum L.
Malus baccata var. baccata
Rubus chingii Hu
Rubus bambusarum Focke
Citrus hybr
Triticum aestivum subsp. sphaerococcum (Percival) Mackey
Gossypium arboreum L.
Ilex rotunda Thunb.
Ficus vasta Forssk.
Allium serpentinicum I.Genç & Özhatay
Ficus saussureana DC.
Zea mays subsp. indurata (Sturtev.) Zhuk.
Solanum trifolium Dunal
Brassica rapa subsp. pekinensis (Lour.) Hanelt
Lupinus sonomensis A.Heller
Malus asiatica Nakai
Solanum ptychanthum Dunal
Thinopyrum caespitosum (K.Koch) Zhi W.Liu & R.R.-C.Wang
Potentilla concinna var. proxima (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh & B.C.Johnst.
Fragaria vesca var. alba Dudley, 1886
Gossypium trilobum (Sessé & Moc. ex DC.) Skovst.
Persea borbonia (L.) Spreng.
Ilex opaca Sol. ex Aiton
Allium shevockii McNeal
Solanum gayanum Dunal
Lupinus ammophilus var. ammophilus
Lysimachia borealis (Raf.) U.Manns & Anderb.
Chondrosum gracile Kunth
Eriocoma lettermanii (Vasey) Romasch.
Paspalum millegranum Schrad.
Muhlenbergia flaviseta Scribn.
Loeflingia L.
Balsamorhiza careyana var. intermedia Cronquist
Poa purpurascens Spreng.
Muhlenbergia pubescens (Kunth) Hitchc.
Cicuta bolanderi A.Gray
Leptochloa panicea subsp. mucronata (Michx.) Nowack
Poa piperi Hitchc.
Silene cucubalus Wibel
Acacia kelloggiana A.M.Carter & Rudd
Paspalum botterii (E.Fourn.) Chase
Tetradema Schltr.
Madia elegans var. hispida H.M.Hall
Erigeron callianthemus Greene
Pleuraphis mutica Buckley
Erythrina montana Rose & Standl.
Piscidia L.
Microsteris Greene
Cryptantha excavata Brandegee
Cryptantha crymophila I.M.Johnst.
Collomia rawsoniana Greene
Ulmus glabra Huds.
Alonsoa linearis (Jacq.) Ruiz & Pav.
Astragalus praelongus var. ellisiae (Rydb.) Barneby ex B.L.Turner
Heterotheca viscida (A.Gray) V.L.Harms
Heterotheca fastigiata (Greene) V.L.Harms
Dichondra J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Suaeda californica var. californica
Hieracium greenei A.Gray
Pyracantha M.Roem.
Heterotheca scaberrima (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Erica mediterranea Sieber ex Tausch
Crepis bakeri Greene
Ribes divaricatum var. klamathense (Coville) McMinn
Camellia japonica L.
Ribes malvaceum var. indecorum (Eastw.) Jancz.
Campsis radicans (L.) Bureau
Corymbia calophylla (Lindl.) K.D.Hill & L.A.S.Johnson
Lomatium parvifolium var. pallidum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Jeps.
Eucalyptus incrassata Labill.
Eucalyptus intertexta R.T.Baker
Mentzelia multiflora var. multiflora
Trifolium buckwestiorum Isely
Transberingia bursifolia subsp. virgata (Nutt.) Al-Shehbaz & O'Kane
Erythranthe utahensis (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Heterotheca rutteri (Rothr.) Shinners
Heuchera eastwoodiae Rosend. & Lakela
Valeriana amplexicaulis F.G.Mey.
Rhododendron occidentale var. occidentale
Stebbinsoseris decipiens (K.L.Chambers) K.L.Chambers
Callistemon lanceolatus DC.
Eucalyptus gunnii Hook.fil.
Firmiana platanifolia (L.fil.) Schott & Endl.
Lampranthus multiradiatus (Jacq.) N.E.Br.
Dalea parryi Torr. & A.Gray
Sida physocalyx Gray
Eucalyptus goniocalyx F.Muell. ex Miq.
Juncus leseuerii Bol.
Eucalyptus blakelyi Maiden
Eucalyptus glaucescens Maiden & Blakely
Cerastium arvense subsp. strictum (L.) Ugbor.
Senecio macdougalii A.Heller
Lobelia Plum. ex L.
Paspalum notatum var. saurae Parodi
Passiflora mollissima (Kunth) Bailey
Chamaesyce indivisa (Engelm.) Millsp.
Monardella villosa var. obispoensis Hoover
Eucalyptus acaciiformis H.Deane & Maiden
Eucalyptus pellita F.Muell.
Eucalyptus macarthurii H.Deane & Maiden
Holocarpha Greene
Hypericum patulum subsp. henryi Veitch ex Bean
Horkelia yadonii Ertter
Hulsea vestita var. callicarpha H.M.Hall
Celosia cristata L.
Trifolium lacerum Greene
Eucalyptus eudesmioides F.Muell.
Horkelia californica var. californica
Erica tetralix L.
Eucalyptus cylindrocarpa Blakely
Eucalyptus nobilis L.A.S.Johnson & K.D.Hill
Eucalyptus dalrympleana subsp. heptantha L.A.S.Johnson
Eucalyptus mannifera subsp. mannifera
Chorisia speciosa A.St.-Hil.
Sterculia acerifolia A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Phrygilanthus sonorae (S.Watson) Standl.
Orthocarpus brevistylus Hoover
Eriogonum spergulinum subsp. reddingianum (M.E.Jones) Munz ex Reveal
Eucalyptus torelliana F.Muell.
Eucalyptus bridgesiana F.Muell. ex R.T.Baker
Eucalyptus viridis R.T.Baker
Myrsine africana L.
Juncus interior var. neomexicanus (Wiegand) F.J.Herm.
Phelipanche ramosa (L.) Pomel
Aphyllon californicum subsp. grande (Heckard) A.C.Schneid.
Eriogonum nodosum var. jaegeri Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Eucalyptus platypus Hook.
Eucalyptus parvula L.A.S.Johnson & K.D.Hill
Najas L.
Navarretia nigelliformis subsp. nigelliformis
Gilia multicaulis Benth.
Mariscus fendlerianus (Boeckeler) T.Koyama
Arenaria fendleri var. eastwoodiae (Rydb.) H.D.Harr.
Ceanothus foliosus var. vineatus McMinn
Simmondsia californica (Link) Nutt.
Lessingia Cham.
Tetrapteron (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Sagina decumbens (Elliott) Torr. & A.Gray
Gilia achilleifolia subsp. chamissonis (Greene) Brand
Eucalyptus paniculata Sm.
Eucalyptus propinqua H.Deane & Maiden
Adelinia grandis (Douglas ex Lehm.) J.I.Cohen
Mercurialis ambigua L.f.
Hesperevax acaulis var. acaulis
Ancistrocarphus keilii Morefield
Cirsium clavatum var. americanum (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Sidalcea neomexicana subsp. thurberi (B.L.Rob. ex Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Lavandula L.
Poa secunda var. scabrella Thurb.
Eriogonum inerme var. inerme
Oenothera stricta Link
Senecio fremontii subsp. occidentalis (Greene) G.W.Douglas & Ruyle-Dougl.
Sericocarpus oregonensis subsp. californicus (Durand) Ferris
Erythranthe arenicola (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Plagiobothrys shastensis Greene ex A.Gray
Actaea L.
Argyranthemum Webb ex Sch.Bip.
Juncus falcatus var. falcatus
Hylocereus undatus (Haw.) Britton & Rose
Juncus falcatus subsp. falcatus
Fraxinus angustifolia Vahl
Oreocarya interrupta Greene
Oenothera cheiranthifolia Hornem. ex Spreng.
Ageratina wrightii (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Jasminum primulinum Hemsl.
Solanum umbelliferum var. obispoense (Eastw.) D.J.Keil
Senecio vitalis N.E.Br.
Antirrhinum thompsonii D.J.Keil
Diplacus aurantiacus var. calycinus (Eastw.) D.J.Keil
Mina lobata Cerv.
Monardella subglabra (Hoover) Hardham
Elymus mollis var. mollis
Mentha villosa Huds.
Eriophyllum staechadifolium var. artemisiifolium (Less.) J.F.Macbr.
Mentzelia pectinata var. chrysopetala D.J.Keil & Brokaw
Streptanthus lasiophyllus (Hook. & Arn.) Hoover
Cistus L.
Pedicularis grayi A.Nelson
Rhododendron calendulaceum (Michx.) Torr.
Arctostaphylos hearstiorum Hoover & Roof
Physalis heterophylla Nees
Oenothera claviformis Torr. & Frém.
Tonestus aberrans (A.Nelson) G.L.Nesom & D.R.Morgan
Penstemon deustus var. heterander (Torr. & A.Gray) Cronquist
Carex gymnoclada Holm
Pogogyne Benth.
Dyssodia Cav.
Eryngium racemosum Jeps.
Kuhnia rosmarinifolia Vent.
Mentzelia pectinata var. pectinata
Lithophragma tenella Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Echeveria bartramii (Rose) Kearney & Peebles
Corynocarpus laevigatus J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Cyperus albomarginatus (Mart. & Schrad. ex Nees) Steud.
Solanum umbelliferum var. glabrescens Torr.
Bergenia schmidtii (Regel) Silva Tar.
Barroetea laxiflora Brandegee
Acacia cymbispina Sprague & L.Riley
Achyrachaena Schauer
Senna durangensis (Rose) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Aconitum columbianum var. ochroleucum A.Nelson
Delphinium parryi subsp. eastwoodiae Ewan
Diplacus aurantiacus var. puniceus (Nutt.) D.J.Keil
Potentilla fruticosa Hook.f.
Thysanocarpus amplectens Greene
Cruciferae
Holodiscus dumosus var. australis (A.Heller) F.Ley
Calliandra inaequilatera Rusby
Astragalus toanus var. scidulus S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Linanthus montanus (Greene) Greene
Trautvetteria grandis Nutt.
Senna artemisioides subsp. filifolia Randell
Physaria integrifolia var. integrifolia
Kleinia ficoides (L.) Haw.
Kniphofia Moench
Tilia platyphyllos Scop.
Eucalyptus multicaulis Blakely
Convolvulus cneorum L.
Eucalyptus redunca Schauer
Dudleya collomiae Rose ex Morton
Androsace laevigata (A.Gray) Wendelbo
Deinandra corymbosa subsp. macrocephala (Nutt.) B.G.Baldwin
Eucalyptus sargentii Maiden
Eucalyptus ochrophloia F.Muell.
Eucalyptus nutans F.Muell.
Eucalyptus mannifera subsp. maculosa (R.T.Baker) L.A.S.Johnson
Eucalyptus neglecta Maiden
Astragalus subcinereus var. subcinereus
Dalea spinosa A.Gray
Draba cuneifolia var. californica Jeps.
Ivesia Torr. & A.Gray
Psorothamnus polyadenius Rydb., 1919
Cyperus michelianus (L.) Delile
Cryptantha humilis var. ovina (Payson) Higgins
Lupinus lacteus Kellogg
Isocoma veneta var. vernonioides (Nutt.) Jeps.
Eucalyptus dundasii Maiden
Eucalyptus gillii Maiden
Nymphoides peltatum (S.G.Gmel.) Britten & Rendle
Eucalyptus resinifera Sm.
Acacia elata A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Acacia decurrens var. dealbata (Link) Muller
Acacia armata R.Br.
Orlaya grandiflora (L.) Hoffm.
Lithospermum arvense Ledeb.
Veronica anagallis Bong.
Chorizanthe diffusa var. nivea (Curran) Hoover
Lasthenia hirsutula Greene
Syntrichopappus A.Gray
Tagetes pringlei S.Watson
Phaseolus atropurpureus var. sericeus A.Gray
Fimbristylis vahlii (Lam.) Link
Phalaris coerulescens Desf.
Madia sativa subsp. sativa
Stylocline masonii Morefield
Filago californica var. tomentosa Nutt.
Photinia serrulata Lindl.
Castanopsis chrysophylla subsp. minor (Benth.) A.E.Murray
Stephanomeria carotifera Hoover
Spirodela oligorrhiza (Kurz) Hegelm.
Stipa clandestina Hack.
Fragaria bracteata A.Heller
Lasianthaea seemannii (A.Gray) K.M.Becker
Aegilops geniculata Roth
Monardella undulata var. undulata
Lagunaria patersonii (R.Br.) G.Don
Chamaesyce hooveri (L.C.Wheeler) Koutnik
Chlorogalum pomeridianum var. minus Hoover
Layia Hook. & Arn. ex DC.
Echinacea angustifolia DC.
Emilia javanica (Burm.fil.) C.B.Rob.
Sisymbrium linearifolium (A.Gray) Payson
Elymus farctus (Viv.) Runemark ex Melderis
Haplopappus salicinus S.F.Blake
Ceanothus fendleri var. viridis M.E.Jones
Navarretia panochensis D.Gowen & L.A.Johnson
Typha angustifolia x Typha domingensis
Jasminum officinale L.
Eucalyptus conferruminata S.G.M.
Eucalyptus pulchella Desf.
Eucalyptus prava L.A.S.Johnson & K.D.Hill
Eucalyptus kitsoniana Luehm. ex Maiden
Haplophyton cimicidum var. cimicidum
Penstemon angustifolius Nutt. ex Pursh
Euryops virgineus (L.fil.) Less.
Aster exilis Elliott
Epilobium minutum var. foliosum Torr. & A.Gray
Chaenactis glabriuscula var. curta (A.Gray) Jeps.
Genista maderensis (Webb & Berthel.) Lowe
Selenicereus grandiflorus (L.) Britton & Rose
Cercocarpus betuloides var. traskiae (Eastw.) Dunkle
Erythrina humeana Spreng.
Cenchrus nervosus (Nees) Kuntze
Cenchrus macrourus (Trin.) Morrone
Hymenopappus pauciflorus I.M.Johnst.
Peltandra virginica (L.) Schott
Lantana sellowiana Link & Otto
Galium californicum subsp. luciense Dempster & Stebbins
Marrubium L.
Pelargonium L'Hér. ex Aiton
Pelargonium inquinans (L.) L'Hér.
Centrostegia thurberi var. macrotheca (J.T.Howell) Goodman
Cerastium dichotomum L.
Buxus microphylla Siebold & Zucc.
Penstemon antirrhinoides Benth.
Sparaxis bulbifera (L.) Ker Gawl.
Spergularia (Pers.) J. & K.Presl
Opuntia brasiliensis (Willd.) Haw.
Diplacus aurantiacus var. lompocensis (Mc Minn) D.J.Keil
Opuntia lindheimeri var. linguiformis (Griffiths) L.D.Benson
Echinocereus rectispinus var. robustus Peebles
Echinocereus engelmannii var. variegatus (Engelm. & Bigelow) Engelm. ex Rümpler
Echinocereus Engelm.
Echinocereus engelmannii var. nicholii L.D.Benson
Hymenopappus L'Hér.
Penstemon procerus subsp. formosus (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Lagophylla Nutt.
Eugenia L.
Atriplex muelleri Benth.
Mariposa clavata var. recurvifolia Hoover
Symphyotrichum praealtum (Poir.) G.L.Nesom
Atriplex flavida (S.C.Sand. & G.L.Chu) D.J.Keil & D.W.Taylor
Poa curta Rydb.
Pennisetum alopecuroides (L.) Spreng.
Arthrocnemum Moq.
Atriplex cordulata var. erecticaulis (Stutz, G.L.Chu & S.C.Sand.) S.L.Welsh
Rosa setigera var. serena E.J.Palmer & Steyerm.
Cordylanthus maritimus var. canescens (A.Gray) Jeps.
Hemizonia pentactis (D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck
Dahlia imperialis Roezl
Kleinia barbertonica (Klatt) Burtt Davy
Stevia glandulosa Hook. & Arn.
Kleinia anteuphorbium (L.) DC.
Oreocarya nana Eastw.
Chondropetalum tectorum (L.f.) Raf.
Stipa gigantea Link
Felicia Cass.
Perezia thurberi A.Gray
Malacothamnus abbottii (Eastw.) Kearney
Primula fragrans A.R.Mast & Reveal
Commicarpus Standl.
Simsia lagascaeformis DC.
Aristolochia brevipes var. acuminata S.Watson
Cryptantha oblata (M.E.Jones) Payson
Ribes viscosissimum var. hallii (Jancz.) Jancz.
Helleborus niger L.
Ericameria parryi var. parryi
Phaseolus metcalfei Wooton & Standl.
Trifolium variegatum var. pauciflorum McDermott
Physaria arizonica var. andrusensis N.D.Atwood, S.L.Welsh & L.C.Higgins
Cinna bolanderi Scribn.
Urochloa panicoides P.Beauv.
Crotalaria agatiflora Schweinf.
Cracca edwardsii A.Gray
Draba helleriana var. bifurcata C.L.Hitchc.
Salvia grahamii Benth.
Lewisia congdonii (Rydb.) S.Clay
Leucanthemum ×superbum (Bergmans ex J.W.Ingram) D.H.Kent
Tristania suaveolens (Sol. ex Gaertn.) Sm.
Leibnitzia seemannii (Sch.Bip.) G.L.Nesom
Cirsium crassicaule (Greene) Jeps.
Bromus polyanthus Scribn. ex Shear
Echinochloa crus-galli var. frumentacea (Link) W.Wight
Muhlenbergia utilis (Torr.) Hitchc.
Bouteloua erecta (Vasey & Hack.) Columbus
Linanthus californicus subsp. glandulosus (Eastw.) J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Monardella undulata var. frutescens Hoover
Antirrhinum confertiflorum Benth.
Ceratostigma willmottianum Stapf
Linanthus bigelovii var. jonesii (A.Gray) Jeps. & H.Mason
Dodecatheon clevelandii var. insulare (H.J.Thomps.) Reveal
Clarkia speciosa subsp. immaculata F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Dieteria canescens var. ambigua (B.L.Turner) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Ruellia brittoniana Leonard
Clarkia rubicunda subsp. rubicunda
Hebe elliptica (G.Forst.) Pennell
Astragalus parishii A.Gray
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. lanosa Hrusa
Achnatherum nelsonii subsp. nelsonii
Coreocarpus arizonicus var. filiformis (Greenm.) S.F.Blake
Clarkia cylindrica subsp. clavicarpa W.S.Davis
Phlomis fruticosa L.
Erigeron formosissimus var. viscidus (Rydb.) Cronquist
Convolvulus cyclostegius House
Desmodium intortum (Mill.) Urb.
Acanthus montanus (Nees) T.Anderson
Bromus alopecuros Poir.
Trifolium hydrophilum Greene
Claytonia parvifolia Moc. ex DC.
Zygophyllum fabago var. brachycarpum Boiss.
Aristida glauca (Nees) Walp.
Hymenoxys ambigens (S.F.Blake) Bierner
Elymus virginicus L.
Baeria fremontii (Torr. ex A.Gray) A.Gray
Phoenix reclinata Jacq.
Viola canadensis var. canadensis
Limnanthes gracilis subsp. parishii (Jeps.) C.T.Mason
Limnanthes alba var. detonsa Jeps.
Austrocylindropuntia cylindrica (Lam.) Backeb.
Microseris douglasii var. tenella (A.Gray) Hoover
Lotus junceus var. biolettii Ottley
Eschscholtzia J.J.Bernhardi, 1833
Galinsoga parviflora subsp. semicalva Gray
Diplacus aurantiacus var. linearis (Benth.) D.J.Keil
Ipomopsis congesta var. frutescens (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Carex dioica L.
Genista racemosa (Marnock) Anon.
Dimorphotheca cuneata (Thunb.) DC.
Gazania Gaertn.
Ranunculus californicus var. ludovicianus (Greene) Davis
Cirsium scariosum var. robustum D.J.Keil
Achyranthes watsoni Standl.
Cephalanthera austinae (A.Gray) A.Heller
Carex praeceptorium Mack.
Lupinus lepidus var. culbertsonii (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Oreostemma peirsonii (Sharsm.) G.L.Nesom
Danthonia intermedia subsp. intermedia
Ammophila arenaria subsp. arenaria
Trifolium monanthum var. tenerum (Eastw.) Parish
Brayulinea densa (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Schult.) Small
Zinnia hybrida Hort.Par. ex Poir.
Betula lutea F.Michx.
Baccharis plummerae subsp. glabrata Hoover
Grindelia gymnospermoides (A.Gray) Ruffin
Heliomeris annua (M.E.Jones) Cockerell
Pandorea pandorana (Andr.) Steenis
Jacaranda ovalifolia R.Br.
Pandorea Spach
Gomphrena L.
Bauhinia galpinii N.E.Br.
Mentzelia multicaulis (Osterh.) J.Darl.
Myosurus alopecuroides Greene
Descurainia obtusa subsp. brevisiliqua Detling
Balsamorhiza macrolepis var. macrolepis
Salix drummondiana var. subcoerulea (Piper) C.R.Ball
Guillenia lemmonii (Greene) R.Buck
Thermopsis macrophylla var. semota Jeps.
Hieracium crepidispermum Fr.
Fremontodendron Coville
Sabulina pusilla (S.Watson) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Cenchrus americanus (L.) Morrone
Penstemon corymbosus Benth.
Azara dentata Ruiz & Pav.
Heteromorpha trifoliata (J.C.Wendl.) Eckl. & Zeyh.
Euonymus occidentale Nutt. ex Torr.
Chenopodium incisum var. neomexicanum Aellen
Gilia gilioides subsp. glutinosa (Benth.) H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Eriastrum pluriflorium var. sherman-hoytae (T.T.Craig) H.Mason
Gutierrezia linoides Greene
Quercus reticulata Bonpl.
Cuscuta macrocarpa G.Don ex Loudon
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. crinita (J.E.Adams ex Mc Minn) Gankin
Hakea suaveolens R.Br.
Calycadenia hooveri G.D.Carr
Setaria adhaerans (Forssk.) Chiov.
Astragalus subcinereus var. basalticus S.L.Welsh
Agrostis exarata subsp. exarata
Trillium sessile var. angustipetalum Torr.
Gentiana microcalyx Lemmon
Agrostis tandilensis (Kuntze) Parodi
Gutierrezia sarothrae var. sarothrae
Astragalus lentiginosus var. trumbullensis S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Centratherum punctatum Cass.
Franseria eriocentra A.Gray
Cleome lutea var. jonesii J.F.Macbr.
Cirsium arizonicum var. chellyense (R.J.Moore & Frankton) D.J.Keil
Franseria dumosa A.Gray
Cirsium chellyense R.J.Moore & Frankton
Franseria bipinnatifida Nutt.
Lupinus leucopsis J.Agardh
Blepharizonia plumosa subsp. viscida D.D.Keck
Bidens ferulifolia (Jacq.) DC.
Ambrosia aptera DC.
Phaseolus heterophyllus Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Centaurea ragusina L.
Digitaria didactyla Willd.
Salicornia ambigua Michx.
Elodea Michx.
Elymus farctus subsp. boreali-atlanticus (Simonet & Guin.) Melderis
Alyssum murale Waldst. & Kit.
Alyssum corsicum Duby
Collinsia franciscana Bioletti
Erigeron lassenianus var. deficiens Cronquist
Lupinus exaltatus Zucc.
Ceanothus ×flexilis McMinn
Salvia palmeri (A.Gray) Greene
Ceanothus ×serrulatus McMinn
Ceanothus ×mendocinensis McMinn
Ceanothus ×lorenzenii (Jeps.) McMinn
Arctostaphylos andersonii var. andersonii
Arctostaphylos crustacea var. rosei (Eastw.) McMinn
Youngia japonica subsp. japonica
Coreopsis cardaminefolia (DC.) Torr. & A.Gray
Gilia longiflora (Torr.) G.Don
Pyrrocoma racemosa var. pinetorum (D.D.Keck) Kartesz & Gandhi
Smilacina stellata var. sessilifolia (Nutt. ex Baker) L.F.Hend.
Paeoniaceae
Collinsia torreyi var. latifolia Newsom
Conicosia elongata (Haw.) Schwantes
Juncus saximontanus f. saximontanus
Aquilegia desolaticola S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Erigeron pringlei A.Gray
Juncus effusus var. bruneus Engelm.
Acokanthera G.Don
Viguiera quinqueradiata (Cav.) A.Gray
Antirrhinum vexillocalyculatum Kellogg
Antirrhinum subcordatum A.Gray
Artemisia vulgaris subsp. ludoviciana (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Streptanthus anceps (Payson) Hoover
Sabulina cismontana (Meinke & Zika) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Pseudobahia (A.Gray) Rydb.
Tagetes mandonii Sch.Bip. ex Klatt
Hypericum ×moseranum André
Deinandra corymbosa subsp. corymbosa
Coleonema pulchrum Hook.
Triodia eragrostoides Vasey & Scribn.
Atriplex jonesii Standl.
Schinus dependens Ortega
Rhus radicans L.
Hemizonia increscens subsp. foliosa (Hoover) Tanowitz
Centromadia parryi subsp. rudis (Greene) B.G.Baldwin
Lathyrus parviflorus S.Watson
Prunus angustifolia Marshall
Raphiolepis indica (L.) Lindl.
Eucalyptus radiata A.Cunn. ex DC.
Trachycarpus fortunei (Hook.) H.Wendl.
Casuarina stricta Aiton
Navarretia mitracarpa var. villosa Hoover
Eucalyptus melanophloia F.Muell.
Pteryxia terebinthina (Hook.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eriogonum heermannii subsp. floccosum (Munz) Munz
Eucalyptus orbifolia F.Muell.
Griselinia littoralis (Raoul) Raoul
Blepharocalyx salicifolius (Kunth) O.Berg
Annona cherimola Mill.
Eucalyptus lansdowneana F.Muell. & J.E.Br.
Eucalyptus wandoo Blakely
Heliomeris hispida (A.Gray) Cockerell
Angelica wheeleri S.Watson
Triodia mutica (Torr.) Scribn.
Helianthemum nummularium (L.) Mill.
Eucalyptus pruiniramis L.A.S.Johnson & K.D.Hill
Eucalyptus leptophylla F.Muell. ex Miq.
Erythronium citrinum var. roderickii Shevock & G.A.Allen
Carex incurviformis var. danaensis (Stacey) F.J.Herm.
Greenella arizonica A.Gray
Rhynchelytrum roseum (Nees) Stapf & C.E.Hubb.
Camissonia dominguez-escalantorum N.D.Atwood, L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh
Saxifraga bryophora A.Gray
Eriastrum densifolium subsp. patens Hoover
Amorpha L.
Vanclevea stylosa (Eastw.) Greene
Muhlenbergia wolfii (Vasey) Rydb.
Mucronea perfoliata var. opaca Hoover
Pelargonium graveolens (Thunb.) L'Hér.
Spiraea cantoniensis Lour.
Grevillea R.Br. ex Knight
Eremogone eastwoodiae var. adenophora (Kearney & Peebles) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Erythranthe sierrae N.S.Fraga
Eucalyptus dalrympleana Maiden
Eucalyptus microcorys F.Muell.
Malpighia L.
Silene stellata (L.) Aiton
Santolina virens Mill.
Gamochaeta calviceps (Fernald) Cabrera
Rosa bracteata J.C.Wendl.
Salix sessilifolia var. leucodendroides (Rowlee) C.K.Schneid.
Correa speciosa Donn ex H.C.Andrews
Eucalyptus dealbata A.Cunn. ex Schauer
Eucalyptus dunnii Maiden
Choisya mollis Standl.
Acuan cooleyi (Eaton) Britton & Rose
Albizzia julibrissin Durazz.
Hackelia amethystina Howell
Moraea collina Thunb.
Rosa stellata var. abyssa (A.M.Phillips) N.H.Holmgren
Dianthus caryophyllus L.
Cerastium nutans var. obtectum Kearney & Peebles
Pelargonium fragrans Willd.
Eremothera (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Chylismia (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Raim.
Minuartia cismontana Meinke & Zika
Diplacus compactus (D.M.Thomps.) G.L.Nesom
Tetraneuris verdiensis R.A.Denham & B.L.Turner
Eriogonum ×blissianum Mason
Gladiolus tristis L.
Freesia armstrongii W.Watson
Lotus scoparius f. prostratus Hoover
Berlandiera lyrata var. lyrata
Bidens bipinnata L.
Salpichroa rhomboidea (Gillies & Hook.) Miers
Oxybasis chenopodioides (L.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Lotus biolettii var. spiralis Hoover
Anacharis canadensis (Michx.) Planch.
Diplacus aurantiacus subsp. australis (McMinn) R.M.Beeks
Streptanthus parryi Greene
Carduus cinereus M.Bieb.
Trifolium longipes subsp. pygmaeum (A.Gray) J.M.Gillett
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. minima (Eastw.) Hrusa
Streptanthus inflatus (S.Watson) Greene
Ilex cornuta var. burfordii De France
Acleisanthes diffusa (A.Gray) R.A.Levin
Porophyllum pygmaeum D.J.Keil & Morefield
Salsola kali subsp. tenuifolia Tausch
Erigeron inornatus var. keilii G.L.Nesom
Myosurus minimus var. minimus
Muhlenbergia schreberi J.F.Gmel.
Scolymus hispanicus L.
Muhlenbergia paniculata (Nuttall) Columbus
Oxybasis glauca subsp. glauca
Sporobolus alopecuroides (Piller & Mitterp.) P.M.Peterson
Oxybasis rubra (L.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Erigeron inornatus var. calidipetris G.L.Nesom
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. californica (DC.) Saroyan
Origanum majorana L.
Kallstroemia hirsutissima Vail ex Small
Verbena lasiostachys var. abramsii (Moldenke) Jeps.
Eriogonum giganteum subsp. compactum (Dunkle) Munz
Rumex maritimus var. persicarioides (L.) R.S.Mitch.
Blattaria Mill.
Heteropogon Pers.
Limonia L.
Xanthophyllum Roxb.
Goodeniaceae
Corethrogyne californica DC.
Vicia micrantha Torr. & A.Gray
Acacia rosei Standl.
Acacia angustissima var. filicioides (Cav.) Kuntze
Acacia californica Brandegee
Acacia hartwegii Benth.
Acacia angustissima var. angustissima
Acacia vernicosa Standl.
Acacia tequilana S.Watson
Datura ceratocaula Ortega
Calliandra schottii Torr. ex S.Watson
Atriplex elegans subsp. elegans
Chamaesyce pediculifera (Engelm.) Rose & Standl.
Tigridia pavonia (L.f.) DC.
Trichocentrum cebolleta (Jacq.) M.W.Chase & N.H.Williams
Chrysophyllum cainito L.
Ribes cereum var. pedicellare A.Gray
Petrosedum sediforme (Jacq.) Grulich
Manilkara zapota (L.) P.Royen
Primula capillaris N.H.Holmgren & A.H.Holmgren
Wisteria floribunda (Willd.) DC.
Eriocoma occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Ruellia leucantha Brandegee
Acer pensylvanicum L.
Conicosia pugioniformis subsp. muirii (N.E.Br.) Ihlenf. & Gerbaulet
Populus longifolia Fisch. ex Loudon
Sclerocactus schlesseri K.D.Heil & S.L.Welsh
Aphyllon robbinsii (Heckard) A.C.Schneid.
Sanguisorba minor subsp. balearica (Bourg. ex Nyman) Mu
Viola langsdorffii Fisch. ex DC.
Pulsatilla vulgaris Mill.
Tetradymia canescens var. thorneae N.D.Atwood, S.L.Welsh & L.C.Higgins
Xylorhiza glabriuscula Nutt.
Ceanothus griseus (Trel.) Mc Minn
Rumex acetosella subsp. acetosella
Bauhinia pringlei S.Watson
Astragalus sinuatus Piper
Streptanthus howellii S.Watson
Erigeron klamathensis (G.L.Nesom) G.L.Nesom
Erythranthe filicifolia (Sexton, K.G.Ferris & Schoenig) G.L.Nesom
Packera candidissima (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Thalictrum occidentale var. occidentale
Hypericum grandifolium Choisy
Cyperus tenerrimus J.Presl & C.Presl
Narcissus pseudonarcissus subsp. pseudonarcissus
Farfugium japonicum var. giganteum (Siebold & Zucc.) Kitam.
Collinsia sparsiflora var. arvensis (Greene) Jeps.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. covillei (Small) Munz & Reveal
Prunus salicina Lindl.
Cotoneaster fangianus T.T.Yu
Pediocactus winkleri K.D.Heil
Penstemon dolius M.E.Jones
Geranium endressii J.Gay
Rosa hugonis Hemsl.
Sanguisorba minor subsp. minor
Opuntia canada Griffiths
Dictyanthus sepicola (W.D.Stevens) W.D.Stevens
Cestrum fasciculatum (Schltdl.) Miers
Palmerella debilis subsp. debilis
Oenothera berlandieri (Spach) Walp.
Echinochloa crus-galli var. zelayensis (Kunth) Hitchc.
Cynodon dactylon var. longiglumis Caro & E.A.Sánchez
Opopanax horridus Miq. ex Dippel
Digitaria horizontalis Willd.
Oplismenus P.Beauv.
Machaeranthera canescens var. aristata (Eastw.) B.L.Turner
Brassica geniculata (Desf.) Benth.
Clarkia rubicunda (Lindl.) H.F.Lewis & M.R.Lewis
Eritrichium holopterum A.Gray
Zostera americana Hartog
Oplismenus affinis Schult.
Machaeranthera frutescens (S.Watson) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Hoffmannseggia Cav.
Lomatium angustatum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) H.St.John
Oxytropis campestris var. gracilis (A.Nelson) Barneby
Vachellia nilotica (L.) P.J.H.Hurter & Mabb.
Campanula latifolia L.
Andromeda polifolia var. glaucophylla (Link) DC.
Calochortus umpquaensis subsp. flavicomus Callahan
Capparis spinosa L.
Sairocarpus cornutus (Benth.) D.A.Sutton
Oxalis stricta var. rufa (Small) Farw.
Lomatium roneorum Darrach
Sphaeralcea angustifolia subsp. lobata (Wooton) Kearney
Monardella hypoleuca A.Gray
Erysimum occidentale (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Penstemon xylus A.Nelson
Brickelliastrum fendleri (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Cylindropuntia whipplei subsp. enodis (Peebles) M.A.Baker
Helleborus foetidus L.
Amaranthus tricolor L.
Narcissus hispanicus Willd. ex Willk. & Lange, 1861
Eriogonum ripleyi Howell
Crossosoma Nutt.
Haplopappus propinquus S.F.Blake
Condalia globosa subsp. globosa
Muhlenbergia arenacea (Buckley) Hitchc.
Camissonia proavita Raven
Festuca ovina var. brevifolia S.Watson
Casuarina obesa Miq.
Agastache pallida var. pallida
Galium sparsiflorum subsp. glabrius Dempster & Stebbins
Morkillia mexicana (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) Rose & Painter
Xanthosoma wendlandii (Schott) Schott
Cassia tora L.
Polygala tenuifolia Willd.
Panax ginseng C.A.Mey.
Actinidia deliciosa (Chev.) C.F.Liang & A.R.Ferguson
Chlorophora tinctoria (L.) Gaudich. ex Benth. & Hook.f.
Anoda reticulata S.Watson
Platanthera brevifolia (Greene) Kraenzl.
Macrosiphonia Müll.Arg.
Arenaria propinqua Richardson
Penstemon procerus var. brachyanthus (Pennell) Cronquist
Echinochloa crus-galli subsp. crus-galli
Boswellia sacra Flück.
Dalea leucostachya A.Gray
Malva venosa Thunb.
Picris L.
Pappophorum philippianum Parodi
Verbena halei Small
Randia laevigata Standl.
Hemizonia martirensis D.D.Keck
Pectis filipes var. filipes
Dodonaea angustifolia L.fil.
Tillandsia mooreana L.B.Sm.
Polygonum sachalinense F.Schmidt
Abronia umbellata subsp. variabilis (Standl.) Munz
Eupatorium purpureum L.
Larrea Cav.
Dioscorea bulbifera L.
Humulus lupulus var. lupuloides E.Small
Alpinia globosa (Lour.) Horan.
Desmodium styracifolium (Osbeck) Merr.
Rumex maritimus subsp. fueginus (Phil.) Dusén
Datisca glomerata (C.Presl) Benth. & Hook.
Dryopetalon runcinatum var. laxiflorum Rollins
Waltheria L.
Plumbago L.
Encelia resinosa Brandegee
Cyperus wrightii Britton
Rosa woodsii subsp. puberulenta (Rydb.) W.H.Lewis & Ertter
Lens Mill.
Plantago psyllium L.
Barosma betulina Bartl. & H.L.Wendl.
Eleutherococcus senticosus (Rupr. & Maxim.) Maxim.
Capparis flexuosa (L.) L.
Mimulus aurantiacus subsp. australis Munz
Wislizenia Engelm.
Saxifragaceae
Styrax officinalis var. californicus (Torr.) Rehder
Piper futokadsura Siebold
Oryza L.
Urtica L.
Paeonia officinalis L.
Chamaesyce Rafinesque, 1817
Elymus trachycaulus (Link) Gould
Macromeria viridiflora DC.
Chorizanthe procumbens var. procumbens
Prunus ferruginea (Ser.) Steud.
Quercus tarahumara Spellenb., J.D.Bacon & Breedlove
Lupinus confusus Rose
Valeriana apiifolia A.Gray
Passiflora suberosa subsp. litoralis (Kunth) Port.-Utl. ex M.A.M.Azevedo, Baumgratz & Gonç.-Estev.
Cecropia peltata L.
Tetramerium scabrum Torr. ex Happ
Clinopodium L.
Linanthastrum nuttallii (A.Gray) Ewan
Passiflora foetida var. gossypiifolia (Desv. ex Ham.) Mast.
Leptosyne DC.
Leucospermum R.Br.
Orobanche aegyptiaca Pers.
Bulbostylis junciformis (Kunth) C.B.Clarke
Luffa aegyptiaca Mill.
Antirrhinum speciosum (Nutt.) A.Gray
Quercus durifolia Seemen, 1900
Lupinus leucophyllus subsp. tenuispicus (A.Nelson) C.P.Sm.
Polygonatum hookeri Baker
Benincasa hispida (Thunb.) Cogn.
Polygonatum odoratum (Mill.) Druce
Leonurus heterophyllus Sweet
Triumfetta chihuahuensis Standl.
Senna apiculata (M.Martens & Galeotti) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Lopezia gracilis S.Watson
Alopecurus geniculatus var. aristulatus (Michx.) Torr.
Critonia quadrangularis (DC.) R.King & H.Rob.
Melica imperfecta var. flexuosa Bol.
Origanum vulgare subsp. vulgare
Polemonium foliosissimum var. flavum (Greene) Anway
Opuntia tomentosa Salm-Dyck
Limnanthes alba subsp. gracilis (Howell) Morin
Pachystegia insignis (Hook.fil.) Cheeseman
Nardus stricta L.
Antennaria soliceps S.F.Blake
Dimorphotheca pluvialis (L.) Moench
Carex lacustris Willd.
Rosa palustris Marshall
Ypsilandra thibetica Franch.
Malaxis novogaliciana R.González ex McVaugh
Navarretia leucocephala subsp. pauciflora (H.Mason) A.G.Day
Oxalis eckloniana C.Presl
Cleome gynandra L.
Chrysopsis villosa (Pursh) Nutt. ex Hook.
Plagiobothrys austinae (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Salvia emaciata Epling
Camissonia integrifolia Raven
Astragalus cimae var. sufflatus Barneby
Romulea flava (Lam.) M.P.de Vos
Pilosella piloselloides (Vill.) Soják
Raphanus raphanistrum subsp. raphanistrum
Boykinia intermedia (Piper) G.N.Jones
Guaiacum angustifolium Engelm.
Polygala fruticosa P.J.Bergius
Boechera serpenticola Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Valeriana columbiana Piper
Eucalyptus albopurpurea (Boomsma) D.Nicolle
Boechera nevadensis (Tidestr.) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Lippia fastigiata Brandegee
Ericameria arizonica R.P.Roberts, Urbatsch & J.L.Anderson
Taraxacum duplidentifrons Dahlst.
Fritillaria imperialis L.
Commelina Plum. ex L.
Oenothera stricta subsp. stricta
Santolina rosmarinifolia L.
Podanthus ovatifolius Lag.
Arcteranthis cooleyae (Vasey & Rose) Greene
Brachiaria (Trin.) Griseb.
Dahlia tenuicaulis P.D.Sørensen
Rhinanthus minor subsp. minor
Hymenoxys Cass.
Bulbostylis tenuifolia (Rudge) J.F.Macbr.
Penstemon cedrosensis Kellogg
Prosartes hookeri var. oregana (S.Watson) Kartesz
Senecio serranus Zardini
Leucelene Greene
Chylismia scapoidea (Torr. & A.Gray) Small
Platyschkuhria integrifolia var. desertorum (M.E.Jones) Ellison
Asteracantha Nees
Sporobolus nealleyi Vasey
Penstemon campanulatus subsp. chihuahuensis Straw
Calamagrostis canadensis var. pallida (Vasey & Scribn.) Stebbins
Ipomoea leucantha Jacq.
Cinna L.
Lycium californicum Nutt.
Linanthus androsaceus subsp. micranthus (Steud. ex Benth.) H.Mason
Thlaspi montanum var. siskiyouense P.K.Holmgren
Lourteigia stoechadifolia (L.fil.) R.King & H.Rob.
Muhlenbergia expansa (Poir.) Trin.
Palafoxia linearis var. leucophylla I.M.Johnst.
Oplismenus hirtellus (L.) P.Beauv.
Paspalum virletii E.Fourn.
Xenophyllum Funk
Apera Adans.
Agrostis subrepens (Hitchc.) Hitchc.
Lupinus salticola Eastw.
Franseria ilicifolia A.Gray
Crepis acuminata subsp. acuminata
Cercocarpus douglasii Rydb.
Cirsium novoleonense G.L.Nesom
Malva dendromorpha M.F.Ray
Chloris submutica Kunth
Franseria divaricata Brandegee
Roldana heterogama (Benth.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Orthocarpus lithospermoides Benth.
Bahia absinthifolia var. absinthifolia
Muhlenbergia crispiseta Hitchc.
Astragalus scariosus Benth.
Melilotus luteus Gueldenst.
Pedicularis scopulorum A.Gray
Madia valida Brandegee
Ruellia humilis Nutt.
Viola pluviae Marcussen, H.E.Ballard & Blaxland
Notoptera Urb.
Hamelia xorullensis Kunth
Ageratina sandersii B.L.Turner
Dyssodia speciosa A.Gray
Schkuhria pinnata var. virgata (La Llave & Lex.) Heiser
Tagetes tenuifolia Cav.
Chamomilla recutita (L.) Rauschert
Roldana tepopana (B.L.Turner) B.L.Turner
Erigeron basaseachensis G.L.Nesom
Erigeron wislizenii (A.Gray) Greene
Sida alamosana S.Watson
Symphoricarpos palmeri G.N.Jones
Lamarckia Moench
Bidens schaffneri (A.Gray) Sherff
Chamaesyce hirta (L.) Millsp.
Chamaesyce platysperma (Engelm. ex S.Watson) Shinners
Chamaesyce tomentulosa (S.Watson) Millsp.
Cercidium Tul.
Glandularia bipinnatifida var. latilobata (L.M.Perry) B.L.Turner
Lantana urticifolia Mill.
Tragia pacifica McVaugh
Cyrtocarpa Kunth
Seymeria bipinnatisecta Seem.
Conopholis alpina var. mexicana (Gray ex S.Watson) Haynes
Psittacanthus schiedeanus (Cham. & Schltdl.) Blume
Echeandia mexicana Cruden
Hymenocallis Salisb.
Brickellia veronicifolia (Kunth) A.Gray
Chromolaena ovaliflora (Hook. & Arn.) R.King & H.Rob.
Conoclinium mayfieldii T.F.Patt.
Koanophyllon monanthum (Sch.Bip.) Ayers & B.L.Turner
Stevia serrata var. serrata
Bidens mollifolia Sherff
Bidens odorata var. odorata
Perymenium buphthalmoides DC.
Perymenium stenophyllum S.F.Blake
Tithonia calva var. lancifolia (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) McVaugh
Senecio sandersii B.L.Turner
Machaeranthera pinnatifida var. goodingii (A.Nelson) B.L.Turner & R.L.Hartm.
Pseudognaphalium arizonicum (A.Gray) Anderb.
Pseudognaphalium bicolor (Bioletti) Anderb.
Abutilon fruticosum Guill. & Perr.
Althaea rosea (L.) Cav.
Pseudognaphalium pacificum G.L.Nesom
Pseudognaphalium viscosum (Kunth) Anderb.
Helianthemum glomeratum (Lag.) Lag. ex Dunal
Garrya laurifolia subsp. laurifolia
Agastache pallida var. coriacea R.W.Sanders
Setaria leucophylla D.Dietr.
Sorghum vulgare Pers.
Eriogonum molestum var. davidsonii (Greene) Jeps.
Chenopodium graveolens Willd.
Lotus repens (G.Don) Sessé & Moc. ex Standl. & Steyerm.
Lotus leucophaeus Greene
Ambrosia canescens A.Gray
Desmodium scorpiurus (Sw.) Poir., 1819
Polygala glochidata Kunth
Quercus urbani Trel.
Phytolacca rivinoides Kunth & Bouché
Delphinium wislizenii Engelm.
Cenchrus L.
Telosiphonia hesperia (I.M.Johnst.) Henrickson
Sida glutinosa Roxb.
Zanthoxylum fagara subsp. fagara
Ceanothus fendleri var. venosus Trel.
Ageratina lemmonii (B.L.Rob.) R.King & H.Rob.
Acleisanthes acutifolia Standl.
Wedelia chihuahuana B.L.Turner
Senecio ammophilus Greene
Erigeron wislizeni var. purpurascens (Greenm.) G.L.Nesom
Sicyos laciniatus L.
Chamaesyce florida (Engelm.) Millsp.
Cosmos parviflorus (Jacq.) Kunth, 1818
Lagascea decipiens var. glandulosa (Fernald) Stuessy
Machaeranthera coulteri var. arida (Turner & Horne) B.L.Turner
Magnolia pacifica Vazquez
Acacia rigidula Benth.
Asterohyptis seemannii (A.Gray) Epling
Indigofera trita L.f.
Lycium berlandieri var. peninsulare C.L.Hitchc.
Mimosa gentryi Barneby
Salvia greggii A.Gray
Cerastium barberi B.L.Rob.
Linum australe var. glandulosum C.M.Rogers
Zornia J.F.Gmel.
Ageratina hyssopina (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Peperomia jaliscana S.Watson
Vernonia vernonioides (A.Gray) Bacig.
Hymenothrix palmeri A.Gray
Porophyllum coloratum var. coloratum
Lactuca intybacea Jacq. ex Murray, 1784
Pinaropappus pooleanus B.L.Turner
Erigeron coronarius var. coronarius
Erigeron wislizeni var. wislizeni
Gutierrezia conoidea (Hemsl.) M.A.Lane
Anoda succulenta Fryxell
Hibiscus phoeniceus Jacq.
Panicum fasciculatum Sw.
Corchorus orinocensis Kunth
Adelia barbinervis Cham. & Schltdl.
Argythamnia guatemalensis Müll.Arg.
Chamaesyce petrina (S.Watson) Millsp.
Bidens glaucescens Greene
Delilia biflora (L.) Kuntze
Montanoa karwinski K.Koch
Pseudognaphalium stereovirens G.L.Nesom
Capparaceae
Sarcostemma cynanchoides var. hartwegii (R.W.Holm) Shinners
Helianthemum scoparium Nutt.
Eryngium fluitans M.E.Jones
Sanicula liberta Cham. & Schltdl.
Sedum mellitulum Rose
Tillaea erecta Hook. & Arn.
Quercus endlichiana Trel.
Sorghastrum nudipes Nash
Salix humboldtiana Willd.
Scirpus olneyi A.Gray
Antirrhinum kingii var. watsonii (Vasey & Rose) Munz
Lotus humilis Greene
Brickellia rhomboidea Greene
Stevia caracasana DC.
Bebbia juncea var. atriplicifolia I.M.Johnst.
Helianthemum pringlei S.Watson
Tilia americana var. mexicana (Schltdl.) Hardin
Aphananthe monoica (Hemsl.) Leroy
Polygala amphothrix S.F.Blake
Salvia farinacea var. farinacea
Delphinium tenuisectum Greene
Ranunculus forreri Greene
Telosiphonia brachysiphon (Torr.) Henrickson
Vigna strobilophora B.L.Rob.
Aeschynomene L.
Pediomelum palmeri (Ockendon) J.W.Grimes ex Gandhi
Gaultheria glaucifolia Hemsl.
Cirsium wrightii A.Gray
Ageratina thyrsiflora (Greene) R.King & H.Rob.
Ericameria nauseosa var. arta (A.Nelson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Lonicera denudata Davidson & Moxley
Siphonoglossa incerta (Brandegee) Hilsenb.
Orobanche grayana var. feudgei Munz
Mecardonia Ruiz & Pav.
Mimulus glabratus Kunth
Koanophyllon palmeri var. palmeri
Tauschia edulis (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Trachypogon montufarii (Kunth) Nees
Dalea seemanni S.Watson
Populus monticola Brandegee
Astragalus scalaris S.Watson
Aeschynomene americana L.
Zinnia angustifolia var. angustifolia
Zinnia violacea Cav.
Perityle vaseyi Coult.
Pinaropappus roseus var. roseus
Baccharis heterophylla Kunth
Conyza coronopifolia Kunth
Erigeron jenkinsii G.L.Nesom
Cyclanthera Schrad.
Microsechium Naudin
Ageratella microphylla var. sonorana B.L.Turner
Triumfetta heliocarpoides Bullock
Chamaesyce bartolomaei (Greene) Millsp.
Chamaesyce thymifolia (L.) Millsp.
Cnidoscolus tepiquensis (Costantin & Gall.) McVaugh
Allionia incarnata var. nudata (Standl.) Munz
Russelia ternifolia Kunth
Brickellia lewisii B.L.Turner
Stevia scabrella var. venosa (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Bidens bigelovii var. bigelovii
Bidens odorata var. rosea (Sch.Bip.) Melchert
Perymenium basaseachicanum B.L.Turner
Perymenium buphthalmoides var. sonoranum B.L.Turner
Roldana carlomasonii (B.L.Turner & T.M.Barkley) C.Jeffrey
Stevia ovata Willd.
Erigeron podophyllus G.L.Nesom
Cercocarpus montanus var. paucidentatus (S.Watson) F.L.Martin
Sideroxylon angustifolium Standl.
Lechea tripetala (Moc. & Sessé) Britton
Gaura coccinea Nutt.
Eryngium beecheyanum Hook. & Arn.
Agastache pringlei var. pringlei
Fendlerella utahensis var. cymosa (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Quercus incarnata f. longa Trel.
Ostrya virginiana subsp. virginiana
Echinocereus scheeri (Salm-Dyck) Scheer
Pectis stenophylla var. stenophylla
Desmodium prostratum Brandegee
Spergularia mexicana Hemsl.
Salvia prasiifolia Benth.
Stachys grahamii Benth.
Spigelia coelostylioides K.Gould
Mirabilis longiflora var. longiflora
Galium mexicanum subsp. mexicanum
Lepidium sordidum A.Gray
Loeselia glandulosa subsp. glandulosa
Mammillaria pottsii Scheer ex Salm-Dyck
Acalypha L.
Merremia platyphylla (Fernald) O'Donell
Argythamnia adenophora A.Gray
Senna mollissima (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Penstemon apateticus Straw
Koanophyllon peninsularis (Brandegee) B.L.Turner, 1997
Alloispermum palmeri var. lancifolium (Urbatsch & B.L.Turner) C.F.Fernández & L.Urb.
Krameria pauciflora Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Astragalus catalinensis Nutt.
Crusea longiflora (Roem. & Schult.) W.R.Anderson
Achillea millefolium var. pacifica (Rydb.) G.N.Jones
Cirsium ehrenbergii Sch.Bip.
Hieracium abscissum Less.
Gochnatia hypoleuca (DC.) A.Gray
Archibaccharis serratifolia (Kunth) S.F.Blake
Briquetia sonorae Fryxell
Pennisetum durum Beal
Lonicera pilosa (Kunth) Spreng.
Cyclanthera micrantha Cogn., 1895
Lobelia knoblochii T.J.Ayers
Muhlenbergia shepherdii (Vasey) Swallen
Elytraria squamosa (Jacq.) Lindau
Chamaesyce incerta (Brandegee) Millsp.
Chamaesyce trachysperma (Engelm.) Millsp.
Seymeria falcata var. falcata
Hesperaloe nocturna Gentry
Brickellia lemmonii var. lemmonii
Brickellia subuligera (Schauer) B.L.Turner
Koanophyllon sinaloense B.L.Turner
Gamochaeta americana (Mill.) Wedd.
Eruca vesicaria var. sativa (Mill.) Thell.
Lepidium austrinum Small
Cleome jonesii (J.F.Macbr.) Tidestr.
Adenostoma Hook. & Arn.
Potentilla townsendii Rydb.
Acacia greggii var. greggii
Hyptis stellulata Benth.
Amaranthus dubius Mart. ex Thell.
Eleocharis caribaea (Rottb.) S.F.Blake
Carex endlichii Kük.
Pseudobombax palmeri (S.Watson) Dugand
Lycium berlandieri var. longistylum C.L.Hitchc.
Amyris balsamifera L.
Silene chihuahuensis Standl.
Pithecellobium undulatum (Britton & Rose) Gentry
Lotus neomexicanus Greene
Muhlenbergia mundula I.M.Johnst.
Arracacia compacta Rose
Calochortus exilis Painter
Gaura mutabilis Cav.
Leucaena macrophylla Benth.
Cissus sicyoides L.
Platymiscium Vogel
Xylococcus Nutt.
Sisyrinchium scabrum Schltdl. & Cham.
Yucca carnerosana (Trel.) McKelvey
Laennecia filaginoides DC.
Erigeron fraternus var. sororis G.L.Nesom
Schizachyrium sanguineum var. oligostachyum (Chapm.) S.L.Hatch
Muhlenbergia parviglumis Vasey
Argythamnia brandegeei var. brandegeei
Orthocarpus purpurascens var. typicus D.D.Keck
Parietaria pensylvanica var. obtusa (Rydb. ex Small) Shinners
Acacia angustissima var. hirta (Nutt.) B.L.Rob.
Bumelia occidentalis Hemsl.
Calylophus toumeyi (Small) Towner
Amicia zygomeris DC.
Acacia pennatula (Schltdl. & Cham.) Benth.
Dyssodia cancellata (Cass.) A.Gray
Pectis stenophylla var. puberula (Greenm.) D.J.Keil
Hieracium pringlei A.Gray
Pinaropappus junceus A.Gray
Acourtia dieringeri L.Cabrera
Laennecia chihuahuana G.L.Nesom
Erigeron delphinifolius Willd.
Erigeron eruptens G.L.Nesom
Batesimalva pulchella Fryxell
Ayenia palmeri S.Watson, 1886
Gouania polygama (Jacq.) Urb.
Adelia virgata Brandegee
Eremocarpus Benth.
Euphorbia graminea var. novogaliciana McVaugh
Euphorbia maysillesii McVaugh
Mimulus pallens Greene
Stevia lemmoni var. lemmoni
Acmella radicans (Jacq.) R.K.Jansen
Baltimora geminata (Brandegee) Stuessy
Bidens rostrata Melchert
Encelia virginensis var. actonii (Elmer) B.L.Turner
Lagascea helianthifolia var. helianthifolia
Lagascea helianthifolia var. levior (B.L.Rob.) B.L.Rob.
Machaeranthera incisifolia (I.M.Johnst.) G.L.Nesom
Triumfetta goldmanii Rose
Stipa pringlei Scribn., 1892
Sporobolus splendens Swallen
Lotus nudatus (Greene) Greene
Oxalis hernandezii DC.
Thamnosma texana f. purpurea (Wooton & Standl.) Lundell
Janusia linearis Wiggins
Salvia verecunda Epling ex M.E.Jones, 1933
Ranunculus petiolaris var. arsenei (Benson) T.Duncan
Ipomoea cholulensis Kunth
Forsellesia spinescens (A.Gray) Greene
Cuphea inflata S.A.Graham
Chamaesyce velleriflora (Klotzsch & Garcke) Millsp.
Trifolium mucronatum subsp. mucronatum
Hieracium schultzii Fr.
Dyssodia aurea (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Escobedia crassipes Pennell
Conzattia multiflora (B.L.Rob.) Standl.
Gaura calcicola Raven & D.P.Greg.
Drymaria carinata Brandegee
Populus mexicana Wesm. ex A.DC.
Muhlenbergia pulcherrima Scribn., 1896
Houstonia spellenbergii (G.L.Nesom & Vorobik) Terrell
Dyssodia porophylla (Cav.) Cav.
Perityle gentryi A.M.Powell
Roldana pennellii H.Rob. & Brettell
Erigeron dactyloides (Greenm.) G.L.Nesom
Anoda speciosa Fryxell
Gouinia virgata (J.Presl) Scribn.
Pappophorum subbulbosum Arechav.
Tilia caroliniana Mill.
Plantago erecta subsp. rigidior Pilg.
Mirabilis viscosa Cav.
Cassia biflora L.
Cassia emarginata L.
Chamaecrista hispidula (Vahl) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Spiranthes eriophora B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Stevia origanoides Kunth
Bidens cornuta Sherff
Jaegeria glabra (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Koanophyllon palmeri var. tonsum B.L.Rob.
Bidens alba var. radiata (Sch.Bip.) Ballard ex Melchert, 1975
Machaeranthera coulteri (A.Gray) B.L.Turner & Horne
Acacia wrightii Benth.
Passiflora quercetorum Killip
Tripsacum dactyloides (L.) L.
Tamarix juniperina Bunge
Hyptis pectinata (L.) Poit.
Lithospermum obovatum J.F.Macbr.
Brongniartia lunata Rose
Brachiaria reptans (L.) C.A.Gardner & C.E.Hubb.
Sideroxylon persimile (Hemsl.) T.D.Penn.
Halenia Borkh.
Thalictrum pringlei S.Watson
Arenaria lanuginosa var. lanuginosa
Caesalpinia gracilis Hemsl.
Bunchosia Rich. ex Juss.
Potentilla subgorodkovii Jurtzev
Valeriana capitata Link
Gentianopsis detonsa (Rottb.) Ma
Lygodesmia texana (Torr. & A.Gray) Greene ex Small
Fraxinus pennsylvanica var. subintegerrima (Vahl) Fernald
Cistus ×hybridus Pourr.
Eremogone congesta var. lithophila (Rydb.) Dorn
Muscari Mill.
Cascabela thevetioides (Kunth) Lippold
Navarretia aeroides L.A.Johnson & D.Gowen
Brassica oleracea var. acephala Linnaeus, 1753
Frangula purshiana subsp. ultramafica Sawyer & S.W.Edwards
Frasera albicaulis var. albicaulis
Zapoteca formosa subsp. schottii (Torr. ex S.Watson) H.M.Hern.
Opuntia blakeana Rose
Koanophyllon palmeri (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Sagittaria platyphylla (Engelm.) J.G.Sm.
Sclerocactus blainei S.L.Welsh & K.H.Thorne
Eremogone hookeri (Nutt. ex T. & G.) W.A.Weber
Cirsium hydrophilum (Greene) Jeps.
Ceanothus tomentosus var. tomentosus
Rosa woodsii subsp. arizonica (Rydb.) W.H.Lewis & Ertter
Epilobium howellii Hoch
Veronica peregrina subsp. peregrina
Cordylanthus brunneus (Jeps.) Pennell
Plectritis anomala (A.Gray) Suksd.
Phyllospadix iwatensis Makino
Asparagus asparagoides (L.) W.Wight
Taraxacum F.H.Wigg.
Tanacetum L.
Prunella L.
Cyperus hochstetteri Nees ex Krauss
Cyperus incompletus (Jacq.) Link
Sesbania exaltata (Raf.) Cory
Ranunculus trichophyllus Chaix ex Vill.
Bulbostylis juncoides (Vahl) Kük. ex Osten
Cyperus flavens Pall.
Ranunculus hydrocharoides var. stolonifer (Hemsl.) L.D.Benson
Pycreus polystachyos (Rottb.) P.Beauv.
Pycreus lanceolatus (Poir.) C.B.Clarke
Pycreus niger (Ruiz & Pav.) Cufod.
Pycreus bipartitus (Torr.) C.B.Clarke
Cyperus canus J.Presl & C.Presl
Fimbristylis simplex S.T.Blake
Polygonum punctatum var. ellipticum Fassett
Fimbristylis puberula (Michx.) Vahl
Eriocaulon bilobatum Morong
Inga vera subsp. eriocarpa (Benth.) J.León
Pycreus fugax (Liebm.) C.D.Adams
Potamogeton pusillus subsp. pusillus
Gratiola oresbia B.L.Rob.
Eleocharis densa Benth.
Navarretia atractyloides var. hamata (Greene) Jeps.
Cyperus paniculatus Rottb.
Torulinium odoratum (L.) S.S.Hooper
Cyperus ligularis L.
Triglochin mexicana Kunth
Lilaeopsis schaffneriana subsp. schaffneriana
Scirpus cernuus subsp. californicus (Torr.) Thorne
Scirpus carinatus Sm.
Bacopa monnieri (L.) Wettst.
Cyperus articulatus L.
Rhynchospora kunthii Nees ex Kunth
Juncus liebmannii var. liebmannii
Crassula viridis (S.Watson) M.Bywater & Wickens
Pycreus flavicomus (Michx.) C.D.Adams
Pycreus flavescens (L.) P.Beauv. ex Rchb.
Polygonum segetum Kunth
Fimbristylis decipiens Kral
Myriophyllum exalbescens Fernald
Nymphaea elegans Hook.
Hydrocotyle verticillata var. triradiata (A.Rich.) Fernald
Sesuvium L.
Sesuvium sessile Pers.
Trifolium wormskioldii var. ortegae (Greene) Barneby
Cuphea caeciliae Koehne
Eriogonum gracile var. effusum Torr. & A.Gray
Lachnostoma arizonicum A.Gray
Pithecellobium oblongum Benth.
Lupinus carnosulus Greene
Polemonium brandegeei (A.Gray) Greene
Arnica caespitosa A.Nelson
Rosa banksiana C.Abel
Grindelia setulifera Wooton & Standl.
Fagonia chilensis Hooker & Arn.
Castilleja galeata A.Nelson
Potamogeton ×perplexus A.Benn.
Lepidium virginicum var. menziesii Thell., 1906
Harpephyllum caffrum Bernh.
Penstemon glaber var. alpinus (Torr.) A.Gray
Lychnis nuda S.Watson
Arabis fernaldiana Rollins
Eriogonum commixtum Greene
Lithospermum latifolium Michx.
Antennaria oblanceolata Rydb.
Hymenoxys floribunda (A.Gray) Cockerell
Astragalus asotinensis Björk & Fishbein
Stachys palustris var. pilosa (Nutt.) Fernald
Geranium toquimense A.H.Holmgren & N.H.Holmgren
Echinocactus horizonthalonius Lem.
Quercus sinuata Walter
Malvastrum thurberi A.Gray
Synthyris dissecta Rydb.
Rhamnus betulifolia var. obovata Kearney & Peebles
Mirabilis angustifolia (Nutt.) MacMill.
Wedelia hispida Kunth
Cordylanthus hispidus Pennell
Achnatherum stillmanii (Bol.) Barkworth
Astragalus ophiogenes Barneby
Peucedanum tomentosum Benth.
Rubus nutkanus Moc. ex Ser.
Penstemon cinerascens Greene
Salix exigua var. pedicellata (Andersson) Cronquist
Penstemon navajoa N.H.Holmgren
Orthocarpus purpurascens var. palmeri A.Gray
Gentianopsis barbellata (Engelm.) Iltis
Penstemon exsertus A.Nelson
Lilaeopsis schaffneriana subsp. recurva (A.W.Hill) Affolter
Eriogonum idahoense Rydb.
Amelanchier gracilis A.Heller
Clematis hirsutissima var. arizonica (A.Heller) R.O.Erickson
Opuntia bigelovii var. bigelovii
Mitella stauropetala var. stenopetala (Piper) Rosend.
Saxifraga hirculus L.
Zigadenus porrifolius Greene
Brodiaea coronaria var. kernensis Hoover
Amsinckia verna Suksd.
Leptodactylon lilacinum Greene ex Brand
Plantago durvillei subsp. subnuda (Pilg.) Pilg.
Helianthus microcephalus Torr. & A.Gray
Antennaria howellii subsp. canadensis (Greene) R.J.Bayer
Euphorbia robusta var. interioris Norton
Astragalus feensis M.E.Jones
Polygonum erectum L.
Lupinus leucophyllus var. retrorsus (L.F.Hend.) C.P.Sm.
Penstemon assurgens D.D.Keck
Hymenoclea sandersonii (S.L.Welsh) N.H.Holmgren
Arabis koehleri T.J.Howell
Penstemon yampaensis Penland
Mimosa galeottii Benth.
Phlox longifolia subsp. compacta (Brand) Wherry
Dracocephalum moldavica L.
Diplostephium canum A.Gray
Tetraneuris acaulis var. nana (S.L.Welsh) Kartesz & Gandhi
Anemone stylosa A.Nelson
Betula microphylla Bunge
Ratibida tagetes (James) Barnhart
Carex canescens var. canescens
Hymenoxys acaulis var. ivesiana (Greene) K.F.Parker
Spiraea hydrophila Suksd.
Nerisyrenia camporum (A.Gray) Greene
Abutilon lemmonii S.Watson
Adenostoma fasciculatum var. densifolium Eastw.
Penstemon spectabilis subsp. spectabilis
Primula domensis Kass & S.L.Welsh
Sparganium minimum Hill, 1756
Opuntia eocarpa Griffiths
Helictotrichon mortonianum (Scribn.) Henrard
Penstemon ramosus Crosswh.
Neomammillaria sheldonii Britton & Rose
Calais tenella A.Gray
Deyeuxia montanensis Scribn.
Claytonia depressa var. interrupta Suksd.
Delphinium occidentale subsp. cucullatum (A.Nelson) Ewan
Sclerocactus pubispinus var. spinosior (Engelm.) S.L.Welsh
Stephanomeria minor Nutt.
Calycadenia hispida (Greene) Greene
Tilia heterophylla Vent.
Eriogonum polyanthum Benth.
Viguiera soliceps Barneby
Aristida purpurascens Poir.
Penstemon pahutensis Holmgren
Eunanus coulteri Harv. & Gray ex Benth.
Flaveria campestris Johnst.
Lepidium utahense M.E.Jones
Senecio rusbyi Greene
Boechera beckwithii (S.Watson) Dorn
Polygonum polycnemoides Jaub. & Spach
Hymenopappus scaposus Rydb.
Erigeron uncialis subsp. conjugans (S.F.Blake) Cronquist
Ceanothus spinosus Torr. & A.Gray
Lopezia hirsuta Jacq.
Cirsium callilepis (Greene) Jeps., 1901
Pittosporum daphniphylloides Hayata
Obione truncata Torr. ex S.Watson
Euphorbia flagelliformis (Rydb.) A.Nelson
Silene antirrhina var. vaccarifolia Rydb.
Frasera albicaulis subsp. albicaulis
Oxytropis paysoniana A.Nelson
Tillaea leptopetala Benth.
Gaillardia globosa A.Nelson
Malacothrix succulenta Elmer
Amaranthus graecizans var. pubescens Uline & W.L.Bray
Mimulus microphyton Pennell
Balsamorhiza macrophylla var. idahoensis W.M.Sharp
Microseris laciniata subsp. siskiyouensis K.L.Chambers
Oenothera ovata Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Matricaria suaveolens (Pursh) Buchenau
Collomia renacta Joyal
Phlox cortezana A.Nelson
Salix bonplandiana var. bonplandiana
Trifolium wormskioldii var. longicaule (Wooton & Standl.) L.D.Benson
Arabis perelegans A.Nelson
Horkelia pulchra Rydb.
Dodecatheon hendersonii var. hansenii Greene
Trifolium franciscanum Greene
Horkelia flavescens Rydb.
Prenanthella Rydb.
Draba sharsmithii Rollins & R.A.Price
Leucaena sonorensis Britton & Rose
Desmodium bigelovii A.Gray
Hemizonia palmeri Rose
Draba hitchcockii Rollins
Bartonia laevicaulis Douglas ex Hook.
Claytonia parviflora var. hydrophila (Suksd.) Suksd.
Solidago marshallii Rothr.
Tissa leucantha Greene
Arenaria congesta var. prolifera Maguire
Glossopetalon spinescens var. spinescens
Arenaria hookeri Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Vigna Savi
Hymenopappus filifolius var. polycephalus (Osterh.) B.L.Turner
Oenothera walkeri (A.Nelson) Raven
Hypericum peninsulare Eastw.
Stevia plummerae var. durangensis B.L.Rob.
Erigeron vagus var. madsenii S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Amsinckia microcarpa Greene
Juncus longistylis var. longistylis
Clinelymus glaucus subsp. coloratus Nevski
Pseudopteryxia longiloba Rydb.
Muscari armeniacum Leichtlin ex Baker
Sanguisorba polygama F.Nyl.
Grindelia pacifica M.E.Jones
Haplopappus thiniicola Rzed. & E.Ezcurra
Lupinus lutescens C.P.Sm.
Limnia utahensis Rydb.
Carex crawei Dewey ex Torr.
Sanicula diversiloba Suksd.
Neomammillaria fraileana Britton & Rose
Plagiobothrys glyptocarpus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Muhlenbergia phalaroides (Kunth) P.M.Peterson
Lathyrus violaceus var. barbarae T.G.White
Olmediella betschleriana (Göpp.) Loes.
Calandrinia elegans Spach
Lemna obscura (Austin) Daubs
Eriophorum angustifolium Roth, 1802
Eucalyptus maculosa R.T.Baker
Muhlenbergia virescens (Kunth) Kunth
Cinchona micrantha Ruiz & Pav.
Proatriplex pleiantha (W.A.Weber) Stutz & G.L.Chu
Eriogonum domitum Grady & Reveal
Melampyrum lineare var. pectinatum (Pennell) Fernald
Pectis mearnsii Rydb.
Senecio fremontii var. blitoides (Greene) Cronquist
Sidalcea candida var. glabrata C.L.Hitchc.
Rubus idaeus var. idaeus
Acerates cordifolia Benth.
Dalea leucostachya var. leucostachya
Cephalanthera oregana Rchb.f.
Cymopterus panamintensis J.M.Coult. & Rose
Stellaria porsildii C.C.Chinnappa
Phaseolus angustissimus var. latus M.E.Jones
Potentilla ramulosa Rydb.
Arctostaphylos strigosa Howell
Juncus tenuis var. anthelatus Wiegand
Penstemon whitedii Piper
Epilobium palustre var. gracile (Farw.) Dorn
Microseris elegans Greene
Limnanthes rosea Hartw. ex Benth.
Atriplex parishii var. minuscula (Standl.) S.L.Welsh
Draba oligosperma var. juniperina (Dorn) S.L.Welsh
Hymenoxys lemmonii subsp. greenei Cockerell
Agarista calliopsidea DC.
Chamaesaracha (A.Gray) Benth. ex Franch. & Sav.
Perymenium oxycarphum S.F.Blake
Astragalus simplicifolius (Nutt.) A.Gray
Amsinckia campestris Greene
Triniteurybia aberrans (A.Nelson) Brouillet, Urbatsch & R.P.Roberts
Rubus exrubicundus (Wooton & Standl.) L.H.Bailey
Asclepias purpurascens L.
Brickellia grandiflora var. petiolaris A.Gray
Chenopodium humile Hook.
Bouteloua arenosa Vasey
Eryngium sparganophyllum Hemsl.
Avenula hookeri (Scribn.) Holub
Chrysothamnus zionis A.Nelson
Hypericum anagalloides var. undulatum R.Keller
Anotites jonesii Greene
Penstemon laricifolius subsp. laricifolius
Physaria geyeri (Hook.) A.Gray
Carex thurberi Dewey ex Torr.
Gormania laxa Britton ex Britton & Rose
Uvularia sessilifolia L.
Cissus hypoglauca A.Gray
Draba oligosperma var. subsessilis (S.Watson) O.E.Schulz
Hedera helix subsp. helix
Geranium laxum Hanks ex Hanks & Small
Brahea nitida Andre
Sidalcea spicata (Regel) Greene
Cnicus lilacinus Greene
Glandularia bipinnatifida var. brevispicata Umber
Lithospermum pilosum Nutt.
Peucedanum marginatum Benth.
Calylophus serrulata (Nutt.) Raven
Chrysopsis oregona (Nutt.) A.Gray
Ficus rumphii Blume
Astragalus andersonii var. sepultipes Barneby
Tecoma incisa (Rose & Standl.) I.M.Johnst.
Gilia demissa A.Gray
Barbarea orthoceras var. orthoceras
Polygonum gabrielae Costea & Tardif
Chamaecrista absus var. meonandra (H.S.Irwin & Barneby) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Cylindropuntia delgadilloana Rebman & Pinkava
Bambusa malingensis McClure
Carex barbata Boott
Lupinus lucidulus Rydb.
Astragalus accumbens E.Sheld.
Hesperodoria salicina (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Calamagrostis aleutica var. angusta Vasey
Camissonia exilis (Raven) Raven
Centaurea virgata var. squarrosa (Willd.) Boiss.
Tidestromia lanuginosa var. lanuginosa
Salix lasiandra var. lancifolia (Andersson) Bebb
Senecio admirabilis Greene
Amelanchier ephemerotricha Suksd.
Helenium microcephalum DC.
Astragalus daleae Greene
Astragalus eremiticus var. ampullarioides S.L.Welsh
Erythronium giganteum Lindl.
Sericocarpus oregonensis subsp. oregonensis
Carex glomerata Thunb.
Trifolium dasyphyllum var. uintense (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Arnica laevigata Greene
Alpinia Roxb.
Triodanis holzingeri McVaugh
Stylophyllum traskae Rose
Draba apiculata C.L.Hitchc.
Lupinus montis-libertatis C.P.Sm.
Penstemon pseudospectabilis var. connatifolius (A.Nelson) C.C.Freeman
Astragalus kentrophyta var. neomexicanus (Barneby) Barneby
Gigantochloa verticillata (Willd.) Munro
Eriogonum spathulatum var. kayeae S.L.Welsh
Perityle lloydii B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Pluchea adnata var. parvifolia (A.Gray) S.F.Blake, 1926
Melampyrum lineare var. americanum (Michx.) Beauv.
Sedum woodii Britton
Plantago durvillei var. angustata Pilg.
Acacia bilimekii var. robusta Miranda
Lupinus wenatchensis Eastw.
Drymaria depressa Greene
Hypericum bryophytum Elmer
Arnica chamissonis var. foliosa (Nutt.)
Veronica alpina var. alterniflora Fernald
Silene thurberi S.Watson
Atriplex pleiantha W.A.Weber
Opuntia treleasei Coult.
Arabis hirsuta f. americana J.Tuzson
Lappula diploloma (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Gürke
Arctostaphylos rosei Eastw.
Clematis viorna L.
Xylophacos medius Rydb.
Cordylanthus ramosus subsp. eremicus (Coville & C.V.Morton) Munz
Thelypodium sagittatum var. ovalifolium (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Vulpia elliotea (Raf.) Fernald
Tillandsia confinis L.B.Sm.
Limnia cuprea A.Heller
Hoffmannseggia falcaria var. pringlei Fisher
Astragalus cusickii var. flexilipes Barneby
Astragalus arrectus var. remotus M.E.Jones
Cyperus vegetus Willd.
Xylophacos subvillosus Rydb.
Astragalus oreganus Torr. & A.Gray
Besseya alpina (A.Gray) Rydb.
Russelia sarmentosa Jacq.
Physaria acutifolia var. stylosa (Rollins) S.L.Welsh
Dodonaea viscosa var. linearis (Harvey & Sond.) Sherff
Cryptantha albida (Kunth) I.M.Johnst.
Carex atrata var. chalciolepis (Holm) Kük.
Euphorbia subpubens Engelm. ex S.Watson
Lappula redowskii var. occidentalis (S.Watson) Rydb.
Artemisia alpina Pall. ex Willd.
Cercocarpus macrourus Rydb.
Thysanocarpus crenatus Nutt.
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. dumosum (Greene) S.Stokes
Mentzelia librina (K.H.Thorne & F.J.Sm.) J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Trifolium arizonicum Greene
Astragalus mollissimus var. matthewsii (S.Watson) Barneby
Arabis lemmonii var. lemmonii
Schoenoplectus heterochaetus (Chase) Soják
Carex interior subsp. charlestonensis Clokey
Chamaecrista goldmanii Britton & Rose
Grindelia integrifolia var. aestivalis J.K.Henry
Leptotaenia dissecta var. multifida (Nutt.) Jeps.
Styrax gentryi P.W.Fritsch
Minuartia macrantha (Rydb.) House
Lupinus sylvestris Lam.
Purshia DC.
Trifolium columbinum Greene
Eriogonum humivagans Reveal
Rosa ×oligocarpa Rydb.
Boechera demissa var. demissa
Rubus helleri Rydb.
Salsola collina Pall.
Macromeria viridiflora var. thurberi (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Viola adunca var. bellidifolia (Greene) H.D.Harr.
Senecio scortifolius Greenm.
Clematis alpina var. repens Kuntze
Conringia orientalis (L.) C.Presl
Peucedanum graveolens S.Watson
Michelia alba DC.
Solanum retroflexum Dunal
Morus parvifolia Raf.
Leptopharynx cordifolia Rydb.
Gilia aurea var. decora A.Gray
Hedyotis greenei (A.Gray) W.H.Lewis
Unifolium liliaceum Greene
Rhysopterus jonesii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Populus alba var. bolleana (Lauche) Otto
Tanacetum potentilloides var. nitrophilum Cronquist
Toxicodendron phaseoloides Greene
Carex parryana var. brevisquama F.J.Herm.
Frasera ackermaniae C.C.Newb. & Goodrich
Lupinus lepidus var. cusickii (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Anisacanthus quadrifidus (Vahl) Nees
Grindelia arizonica var. stenophylla Steyerm.
Rubus parviflorus f. praebifarius Fassett
Callitrichaceae
Panicularia occidentalis Piper
Amsonia Walter
Penstemon hallii var. arizonicus A.Gray
Vicia sativa subsp. angustifolia (L.) Asch. & Graebn.
Arabis holboellii var. holboellii
Cuscuta epithymum Murray, 1784
Galpinsia hartwegii (Benth.) Britton
Ceanothus divaricatus Boland
Carex fuliginosa Schkuhr
Atriplex canescens var. garrettii (Rydb.) L.D.Benson
Crepis runcinata var. runcinata
Artemisia abrotanum L.
Cereus maritimus M.E.Jones
Carex douglasii var. brunnea Olney
Kunzea ambigua (Sm.) Druce
Ribes velutinum var. velutinum
Kuhnia L.
Eriogonum biumbellatum Rydb.
Echinocereus stramineus (Engelm.) F.Seitz
Acer forrestii Diels
Helenium quadridentatum Labill.
Oxalis cernua Thunb.
Isolepis koilolepis Steud.
Eupatorium bertholdii Sch.Bip.
Lupinus hullianus C.P.Sm.
Carex scopulorum var. scopulorum
Oreolirion arizonicum (Rothr.) E.P.Bicknell
Saxifraga napensis Small
Drymocallis gracilis Rydb.
Aliciella latifolia subsp. imperialis (S.L.Welsh) J.M.Porter
Eriogonum ×duchesnense Reveal
Ceanothus fresnensis Dudley
Dendrocalamus giganteus Munro
Datura thomasii Torr.
Ficus sur Forssk.
Thelypodium ovalifolium Rydb.
Rosa woodsii subsp. manca (Greene) W.H.Lewis & Ertter
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. neglecta (Sharp) Cronquist
Diosma L.
Alyssum szovitsianum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Strelitzia reginae Banks ex Aiton
Lupinus wyethi var. wyethi
Atriplex persistens Stutz & G.L.Chu
Guadua angustifolia Kunth
Scaevola aemula R.Br.
Horkelia congdonis Rydb.
Allocarya echinoglochin Greene
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. bigelovii (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Zapoteca formosa subsp. formosa
Perezia palmeri S.Watson
Lepidium montanum subsp. cinereum C.L.Hitchc.
Ribes hirtellum Michx.
Chylismia venosa A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Oenothera caespitosa var. stellae S.L.Welsh
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. latifolius (D.C.Eaton) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Cistus villosus L.
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. montanus L.C.Anderson
Astragalus candicans Greene
Gaura podocarpa Wooton & Standl.
Gilia ciliata Benth.
Glycyrrhiza glabra L.
Helianthemum chihuahuense S.Watson
Centaurea nigrescens Willd.
Pyrrhopappus rothrockii A.Gray
Mimosa coelocarpa B.L.Rob.
Montia dipetala Suksd.
Acer distylum Siebold & Zucc.
Descurainia torulosa Rollins
Arabis menziesii var. lata A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Crepis mogollonica Greene, 1913
Cymopterus ripleyi var. saniculoides Barneby
Poa pachypholis Piper
Ptelea similis Greene
Echinopepon palmeri Watson
Physaria grahamii C.V.Morton
Stellaria longipes var. monantha (Hultén) S.L.Welsh
Ranunculus aquatilis var. longirostris (Godr.) G.Lawson
Sclerocactus Britton & Rose
Androsace chamaejasme var. carinata (Torr.) R.Knuth
Agastache pallidiflora var. pallidiflora
Astragalus aretioides (M.E.Jones) Barneby
Flourensia crenua DC.
Salix bigelovii var. latifolia Andersson
Hemizonia clevelandii Greene
Allocarya conjuncta Piper
Ludwigia polycarpa Short & R.Peter
Lepidium montanum var. nevadense Rollins
Laccospadix australasicus H.Wendl. & Drude
Gilia violacea A.Heller
Pyrrocoma prionophylla Greene
Polygala puberula A.Gray
Eriogonum brevicaule var. huberi S.L.Welsh
Clarkia speciosa H.F.Lewis & M.R.Lewis
Astragalus brevicaulis A.Nelson
Rhus aromatica var. pilosissima (Engl.) Shinners
Echinocereus rigidissimus (Engelm.) Haage
Linanthus nuttallii subsp. howellii T.W.Nelson & R.Patt.
Astragalus shortianus Torr. & A.Gray
Cnicus clavatus M.E.Jones
Talinum polygaloides Gillies ex Arn.
Mirabilis pudica var. pudica
Melica retrofracta Suksd.
Eriogonum racemosum var. coccineum (J.T.Howell) S.L.Welsh
Garrya flavescens var. flavescens
Cerastium sericeum S.Watson
Globba bulbifera Roxb.
Oxytropis besseyi var. argophylla (Rydb.) Barneby
Psoralea rafaelensis M.E.Jones
Rhododendron occidentale var. californicum (Torr. & A.Gray ex Durand) Hrusa
Tetradymia DC.
Bambusa dolichoclada Hayata
Chrysopsis arenaria Elmer
Salvia ×superba (Silva Tar. & C.K.Schneid.) Stapf
Salix ×dieckiana Suksd.
Gaudichaudia cynanchoides Kunth
Mertensia virginica (L.) Pers. ex Link
Linosyris arborescens A.Gray
Capsella divaricata Walp.
Claytonia perfoliata var. depressa (A.Gray) Poelln.
Draba mulfordae Payson
Astragalus racemosus var. longisetus M.E.Jones
Rumex ellipticus Greene
Thelesperma marginatum Rydb.
Prenanthes exigua A.Gray
Populus deltoides var. wislizenii (S.Watson) Dorn
Xylophacos lenophyllus Rydb.
Apocynum oblongum Greene
Castilleja lauta A.Nelson
Verbena bipinnatifida var. latilobata L.M.Perry
Sisyrinchium bermudiana L.
Hymenoclea fasciculata var. patula A.Nelson
Lupinus lignipes A.Heller
Carex watsonii Olney
Erigeron rusbyi A.Gray
Delphinium xylorrhizum Rydb.
Rhodosphaera rhodanthema (F.Muell.) Engl.
Streptopus amplexifolius var. chalazatus Fassett
Androsace glandulosa Wooton & Standl.
Eriophyllum trichocarpum Rydb.
Salix bigelovii Torr.
Gilia gilioides var. integrifolia Brand
Mentzelia goodrichii Thorne & S.L.Welsh
Pedicularis attenuata Benth.
Cyclanthera monticola Gentry
Astragalus cusickii var. packardiae Barneby
Myosotis flaccida Douglas
Plectritis macrocera var. collina (A.Heller) Dyal
Plagiobothrys hirtus var. corallicarpa (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Trifolium filipes Greene
Hosackia ornithopus Greene
Leptodactylon glabrum R.Patt. & Yoder-Will.
Mentzelia dispersa var. dispersa
Sedum laxum subsp. latifolium Clausen
Potentilla virgulata A.Nelson
Newberrya longiloba Small
Githopsis specularioides var. glabra Jeps.
Bromus pumpellianus var. pumpellianus
Cerasus kelloggiana Greene
Rumex ×pratensis Mert. & Koch
Carex holmiana Mack.
Astragalus cottamii S.L.Welsh
Cirsium lactucinum Rydb.
Ortachne Nees ex Steud.
Stevia venosa A.Gray
Manihot glaziovii Müll.Arg.
Rosa nutkana var. alta Suksd.
Potentilla parishii Rydb.
Machaeranthera canescens var. monticola Dorn
Cymopterus terebinthinus var. calcareus (M.E.Jones) Cronquist
Arabis exilis A.Nelson
Festuca subbiflora Suksd.
Berlandiera lyrata var. macrophylla A.Gray
Erigeron flagellaris var. trilobatus Maguire
Achnatherum contractum (B.L.Johnson) Barkworth
Minuartia stricta (Sw.) Hiern
Neomammillaria microcarpa (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Solidago rugosa var. rugosa
Erythronium taylorii Shevock & G.A.Allen
Chamaecrista serpens (L.) Greene
Eriogonum deflexum subsp. parryi (A.Gray) S.Stokes
Crataegus tracyi var. madrensis J.B.Phipps
Vitex L.
Orthocarpus cuspidatus subsp. cuspidatus
Epilobium doriphyllum Hausskn.
Boschniakia C.A.Mey. ex Bong.
Cordylanthus canescens A.Gray
Quercus ithaburensis subsp. macrolepis (Kotschy) Hedge & Yalt.
Silene apetala (L.) Willd.
Euphrasia L.
Hebe buxifolia (Benth.) Cockayne & Allan
Salix lucida var. lasiandra (Benth.) Cronquist
Muhlenbergia glauca (Nees) B.D.Jacks.
Aster tripolium L.
Achnatherum brachychaetum (Godr.) Barkworth
Aster adscendens Lindl. ex DC.
Cistanthe monosperma (Greene) Hershk.
Salix sitchensis var. angustifolia Bebb
Ulmus thomasii Sarg.
Pieris japonica (Thunb.) D.Don
Juncus arcticus subsp. balticus (Willd.) Hyl.
Senecio moranii T.M.Barkley
Cleome serrulata Pax
Paspalum palmeri Chase
Lycianthes somniculenta (Kunze ex Schltdl.) Bitter
Senecio multicaulis DC.
Galium anglicum Huds.
Digitalis lutea L.
Astragalus laxmannii Jacq.
Agave fortiflora Gentry
Poa nemoralis var. interior (Rydb.) Butters & Abbe
Lotus aboriginus Jeps.
Lathyrus laetiflorus subsp. laetiflorus
Cassia tomentosa Arn.
Rhynchelytrum Nees
Gamochaeta Wedd.
Ceanothus cuneatus subsp. rigidus (Nutt.) C.L.Schmidt
Wislizenia californica Greene
Acalypha pringlei S.Watson
Leptodactylon californicum subsp. californicum
Heterotheca echioides (Benth.) Shinners
Claytonia perfoliata var. parviflora (Douglas ex Hook.) Torr.
Chamaesyce magdalenae (Benth.) Millsp.
Nasturtium R.Br.
Calyptridium Nutt.
Setaria lutescens F.T.Hubb.
Garrya flavescens var. pallida (Eastw.) Bacig. ex Ewan
Linanthus floribundus subsp. floribundus
Linanthus breviculus (A.Gray) Greene
Bromus erectus Huds.
Camissonia boothii subsp. rutila (A.Davidson) Munz
Thelypodium lasiophyllum var. utahense (Rydb.) Jeps.
Philibertia heterophylla (Engelm. ex Torr.) Jeps.
Morus indica L.
Agropyron parishii Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Lithophragma affine subsp. affine
Ivesia lycopodioides subsp. scandularis (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Potentilla pectinisecta Rydb.
Astragalus gambelianus subsp. gambelianus
Samolus valerandi subsp. parviflorus (Raf.) Hultén
Dalea polyadenia F.Heller
Grindelia robusta var. davyi Jeps.
Osteospermum calendulaceum L.fil.
Franseria chamissonis subsp. bipinnatisecta (Less.) Wiggins & Stockw.
Stephanomeria myrioclada D.C.Eaton
Chamaesyce serpyllifolia subsp. hirtella (Engelm. ex S.Watson) Koutnik
Triodanis perfoliata subsp. biflora (Ruiz & Pavón) Bradley
Trevirana longiflora (DC.) D.Dietr.
Juncus balticus var. balticus
Eriogonum saxatile var. saxatile
Cosmos Cav.
Leptodactylon californicum subsp. glandulosum (Eastw.) H.Mason
Gilia micromeria A.Gray
Linanthus floribundus subsp. glabrus R.Patt.
Forestiera acuminata (Michx.) Poir.
Amaranthus fimbriatus var. denticulatus (Torr.) Uline & W.L.Bray
Vernonia mespilifolia Less.
Aster intricatus (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Plagiobothrys californicus var. gracilis I.M.Johnst.
Glandularia bipinnatifida var. bipinnatifida
Berginia virgata Harv. ex Benth. & Hook.fil.
Faucaria Schwantes
Tritonia crocata (L.) Ker Gawl.
Ferraria crispa Burm.
Lachenalia contaminata Aiton
Watsonia coccinea (Herb. ex Baker) Baker
Albuca L.
Cassia didymobotrya Fresen.
Diplacus australis McMinn
Hymenoclea salsola var. salsola
Solanum esculentum Neck.
Scirpus acutus var. occidentalis (S.Watson) Beetle
Spergula rubra (L.) Bartl.
Calochortus nuttallii var. bruneaunis (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Ownbey
Prosopis glandulosa subsp. torreyana (L.D.Benson) A.E.Murray
Chenopodium ambrosioides var. suffruticosum (Willd.) Asch. & Graebn.
Camissonia cardiophylla subsp. robusta (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Abutilon aurantiacum S.Watson
Castilleja roseana Eastw.
Stipa coronata var. depauperata (M.E.Jones) Hitchc.
Dalechampia scandens var. fimbriata (Kunth) Müll.Arg.
Cakile americana Nutt.
Sapindus saponaria var. saponaria
Monanthochloe Engelm.
Jaumea Pers.
Allenrolfea Kuntze
Spartina Schreb.
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. glabrum Macoun
Alyssum maritimum (L.) Lam.
Lesquerella kingii subsp. bernardina (Munz) Munz
Calyptridium parryi var. nevadense J.T.Howell
Brassica adpressa Boiss.
Artemisia longiloba (Osterh.) Beetle
Strumaria truncata Jacq.
Cirsium coulteri Jeps.
Lupinus excubitus subsp. excubitus
Ceanothus sorediatus Hook. & Arn.
Spiloxene serrata (Thunb.) Garside
Lachenalia pustulata Jacq.
Moraea tricolor Andrews
Spiloxene ovata (L.f.) Garside
Gladiolus scullyi Baker
Lupinus rubens Rydb.
Lachenalia mathewsii W.F.Barker
Moraea karroica Goldblatt
Lachenalia pallida Aiton
Moraea vegeta L.
Moraea tricuspidata (L.f.) G.J.Lewis
Ixia pumilio Goldblatt & Snijman
Aloe petricola Pole-Evans
Bulbinella latifolia subsp. doleritica (P.L.Perry) P.L.Perry
Lachenalia aloides (L.f.) Engl.
Spiloxene scullyi (Baker) Garside
Synnotia villosa (Burm.f.) N.E.Br.
Stephanomeria minor var. myrioclada (D.C.Eaton) Kartesz
Chamaesyce Gray
Amsinckia spectabilis var. nicolai (Jeps.) I.M.Johnst.
Eremocarpus setiger (Hook.) Benth.
Ambrosia psilostachya var. psilostachya
Dinebra retroflexa (Vahl) Panz.
Chenopodium carinatum R.Br.
Chrysanthemum frutescens L.
Lotus oblongifolius var. nevadensis (A.Gray) Munz
Dalea megalostachys (Rose) Wiggins
Sporobolus pulvinatus Swallen
Chrysopsis breweri A.Gray
Castilleja breweri Fernald
Acacia smallii Isely
Lotus dendroideus (Greene) Greene
Festuca eastwoodae Piper
Calochortus nuttallii var. panamintensis Ownbey
Polygonum davisiae W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray
Moraea bipartita L.Bolus
Haplopappus canus (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Argemone platyceras var. platyceras
Nepeta L.
Pittocaulon praecox (Cav.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Euphorbia tuberculata Jacq.
Hippeastrum papilio (Ravenna) Van Scheepen
Eucalyptus salubris F.Muell.
Nicotiana bigelovii (Torr.) S.Watson
Bromus berterianus Colla
Bromus unioloides Kunth
Datura stramonium var. tatula (L.) Torr.
Rhus batophylla Codd
Mangifera L.
Frankenia grandifolia var. campestris A.Gray
Rhus glauca Hochst. ex Oliv.
Rhus lanceolata (Gray) Britton
Quercus dunnii Kellogg
Triteleia hyacinthina var. hyacinthina
Oenothera hookeri subsp. venusta (Bartlett) Munz
Proboscidea louisiana (Mill.) Thell.
Styrax officinalis var. rediviva (Torr.) Howard
Holodiscus (K.Koch) Maxim.
Bromus diandrus subsp. diandrus
Malacothamnus fasciculatus subsp. laxiflorus (A.Gray) Thorne
Scutellaria siphocamyploides Vatke
Sphaeralcea angustifolia subsp. cuspidata (A.Gray) Kearney
Phragmites Adans.
Echinochloa crus-galli var. oryzicola (Vasinger) Ohwi
Diplacus rutilus (A.L.Grant) McMinn
Hackelia Vasey ex Beal
Orthocarpus erianthus var. erianthus
Haplopappus spinulosus var. turbinellus (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Evax sparsiflora (A.Gray) Jeps.
Minuartia douglasii var. douglasii
Plantago purshii var. oblonga (E.Morris) Shinners
Encelia virginensis subsp. actoni (Elmer) D.D.Keck, 1958
Aster campestris var. bloomeri (A.Gray) A.Gray
Chaenactis carphoclinia var. attenuata (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Melica imperfecta var. refracta Thurb.
Claytonia spathulata Douglas
Carthamus L.
Eschscholzia californica var. crocea (Benth.) Jeps.
Helianthus tephrodes A.Gray
Muhlenbergia aspera (P.Beauv.) Kunth
Veronica xalapensis Kunth
Searsia lucida (L.) F.A.Barkley
Loeflingia squarrosa subsp. squarrosa
Holodiscus boursieri (Carrière) Rehder
Potentilla egedei var. grandis (Torr. & A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Hemizonia laevis (D.D.Keck) D.D.Keck
Quercus virginiana Mill.
Haplopappus apargioides A.Gray
Haplopappus arborescens subsp. parishii (Greene) Moran
Haplopappus racemosus subsp. sessiliflorus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Haplopappus suffruticosus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Ageratina venulosa (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Dalea calycosa A.Gray
Calandrinia maritima Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Brickellia oliganthes (Less.) A.Gray
Critoniopsis triflosculosa (Kunth) H.Rob.
Microsechium helleri (Peyr.) Cogn.
Tephrosia nicaraguensis Oerst.
Eriosema palmeri var. palmeri
Muhlenbergia geminiflora (Kunth) P.M.Peterson
Podostemum ceratophyllum Michx.
Romneya coulteri var. trichocalyx (Eastw.) Jeps.
Tagetes jaliscensis Greenm.
Matelea reticulata (Engelm. ex A.Gray) Woodson
Geranium mexicanum var. resimum (Small) H.E.Moore
Cryptantha mexicana (Brandegee) I.M.Johnst.
Begonia portillana S.Watson
Dalea carthagenensis var. capitulata (Rydb.) Barneby
Carphochaete pringlei var. simulans (B.L.Rob.) B.L.Turner
Desmodium orbiculare var. rubricaule (Rose & J.H.Painter) B.G.Schub. & McVaugh
Agave rhodacantha Trel.
Opuntia spraguei J.G.Ortega
Convolvulus alsinoides L.
Adenophyllum anomalum (Canby & Rose) Strother
Hemizonia greeneana var. greeneana
Eragrostis diffusa var. arida (Hitchc.) Beetle
Opuntia pailana Weing.
Smallanthus maculatus (Cav.) H.Rob.
Aristolochia porphyrophylla Pfeifer
Manfreda singuliflora (S.Watson) Rose
Lupinus lesueurii Standl.
Zornia laevis Schltdl. & Cham.
Pluchea symphytifolia (Mill.) Gillis
Anisacanthus Nees
Penstemon campanulatus var. chihuahuensis (Straw) B.L.Turner
Mnesithea granularis (L.) de Koning & Sosef
Drymaria leptophylla var. cognata (Blake) J.A.Duke
Alloispermum scabrifolium (Hook. & Arn.) H.Rob.
Senna pallida var. geminiflora H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Wimmeria confusa Hemsl.
Paspalum setaceum Michx.
Fouquieria Kunth
Stipa speciosa var. speciosa
Antiphytum DC. ex Meisn.
Opuntia wolfii (L.D.Benson) M.A.Baker
Chamaesyce carmenensis (Rose) Millsp.
Ruellia parryi A.Gray
Opuntia robinsonii J.G.Ortega
Lastarriaea chilensis Remy
Galium moranii Dempster
Senecio salicifolius Wallr.
Desmodium volubile (Schindl.) B.G.Schub. & McVaugh
Orobanche multiflora Nutt.
Dudleya rigida Rose ex Britton & Rose
Verbesina parviflora var. parviflora
Acacia peninsularis (Britton & Rose) Standl.
Indigofera densiflora M.Martens & Galeotti
Dichondra sericea Sw.
Bletia roezlii Rchb.f.
Russelia retrorsa f. nudicostata Carlson
Hedeoma floribunda Standl.
Sedum bourgaei Hemsl.
Pinguicula oblongiloba A.DC.
Lilaeopsis schaffneriana (Schltdl.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Ipomoea tenuiloba Torr.
Plantago insularis var. insularis
Agave schidigera Lem.
Opuntia fosbergii C.B.Wolf
Symphoricarpos Duhamel
Iostephane madrensis (S.Watson) Strother
Aster ascendens Hook.
Camissonia claviformis subsp. rubescens (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Mammillaria lewisiana H.E.Gates
Linanthus nuttallii subsp. floribundus (A.Gray) Munz
Chamaesyce capitellata (Engelm.) Millsp.
Desmodium angustifolium var. gramineum (A.Gray) B.G.Schub.
Lotus argyraeus var. argyraeus
Aldama montanoa Sch.Bip. ex K.Koch, 1864
Asclepias jorgeana Fishbein & S.P.Lynch
Piper scabrum Lam.
Buddleja cordata Kunth
Quercus fulva Liebm.
Haplophyton cimicidum var. crooksii L.D.Benson
Loeselia L.
Prunus serotina var. virens (Wooton & Standl.) McVaugh
Mammillaria glareosa Boed.
Zaluzania parthenioides (DC.) Rzed.
Gibasis chihuahuensis (Standl.) Rohweder
Argemone alba F.Lestib.
Dichanthelium sphaerocarpon var. sphaerocarpon
Penstemon cedrosensis Krautter
Stevia salicifolia Cav.
Pseudognaphalium inornatum (DC.) Anderb.
Salvia betulifolia var. betulifolia
Viola pringlei Rose & House
Talinum marginatum Greene
Thymophylla pentachaeta var. pentachaeta
Cologania Kunth
Russelia Jacq.
Echinopepon arachoideus (Dieterle) A.K.Monro & Stafford
Oenothera tetraptera Cav.
Agastache pallida (Lindl.) Cory
Clarkia biloba subsp. brandegeei (Jeps.) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Matelea velutina (Schltdl.) Woodson
Opuntia lindsayi Rebman
Opuntia clavellina Engelm. ex J.M.Coult.
Linanthus pygmaeus (Brand) Howell
Ambrosia peruviana Willd.
Condalia velutina I.M.Johnst.
Sphaeralcea palmeri (S.Watson) Jeps.
Schoepfia parvifolia Planch.
Oenothera chamaenerioides A.Gray
Agave multifilifera Gentry
Verbena caroliniana Willd., 1797
Opuntia invicta Brandegee
Cyperus ischnos Schltdl.
Arenaria stricta subsp. texana (Small) Maguire
Stachys repens M.Martens & Galeotti
Mortonia diffusa Rose & Standl.
Chamaesyce densiflora (Klotzsch) Millsp.
Schkuhria pinnata var. wislizenii (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Mammillaria saboae f. haudeana (A.B.Lau & Wagner) D.R.Hunt
Chiococca pubescens var. peninsularis Wiggins
Fouquieria formosa Kunth
Oenothera cheiranthifolia A.Gray
Dalea vetula Brandegee
Zephyranthes arenicola Brandegee
Chamaesyce pondii (Millsp.) Millsp.
Salvia muscarioides Fernald
Phaseolus sonorensis Standl.
Ampelopsis cordata Michx.
Berberis moranensis Schult. & Schult.fil.
Iresine diffusa var. diffusa
Capsicum annuum var. aviculare (Dierb.) D' Arcy & Eschbaugh
Plantago australis Lam.
Tithonia calva var. calva
Desmanthus subulatus (Britton & Rose) B.L.Turner
Lobelia endlichii (E.Wimm.) T.J.Ayers
Rhynchosia discolor var. lanceolata Grear
Talinum mucronatum Kunth
Bignonia unguis-cati L.
Heliopsis annua Hemsl.
Eleusine multiflora Hochst. ex A.Rich.
Stevia porphyrea McVaugh
Gnaphalium viscosum (Kunth) Kunth
Physalis nicandroides Schltdl.
Agave shrevei subsp. shrevei
Stevia serrata var. arguta B.L.Rob.
Desmodium hartwegianum var. amans (S.Watson) B.G.Schub.
Eragrostis neomexicana Vasey ex L.H.Dewey
Brickellia magnifica McVaugh
Spathodea campanulata Beauv.
Zornia thymifolia Kunth
Tephrosia multifolia Rose
Matelea sepicola W.D.Stevens
Dasylirion durangense Trel.
Ipomoea perlonga B.L.Rob. ex Pringle
Leucaena esculenta (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) Benth.
Paspalum plicatulum Michx.
Chamaecrista nictitans var. pilosa (Benth.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Epilobium mirabile Trel. ex Piper
Chusquea foliosa L.G.Clark
Isolepis pseudosetacea (Daveau) Gand.
Oxalis micrantha Bojer ex Progel
Vicia nigricans Hook. & Arn.
Herniaria glabra L.
Lotus krylovii Schischk. & Serg.
Persicaria longiseta (Bruyn) Kitag.
Urtica dioica var. holosericea Fr.
Carex anthoxanthea J.Presl & C.Presl
Guadua paniculata Munro
Cornus disciflora Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Castilleja rhizomata N.H.Holmgren
Berberis longipes (Standl.) Marroq. & Laferr.
Barkleyanthus H.Rob. & Brettell
Oncidium Sw.
Sassafridium macrophyllum Rose
Pinaropappus Less.
Jacobinia candicans (Nees) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Clethra mexicana DC.
Donnellsmithia silvicola Constance & Bye
Pitcairnia palmeri S.Watson
Gonolobus Michx.
Acalypha cincta Müll.Arg.
Encyclia Hook.
Quercus omissa A.DC.
Leucaena Benth.
Arctostaphylos polifolia Torr.
Lysiloma Benth.
Lopezia Cav.
Stemmadenia palmeri Rose & Standl.
Dasylirion Zucc.
Bumelia persimilis Hemsl.
Peperomia Ruiz & Pav.
Dorstenia L.
Cymbopogon Spreng.
Brittonastrum Briq.
Cucurbita mixta Pangalo
Tauschia bicolor Constance & Bye
Galinsoga Ruiz & Pav.
Chaptalia seemannii (Sch.Bip. ex Seem.) Hemsl.
Phlox mesoleuca Greene
Exogonium bracteatum (Cav.) Choisy
Agave americana var. expansa (Jacobi) Gentry
Pinguicula L.
Solanum tequilense A.Gray
Bumelia persimilis subsp. subsessiliflora (Hemsl.) Cronquist
Verbesina L.
Scutellaria L.
Physalis sancti-josephi Dunal
Gongora Ruiz & Pav.
Aneilema R.Br.
Ceanothus buxifolius Willd.
Buddleja cordata subsp. cordata
Arbutus glandulosa Mart. & Galeotti
Washingtonia gracilis Parish
Syrmatium traskiae Eastw.
Sphaeralcea rosacea Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Rosa mohavensis Parish
Ribes hittellianum Eastw.
Platystemon villosus Greene
Madia doris-nilesiae T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Balsamorhiza terebinthacea (Hook.) Nutt.
Boechera bodiensis (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Correa Andrews
Agoseris heterophylla var. cryptopleura Jeps.
Potentilla uliginosa B.C.Johnst. & Ertter
Amsinckia nigricans Brand
Arctostaphylos cushingiana f. repens J.T.Howell
Eleocharis disciformis Parish
Prunus emarginata (Douglas) D.Dietr., 1842
Artemisia arbuscula var. arbuscula
Heterotheca villosa var. shevockii Semple
Gilia tenuiloba Parish
Garrya rigida Eastw.
Euphorbia pseudoserpyllifolia f. villosa J.T.Howell
Galium multiflorum var. parvifolium Parish
Agrostis elliottiana Schult.
Physocarpus (Cambess.) Maxim.
Vaccinium shastense subsp. nevadense J.K.Nelson & Lindstrand
Vaccinium shastense subsp. shastense
Ivesia pickeringii Torr. ex A.Gray
Heuchera micrantha var. hartwegii (S.Watson ex Wheelock) Rosend.
Agoseris parviflora (Nutt.) Greene
Drymocallis glandulosa subsp. glandulosa
Camissonia tanacetifolia subsp. quadriperforata Raven
Saxifragopsis fragarioides (Greene) Small
Cistanthe pygmaea (Parish ex Rydb.) Hershk.
Cistanthe rosea (S.Watson) Hershk.
Nemacladus calcaratus Morin
Brassica sisymbrioides (Fisch. ex DC.) Grossh.
Lewisia sierrae Ferris
Linanthus bolanderi (A.Gray) Greene
Gilia sinistra subsp. sinistra
Brodiaea terrestris var. kernensis (Hoover) T.F.Niehaus
Camissonia tanacetifolia subsp. tanacetifolia
Phlox douglasii subsp. rigida (Benth.) Wherry
Linanthus nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Pedicularis groenlandica subsp. surrecta (Benth.) Piper
Horkelia elata (Greene) Rydb.
Lonicera involucrata var. ledebourii (Eschsch.) Zabel
Schedonorus pratensis (Huds.) P.Beauv.
Juncus scheuchzerioides Gaudich.
Anisacanthus andersonii T.F.Daniel
Layia gaillardioides (Hook. & Arn.) DC.
Lasthenia glabrata var. glabrata
Mirabilis oligantha (Standl.) J.F.Macbr.
Iris xiphium L.
Eriogonum microthecum subsp. laxiflorum (Hook.) S.Stokes
Dudleya viridicata D.A.Johans.
Zigadenus fremontii var. brevibracteatus M.E.Jones
Sphaeralcea ambigua var. keckii Munz
Rosa corymbiflora Rydb.
Penstemon laetus subsp. filiformis D.D.Keck
Malvastrum mendocinense Eastw.
Malvastrum catalinense Eastw.
Pouteria leucophylla (S.Watson) Cronquist
Calamintha Mill.
Amsinckia attenuata Eastw. ex Suksd.
Boechera yorkii S.Boyd
Astragalus vaseyi var. johnstonii Munz & McBride
Brassica fruticulosa Cyril.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. macrophyllus J.T.Howell
Cleomella alata Eastw.
Cymopterus owenensis M.E.Jones
Boykinia rotundifolia Parry
Juncus balticus subsp. mexicanus (Willd. ex Schult. & Schult.fil.) Snogerup
Boechera rollei (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Mertensia oblongifolia var. oblongifolia
Stenotus stenophyllus (A.Gray) Greene
Ceanothus foliosus subsp. medius C.L.Schmidt
Physaria occidentalis subsp. occidentalis
Rhodiola rosea subsp. integrifolia (Raf.) H.Hara
Rhynchospora recognita (Gale) Kral
Haplopappus racemosus subsp. pinetorum D.D.Keck
Hoita villosa Rydb.
Gilia aurea f. pallescens Brand
Allium siskiyouense Munz & Keck ex Ownbey
Allium hoffmannii Ownbey
Melaleuca quinquenerva
Swertia albicaulis subsp. albicaulis
Lupinus micranthus var. microphyllus S.Watson
Gilia leptalea subsp. leptalea
Camissonia claviformis subsp. cruciformis (Kellogg) P.H.Raven
Minuartia nuttallii subsp. gracilis (B.L.Rob.) McNeill
Hesperolinon (A.Gray) Small
Galium grayanum var. grayanum
Eriogonum strictum subsp. anserinum (Greene) S.Stokes
Horkelia fusca var. pseudocapitata (Rydb. ex Howell) Kartesz
Chenopodium album var. lanceolatum (Muhl.) Coss. & Germ.
Castilleja pinetorum Fernald
Viola purpurea var. purpurea
Poa secunda var. juncifolia (Scribn.) Soreng
Viola sororia subsp. affinis (Leconte) R.J.Little
Pseudognaphalium canescens (DC.) W.A.Weber
Hymenophysa pubescens C.A.Mey.
Eriogonum prattenianum var. avium Reveal & Shevock
Euphorbia xanti Engelm.
Mimulus purpureus var. pauxillus A.L.Grant
Salix bakeri von Seem.
Petalonyx gilmanii Munz
Bidens cernua var. cernua
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. lanata Sharp
Alopecurus aequalis var. sonomensis P.Rubtzov
Baeria bakeri J.T.Howell
Calyptridium pygmaeum Parish
Calycadenia truncata subsp. microcephala H.M.Hall ex D.D.Keck
Castilleja adenophora Eastw.
Claytonia lanceolata var. pacifica McNeill
Cordylanthus pallescens Pennell
Streptanthus peramoenus Greene
Guizotia Cass.
Lepidium pubicarpum A.Nelson
Pachycormus discolor (Benth.) Coville ex Standl.
Coreopsis grandiflora Hogg ex Sweet
Chenopodium berlandieri var. zschackii (Murr) Murr ex Asch.
Arctotis L.
Rhynchospora glomerata var. minor Britton
Cyperus niger var. castaneus (Torr.) Kük.
Allium sanbornii var. sanbornii
Agrostis hendersonii Hitchc.
Mitella L.
Verbascum L.
Smilacina
Eremogone congesta var. suffrutescens (A.Gray) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Levisia Steud.
Eriogonum breedlovei var. shevockii J.T.Howell
Poa sierrae J.T.Howell
Poa unilateralis Scribn., 1893
Ericameria palmeri var. pachylepis (H.M.Hall) G.L.Nesom
Sedum moranii Clausen
Bromus madritensis subsp. rubens (L.) Duvin
Atriplex watsonii A.Nelson
Anemone oregana var. oregana
Haplopappus pulvinatus Moran
Valeriana whiltonae Eastw.
Salix franciscana von Seem.
Rhamnus rubra subsp. modocensis C.B.Wolf
Philadelphus pumilus Rydb.
Lupinus brittonii Abrams
Bahia Lag.
Arenaria rosei Maguire & Barneby
Carex luzulina var. luzulina
Castilleja inornata Eastw.
Crepis occidentalis var. nevadensis Kellogg
Erigeron austiniae Greene
Chimaphila Pursh
Vaccinium ×brunoense P.W.Fritsch
Limnanthes douglasii var. sulphurea C.T.Mason
Garrya fremontii var. laxa Eastw.
Gilia dianthoides var. farinosa Brand
Ivesia arizonica var. arizonica
Impatiens hoehnelii T.C.E.Fr.
Eriogonum nudum var. murinum Reveal
Ranunculus occidentalis var. howellii (Greene) Greene
Gilia yorkii Shevock & A.G.Day
Croton lindheimerianus Scheele
Eriogonum nudum var. regirivum Reveal & J.C.Stebbins
Toxicoscordion Rydb.
Viola adunca var. kirkii V.G.Duran
Stylophyllum parishii Britton
Streptanthella longirostris var. derelicta J.T.Howell
Saxifraga fallax Greene
Penstemon tracyi D.D.Keck
Lupinus fontis-batchelderi C.P.Sm.
Crepis modocensis subsp. subacaulis (Kellogg) Babc., Stebbins & Publ.Carnegie Inst.Wash.
Arabis modesta Rollins
Arctostaphylos bowermaniae Roof
Argythamnia californica Brandegee
Castilleja latifolia subsp. pinnatifida Eastw.
Chrysopsis gracilis Eastw.
Collinsia davidsonii Parish
Eriogonum pratense S.Stokes
Dicentra formosa subsp. oregana (Eastw.) Munz
Lepidium chalepensis L.
Acer negundo var. negundo
Romneya coulteri var. coulteri
Scirpus nodosus Rottb.
Hypericum anagalloides var. ramigerum R.Keller
Grindelia arenicola var. pachyphylla Steyerm.
Claytonia peirsonii (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) Stoughton
Alnus viridis subsp. crispa (Aiton) Turrill
Melilotus alba Ledeb.
Nuphar luteum subsp. polysepalum (Engelm.) Beal
Sedum sediforme (Jacq.) Pau
Pectocarya lateriflora (Lam.) DC.
Perideridia leptocarpa T.I.Chuang & Constance
Koeleria pyramidata subsp. pyramidata
Sedum radiatum subsp. depauperatum R.T.Clausen
Graptopetalum Rose
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. bloomeri (S.Watson) Benson
Forestiera pubescens var. parvifolia (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Parosela neglecta Parish
Minuartia decumbens T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Monotropa californica Eastw.
Draba cruciata var. integrifolia C.L.Hitchc. & Sharsm.
Baeria macrantha var. thalassophila J.T.Howell
Carduus bernardinus Greene
Ceanothus ×humboldtensis Roof
Cordylanthus bernardinus Munz
Linanthus pachyphyllus R.Patt.
Nemacladus adenophorus Parish
Haplopappus whitneyi var. discoideus Howell
Gilia traskiae Eastw. ex Milliken
Eriogonum kennedyi var. olanchense J.T.Howell
Trifolium monanthum var. monanthum
Cistanthe quadripetala (S.Watson) Hershk.
Ribes tularense (Coville) Fedde
Amsinckia vernicosa var. vernicosa
Eriastrum diffusum subsp. utahense S.J.De Groot
Festuca californica subsp. californica
Velaea glauca var. purpurascens J.T.Howell
Veronica franciscana Eastw.
Zauschneria eastwoodiae Moxley
Plectritis nitida A.Heller
Penstemon berryi Eastw.
Boechera tularensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Agoseris eastwoodiae Fedde
Calycadenia ciliosa f. alba D.D.Keck
Ceanothus prostratus var. occidentalis McMinn
Sambucus melanocarpa Gray
Lilium pitkinense Beane & Vollmer
Grindelia hirsutula f. glabrata Steyerm.
Gilia hallii Parish
Galium munzii var. kingstonense Dempster
Hazardia whitneyi var. whitneyi
Oenothera boothii Douglas
Trifolium longipes var. oreganum (Howell) Isely
Linanthus nudatus Greene
Pelargonium vitifolium (L.) L'Hér.
Lupinus excubitus subsp. hallii (Abrams) D.B.Dunn
Carpobrotus edulis (L.) L.Bolus, 1927
Atriplex argentea var. mohavensis M.E.Jones
Pleuropogon californicus var. californicus
Physostegia Benth.
Tithonia Desf. ex Juss.
Carex pensylvanica var. digyna Boeckeler
Carex pachystachya Cham.
Carex macrocephala Willd.
Carex scirpoidea var. scirpiformis (Mack.) O'Neill & Duman
Carex sprengelii Dewey
Carex drummondiana Dewey
Muhlenbergia quadridentata (Kunth) Trin.
Muhlenbergia grandis Vasey
Muhlenbergia speciosa Vasey
Muhlenbergia vaginata Swallen
Muhlenbergia lindheimeri Hitchc.
Muhlenbergia implicata (Kunth) Trin.
Muhlenbergia distans Swallen ex Hitchc., 1935
Muhlenbergia robusta (E.Fourn.) Hitchc.
Muhlenbergia majalcensis P.M.Peterson
Muhlenbergia schmitzii Hack.
Tissa Adans.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. mohavense Reveal
Deinandra fasciculata var. ramosissima Davidson & Moxley
Schizachyrium sanguineum (Retz.) Alston
Sorghastrum Nash
Collinsia rattanii var. typica Newsom
Chaenactis heterocarpha var. megacephala (A.Gray) Stockw.
Panicum joorii Vasey
Cercocarpus montanus var. minutiflorus (Abrams) Martin
Cynosurus L.
Paspalum setaceum var. stramineum (Nash) D.J.Banks
Astragalus drummondii Douglas
Astragalus inflexus Douglas
Campeiostachys dahurica (Turcz. ex Griseb.) B.R.Baum et al.
Valeriana hookeri Shuttlew.
Boechera constancei (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Mitella diversifolia Greene
Rumex crispus subsp. crispus
Ivesia gordonii var. alpicola (Rydb. ex Howell) Ertter & Reveal
Collinsia latifolia (Newsom) B.G.Baldwin, Kalisz & Armbr.
Veronica besseya M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Scutellaria drummondii Benth.
Eriogonum elatum var. villosum Jeps.
Ampelopsis glandulosa (Wall.) Momiy.
Plantago coronopus var. coronopus
Echium wildpretii H.Pearson ex Hook.fil.
Amelanchier ovalis Medik.
Syringa reticulata (Blume) H.Hara
Quercus buckleyi Nixon & Dorr
Tillandsia intermedia Mez
Pattalias palmeri var. palmeri
Viola sororia f. priceana (Pollard) Cooperr.
Orobanche ludoviciana subsp. multiflora (Nutt.) Collins
Pseudognaphalium stramineum (Kunth) W.A.Weber
Eriogonum thompsoniae var. atwoodii Reveal
Gentianella amarella subsp. heterosepala (Engelm.) J.M.Gillett
Allium cernuum var. obtusum Cockerell ex J.F.Macbr.
Argemone polyanthemos (Fedde) G.B.Ownbey
Achillea lanulosa var. alpicola Rydb.
Chimaphila umbellata subsp. acuta (Rydb.) Hultén
Zigadenus elegans subsp. elegans
Zuckia brandegeei var. arizonica (Standl.) S.L.Welsh
Petrophyton caespitosum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Dieteria canescens var. incana (Lindl.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Psilostrophe tagetina var. tagetina
Schkuhria pinnata (Lam.) Kuntze ex Thell.
Ptelea trifoliata var. lutescens (Greene) V.L.Bailey
Arenaria fendleri var. tweedyi (Rydb.) Maguire
Descurainia pinnata subsp. paysonii Detling
Noccaea fendleri subsp. fendleri
Plantago argyraea E.Morris
Herrickia glauca var. pulchra (S.F.Blake) Brouillet
Gilia rigidula subsp. acerosa (A.Gray) Wherry
Tragia nepetifolia Wawra
Tamaricaceae
Melica porteri Scribn.
Physaria pinetorum (Wooton & Standl.) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Monroa squarrosa (Nutt.) Torr.
Eriogonum hieracifolium Benth.
Eragrostis curvula var. conferta Stapf
Claytonia lanceolata var. rosea (Rydb.) R.J.Davis
Eriogonum heermannii var. subracemosum (S.Stokes) Reveal
Medicago minima (L.) L.
Petalostemon searlsiae A.Gray
Corydalis curvisiliqua subsp. occidentalis (Engelm. ex A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Lobelia cardinalis var. graminea (Lam.) McVaugh
Celtis laevigata var. reticulata (Torr.) L.D.Benson
Ceratocephala testiculata (Crantz) Besser
Ranunculus inamoenus var. subaffinis (A.Gray) L.D.Benson
Ranunculus trichophyllus var. trichophyllus
Salix ×pendulina Wender.
Corispermum americanum var. americanum
Penstemon eatonii var. exsertus (A.Nelson) C.C.Freeman
Polygala rusbyi Greene
Dasiphora floribunda (Pursh) Raf.
Ivesia multifoliata (Torr.) D.D.Keck
Rosa woodsii var. ertterae W.H.Lewis
Grindelia nuda var. aphanactis (Rydb.) G.L.Nesom
Cirsium arizonicum var. nidulum (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Chrysothamnus stylosus (Eastw.) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Ptelea trifoliata subsp. polyadenia (Greene) V.L.Bailey
Draba asprella var. stelligera O.E.Schulz
Lunaria rediviva L.
Mirabilis decipiens (Standl.) Standl.
Festuca calligera (Piper) Rydb.
Muhlenbergia rigida (Kunth) Trin.
Potentilla thurberi var. thurberi
Physaria newberryi var. newberryi
Dieteria canescens var. glabra (A.Gray) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Achillea millefolium subsp. occidentalis (DC.) Hyl.
Potentilla subviscosa var. subviscosa
Asclepias galioides Kunth
Draba asprella var. kaibabensis C.L.Hitchc.
Carex arizonica Licher, G.Rink & Reznicek
Petradoria pumila subsp. graminea (Wooton & Standl.) L.C.Anderson
Lepidium montanum var. glabrum C.L.Hitchc.
Brickellia microphylla subsp. scabra (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. redolens (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Sphaeralcea incana subsp. cuneata Kearney
Juncus interior var. arizonicus (Wiegand) F.J.Herm.
Quercus harvardii Rydb.
Solidago altissima var. altissima
Bromus mucroglumis Wagnon
Pyrrocoma crocea var. genuflexus (Greene) Mayes ex G.K.Br. & D.J.Keil
Suckleya suckleyana (Torr.) Rydb.
Lupinus kingii var. argillaceus (Wooton & Standl.) C.P.Sm.
Erigeron sparsifolius Eastw.
Trifolium wormskioldii var. arizonicum (Greene) Barneby
Pedicularis racemosa subsp. alba Pennell
Carex microdonta Torr.
Penstemon pachyphyllus subsp. congestus (M.E.Jones) D.D.Keck
Gaura hexandra subsp. hexandra
Euphorbia serpyllifolia var. serpyllifolia
Galium collomiae J.T.Howell
Bothriochloa bladhii (Retz.) S.T.Blake
Ericameria viscidiflora subsp. puberula (D.C.Eaton) L.C.Anderson
Tradescantia occidentalis var. occidentalis
Acacia latifolia Benth.
Encelia resinifera subsp. resinifera
Viola sororia var. affinis (Leconte) L.E.McKinney
Mentzelia canyonensis J.J.Schenk, W.C.Hodgs. & L.Hufford
Potentilla sanguinea Rydb.
Schizachyrium sanguineum var. hirtiflorum (Nees) S.L.Hatch
Leymus salina subsp. mojavensis Barkworth & R.J.Atkins
Oreocarya bakeri Greene
Hoffmanseggia drepanocarpa A.Gray
Celtis laevigata subsp. reticulata (Torr.) A.E.Murray
Sanvitalia ocymoides DC.
Lorandersonia baileyi (Wooton & Standl.) Urbatsch, R.P.Roberts & Neubig
Astragalus lentiginosus var. oropedii Barneby
Artemisia ludoviciana var. mexicana (Spreng.) A.Gray
Thelypodium sagittatum var. vermicularis S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Lepidium montanum subsp. jonesii (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Dianthus chinensis L.
Lychnis alba Mill.
Astragalus pictiformis Barneby
Cannabis sativa subsp. indica (Lam.) E.Small & Cronquist
Cassia planisiliqua L.
Gentiana prostrata Wahlenb.
Fraxinus oregona Nutt.
Syringa chinensis Willd.
Castilleja genevievana G.L.Nesom
Eleocharis microformis Buckley
Papaver atlanticum (Ball) Coss.
Ranunculus gmelinii var. gmelinii
Pyrus malus L.
Verbena ambrosifolia f. eglandulosa L.M.Perry
Narcissus cyclamineus DC.
Crocus susianus Ker Gawl.
Allium sanbornii var. congdonii Jeps.
Achnatherum perplexum Hoge & Barkworth
Eupatorium wrightii A.Gray
Aster foliaceus var. canbyi A.Gray
Muhlenbergia tenuiflora (Willd.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Dodecatheon ellisiae Standl.
Carex nigricans Kit.
Holmgrenia andina (Nutt.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Carex stevenii (Holm) Kalela
Gilia caespitosa A.Gray
Carex echinata var. echinata
Salvia davidsonii Greenm.
Bouteloua uniflora Vasey
Eriogonum zionis var. coccineum J.T.Howell
Lemna minima Philippi
Geranium caespitosum var. fremontii (Torr. ex A.Gray) Dorn
Cymopterus sessiliflorus (W.L.Theob. & C.C.Tseng) R.L.Hartm.
Androsace septentrionalis subsp. subulifera (A.Gray) G.T.Robbins
Heuchera inconstans R.A.Folk
Frangula betulifolia subsp. obovata (Kearney & Peebles) Kartesz & Gandhi
Erigeron saxatilis G.L.Nesom
Pleurocornis pluriseta (A.Gray) R.M.King & H.Rob.
Scabrethia scabra subsp. attenuata (W.A.Weber) W.A.Weber
Thelypodiopsis purpusii (Brandegee) Rollins
Trifolium andinum Nutt.
Mentzelia hualapaiensis J.J.Schenk, W.C.Hodgs. & L.Hufford
Agropyron cristatum subsp. desertorum (Fisch. ex Link) Á.Löve
Muhlenbergia tenuifolia (Kunth) Trin.
Cirsium neomexicanum subsp. neomexicanum
Cryptantha cinerea var. jamesii (Torr.) Cronquist
Herrickia glauca var. glauca
Erigeron consimilis Cronquist
Erigeron vreelandii Greene
Oenothera flava subsp. taraxacoides (Wooton & Standl.) W.L.Wagner
Corispermum nitidum Kit.
Symphyotrichum foliaceum var. foliaceum
Penstemon crandallii A.Nelson
Castalis tragus (Aiton) Norl.
Artemisia tridentata var. angustifolia A.Gray
Antennaria arida E.Nelson
Descurainia obtusa subsp. obtusa
Achnatherum parishii var. depauperatum (M.E.Jones) Barkworth
Platyschkuhria integrifolia var. ourolepis (S.F.Blake) Ellison
Sphaeralcea digitata subsp. tenuipes (Wooton & Standl.) Kearney
Physalis hederifolia Holz.
Drymaria effusa A.Gray
Descurainia incisa subsp. paysonii (Detling) Rollins
Euphorbia lathyrus L.
Penstemon angustifolius subsp. venosus D.D.Keck
Scabrethia scabra subsp. scabra
Draba petrophila var. petrophila
Acer negundo var. violaceum (G.Kirchn.) H.Jaeger
Hoffmannseggia glauca (Ort.) Eijert, 1972
Eschscholzia minutiflora Parish ex Greene
Geum strictum Aiton
Desmodium supinum DC.
Halenia palmeri A.Gray
Castilleja ortegae Standl.
Gutierrezia alamanii var. megalocephala (Fernald) M.A.Lane
Oenothera hexandra subsp. gracilis (Wooton & Standl.) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Eriogonum deflexum var. rectum Reveal
Brickellia oblongifolia subsp. linifolia (D.C.Eaton) Cronquist
Rhus hirta (L.) Südw.
Antennaria margaritacea (L.) R.Br. ex DC.
Artemisia potens A.Nelson
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. hirsuta (Nutt.) A.Nelson
Scutellaria potosina var. kaibabensis S.L.Rhodes & T.J.Ayers
Symphyotrichum puniceum (L.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Juglans rupestris Engelm.
Euonymus radicans Siebold ex Miq.
Cornus suecica L.
Dieteria canescens var. sessiliflora (Nutt.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Mimulus verbenaceus Greene
Silene laciniata var. greggii (A.Gray) S.Watson
Lupinus sericeus var. barbiger (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh
Oxytropis jonesii Barneby
Pelargonium zonale (L.) L'Hér. ex Aiton
Geranium caespitosum var. parryi (Engelm.) W.A.Weber
Mentzelia multicaulis var. librina K.H.Thorne & F.J.Sm.
Carex conoidea Willd.
Oenothera runcinata (Engelm.) Munz
Eriogonum howellii S.Stokes
Eriogonum vimineum subsp. juncinellum (Gand.) S.Stokes
Eremophila maculata (Ker Gawl.) F.Muell.
Yucca angustissima var. toftiae (S.L.Welsh) Reveal
Sparganium simplex Muhl.
Carex filifolia var. filifolia
Aristida purpurea var. glauca (Nees) A.H.Holmgren & N.H.Holmgren
Townsendia fendleri A.Gray
Elymus hispidus var. ruthenicus (Griseb.) Dorn
Chamaesyce dioeca (Kunth) Millsp.
Margaranthus lemmonii Gray
Dicliptera pseudoverticillaris A.Gray
Leucosyris carnosa (A.Gray) Greene
Hypericum formosanum Maxim.
Descurainia browniae R.P.McNeill
Carex capitata Suter ex Boott, 1867
Flaveria macdougalii Theroux, Pinkava & Keil
Draba petrophila var. viridis (A.Heller) C.L.Hitchc.
Dalea candida var. candida
Prunus serotina var. rufula (Wooton & Standl.) McVaugh
Physaria montana (A.Gray) Greene
Oreocarya atwoodii (L.C.Higgins) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Vaccinium myrtillus var. oreophilum (Rydb.) Dorn
Philadelphus microphyllus subsp. stramineus (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Anemone multifida var. hudsoniana DC.
Stachys crenata Raf.
Draba asprella var. asprella
Potentilla crinita var. lemmonii (S.Watson) Kearney & Peebles
Erigeron nudiflorus Buckley
Solidago simplex var. spathulata (DC.) Cronquist
Tripterocalyx carnea var. wootonii (Standl.) L.A.Galloway
Ranunculus pedatifidus Sm.
Cyclospermum leptophyllum (Pers.) Sprague ex Britton & P.Wilson
Abutilon incanum subsp. pringlei (Hochr.) Felger & Lowe
Tridens muticus var. elongatus (Buckley) Shinners
Sporobolus texanus Vasey
Poa fendleriana var. longiligula (Scribn. & T.A.Williams) Gould
Polygala barbeyana Chodat
Boechera demissa (Greene) W.A.Weber
Paronychia depressa (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt. ex A.Nelson
Erianthus ravennae (L.) P.Beauv.
Lotus maritimus L.
Packera millelobata (Rydb.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Oenothera caespitosa subsp. macroglottis (Rydb.) W.L.Wagner et al.
Wislizenia refracta var. melilotoides (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Allium neapolitanum Cyr.
Populus balsamifera subsp. trichocarpa (Torr. & A.Gray) Hultén
Penstemon barbatus var. trichander A.Gray
Potentilla multifoliata (Torr.) Kearney & Peebles
Ericameria nauseosa var. bigelovii (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Solidago simplex subsp. simplex
Festuca earlei Rydb.
Crataegus succulenta Schrad. ex Link
Pediomelum retrorsum Rydb.
Artemisia ludoviciana var. albula (Wooton) Shinners
Dichanthelium lanuginosum var. fasciculatum (Torr.) Spellenb.
Ferocactus cylindraceus var. eastwoodiae (L.D.Benson) N.P.Taylor
Arabis pygmaea Rollins
Buchloe dactyloides (Nutt.) Engelm.
Erysimum capitatum var. perenne (S.Watson ex Coville) R.J.Davis
Arabis rectissima var. simulans Rollins
Ranunculus aquaticus Neck.
Hesperoyucca newberryi (McKelvey) Clary
Lactuca graminifolia var. arizonica McVaugh
Lupinus hillii var. hillii
Ptelea trifoliata var. angustifolia (Benth.) M.E.Jones
Carex pityophila Mack.
Osmanthus americanus (L.) Knobl., 1933
Gutierrezia megalocephala (Fernald) G.L.Nesom
Camissonia specuicola (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Verbascum chaixii Vill.
Penstemon oliganthus Wooton & Standl.
Chenopodium nitens Benet-Pierce & M.G.Simpson
Musineon divaricatum (Pursh) Raf.
Thevetia neriifolia Juss. ex Steud.
Schefflera elegantissima (H.J.Veitch ex Mast.) Lowry & Frodin
Hymenoxys cooperi var. cooperi
Oreocarya compacta (L.C.Higgins) R.B.Kelley
Draba serpentina (Tiehm & P.Holmgren) Al-Shehbaz & Windham
Convolvulus macrostegius Greene
Elaeagnus hortensis M.Bieb.
Pueraria montana var. lobata (Willd.) Maesen & S.M.Almeida ex Sanjappa & Predeep
Lupinus argenteus var. macounii (Rydb.) R.J.Davis
Gentiana forwoodii Gray
Acacia filicina Willd.
Callirhoe involucrata (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Castilleja parvula var. revealii (Holmgren) N.D.Atwood
Castilleja viscida Rydb.
Penstemon caudatus A.Heller
Delphinium reticulatum (A.Nelson) Rydb.
Ivesia gordonii var. ursinorum (Jeps.) Ertter & Reveal
Psilactis brevilingulata Sch.Bip. ex Hemsl.
Erythronium parviflorum (S.Watson) Goodd.
Ericameria parryi var. affinis (A.Nelson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Astragalus diphysus A.Gray
Oreocarya cinerea Greene
Carex arapahoensis Clokey
Dalea terminalis M.E.Jones
Pseudognaphalium canescens subsp. canescens
Ipomopsis longiflora subsp. longiflora
Coreopsis tinctoria var. tinctoria
Acacia constricta var. constricta
Tetraneuris argentea (A.Gray) Greene
Lupinus osterhoutianus C.P.Sm.
Agastache pallidiflora var. greenei (Briq.) R.W.Sanders
Chenopodium neomexicanum var. neomexicanum
Atriplex elegans var. thornberi M.E.Jones
Tamayorkis ehrenbergii (Rchb.f.) R.González & Szlach.
Mentzelia multiflora var. integra M.E.Jones
Rhamnus crocea subsp. crocea
Arrhenatherum elatius f. elatius
Scutellaria potosina var. grahamiana B.L.Turner
Hordeum hystrix Roth
Sphaeralcea digitata subsp. digitata
Aquilegia caerulea var. pinetorum (Tidestr.) Payson ex Kearney & Peebles
Calochortus nuttallii var. aureus (S.Watson) Ownbey
Frangula betulifolia subsp. betulifolia
Carex abacta L.H.Bailey
Tridens congestus (L.H.Dewey) Nash
Gentianella barbellata (Engelm.) J.M.Gillett
Aconitum infectum Greene
Alyssum minus var. micranthum (C.A.Mey.) T.R.Dudley
Margaranthus solanaceous Schltdl.
Bulbostylis schaffneri (Boeckeler) C.B.Clarke
Silene hallii S.Watson
Sclerocactus havasupaiensis Clover
Stuckenia filiformis subsp. filiformis
Ratibida columnifera subsp. pulcherrima (DC.) Wooton & Standl.
Cyperus fendleranus Boeckeler
Drymocallis Fourr. ex Rydb.
Ferocactus acanthodes var. eastwoodiae L.D.Benson
Lupinus sellulus subsp. sellulus
Gentianella amarella var. acuta Herder
Erigeron nitens G.L.Nesom
Potentilla oblanceolata Rydb.
Malaxis Sol. ex Sw.
Dodecatheon dentatum var. ellisiae (Standl.) N.H.Holmgren
Peteria thompsonae S.Watson
Cyperus engelmannii Steud.
Escobaria vivipara var. vivipara
Fuirena simplex var. aristulata (Torr.) Kral
Chenopodium desiccatum var. desiccatum
Campanula punctata Lam.
Artemisia gnaphalodes Nutt.
Cirsium wheeleri var. wheeleri
Heteranthera reniformis Ruiz & Pav.
Heterotheca fulcrata var. arizonica Semple
Platyschkuhria oblongifolia Rydb.
Rumex pycnanthus Rech.fil.
Arctostaphylos parryana var. pinetorum (Rollins) Wiesl. & B.Schreib.
Rorippa palustris var. glabrata (Lunell) Stuckey
Anthemis cota Sibth. & Sm.
Carex rosea Willd.
Carex lativena S.D.Jones & G.D.Jones
Castilleja haydenii (A.Gray) Cockerell
Lupinus lepidus subsp. aridus (Douglas) Detling
Quercus gambelii var. gambelii
Eucalyptus sideroxylon A.Cunn.
Penstemon laetus var. roezlii (Regel) Jeps.
Synthyris stellata Pennell
Eriogonum beatleyae Reveal
Sisyrinchium douglasii var. inflatum (Suksd.) P.K.Holmgren
Acer interius Britton
Leptochloa panicea (Retz.) Ohwi
Machaeranthera mucronata Greene
Oreocarya alpicola (Cronquist) D.W.Taylor
Lotus parviflorus Desf.
Astragalus anxius Meinke & Kaye
Carex radiata (Wahlenb.) Small
Valeriana capitata subsp. acutiloba (Rydb.) F.G.Mey.
Quercus velutina Lam.
Lupinus pusillus subsp. pusillus
Vicia americana subsp. minor (Hook.) Á.Löve & D.Löve, 1982
Oenothera californica subsp. arizonica (Munz) W.M.Klein
Malacothrix sonorae W.S.Davis & Raven
Galium munzii subsp. ambivalens Dempster & Ehrend.
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. wrightii (A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Phlox longifolia subsp. brevifolia (A.Gray) H.Mason
Tetrachne dregei Nees
Potentilla pennsylvanica Ledeb.
Corispermum hyssopifolium L.
Rhynchosia texana Torr. & A.Gray
Camissonia walkeri subsp. walkeri
Lupinus ingratus Greene
Cyperus retroflexus Buckley
Bromus ciliatus var. laeviglumis Scribn., 1900
Phlox canescens Torr. & A.Gray
Cassia bauhinioides A.Gray
Phemeranthus validulus (Greene) Kiger
Dyschoriste schiedeana var. decumbens (A.Gray) Henrickson
Andropogon hallii Hack.
Oenothera cardiophylla var. splendens Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Packera pseudaurea var. flavula (Greene) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Eustoma grandiflorum (Raf.) Shinners
Sidalcea neomexicana var. neomexicana
Artemisia campestris var. pacifica (Nutt.) M.Peck
Eriogonum ericifolium var. pulchrum (Eastw.) Reveal
Cirsium ochrocentrum subsp. martinii P.Barlow
Ptelea trifoliata var. pallida (Greene) V.L.Bailey
Ericameria nauseosa var. nitida (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Fragaria mexicana Schltdl.
Ceanothus buxifolius Willd. ex Schult.fil.
Rorippa palustris var. glabra (O.E.Schulz) Roy L.Taylor & MacBryde
Chenopodium foliosum (Moench) Asch.
Xylorhiza confertifolia (Cronquist) T.J.Watson
Brickellia betonicaefolia A.Gray, 1852
Sanvitalia angustifolia Engelm. ex A.Gray
Brickellia parvula A.Gray
Beta vulgaris var. crassa Alef.
Musschia aurea (L.f.) Dumort.
Asclepias eriocarpa Torr.
Artemisia discolor Torr. & A.Gray
Crepis scopulorum Coville
Machaeranthera canescens subsp. glabra (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Erigeron chrysopsidis var. austiniae (Greene) Cronquist
Oreocarya ochroleuca (L.C.Higgins) R.B.Kelley
Cistanthe parryi (A.Gray) Hershk.
Oldenlandia corymbosa L.
Trifolium kingii subsp. dedeckerae (J.M.Gillett) D.Heller
Ribes cognatum Greene
Mimulus puniceus (Nutt.) Steud.
Synthyris canbyi Pennell
Potentilla gracilis var. nuttallii (Lehm.) E.Sheld.
Acer nigrum F.Michx.
Agave parviflora subsp. parviflora
Juncus acutus var. leopoldii (Parl.) Buchenau
Potentilla crinata A.Gray
Chrysopsis zionensis (Semple) S.L.Welsh
Vulpia microstachya Munro
Carex saxatilis Suter ex Boott, 1867
Convolvulus purpureus L.
Monoptilon Torr. & A.Gray
Sambucus glauca Nutt.
Teucrium cubense var. densum Jeps.
Trichostema brachiatum L.
Urochloa platyphylla (Munro ex C.Wright) R.D.Webster
Sphaeralcea grossulariifolia subsp. pedata (Torr. ex Gray) Kearney
Myosurus nitidus Eastw.
Euphorbia chaetocalyx var. chaetocalyx
Passiflora ×belotii Pépin
Poa rupicola Nash ex Rydb.
Enneapogon mollis Lehm.
Anemone multifida var. globosa Torr. & A.Gray
Eutrochium maculatum var. bruneri (A.Gray) E.E.Lamont
Thermopsis pinetorum Greene
Bromus ciliatus var. richardsonii (Link) B.Boivin
Silene pringlei S.Watson
Hoffmannseggia jamesii Torr. & A.Gray
Panicum oligosanthes var. scribnerianum (Nash) Fernald
Lomatium austinae (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Echinops sphaerocephalus L.
Erigeron schiedeanum Less.
Moehringia trinervia (L.) Clairv.
Cleomella plocasperma var. mojavensis (Payson) Crum
Astragalus collinus (Hook.) Douglas
Cyperus andinus Palla ex Kük.
Festuca trachyphylla (Hack.) R.P.Murray
Trifolium kingii subsp. kingii
Chrysothamnus pumilus Nutt.
Gentiana tortuosa M.E.Jones
Papaver bracteatum Lindl.
Aquilegia formosa var. fosteri S.L.Welsh
Clematis douglasii Hook.
Buddleja lindleyana Fortune
Cyperus surinamensis Vahl ex Kunth, 1837
Eleocharis robbinsii Oakes
Bromus brizaeformis Fischer & C.Meyer
Tulipa suaveolens Roth
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. stenophyllus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Penstemon rydbergii subsp. aggregatus (Pennell) D.D.Keck
Zuckia brandegeei var. brandegeei
Carex kelloggii var. impressa (L.H.Bailey) B.L.Wilson & Otting
Trisetum montanum Vasey
Heterotheca fulcrata var. fulcrata
Mirabilis oblongifolia (Gray) Heimerl
Arnica chamissonis var. andina (Nutt.) Ediger & T.M.Barkley
Camissonia scapoidea subsp. macrocarpa (P.H.Raven)
Symphyotrichum falcatum var. crassulum (Rydb.) G.L.Nesom
Agoseris glauca var. agrestis (Osterh.) Q.Jones ex Cronquist
Argemone parva (S.L.Welsh) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Potentilla arizonica Greene
Gentiana interrupta Greene
Hedeoma nanum var. namum (Torr.) Briq.
Phaseolus wrightii A.Gray
Penstemon angustifolius var. caudatus (A.Heller) Rydb.
Scabrethia scabra subsp. canescens (W.A.Weber) W.A.Weber
Aloysia gratissima var. gratissima
Galium watsonii (A.Gray) A.Heller
Petradoria Greene
Delphinium pinetorum Tidestr.
Gilia aggregata var. arizonica (Greene) Fosberg
Symphyotrichum ericoides var. ericoides
Agoseris aurantiaca subsp. purpurea (A.Gray) G.W.Douglas
Corydalis aurea var. occidentalis Engelm.
Boechera pulchra var. munciensis (M.E.Jones) Dorn
Scutellaria potosina var. platyphylla (Epling) B.L.Turner
Encelia resinifera subsp. tenuifolia C.Clark
Penstemon caespitosus subsp. desertipicti (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Cirsium eatonii var. eriocephalum (A.Gray) D.J.Keil
Galium angustifolium (Sennen) Sennen
Andropogon scoparius Michx.
Delphinium madrense S.Watson
Agalinis Raf.
Desmodium triflorum Wall.
Saxifraga flagellaris subsp. crandallii (Gand.) Hultén
Hedeoma nanum var. californicum W.S.Stewart
Sanvitalia procumbens Lam.
Penstemon eatonii subsp. undosus (M.E.Jones) D.D.Keck
Leymus salinus subsp. mojavensis Barkworth & R.J.Atkins
Rhus integrifolia (Nutt.) Engl., 1883
Koeberlinia spinosa var. spinosa
Cirsium magnificum (A.Nelson) Rydb.
Tephroseris lindstroemii (Ostenf.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Draba crassifolia var. nevadensis C.L.Hitchc.
Carex perglobosa Mack.
Phlox drummondii Hook.
Pyrus sieboldii Regel
Populus tacamahaca Mill.
Billbergia nutans H.Wendl.
Phragmites communis var. berlandieri (E.Fourn.) Fernald
Holodiscus discolor var. dumosus Maxim. ex J.M.Coult.
Digitaria pubiflora (Vasey) Wipff
Gilia exilis Abrams
Leucosyris riparia (Kunth) Pruski & R.L.Hartm.
Opuntia acanthocarpa var. thornberi (Thornb. & Bonker) L.D.Benson
Allium rhizomatum Wooton & Standl.
Astragalus kentrophyta subsp. coloradoensis (M.E.Jones) W.A.Weber
Dalea wislizeni var. sanctae-crucis (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Sesbania macrocarpa Muhl. ex Raf.
Nissolia wislizeni (A.Gray) A.Gray
Opuntia macrorhiza var. pottsii (Salm-Dyck) L.D.Benson
Castilleja confusa Greene
Perityle gilensis var. salensis A.M.Powell
Digitaria eriantha Steud.
Spiranthes parasitica A.Rich. & Galeotti
Camissonia brevipes subsp. pallidula (Munz) P.H.Raven
Gleditsia triacanthos var. inermis Willd.
Puccinellia fasciculata (Torr.) E.P.Bicknell
Tulipa gesneriana Reboul
Heterotheca canescens (DC.) Shinners
Gilia gunnisonii Torr. & A.Gray
Andropogon glomeratus var. scabriglumus C.S.Campb.
Elymus interruptus Buckley
Rumex densiflorus Osterh.
Seymeria Pursh
Amaranthus powellii subsp. powellii
Scutellaria platyphylla (Epling) B.L.Turner & Delprete
Rubus sachalinensis var. sachalinensis
Zornia gemella Vogel
Acanthus spinosus L.
Amaranthus ×tucsonensis Henrickson
Isotoma fluviatilis (R.Br.) F.Muell. ex Benth.
Achillea taygetea Boiss. & Heldr.
Mentzelia albicaulis var. jonesii Urb. & Gilg
Erigeron higginsii S.L.Welsh
Malacothrix californica var. glabrata A.Gray ex D.C.Eaton, 1871
Ferocactus acanthodes var. lecontei (Engelm.) G.E.Linds.
Sophora japonica L.
Swertia speciosa Wall.
Fuchsia speciosa hort.
Salix novae-angliae subsp. pseudomyrsinites (Andersson) Andersson
Leuciva dealbata (A.Gray) Rydb.
Peucedanum lemmonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Descurainia stricta (Phil.) Prantl ex Reiche
Cirsium virginensis S.L.Welsh
Lonicera korolkowii Stapf
Caryopteris Bunge
Muhlenbergia sylvatica (Torrey) Torrey ex A.Gray
Descurainia incana subsp. viscosa (Rydb.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Astragalus allochrous var. allochrous
Epilobium canum subsp. angustifolium (D.D.Keck) P.H.Raven
Rhamnus serrata Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Phlox austromontana subsp. prostrata (E.Nelson) Wherry
Hedyotis pygmaea Roem. & Schult.
Clematis neomexicana Wooton & Standl.
Callitriche palustris var. verna (L.) Fenley ex Jeps.
Mentzelia laciniata (Rydb.) J.Darl.
Rorippa palustris subsp. fernaldiana (Butters & Abbe) Jonsell
Fimbristylis Vahl
Lupinus caespitosus var. utahensis (S.Watson) B.J.Cox
Psoralea tenuiflora var. bigelovii (Rydb.) J.F.Macbr.
Linaria dalmatica var. dalmatica
Maianthemum racemosum var. amplexicaule (Nutt.) Dorn
Scutellaria potosina var. tessellata (Epling) B.L.Turner
Sambucus caerulea var. neomexicana (Wooton) Rehder
Solidago wrightii f. wrightii
Erigeron versicolor (Greenm.) G.L.Nesom
Chaenactis artemisiaefolia (Harv. & A.Gray ex A.Gray) A.Gray
Erigeron peucephyllus Gray
Hulsea callicarpha (H.M.Hall) S.Watson ex Rydb.
Amelanchier nitens Tidestr.
Xanthisma gracilis D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Ceanothus divaricatus Nutt.
Euonymus europaeus L.
Triodanis perfoliata var. biflora (Ruiz & Pav.) T.R.Bradley
Gaura suffrutescens (Moc. & Sessé) Ser.
Synthyris major A.Heller
Ranunculus septentrionalis Poir.
Citrus grandis (L.) Osbeck
Elymus caninus Roth
Eriogonum heermannii var. apachense (Reveal) Reveal
Senecio perplexus A.Nelson
Mantisalca salmantica (L.) Briq. & Cavill.
Saxifraga debilis Engelm. ex A.Gray
Eragrostis obtusiflora (E.Fourn.) Scribn.
Penstemon triphyllus Douglas ex Lindl.
Crepis occidentalis var. pumila (Rydb.) Babc. & Stebbins
Cyperus hemidrummondii Goetgh.
Eriogonum jamesii var. undulatum (Benth.) S.Stokes ex M.E.Jones
Ericameria parryi var. howardii (Parry ex A.Gray) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Glaucium corniculatum (L.) Rudolph
Achillea millefolium var. occidentalis DC.
Viola affinis Leconte
Muhlenbergia dubia E.Fourn. ex Hemsl.
Hesperostipa (Elias) Barkworth
Lotus unifoliolatus var. unifoliolatus
Echinocystis Torr. & A.Gray
Leptodactylon watsonii (A.Gray) Rydb.
Arenaria lanuginosa subsp. lanuginosa
Hilaria belangeri var. belangeri
Rhamnus smithii Greene
Abronia angustifolia var. arizonica (Standl.) Kearney & Peebles
Apium graveolens var. dulce (Mill.) DC.
Pediomelum verdiense S.L.Welsh & Licher
Artemisia biennis var. biennis
Pascopyrum Á.Löve
Gilia subacaulis Rydb.
Atriplex argentea var. rydbergii (Standl.) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus aschenbornii S.Schauer
Eryngium yuccifolium Michx.
Bouvardia tenuifolia Standl.
Laennecia spellenbergii G.L.Nesom
Synthyris plantaginea (James) Benth.
Erigeron accedens Greene
Erigeron sparsiflorus Eastw.
Eragrostis erosa Scribn., 1896
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. junceus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Opuntia erinacea var. ursina (F.A.C.Weber) Parish
Astragalus arthurii M.E.Jones
Astragalus calycosus var. mancus (Rydb.) Barneby
Symphoricarpos rotundifolius var. oreophilus (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Lupinus volutans Greene
Sophora secundiflora (Ortega) Lag. ex DC.
Gentiana affinis var. major A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Linum aristatum var. australe (A.Heller) Kearney & Peebles
Pogonarthria squarrosa (Licht.) Pilg.
Grammatotheca bergiana (Cham.) C.Presl
Viola praemorsa var. linguifolia (Nutt.) M.Peck
Cryptantha fulvocanescens var. nitida (Greene) Sivinski
Aster foliaceus var. burkei A.Gray
Linanthastrum floribundum (A.Gray) Wherry
Anoda lanceolata Hook. & Arn.
Penstemon trichander (A.Gray) Rydb.
Krigia biflora (Walter) S.F.Blake
Verbena elegans Schauer
Phlox austromontana subsp. densa (Brand) Wherry
Cyphia volubilis (Burm.f.) Willd.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. sandbergii Reveal
Krameria glandulosa Rose & Painter
Viola nephrophylla var. arizonica (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Linum perenne var. lewisii (Pursh) Eaton & C.Wright
Thalictrum fendleri var. wrightii (A.Gray) Trel.
Boerhaavia erecta L.
Anulocaulis leiosolenus var. leiosolenus
Viola pinetorum subsp. grisea (Jeps.) R.J.Little
Symphyotrichum ciliolatum (Lindl.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Carex microptera var. crassinervia F.J.Herm.
Arabis rigidissima Rollins
Physaria lepidota subsp. membranacea (Rollins) O'Kane
Agave parryi var. parryi
Campanula grossekii Heuff.
Valerianella congesta Lindl.
Hylotelephium telephium (L.) H.Ohba
Astragalus lentiginosus var. wahweapensis S.L.Welsh
Cytisus spachianus (Webb) Kuntze
Gentiana calycosa subsp. asepala Maguire
Geranium caespitosum var. marginale (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Magnolia coco (Lour.) DC.
Mimulus spissus A.L.Grant
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. shoshonense (A.Nelson) Reveal
Buddleja alternifolia Maxim.
Scilla non-scripta (L.) Hoffmanns. & Link
Antennaria luzuloides var. luzuloides
Galium uncinulatum DC.
Ipomopsis aggregata var. maculata (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Gossypium thuberi Tod.
Cercis canadensis subsp. texensis (S.Watson) A.E.Murray
Medicago sativa subsp. falcata (L.) Arcang.
Astragalus missouriensis var. mimetes Barneby
Androsace septentrionalis subsp. glandulosa (Wooton & Standl.) G.T.Robbins
Viola bicolor Pursh
Ziziphus mauritiana Lam.
Solidago canadensis var. gilvocanescens Rydb.
Dichanthelium linearifolium (Scribn.) Gould
Bidens pilosa var. radiata Sch.Bip.
Balsamita major Desf.
Oenothera laciniata var. pubescens Munz
Boerhaavia coccinea Mill.
Phleum pratense var. pratense
Brickellia oreithales (B.L.Rob.) Shinners
Pseudostellaria Pax
Carduus pycnocephalus Spreng.
Toxicodendron radicans var. rydbergii (Small ex Rydb.) Erskine
Ipomopsis aggregata subsp. arizonica (Greene) V.E.Grant & A.D.Grant
Psoralidium lanceolatum var. stenophyllum (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Boechera kelseyana Windham & Allphin
Sagittaria Ruppius ex L.
Viburnum acerifolium L.
Atriplex hillmanii (M.E.Jones) Standl.
Bupleurum rotundifolium L.
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. latifolius (D.C.Eaton) Greene
Ranunculus orthorhynchus subsp. platyphyllus (A.Gray) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Boechera fernaldiana subsp. fernaldiana
Draba oreibata J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Trifolium andersonii subsp. monoense (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Scutellaria epilobiifolia A.Ham.
Eriogonum leptophyllum var. vallis-rubrum Reveal & A.Clifford
Saxifraga columbiana Piper
Carex vulpinoidea var. vulpinoidea
Collomia grandiflora var. axillaris A.Nelson
Crepis runcinata subsp. barberi (Greenm.) Babc. & Stebbins
Penstemon idahoensis N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh
Cirsium bipinnatum (Eastw.) Rydb.
Geranium carolinianum var. carolinianum
Phaseolus angustifolius Roxb.
Limonium limbatum Small
Oenothera longissima subsp. typica Munz
Suaeda suffrutescens S.Watson
Camissonia arenaria (A.Nelson) Raven
Coreopsis californica var. newberryi (A.Gray) E.B.Sm.
Geranium caespitosum var. caespitosum
Wahlenbergia undulata (L.f.) A.DC.
Roldana Llave ex Lex.
Cirsium undulatum var. tracyi (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Malus baccata (L.) Borkh.
Thermopsis rhombifolia var. divaricarpa (A.Nelson) Isely
Cenchrus biflorus Roxb.
Agastache micrantha var. micrantha
Ratibida Raf.
Cirsium calcareum var. pulchellum (Greene ex Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Funastrum cynanchoides subsp. cynanchoides
Cassia serpens L.
Erigeron concinnus var. subglaber (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom
Salix arctica var. petraea Andersson
Hedeoma costata Hemsl.
Hyptis Jacq.
Eriogonum ovalifolium subsp. purpureum (Nutt.) S.Stokes
Castilleja linearifolia Benth.
Allium geyeri subsp. tenerum (M.E.Jones) Traub & Ownbey
Oxytropis lambertii subsp. bigelovii (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Polygonum convolvulaceum Lam.
Eriogonum thompsonae var. albiflorum Reveal
Packera neomexicana var. toumeyi (Greene) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Hedeoma nanum var. macrocalyx W.S.Stewart
Townsendia condensata Parry ex A.Gray
Impatiens biflora Walter
Philadelphus inodorus L.
Rotala rotundifolia (Buch.-Ham. ex Roxb.) Koehne
Dieteria bigelovii var. bigelovii
Limonium bellidifolium (Gouan) Dumort.
Eriogonum insigne S.Watson
Casimiroa edulis S.Watson
Populus nigra var. italica Du Roi
Sagittaria arifolia Nutt. ex J.G.Sm.
Populus tremula subsp. tremuloides (Michx.) Á. & D.Löve
Machaeranthera verna A.Nelson
Sicyosperma A.Gray
Leptodactylon pungens var. hallii (Parish) Jeps.
Jasione humilis (Pers.) Loisel.
Petalostemon candidus var. oligophyllus (Torr.) F.J.Herm.
Lupinus hillii var. osterhoutianus (C.P.Sm.) Harmon
Hymenoclea Torr. & A.Gray
Digitaria eriantha subsp. pentzii (Stent) Kok
Echinocereus fasciculatus var. bonkerae (Thornb. & Bonker) L.D.Benson
Castilleja lineata Greene
Salvia macrophylla Benth.
Mentzelia filifolia J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Muhlenbergia pulcherrima Scribn. ex Beal
Sisyrinchium inalatum A.Nelson
Heliomeris soliceps (Barneby) Yates
Elymus trachycaulus subsp. violaceus (Hornem.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Lomatium grayi var. depauperatum (M.E.Jones) Mathias
Agoseris cuspidata (Pursh) Steud.
Amaranthus grandiflorus (J.M.Black) J.M.Black
Tetracoccus fasciculatus var. fasciculatus
Penstemon linarioides var. viridis D.D.Keck
Fraxinus pennsylvanica subsp. subintegerrima (Vahl) A.E.Murray
Syringa L.
Ludwigia peploides var. montevidensis (Spreng.) Shinners
Collinsia solitaria Kellogg
Limonium latifolium (Sm.) Kuntze
Dodecatheon puberulum (Nutt.) Piper
Potentilla sibbaldii Haller f.
Spiraea douglasii var. roseata (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Anticlea elegans subsp. vaginata (Rydb.) Palmquist & T.J.Ayers
Ipomopsis congesta var. crebrifolia (Nutt.) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus artipes A.Gray
Gnaphalium jaliscense Greenm.
Suaeda taxifolia subsp. brevifolia (Standl.) Abrams
Sophora sericea Nutt.
Citrullus lanatus subsp. lanatus
Camissonia confertiflora (Raven) Raven
Dinebra panicea (Retz.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Guilleminea densa var. densa
Ammoselinum giganteum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Nemacladus rubescens var. rubescens
Isocoma coronopifolia (A.Gray) Greene
Scutellaria platyphylla var. occidentalis S.L.Rhodes & T.J.Ayers
Rosa spinosissima L.
Echinocactus polycephalus subsp. xeranthemoides (J.M.Coult.) N.P.Taylor
Linum rupestre Engelm. ex A.Gray
Garrya ovata Benth.
Glandularia wrightii (A.Gray) Umber
Crossosoma bigelovii var. bigelovii
Pimpinella anisum S.G.Gmel.
Malacothrix clevelandii var. stebbinsii (W.S.Davis & P.H.Raven) Cronquist
Oreostemma alpigenum subsp. haydenii (Porter) Semple
Drosera longifolia L.
Lotus glaber Mill.
Centaurium venustum subsp. venustum
Eriogonum ochrocephalum var. calcareum (S.Stokes) M.Peck
Petrea volubilis Walp., 1843
Potentilla glandulosa var. wrangelliana (Fisch. & Avé-Lall.) Th.Wolf
Penstemon attenuatus subsp. pseudoprocerus (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Erigeron sionis var. sionis
Cerastium arvense var. strictum (L.) Rydb., 1900
Penstemon cleavelandii var. mohavensis D.D.Keck
Holosteum umbellatum var. umbellatum
Townsendia excapa (Richardson) T.Porter
Mimosa dysocarpa var. wrightii (A.Gray) Kearney & Peebles
Eriogonum heermannii subsp. argense (M.E.Jones) Munz
Picradeniopsis oppositifolia (Nutt.) Rydb. ex Britton
Pentzia incana (Thunb.) Kuntze
Cryptotaenia canadensis (L.) DC.
Paspalum notatum Flüggé
Corispermum americanum var. rydbergii Mosyakin
Astragalus silerianus M.E.Jones
Leymus salinus subsp. salinus
Agropyron cristatum var. cristatum
Fraxinus cuspidata var. macropetala (Eastw.) Rehder
Dalea ananassa Barneby
Drymaria multiflora Brandegee
Echinocactus xeranthemoides (J.M.Coult.) Engelm. ex Rydb.
Stapelia gigantea N.E.Br.
Saussurea weberi Hultén
Thelypodiopsis wyomingensis (A.Nelson) Rydb.
Cirsium eatonii var. hesperium (Eastw.) D.J.Keil
Lepidium alyssoides var. angustifolium (C.L.Hitchc.) Rollins
Phaseolus caracalla L.
Trifolium parryi subsp. parryi
Jamesia americana var. americana
Magnolia fraseri Walter
Eriogonum racemosum var. zionis (J.T.Howell) S.L.Welsh
Rheum rhaponticum S.G.Gmel. ex Ledeb.
Crocus maesiacus Ker Gawl.
Ericameria nauseosa var. nana (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Chrysothamnus pulchellus var. baileyi (Wooton & Standl.) S.F.Blake
Baccharis viminea var. viminea
Desmodium exiguum A.Gray
Silene acaulis var. subaculescens (F.N.Williams) Hultén
Ludwigia peploides subsp. glabrescens (Kuntze) Raven
Petalostemon flavescens S.Watson
Androsace septentrionalis subsp. subumbellata A.Nelson, 1944
Leucosyris parviflora (A.Gray) Pruski & R.L.Hartm.
Thymus vulgaris Willk.
Muscari commutatum Guss.
Dichanthelium acuminatum var. sericeum (Schmoll) Freckmann
Petradoria graminea Wooton & Standl.
Castilleja linariifolia var. omnipubescens (Pennell) Clokey
Fraxinus velutina var. glabra Rehder
Lupinus argenteus subsp. moabensis D.B.Dunn & Harmon
Euphorbia dioica Hieron.
Eriogonum howellii var. subracemosum S.Stokes
Teloxys graveolens (Willd.) W.A.Weber
Lithospermum calycosum (J.F.Macbr.) I.M.Johnst.
Donnellsmithia juncea (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Spreng.) Mathias & Constance
Helianthus petiolaris var. fallax (Heiser) B.L.Turner
Ericameria nauseosa var. turbinata (M.E.Jones) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Atriplex truncata var. stricta A.Gray
Agrostemma brachyloba (Fenzl) K.Hammer
Mortonia scabrella var. utahensis Coville ex A.Gray
Vicia sativa var. angustifolia (L.) Ser.
Carya pecan (Marshall) Nutt.
Juglans pecan Walter
Pedicularis oederi Vahl ex Hornem.
Carex gynandra Schwein.
Eriogonum shockleyi var. longilobum (M.E.Jones) Reveal
Gaillardia multiceps Greene
Linanthus aureus subsp. decorus (A.Gray) H.Mason
Agastache pallidiflora subsp. typica Lint & Epling
Astragalus bigelovii var. mogollonicus (Greene) Barneby
Chenopodium album var. striatum Kra
Atriplex canescens var. angustifolia (Torr.) S.Watson
Brickellia amplexicaulis var. amplexicaulis
Verbena neomexicana var. xylopoda L.M.Perry
Morus alba var. tatarica (L.) Ser.
Ribes cereum var. pedicellare W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Sphaeralcea incana var. cuneata (Kearney) Kearney
Solidago altissima subsp. altissima
Setaria vulpiseta (Lam.) Roem. & Schult.
Echinocereus engelmannii subsp. variegatus (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) E.Lutz
Gilia multiflora Nutt.
Thelypodium longifolium (Benth.) S.Watson
Lomatium swingerae R.P.McNeill
Boechera pulchra var. pulchra
Cirsium centaureae (Rydb.) K.Schum.
Atriplex bonnevillensis C.A.Hanson
Chenopodium leptophyllum Nutt. ex Moq., 1849
Apocynum suksdorfii Greene
Engelmannia peristenia (Raf.) Goodman & C.A.Lawson
Aster foliaceus var. frondeus A.Gray
Physaria rubicundula (Rollins) S.L.Welsh
Rhododendron ferrugineum L.
Trifolium agrarium Mérat
Koeberlinia spinosa var. wivaggii W.C.Holmes, K.L.Yip & Rushing
Rhinanthus rigidus Chabert
Protea L.
Drymocallis pseudorupestris var. pseudorupestris
Rosa banksiae R.Br.
Solanum rantonnetii Carrière
Cephalanthera austinae Benth. & Hook.f.
Kniphofia uvaria (L.) T.Durand & Schinz, 1894
Rosa gallica L.
Chrysothamnus puberulus Greene
Trillium ovatum subsp. ovatum
Allium bisceptrum var. palmeri (S.Watson) Cronquist
Mirabilis melanotricha (Standl.) Spellenb.
Ciclospermum leptophyllum (Pers.) Sprague
Ericameria viscidiflora subsp. viscidiflora
Plantago australis subsp. hirtella (Kunth) Rahn
Anthemis tinctoria L.
Cirsium parryi subsp. mogollonicum Schaack & Goodwin
Morus L.
Heteranthera dubia f. terrestre (Farw.) Vict.
Sophora formosa Kearney & Peebles
Tridens eragrostoides (Vasey & Scribn.) Nash
Crepis runcinata var. barberi (Greenm.) B.L.Turner
Rosa woodsii var. arizonica (Rydb.) W.C.Martin & C.R.Hutchins
Ammannia auriculata Willd.
Descurainia pinnata var. paysonii (Detling) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Valeriana apiifolia A.Gray ex S.Watson
Salvia mexicana Walter
Eriogonum shoshonense A.Nelson
Setaria viridis var. major Gray
Zinnia juniperifolia (DC.) A.Gray
Atriplex draconis M.E.Jones
Antennaria luzuloides var. microcephala (A.Gray) Cronquist
Solidago multiradiata subsp. scopulorum (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Physaria hitchcockii var. rubicundula (Rollins) B.L.Turner
Acacia hakeoides A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Rumex salicifolius var. triangulivalvis (Danser) C.L.Hitchc.
Draba viridis A.Heller
Lupinus wyethii var. prunophilus (M.E.Jones) C.P.Sm.
Penstemon oreocharis Greene
Aquilegia thalictrifolia Schott & Kotschy
Ranunculus asiaticus Thunb.
Zostera marina Vis., 1826
Senecio mogollonicus Greene
Aster ericoides L.
Ericameria viscidiflora subsp. lanceolata (Nutt.) L.C.Anderson
Cryptantha intermedia var. hendersonii (A.Nelson) Jeps. & Hoover
Leptodactylon pungens var. pungens
Maianthemum racemosum subsp. racemosum
Danthonia caespitosa Nees, 1846
Sambucus cerulea var. cerulea
Isanthus brachiatus (L.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Anagallis monelli M.Bieb.
Macroptilium heterophyllum (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Maréchal & Baudet
Centaurea picris Pall. ex Willd.
Heterosperma Cav.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. mohavensis (Greene) H.M.Hall
Aristida purpurea subsp. robusta (Merr.) Piper
Brickellia californica var. desertorum (Coville) Parish ex H.M.Hall
Lotus salsuginosus subsp. brevivexillus (Ottley) Munz
Mertensia foliosa A.Nelson
Eriogonum purpusi Brandegee
Sanguisorba minor subsp. balearica (Bourg. ex Nyman) Muñoz Garm. & C.Navarro
Cymopterus longilobus (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Pyrrocoma clementis var. clementis
Habenaria crassicornis Lindl.
Viguiera linearis (Cav.) Sch.Bip. ex Hemsl.
Carex microcarpa Bertol. ex Moris
Polemonium delicatum Rydb.
Arctotis stoechadifolia var. grandis (Thunb.) Less.
Arnica cordifolia var. pumila (Rydb.) Maguire
Solidago pumila Pers.
Physaria floribunda Rydb.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. deserticum Reveal
Forsythia ovata Nakai
Gayophytum eriospermun Coville
Rosa grosseserrata E.E.Nelson
Galium asperrimum A.Gray
Heuchera pachypoda Greene
Eriophorum vaginatum L.
Elymus alaskanus (Scribn. & Merr.) Á.Löve
Convolvulus capillaceus Kunth
Phyllanthus warnockii G.L.Webster
Asclepias obtusifolia var. latifolia Torr.
Ctenophyllum Rydb.
Populus zaddachi Heer
Opuntia feroacantha Britton & Rose
Opuntia littoralis var. vaseyi (J.M.Coult.) L.D.Benson & Walk.
Opuntia engelmannii subsp. engelmannii
Opuntia phaeacantha var. phaeacantha
Opuntia puberula Hort.Vindob. ex Pfeiff.
Opuntia pumila Rose
Opuntia lagunae Baxter ex Bravo
Opuntia littoralis var. austrocalifornica L.D.Benson & Walk.
Opuntia fuliginosa Griffiths
Opuntia phaeacantha var. laevis (Coult.) L.D.Benson
Umbilicaria Heist. ex Fabr.
Luzula erecta Desv.
Lupinus ursinus Eastw.
Androsace pinetorum Greene
Psoralea strobilina Hook. & Arn.
Alsine laricifolia (L.) Crantz
Crataegus macracantha Lodd.
Malva hederacea Douglas
Seriphidium arbusculum (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Potentilla pensylvanica var. virgulata (A.Nelson) Th.Wolf
Petroselinum segetum (L.) Koch
Galium parisiense var. parisiense
Sidalcea hickmanii subsp. petraea S.R.Hill & Halse
Saxifraga ferruginea var. ferruginea
Aconitum columbianum subsp. viviparum (Greene) Brink
Horkelia congesta Douglas ex Hook.
Plagiobothrys figuratus var. corallicarpus (Piper) K.L.Chambers
Pedicularis aurantiaca (E.F.Sprague) Monfils & Prather
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. androsaemifolium
Dodecatheon austrofrigidum K.L.Chambers
Eriogonum luteolum var. saltuarium Reveal
Salicornia utahensis (Tidestr.) A.J.Scott
Rhododendron menziesii subsp. glabellum (A.Gray) Craven
Thlaspi parviflorum A.Nelson
Aligera barbata Suksd.
Verbena gentryi Moldenke
Helianthus petiolaris var. petiolaris
Eritrichium barbigerum A.Gray
Hemizonia durandii A.Gray
Callisteris arizonica Greene
Polygonum smallii Kongar
Sisymbrium microtites B.L.Rob.
Opuntia alcahes F.A.C.Weber
Astragalus eremiticus var. malheurensis (A.Heller) Barneby
Lippia pringlei Briq.
Eriogonum latum Small
Cardamine helleriana O.E.Schulz
Batidaea sandbergii Greene
Delphinium lineapetalum f. viscidum Ewan
Lupinus collinus (Greene) A.Heller
Downingia pallida Hoover
Arenaria pusilla var. diffusa Maguire
Cryptantha trifurca Eastw.
Cymopterus terebinthinus var. terebinthinus
Atriplex verna Jeps.
Heuchera parvifolia var. typica Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Malacothrix californica var. californica
Claytonia spathulata var. disciformis (Suksd.) Suksd.
Arabis elegans A.Nelson
Withania adpressa Coss.
Opuntia versicolor Engelm.
Aristida schiedeana var. minor Vasey
Oxytropis sericea Nutt ex Torr. & A.Gray
Lupinus bernardinus (Abrams ex C.P.Sm.) Abrams
Cryptocarya rubra (Molina) Skeels
Balsamorhiza hirsuta var. lagocephala W.M.Sharp
Perovskia Karel.
Begonia convolvulacea (Klotzsch) A.DC.
Stellaria borealis var. borealis
Cardamine bulbosa (Schreb. ex Muhl.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Diospyros sinaloensis S.F.Blake
Salix caudata var. bryantiana C.R.Ball & Bracelin
Oryctanthus alveolatus (Kunth) Kuijt
Antennaria maculata Greene
Arabis lasiocarpa Rollins
Salvia elegans var. sonorensis Fernald
Nolina caudata Trel.
Platystemon tortuosus Greene
Galium scabriusculum (Ehrend.) Dempster & Ehrend.
Stellaria longipes var. altocaulis (Hultén) C.L.Hitchc.
Parietaria pensylvanica Muhl.
Cerastium fischerianum Ser.
Penstemon linarioides subsp. maguirei D.D.Keck
Dalea confusa (Rydb.) Barneby
Banksia integrifolia L.fil.
Montia parviflora var. adsurgens Suksd.
Phytolacca weberbaueri H.Walter
Acacia pennatula subsp. pennatula
Allium neomexicanum Rydb.
Verbena wrightii var. intermedia Moldenke
Madronella oblongifolia Rydb.
Physaria integrifolia var. monticola Lichvar
Saracha nana A.Gray
Lesquerella garrettii Payson
Eremogone fendleri var. brevicaulis (Maguire) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Blitum spathulatum (A.Gray) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Linum rigidum Pursh
Ambrosia arborescens Lam., 1783
Cereus gonzalezii F.A.C.Weber
Cymopterus acaulis var. parvus Goodrich
Acacia albida Delile
Banksia lemanniana Meisn.
Penstemon speciosus var. speciosus
Sedum wootonii Britton
Astragalus lyallii var. caricinus M.E.Jones
Juncus arcticus subsp. arcticus
Chamaecrista brandegeei Rose
Cyperus aristatus Boeckeler
Rosa muriculata Greene
Juncus polyanthemus Buchenau
Chamaecrista alamosensis Britton & Rose
Oenothera mexicana Spach
Lewisia sacajaweana B.L.Wilson
Poa annua var. rigidiuscula Dewey
Evax caulescens (Benth.) A.Gray
Aechmea orlandiana L.B.Sm.
Jaltomata repandidentata (Dunal) Hunz.
Hieracium canadense var. canadense
Rudbeckia hirta var. serotina (Nutt.) Core
Penstemon desertipicti A.Nelson
Malacothrix indecora Greene
Arnica monocephala Rydb.
Penstemon glandulosus var. chelanensis (D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Arabis subpinnatifida var. impar (A.Nelson) Rollins
Cerastium acutatum Suksd.
Erythraea venusta A.Gray
Juncus latifolius (Engelm.) Buchenau
Caryota mitis Lour.
Claytonia depressa var. latifolia Suksd.
Anemone patens var. multifida Pritz.
Machaeranthera centaureoides Greene ex Wooton & Standl.
Arenaria stenomeres Eastw.
Penstemon nitidus var. polyphyllus (Pennell) Cronquist
Convolvulus sepium L.
Cereus orcuttii K.Brandegee
Catalpa speciosa (Warder ex Barney) Warder
Phaca vallicola Rydb.
Microseris alpestris (A.Gray) Q.Jones ex Cronquist
Washingtonia intermedia Rydb.
Oenothera cespitosa var. cespitosa
Cardamine palmeri S.Watson
Dodecatheon dentatum var. utahense N.H.Holmgren
Perityle greenei Rose
Lesquerella hitchcockii Munz
Quercus echinacea Torr.
Euphorbia schizoloba var. mollis Norton
Cota tinctoria (L.) J.Gay ex Guss.
Rosa collaris Rydb.
Physaria prostrata (A.Nelson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Iva L.
Epilobium watsonii Barbey ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson, 1876
Banksia serrata Cav.
Carex marcida Boott
Pyrrocoma carthamoides var. subsquarrosa (Greene) G.K.Br. & D.J.Keil
Mertensia lanceolata var. lanceolata
Potentilla dascia Rydb.
Burrielia gracilis DC.
Primula alcalina Cholewa & Douglass M.Hend.
Antennaria microcephala Gray
Sedum obtusatum subsp. retusum (Rose) Clausen
Lupinus longipes Greene
Fraxinus pennsylvanica var. austinii Fernald
Astragalus riparius Barneby
Arenaria aberrans M.E.Jones
Elymus villosus var. glabriusculus Torr.
Draba pectinipila Rollins
Haplopappus bloomeri A.Gray
Gentiana calycosa var. asepala (Maguire) C.L.Hitchc.
Aster mearnsii Rydb.
Lomatium graveolens var. clarkii S.L.Welsh
Salix eriocephala var. ligulifolia (C.R.Ball) Dorn
Gilia gilioides var. violacea (A.Heller) Cronquist
Lupinus cariciformis C.P.Sm.
Dendropemon emarginatus var. lepidotus Krug & Urb.
Malaxis purpurea (Lindl.) Kuntze
Zinnia tenuis (S.Watson) Strother
Sophia viscosa Rydb.
Festuca suksdorfii Piper, 1923
Trautvetteria media Greene
Arabis pendulina var. pendulina
Polygala acanthoclada var. intricata Eastw.
Comandra umbellata var. umbellata
Astragalus shortianus var. brachylobus A.Gray
Brickellia laciniata A.Gray
Oxytropis riparia Litv.
Ericameria discoidea var. linearis (Rydb.) G.L.Nesom
Gilia prostrata A.Gray
Xylophacos ventosus Rydb.
Cryptantha coryi I.M.Johnst.
Jacobinia Moric.
Panicularia nervata var. rigida Nash
Azara integrifolia Ruiz & Pav.
Arctostaphylos pinetorum Rollins
Elodea longivaginata H.St.John
Orcuttia mucronata Crampton
Lupinus burkei subsp. caeruleomontanus D.B.Dunn & B.J.Cox
Leptochloa pluriflora (E.Fourn.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Alyssum parviflorum Fisch. ex M.Bieb.
Chondropetalum Rottb.
Lolium temulentum f. glaberrimum Kuntze, 1891
Carex tiogana D.W.Taylor & J.D.Mastrog.
Townsendia microcephala Dorn
Solidago caesia f. caesia
Philadelphus californicus Benth.
Cercocarpus ledifolius f. subglaber C.K.Schneid.
Aliciella nyensis (Reveal) J.M.Porter
Cogswellia millefolia var. depauperata M.E.Jones
Bidens reptans var. urbanii (Greenm.) O.E.Schulz
Gayophytum diffusum var. diffusum
Bothriochloa pertusa (L.) A.Camus
Heliopsis buphthalmoides (Jacq.) Dunal
Opuntia multigeniculata Clokey
Plantago ignota E.Morris
Sida sagittifolia (A.Gray) Rydb.
Astragalus julianus M.E.Jones
Salix californica Bebb
Platanthera zothecina (L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh) Kartesz & Gandhi
Potentilla monidensis A.Nelson
Festuca roemeri var. klamathensis B.L.Wilson
Dalea megacarpa S.Watson
Lupinus bassett-maguirei C.P.Sm.
Sedum divergens Greene
Bartonia aurea Lindl.
Macrorhynchus retrorsus Benth.
Penstemon chionophilus Greene
Lycium berlandieri f. parviflorum (A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Audibertiella argentea Rydb.
Lasthenia macrantha subsp. macrantha
Erigeron caespitosus var. nauseosus M.E.Jones
Stanleya canescens Rydb.
Arabis stricta Costa
Hackelia ursina var. ursina
Agropyron riparium Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Vernonia triflosculosa subsp. palmeri (Rose) S.B.Jones
Howellia limosa Greene
Dodecatheon hendersonii subsp. hendersonii
Atropa belladonna L.
Rhamnus californica var. tomentella (Benth.) W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Hoffmannseggia glabra Fisher
Penstemon barbatus var. puberulus A.Gray
Xylorhiza lanceolata Rydb.
Fragaria truncata Rydb.
Chylismia scapoidea var. scapoidea
Sporobolus townsendii (H.Groves & J.Groves) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Cassiope mertensiana var. gracilis (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Festuca brachyphylla subsp. brachyphylla
Leucaena retusa Benth.
Calamagrostis acutiflora (Schrad.) DC.
Polycnemum arvense L.
Luzula parviflora var. fastigiata (E.Mey.) Buchenau
Cistus monspeliensis L.
Iris setosa Pall. ex Link
Silene coronaria (L.) Clairv. ex Rchb.
Primula veris L.
Maianthemum canadense Desf.
Calendula arvensis M.Bieb., 1819
Senecio squalidus L.
Galium saxatile L.
Blitum virgatum L.
Ixia maculata L.
Celtis caudata Planch.
Asclepias syriaca L.
Chamaemelum nobile (L.) All.
Symphyotrichum novae-angliae (L.) G.L.Nesom
Helianthus pauciflorus Nutt.
Galium mollugo L.
Taraxacum parnassicum Dahlst.
Erigeron flabellifolius Rydb.
Agave vivipara L.
Agave bovicornuta Gentry
Clitoria ternatea L.
Heuchera grossulariifolia var. grossulariifolia
Handroanthus chrysanthus (Jacq.) S.O.Grose
Ceanothus ferrisiae Mc Minn
Populus tremula L.
Artemisia borealis Kitam.
Chylismia eastwoodiae (Munz) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Eriogonum lachnogynum var. sarahiae (N.D.Atwood & A.Clifford) Reveal
Mentha spicata subsp. spicata
Drosera pygmaea DC.
Sedum makinoi Maxim.
Nigella sativa L.
Cyclamen repandum Sm.
Clematis occidentalis var. dissecta (C.L.Hitchc.) J.S.Pringle
Begonia cucullata Willd.
Arctostaphylos patula subsp. patula
Zea L.
Cajanus Adans.
Ferocactus peninsulae var. santa-maria (Britton & Rose) N.P.Taylor
Cochemiea halei (Brandegee) Walton
Dyssodia littoralis Brandegee
Dalea divaricata Benth.
Cuscuta corymbosa Ruiz & Pav.
Cassia confinis Greene
Agave sobria var. roseana (Trel.) I.M.Johnst.
Cryptantha grayi var. grayi
Alvordia brandegeei Carter
Amyris madrensis S.Watson
Galvezia juncea var. pubescens I.M.Johnst.
Wilcoxia striata (K.Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Echinocactus wislizenii Engelm.
Cuscuta polyanthemos W.Schaffn. ex Yunck.
Bursera cerasiifolia Brandegee
Heterosperma coreocarpoides (Sherff) Sherff
Mentzelia hispida Willd.
Opuntia santamaria (Baxter) Bravo
Carlowrightia cordifolia A.Gray
Phyllanthus ciliatoglandulosus Millsp.
Thryallis angustifolia (Benth.) Rose
Mammillaria fraileana (Britton & Rose) Boed.
Tradescantia heterophylla Brandegee
Passiflora exsudans Zucc.
Carlowrightia californica Brandegee
Sphaeralcea coulteri var. margaritae (Brandegee) Kearney
Drymaria arenarioides Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Sibara palmeri (S.Watson) Greene
Mammillaria baxteriana (H.E.Gates) Boed.
Euphorbia comonduana Millsp.
Acacia filicioides (Cav.) Trel.
Cynanchum kunthii (Decne.) Standl.
Houstonia australis I.M.Johnst.
Portulaca lanceolata Haw.
Macroptilium longepedunculatum (Mart. ex Benth.) Urb.
Haplopappus spinulosus subsp. scabrellus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Brickellia lanata (DC.) A.Gray
Maba intricata (A.Gray) Hiern
Hydrocharis morsus-ranae L.
Sabal rosei (O.F.Cook) Becc.
Sabal pumos (Kunth) Burret
Nolina durangensis Trel.
Capsella rubella Reut.
Medicago minima (L.) Lam.
Bothriochloa perforata (Trin. ex E.Fourn.) Herter
Poacynum Baill.
Euphorbia chamaesyce L.
Cenchrus durus (Beal) Morrone
Syrmatium ornithopus (Greene) Greene
Prosopis yaquiana R.A.Palacios
Argythamnia mercurialina (Nutt.) Müll.Arg.
Bursera inaguensis (Britton) Britton
Mortonia sempervirens A.Gray
Pseudoroegneria (Nevski) Á.Löve
Muhlenbergia lehmanniana Henrard
Triodanis perfoliata subsp. biflora (Ruiz & Pav.) Lammers
Cuscuta gronovii var. gronovii
Eriogonum microtheca var. foliosum (Torr. & A.Gray) Reveal
Aster humistratus Gand.
Plagiobothrys strictus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Saxifraga howellii Greene
Lesquerella kingii subsp. diversifolia (Greene) Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Chorizanthe chrysacantha Goodman
Hemizonia luzulifolia subsp. rudis (Benth.) D.D.Keck
Polygonum multiflorum Thunb.
Polygonum punctatum var. punctatum
Lupinus nanus subsp. menkerae (C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Odontonema tubiforme (Bertol.) Kuntze
Lasthenia burkei (Greene) Greene
Acacia greggii var. arizonica Isely
Trifolium barbigerum var. barbigerum
Arctostaphylos andersonii var. pallida (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Rhamnus californica subsp. occidentalis (Howell) C.B.Wolf
Machaeranthera shastensis A.Gray
Arctostaphylos columbiana var. tracyi (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Homalobus laurentii Rydb.
Microsteris gracilis subsp. gracilis
Spiraea densiflora var. splendens (Baumann ex K.Koch) C.L.Hitchc.
Ranunculus occidentalis var. eisenii (Kellogg) A.Gray
Saltugilia grinnellii (Brand) L.A.Johnson
Hemizonia halliana D.D.Keck
Achnatherum latiglume (Swallen) Barkworth
Boechera pratincola (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Eriogonum microtheca var. johnstonii Reveal
Dentaria integrifolia var. californica (Nutt.) Jeps.
Tristagma uniflorum (Lindl.) Traub
Cassiope mertensiana subsp. ciliolata Piper
Camissonia robusta Raven
Linanthus aureus var. decora (A.Gray) Jeps.
Cercocarpus intricatus var. intricatus
Eriogonum nidularium var. luciense M.E.Jones
Lupinus odoratus var. odoratus
Cistanthe umbellata var. umbellata
Cercocarpus ledifolius var. intercedens C.K.Schneid.
Tropidocarpum gracile var. gracile
Acanthomintha obovata subsp. obovata
Artemisia arctica (Besser) Leonova
Monardella cinerea Abrams
Stellaria media subsp. pallida (Dumort.) Asch. & Graebn.
Eriogonum microtheca var. corymbosoides Reveal
Ranunculus utahensis Rydb.
Parosela emoryi (A.Gray) A.Heller
Trifolium albopurpureum var. dichotomum (Hook. & Arn.) Isely
Lotus dendroideus var. dendroideus
Machaeranthera canescens var. ziegleri (Munz) B.L.Turner
Gilia pungens (Torr.) Benth.
Sporobolus indicus var. indicus
Phlox viridis subsp. compacta (Brand) Wherry
Menodora scabra var. laevis (Wooton & Standl.) Steyerm.
Lomatium swingerae Mc Neill
Hemizonia calyculata (Babc. & Hall) D.D.Keck
Opuntia echinocarpa var. echinocarpa
Arctostaphylos patula f. platyphylla (A.Gray) P.V.Wells
Hemizonia corymbosa subsp. corymbosa
Senecio douglasii var. tularensis Munz
Lupinus sericeus subsp. huffmannii (C.P.Sm.) Fleak & D.B.Dunn
Oenothera walkeri subsp. tortilis (Jeps.) P.H.Raven
Mimulus bifidus subsp. bifidus
Guillenia flavescens (Hook.) Greene
Adelia virgata Poir.
Mimulus norrisii Heckard & Shevock
Orobanche ramosa L.
Gilia leptalea subsp. bicolor H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Phyllanthus engleri Pax
Erechtites hieraciifolia (L.) Raf. ex DC.
Krameria canescens Willd. ex Schult.
Aster breweri (A.Gray) Semple
Phlox covillei E.Nelson
Plantago spinulosa var. oblonga (E.Morris) Poe
Arctostaphylos drupacea (Parry) J.F.Macbr.
Astragalus simplicifolius var. caespitosus (Nutt.) M.E.Jones
Penstemon albifluvis England
Lotus unifoliolatus (Hook.) Benth.
Myosurus minimus subsp. minimus
Trifolium longipes subsp. elmeri (Greene) J.M.Gillett
Dodecatheon hendersonii subsp. cruciatum (Greene) H.J.Thomps.
Ludwigia repens var. stipitata (Fernald & Griscom) Munz
Silene suksdorfii B.L.Rob.
Opuntia parryi Engelm.
Hemizonia conjugens D.D.Keck
Viscaria viscosa Asch.
Pentachaeta laxa Elmer
Arabis drummondii var. interposita (Greene) Rollins
Gilia brecciarum subsp. argusana A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Cardionema DC.
Oreocarya Greene
Ceanothus jepsonii subsp. albiflorus C.L.Schmidt
×Stiporyzopsis bloomeri (Bol.) B.L.Johnson
Malvastrum coccineum (Nutt.) Gray
Rosa pisocarpa subsp. pisocarpa
Philadelphus lewisii var. gordonianus (Lindl.) Jeps.
Trifolium eriocephalum subsp. villiferum (House) J.M.Gillett
Lupinus caespitosus var. caespitosus
Monardella lanceolata var. microcephala A.Gray
Rubus rubricaulis Weihe ex Weihe & Nees
Opuntia echinocarpa var. wolfii L.D.Benson
Ptelea baldwinii var. crenulata (Greene) Jeps.
Zauschneria arizonica Davidson
Galium multiflorum f. hirsutum (A.Gray) Ehrend.
Gilia aurea f. laeta Brand
Allocarya filicaulis Brand
Chaenactis panamintensis Stockw.
Eschscholzia caespitosa subsp. caespitosa
Ambrosia chamissonis var. chamissonis
Antirrhinum strictum (Hook. & Arn.) A.Gray
Petradoria discoidea L.C.Anderson
Elytrigia Desv.
Astragalus candelarius var. exiguus E.Sheld.
Rhamnus tomentella subsp. crassifolia (Jeps.) Sawyer
Astragalus haydenianus var. major M.E.Jones
Arctostaphylos hookeri subsp. montana (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Silene platyota S.Watson
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. asper (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. virgata (Howell) C.L.Hitchc.
Lavatera assurgentiflora subsp. assurgentiflora
Sphaerostigma erythrum Davidson
Penstemon phlogifolius Greene
Evolvulus L.
Stephanomeria virgata var. virgata
Arctostaphylos setosissima Eastw.
Corydalis curvisiliqua Engelm.
Ivesia callida (Hall) Rydb.
Quercus chrysolepis var. nana (Jeps.) Jeps.
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. monocephala (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) H.H.Hall & Clem.
Orobanche valida Jeps.
Astragalus araneosus E.Sheld.
Collinsia bicolor var. concolor (Greene) Jeps.
Juncus squarrosus L.
Trifolium gracilentum var. palmeri (S.Watson) McDermott
Astragalus argophyllus var. pephragmenoides Barneby
Lathyrus brachycalyx subsp. zionis (C.L.Hitchc.) S.L.Welsh
Chamaesaracha arida Henrickson
Phaseolus heterophyllus var. rotundifolius (A.Gray) Piper
Penstemon humilis subsp. brevifolius (Gray) D.D.Keck
Oenothera multijuga var. typica Munz
Apocynum cannabinum var. hypericifolium (Aiton) A.Gray
Sisymbrium pinnatum (Walter) Greene
Lupinus adsurgens var. adsurgens
Cirsium ciliolatum (L.F.Hend.) J.T.Howell
Brassica rapa var. rapa
Camissonia claviformis subsp. funerea (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Eriogonum plumatella var. jaegeri (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) S.Stokes ex Munz
Spergularia canadensis subsp. canadensis
Orthocarpus purpurascens var. ornatus Jeps.
Epilobium angustifolium var. macrophyllum (Hausskn.) Fernald
Echinochloa crus-pavonis var. macera (Wiegand) Gould
Chaenactis brachiata Greene
Physocarpus alternans subsp. panamintensis J.T.Howell
Arctostaphylos hookeri subsp. ravenii P.V.Wells
Arctostaphylos knightii Gankin & Hildreth
Plantago purshii var. picta (E.Morris) Pilg.
Sambucus canadensis var. canadensis
Crassula connata var. erectoides M.Bywater & Wickens
Perityle villosa (S.F.Blake) Shinners
Heuchera micrantha var. macropetala Shipes & E.F.Wells
Cistanthe parryi var. nevadensis (J.T.Howell) Kartesz & Gandhi
Saxifraga nelsoniana subsp. nelsoniana
Astragalus triflorus (DC.) A.Gray
Phlox longifolia var. gladiformis M.E.Jones
Megarrhiza gilensis Greene
Claytonia peirsonii subsp. peirsonii
Forsellesia pungens var. glabra Ensign
Opuntia fragilis var. frutescens Engelm. & A.Gray
Celtis occidentalis var. pumila (Pursh) A.Gray
Gilia gracilis subsp. spirillifera Brand
Plagiobothrys torreyi var. perplexans I.M.Johnst.
Lesquerella kingii subsp. latifolia (A.Nelson) Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Populus deltoides subsp. deltoides
Plagiobothrys chorisianus var. undulatus (Piper) Higgins
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. patula C.L.Hitchc.
Lappula desertorum (K.Schum.) Greene
Phlox jonesii Wherry
Bistorta scaberula Greene
Atriplex microcarpa Waldst. & Kit.
Galium emeryense subsp. protoscabriusculum (Dempster & Ehrend.) Dempster & Ehrend.
Zauschneria californica subsp. latifolia (Hook.) D.D.Keck
Hemizonia luzulifolia DC.
Echinocactus krausei Hildm. ex K.Schum.
Plectritis californica (Suksd.) Dyal
Heterotheca camphorata (Eastw.) Semple
Eschscholzia rutifolia Greene
Eriogonum deflexum subsp. brachypodum (Torr. & A.Gray) S.Stokes
Eriogonum microtheca var. lapidicola Reveal
Trifolium grantianum A.Heller
Stylocline filaginea (A.Gray) A.Gray
Bromus ciliatus var. ciliatus
Solidago velutina var. nevadensis (Gray) C.E.S.Taylor & R.John Taylor
Rubus parviflorus var. hypomalacus Fernald
Arctostaphylos ×campbelliae Eastw.
Aster standleyi A.Davidson
Arenaria congesta var. charlestonensis Maguire
Calochortus weedii var. vestus Purdy
Carex exserta Mack.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. zacaensis (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Boechera consanguinea (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Arenaria verna L.
Specularia perfoliata (L.) A.DC.
Arctostaphylos mendocinoensis P.V.Wells
Maurandya petrophila Coville & C.V.Morton
Ranunculus oxynotus A.Gray
Galium desereticum Dempster & Ehrend.
Eschscholzia caespitosa subsp. kernensis Munz
Lomatium stebbinsii Schlessman & Constance
Lotus argyraeus var. notitius Isely
Aster glaucus var. wasatchensis M.E.Jones
Astragalus montanus var. impensus M.E.Jones
Trillium ovatum subsp. oettingeri Munz & Thorne
Stenolobium stans (L.) Seem.
Trifolium amplectens var. truncatum (Greene) Jeps.
Mesembryanthemum L.
Arctostaphylos columbiana var. virgata (Eastw.) McMinn
Camissonia guadalupensis subsp. clementina (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Mimulus tilingii var. tilingii
Eriogonum kearneyi Tidestr.
Astragalus junceus A.Gray
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. lagocephala (Sharp) Cronquist
Opuntia stanlyi Engelm.
Collinsia sparsiflora var. bruceae (M.E.Jones) Newsom
Opuntia acanthocarpa var. coloradensis L.D.Benson
Festuca californica var. californica
Rubus parviflorus var. bifarius Fernald
Ericameria ophitidis (J.T.Howell) G.L.Nesom
Opuntia griffithsiana Mackensen
Caltha leptosepala subsp. howellii (Huth) P.G.Sm.
Grindelia hirsutula var. maritima (Greene) M.A.Lane
Oreobolopsis clementis (M.E.Jones) Dhooge & Goetgh.
Begonia mariti Burt-Utley
Eriogonum aureum M.E.Jones
Haplopappus venetus var. vernonioides Munz
Valeriana capitata subsp. californica (A.Heller) F.G.Mey.
Euphorbia ocellata var. ocellata
Galium nuttallii var. tenue Dempster
Pteryxia terebinthina var. albiflora (Torr. & Gray) Mathias
Astragalus decumbens var. decurrens (Rydb.) Cronquist
Tradescantia Ruppius ex L.
Parosela pogonathera (A.Gray) Vail
Oenothera pallida var. typica Munz
Pennisetum latifolium Spreng.
Opuntia erinacea var. paucispina Dunkle
Euphorbia flagelliformis (Engelm.) Engelm.
Oenothera cespitosa var. crinita Munz
Hosackia Douglas ex Benth.
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. imulus Hall & Clem.
Arctostaphylos columbiana var. columbiana
Astragalus peirsonii Munz & McBurney
Streptanthus longisiliquus G.Clifton & R.Buck
Juncus anthelatus (Wiegand) R.E.Brooks
Penstemon confusus var. patens M.E.Jones
Lomatium dasycarpum var. medium Jeps.
Ceanothus divaricatus var. eglandulosus Torr.
Krynitzkia micromeres (A.Gray) A.Gray
Pyrrocoma sessiliflora Greene
Lupinus vallicola subsp. vallicola
Plantago hirtella var. galeottiana (Decne.) Pilg.
Cryptantha jonesii (A.Gray) Greene
Lasthenia macrantha subsp. bakeri (J.T.Howell) Ornduff
Bromus hordeaceus subsp. molliformis (J.Lloyd ex Billot) Maire & Weiller
Ceanothus griseus var. horizontalis McMinn
Meconella oregana var. denticulata (Greene) Jeps.
Phlox diffusa subsp. diffusa
Eriogonum microtheca var. lacusursi Reveal & A.Sand.
Abronia micrantha var. pedunculata M.E.Jones
Disporum hookeri var. hookeri
Dudleya aloides Rose ex Britton & Rose
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. ferrissii (A.Nelson) S.Stokes
Linanthus floribundus subsp. hallii (Jeps.) H.Mason
Zauschneria californica subsp. angustifolia D.D.Keck
Loeflingia squarrosa subsp. artemisiarum Barneby & Twisselm.
Haplopappus ericoides subsp. blakei C.B.Wolf
Lupinus albifrons var. austromontanus (A.Heller) Jeps.
Sesbania exaltata (Raf.) Rydb. ex A.W.Hill
Mammillaria grahamii var. grahamii
Allium bisceptrum var. utahense M.E.Jones
Capnoides brachycarpum Rydb.
Castilleja payneae Eastw.
Astragalus montanus var. tegetarius (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Oxalis oregana f. smalliana (R.Knuth) Munz
Eryngium pendletonensis K.L.Marsden & M.G.Simpson
Calystegia collina subsp. tridactylosa (Eastw.) Brummitt
Lomatium shevockii R.L.Hartm. & Constance
Prunus subcordata var. subcordata
Sphaeralcea marginata York ex Rydb.
Passiflora mixta L.fil.
Sagittaria calycina Engelm.
Eremalche kernensis C.B.Wolf
Festuca californica subsp. parishii (Piper) Darbysh.
Capsella procumbens (L.) Fr.
Forsellesia nevadensis (A.Gray) Greene
Hedyotis mucronata Benth.
Arctostaphylos laevigata Eastw.
Lupinus benthamii var. opimus C.P.Sm.
Atriplex joaquiniana A.Nelson
Gazania splendens Lem.
Rorippa microphylla (Boenn. ex Rchb.) Hyl. ex A.Löve & D.Löve
Penstemon scrophularioides M.E.Jones
Rosa ×hybrida Schleich.
Xylophacos marianus Rydb.
Grayia Hook. & Arn.
Gilia maculata Parish
Senecio bolanderi A.Gray
Crusea hispida var. hispida
Acourtia D.Don
Photinia arbutifolia var. macrocarpa Munz
Solanum virginianum L.
Aquilegia formosa var. desertorum M.E.Jones
Nicotiana bigelovii var. wallacei A.Gray
Ribes stanfordii Elmer
Carex amplectens Mack.
Astragalus marcusjonesii Munz
Dodecatheon hendersonii subsp. parvifolium (R.Knuth) H.J.Thomps.
Amsinckia valens J.F.Macbr.
Hosackia rigida Benth.
Polygonum coccineum f. natans (Wiegand) Stanford
Cryptantha circumscissa var. hispida (J.F.Macbr.) I.M.Johnst.
Orthocarpus floribundus Benth.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa subsp. tomentosiformis (J.E.Adams) P.V.Wells
Mimulus moschatus var. moniliformis (Greene) Munz
Eriogonum ochrocephalum subsp. chrysops (Rydb.) S.Stokes
Platanthera sparsiflora var. sparsiflora
Astragalus fallax S.Watson
Eleocharis quadrangulata (Michx.) Roem. & Schult.
Helianthella californica subsp. shastensis (W.A.Weber) W.A.Weber
Hackelia elegans Brand
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. monarchense D.A.York
Xanthium L.
Astragalus kentrophyta var. douglasii Barneby
Arctostaphylos platyphylla Kuntze
Lupinus micensis M.E.Jones
Trifolium dasyphyllum var. uintense (Rydb.) Isely
Lupinus pulcherrimus Rydb.
Mimosa spicata E.Mey.
Oenothera claviformis subsp. peeblesii (Munz) P.H.Raven
Gaura coccinea var. glabra (Lehm.) Torr. & A.Gray ex Munz
Allionia linearis Pursh
Phellopterus multinervatus J.M.Coult. & Rose
Schismus barbatus subsp. arabicus (Nees) Maire & Weiller
Androsace occidentalis f. simplex (Rydb.) G.T.Robbins
Sphaeralcea emoryi subsp. variabilis (Cockerell) Kearney
Eriophyllum nubigenum Greene ex A.Gray
Corydalis DC.
Pennisetum ciliare var. ciliare
Astragalus pictus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Platystemon californicus var. ornithopus (Greene) Munz
Menodora yecorana T.Van Devender & B.L.Turner
Ranunculus juniperinus M.E.Jones
Opuntia roseana Mackensen
Piperia yadonii Rand.Morgan & Ackerman
Sidalcea neomexicana subsp. neomexicana
Ceanothus cuneatus var. dubius J.T.Howell
Lomatium nevadense var. holopterum Jeps.
Senecio eurycephalus var. lewisrosei (J.T.Howell) T.M.Barkley
Astragalus amphioxys var. cymbellus M.E.Jones
Cassiope D.Don
Taraxacum officinale var. officinale
Talinum sarmentosum Engelm.
Ranunculus canus var. blankinshipii B.L.Rob.
Pyrola californica Krísa
Gilia ochroleuca subsp. transmontana H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Plantago bigelovii subsp. bigelovii
Cirsium californicum var. californicum
Aster occidentalis var. parishii (A.Gray) Ferris
Galium boreale subsp. septentrionale (Roem. & Schult.) H.Hara
Trifolium variegatum var. melananthum (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Eriogonum trichopes var. hooveri Reveal
Mimulus traskiae A.L.Grant
Androstephium coeruleum (Scheele) Greene
Viola ophiophila Greene
Malacothrix saxatilis var. altissima (Greene) Ferris
Camissonia scapoidea subsp. utahensis (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Arabis macdonaldiana Eastw.
Penstemon crandallii subsp. atratus D.D.Keck
Bigelowia menziesii var. scopulorum M.E.Jones
Hemizonia tracyi (Babc. & Hall) D.D.Keck
Apteria aphylla (Nutt.) Barnhart ex Small
Orthocarpus campestris Benth.
Calochortus discolor Davidson
Opuntia phaeacantha var. piercei Fosberg
Streptanthus tortuosus subsp. truei Al-Shehbaz
Astragalus lentiginosus var. carinatus M.E.Jones
Ranunculus alismellus (A.Gray) Greene
Downingia pulcherrima M.Peck
Senebiera didyma (L.) Pers.
Ribes deductum Greene
Aquilegia coerulea var. albiflora A.Gray
Panicum acuminatum var. lindheimeri (Nash) Beetle
Allium atrorubens var. inyonis (M.E.Jones) Ownbey & Aase
Astragalus haydenianus A.Gray
Salix hookeriana var. tomentosa J.K.Henry ex C.K.Schneider
Penstemon heterodoxus subsp. cephalophorus (Greene) D.D.Keck
Arnica longifolia subsp. myriadenia (Piper) Maguire
Lotus yollabolliensis Munz
Melica californica var. nevadensis Boyle
Acacia iteaphylla F.Muell. ex Benth.
Salix brachycarpa subsp. brachycarpa
Lasthenia Cass.
Calliscirpus C.N.Gilmour, J.R.Starr & Naczi
Clematis ligusticifolia var. brevifolia Nutt.
Lesquerella kingii subsp. kingii
Senecio jonesii Rydb.
Bouvardia Salisb.
Draba cyclomorpha Payson
Ludwigia palustris var. pacifica Fernald & Griscom
Orobanche ludoviciana var. latiloba Munz
Tanacetum canum D.C.Eaton
Inyonia dysodioides M.E.Jones
Lotus biolettii Greene
Solanum arborescens Clokey
Penstemon shastensis D.D.Keck
Mimulus aurantiacus subsp. aurantiacus
Eriogonum stellatum Benth.
Lupinus densiflorus subsp. austrocollium (C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Chenopodium album var. stevensii Aellen
Godetia goddardii Jeps.
Gilia inconspicua var. variegata Brand
Scutellaria austiniae Eastw.
Spirostachys occidentalis (S.Watson) S.Watson
Crithmum maritimum L.
Astragalus carminis Barneby
Rosa copelandii Greene
Cryptantha clemensae Payson
Rhamnus rubra subsp. obtusissima (Greene) C.B.Wolf
Amaranthus muricatus (Moq.) Hieron.
Arabis rectissima Greene
Streptopus Michx.
Haloragaceae
Laurentia Michx. ex Adans.
Mentha smithiana R.A.Graham
Astragalus iodopetalus (Rydb.) Greene ex Barneby
Vaccinium macrophyllum (J.J.Sm.) Sleumer
Astragalus argophyllus var. castaneiformis M.E.Jones
Petalostemon oligophyllus (A.Heller) Rydb.
Lathyrus utahensis M.E.Jones
Vicia melilotoides Wooton & Standl.
Rubus spectabilis var. franciscanus (Rydb.) J.T.Howell
Viola lobata subsp. psychodes (Greene) Munz
Ipomoea cissoides (Lam.) Griseb.
Pedicularis racemosa var. racemosa
Oreocarya roosiorum (Munz) R.B.Kelley, Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Schoenoplectus robustus (Pursh) M.T.Strong
Horkelia fusca var. brownii (Rydb.) Ertter & Reveal
Eriogonum kearneyi subsp. monoense (S.Stokes) Munz ex Reveal
Mentzelia albicaulis var. albicaulis
Ceratoides Gagnebin
Collinsia cahonis M.E.Jones
Astragalus montii S.L.Welsh
Rubus ursinus var. sirbenus (L.H.Bailey) J.T.Howell
Oenothera refracta S.Watson
Minuartia rosei (Maguire & Barneby) McNeill
Salix lasiolepis var. sandbergii (Rydb.) C.R.Ball
Castilleja rigida Eastw.
Oxalis divergens Eckl. & Zeyh.
Amorpha ovalis M.E.Jones
Laphamia inyoensis Ferris
Lotus argyraeus var. multicaulis (Ottley) Isely
Clematis occidentalis var. occidentalis
Lupinus densiflorus var. sublanatus C.P.Sm.
Arnica chamissonis var. longinodosa A.Nelson
Diplacus longiflorus var. calycinus (Eastw.) Jeps.
Astragalus montanus L.
Oxytropis nothoxys (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Limnophila ×ludoviciana Thieret
Balsamorhiza hirsuta Nutt.
Astragalus hypoglottis Hook.
Sphaeralcea munroana subsp. subrhomboidea (Rydb.) Kearney
Securinega fasciculata var. hallii (Brandegee) Jeps.
Thalictrum purpurascens DC.
Abronia fallax Heimerl ex Rydb.
Senecio covillei Greene
Aster chilensis var. chilensis
Sisymbrium canescens Nutt.
Phlox variabilis Brand
Balsamorhiza ×terebinthacea (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Raillardiopsis scabrida (Eastw.) Rydb.
Linanthus floribundus (A.Gray) Greene ex Milliken
Gilia sinistra subsp. pinnatisecta (H.Mason & A.D.Grant) A.G.Day
Astragalus monoensis var. monoensis
Eriogonum inflatum var. contiguum Reveal
Pectocarya setosa var. holoptera I.M.Johnst.
Artemisia arbuscula subsp. thermopola Beetle
Chamaesyce supina (Raf.) H.Hara
Allionia coccinea (Torr.) Standl.
Apocynum cardiophyllum Greene
Festuca howellii Hack. ex Beal
Carex gayana Desv.
Solanum californicum Dunal
Argythamnia claryana Jeps.
Abutilon crispum var. imberbe (DC.) Griseb.
Arctostaphylos insularis f. pubescens (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Krynitzkia mixta M.E.Jones
Tissa leucantha var. glabra Davidson
Astragalus preussii var. eastwoodiae (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Pyrrocoma hirta var. lanulosa (Greene) Mayes ex G.K.Br. & D.J.Keil
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. howellii (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Aster intermedius Turcz. ex DC.
Eriogonum kearneyi var. monoense (S.Stokes) Reveal
Cynanchum louiseae Kartesz & Gandhi
Ceanothus gloriosus subsp. porrectus (Howell) C.L.Schmidt
Arenaria capillaris subsp. americana Maguire
Clarkia tembloriensis subsp. calientensis (Vasek) K.E.Hols.
Mammillaria dawsonii (Houghton) R.T.Craig
Krynitzkia leucophaea var. alata M.E.Jones
Linanthus oblanceolatus (Brand) Eastw. ex Jeps.
Lepidium nitidum var. oreganum (T.J.Howell ex Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Prunus persica var. persica
Opuntia phaeacantha var. mojavensis (Engelm.) Fosberg
Empetrum eamesii subsp. hermaphroditum (Hagerup) D.Löve
Platanus hispanica Mill. ex Münchh.
Astragalus triquetrus A.Gray
Kalanchoe tubiflora (Harv.) Raym.-Hamet
Aster tortifolius Michx.
Potentilla bolanderi var. bernardina (Rydb.) Jeps., 1925
Oenothera triloba var. ecristata M.E.Jones
Malva fasciculata Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Rosa johnstonii Rydb.
Eriogonum sarahiae N.D.Atwood & A.Clifford
Orthocarpus faucibarbatus subsp. albidus D.D.Keck
Allium bullardii Davidson
Eriogonum nanum Reveal
Lotus incanus (Torr.) Greene
Gaura odorata Lag.
Calystegia occidentalis var. tomentella (Greene) Brummitt
Sanicula menziesii Hook. & Arn.
Geum triflorum var. canescens (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Lepidospartum squamatum var. palmeri (A.Gray) L.C.Wheeler
Godetia bottae Spach
Oenothera decorticans var. condensata Munz
Dendromecon rigida subsp. rhamnoides (Greene) Thorne
Cerinthe major subsp. purpurascens (Boiss.) Selvi & L.Cecchi
Juncus effusus var. solutus Fernald & Wiegand
Haplopappus venetus subsp. oxyphyllus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Oenothera avita subsp. eurekensis (Munz & Roos) W.M.Klein
Drymocallis deseretica Ertter
Oenothera multijuga S.Watson
Aster lentus Greene
Toxicodendron pubescens Mill.
Astragalus gracilentus var. fallax M.E.Jones
Gentiana holopetala (Gray) Holm
Asanthus squamulosus (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Acacia minuta (M.E.Jones) Beauch.
Freesia corymbosa (Burm.f.) N.E.Br.
Eriogonum ochrocephalum var. sceptrum Reveal
Gilia leptomeria var. myriacantha M.E.Jones
Lotus puberulus (Benth.) Greene
Aster occidentalis var. fremontii (Torr. & A.Gray) A.G.Jones
Hedysarum flexuosum L.
Dudleya abramsii subsp. parva (Rose & Davidson) Bartel
Baileya nervosa M.E.Jones
Gentiana bisetaea Howell
Clarkia rubicunda subsp. blasdalei (Jeps.) F.H.Lewis & M.E.Lewis
Ambrosia bipinnatifida (Nutt.) Greene
Githopsis specularioides subsp. candida Ewan
Eucephalus tomentellus (Greene) Greene
Descurainia incana var. macrosperma (O.E.Schulz) Dorn
Gilia harknessii Curran
Beta vulgaris subsp. macrocarpa (Guss.) Thell.
Cerastium alpinum L.
Camissonia brevipes subsp. arizonica (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Salix planifolia subsp. planifolia
Sphaeralcea rotundifolia (A.Gray) Jeps.
Echinocystis macrocarpa Greene
Valerianella carinata Loisel.
Arctostaphylos pilosula subsp. pilosula
Chamaesyce nutans (Lag.) Small
Anisodontea scabrosa (L.) D.M.Bates
Eriogonum umbellatum var. dumosum (Greene) Reveal
Veronica triphyllos L.
Potentilla saxosa subsp. sierrae Munz
Lupinus lyallii var. villosus Jeps.
Lupinus paynei Davidson
Eriogonum caninum (Greene) Munz
Eriogonum stokesae M.E.Jones
Rubus vitifolius var. eastwoodianus (Rydb.) Munz
Penstemon munzii I.M.Johnst.
Piptochaetium stipoides var. purpurascens (Hack.) Parodi
Thalictrum sparsiflorum var. nevadense B.Boivin
Opuntia convexa Mackensen
Gilia frutescens Rydb.
Erigeron inornatus var. viscidulus Gray
Viola lanceolata subsp. occidentalis (A.Gray) N.H.Russell
Aquilegia depauperata M.E.Jones
Lupinus lyallii var. lyallii
Saponaria L.
Penstemon heterophyllus subsp. purdyi D.D.Keck
Lesquerella sessilis (S.Watson) Small
Erigeron californicus (Less.) Jeps.
Malvastrum exile Gray
Linanthus orcuttii subsp. pacificus (Milliken) H.Mason
Oreocarya barnebyi (I.M.Johnst.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Astragalus stenophyllus Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus linifolius Osterh.
Petalostemon candidum var. oligophyllus (Torr.) F.J.Herm.
Eriogonum ovalifolium subsp. ovalifolium
Cotyledon caespitosa Haw.
Penstemon glaucus var. stenosepalus A.Gray
Oenothera claviformis subsp. rubescens P.H.Raven
Chamaesyce dioica (Kunth) Millsp.
Carthamus baeticus (Boiss. & Reut.) Nyman
Lupinus alpicola L.F.Hend. ex Piper
Opuntia zuniensis Griffiths
Eriogonum scopulorum Reveal
Viola praemorsa subsp. arida M.S.Baker
Agapanthus orientalis F.M.Leight.
Mirabilis laevis subsp. glutinosa (A.Nels) A.E.Murray
Astragalus whitedii Piper
Penstemon clevelandii subsp. mohavensis D.D.Keck
Chrysopsis caespitosa M.E.Jones
Dodecatheon clevelandii var. clevelandii
Tidestromia oblongifolia subsp. oblongifolia
Hugelia eremica Jeps.
Pulicaria hispanica (Boiss.) Boiss.
Cuscuta suksdorfii var. subpedicellata Yunck.
Modiolastrum lateritium (Hook.) Krapov.
Oxalis wrightii A.Gray
Lupinus sellulus var. artulus (Jeps.) Eastw.
Rumex orbiculatus var. borealis Rech.fil.
Eriastrum sparsiflorum subsp. sparsiflorum
Allium monticola subsp. keckii (Munz) Traub & Ownbey
Guillenia Greene
Picradenia Hook.
Escobaria vivipara var. deserti (Engelm.) D.R.Hunt
Penstemon deustus subsp. deustus
Carex tompkinsii J.T.Howell
Juncus bufonius subsp. bufonius
Euphorbia dentata var. gracillima Millsp.
Thelypodium neglectum M.E.Jones
Tropidocarpum dubium Davidson
Cotyledon laxa (Lindl.) Benth. & Hook.f., 1876
Nasturtium aquaticum Wahlenb.
Satureja L.
Astragalus molybdenus Barneby
Ranunculus nudatus Greene
Raillardiopsis muirii (A.Gray) Rydb.
Aspicarpa longipes A.Gray
Leptodactylon jaegeri (Munz) Wherry
Arabis bodiensis Rollins
Mimulus tilingii var. corallinus (Greene) A.L.Grant
Ficus subcordata Blume
Dodecatheon subalpinum Eastw.
Arabis breweri var. pecuniaria Rollins
Camissonia scapoidea subsp. brachycarpa (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Thelypodium howellii S.Watson
Plagiobothrys humifusus M.E.Jones
Galium nitens M.E.Jones
Berberis amplectens (Eastw.) Wheeler
Collinsia torreyi var. brevicarinata Newsom
Linanthus watsonii subsp. dolomiticus J.M.Porter & R.Patt.
Parosela spinosa (A.Gray) A.Heller
Lupinus polyphyllus subsp. bernardianus (Abrams ex C.P.Sm.) Munz
Tauschia howellii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.F.Macbr.
Platystemon californicus var. crinitus Greene
Hastingsia bracteosa var. atropurpurea (Becking) F.A.Lang & Zika
Astragalus playanus M.E.Jones
Atriplex cornuta M.E.Jones
Ligusticum pringlei J.M.Coult. & Rose
Linanthus saxiphilus Davidson
Hedyotis wrightii (A.Gray) Fosberg
Velaea vestita (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Alnus viridis subsp. fruticosa (Rupr.) Nyman
Astragalus curtilobus Tidestr.
Astragalus canovirens (Rydb.) Barneby
Hedysarum marginatum Greene
Oenothera hartwegii var. typica Munz
Smilacina amplexicaulis Nutt.
Mentha officinalis Hull
Stanleya pinnata var. inyoensis (Munz & J.C.Roos) Reveal
Thermopsis macrophylla var. hitchcockii Isely
Ipomopsis spicata subsp. spicata
Lotus douglasii Greene
Astragalus remulcus M.E.Jones
Abronia pumila Rydb.
Prosopis juliflora var. glandulosa (Torr.) Cockerell
Thalictrum wrightii A.Gray
Lotus scoparius subsp. traskiae (Eastw. ex Abrams) P.H.Raven
Arctostaphylos glauca f. adenopuberula P.V.Wells
Viola purpurea subsp. xerophyta M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Aster brickellioides Greene
Lophanthus urticifolius Benth.
Fallopia multiflora (Thunb.) Haraldson
Dicoria clarkiae J.D.Kenn.
Grayia polygaloides Hook. & Arn.
Erigeron cinereus var. aridus M.E.Jones
Schoenoplectus glaucus (Lam.) Kartesz
Monardella antonina Hardham
Trifolium globosum L.
Phellopterus bulbosus (A.Nelson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Gutierrezia linearifolia Lag.
Lappula heterosperma Greene
Psathyrotes (Nutt.) A.Gray
Olea africana Mill.
Hasseanthus elongatus Rose
Grindelia latifolia subsp. platyphylla (Greene) D.D.Keck
Psorodendron schottii (Torr.) Rydb.
Verbesina scaposa M.E.Jones
Pleurophragma platypodum Rydb.
Stanfordia californica S.Watson
Echeveria pulverulenta Nutt.
Arenaria sajanensis Willd.
Oenothera deserti M.E.Jones
Matricaria recutita L.
Viola purpurea subsp. aurea (Kellogg) J.C.Clausen
Euphorbia pediculifera var. typica L.C.Wheeler
Silene montana var. sierrae C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Camelina sativa subsp. sativa
Audibertia stachyoides var. revoluta Brandegee
Astragalus monoensis var. ravenii (Barneby) Isely
Oenothera boothii subsp. desertorum (Munz) Munz
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. glomerata H.M.Hall
Parosela schottii (Torr.) A.Heller
Oxyria Hill
Galium texense A.Gray
Atriplex laciniata L.
Amsinckia intactilis J.F.Macbr.
Gilia lutea var. longistylis Munz
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. pinetorum I.M.Johnst.
Ranunculus californicus var. gratus Jeps.
Lappula marginata (M.Bieb.) Gürke
Chorizanthe robusta var. robusta
Salvia dorrii var. mearnsii (Britton) L.D.Benson
Hosackia wrightii A.Gray
Penstemon glaber var. utahensis S.Watson
Oenothera brevipes subsp. arizonica P.H.Raven
Silene bernardina subsp. bernardina
Oenothera stubelii Hieron., 1895
Libertia formosa Graham
Parosela fremontii (Torr. ex A.Gray) Vail
Festuca parishii (Piper) Hitchc.
Dentaria integrifolia Nutt.
Jacobaea maritima subsp. bicolor (Willd.) B.Nord. & Greuter
Penstemon newberryi subsp. berryi (Eastw.) D.D.Keck
Ceanothus ×regius (Jeps.) McMinn
Yucca canaliculata Hook.
Luzula congesta (Thuill.) Lej.
Pogogyne douglasii subsp. parviflora (Benth.) J.T.Howell
Erythronium multiscapoideum (Kellogg) A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Neolloydia Britton & Rose
Sphaeralcea parryi (Greene) Jeps.
Oxalis corniculata var. stricta (Linnaeus) Savatier ex Trelease
Silene campanulata subsp. campanulata
Relbunium microphyllum (A.Gray) Hemsl.
Polygonum sachalinense F.Schmidt ex Maxim.
Chamaesyce ocellata subsp. arenicola (Parish) Thorne
Leymus pacificus (Gould) D.R.Dewey
Artemisia dracunculus subsp. dracunculus
Plectritis macrocera subsp. grayi (Suksd.) Morey
Porophyllum leptophyllum I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum friscanum M.E.Jones
Eurotia Adans.
Thalictrum occidentale var. palousense H.St.John
Glossopetalon A.Gray
Sarcostemma heterophyllum Engelm. ex Torr.
Geranium anemonifolium L'Hér. ex Aiton
Hasseanthus blochmaniae (Eastw.) Rose
Dicoria canescens subsp. hispidula (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Euphorbia hexagona Nutt. ex Spreng.
Helianthus annuus var. lenticularis (Douglas ex Lindl.) Steyerm.
Stephanomeria exigua var. pentachaeta (D.C.Eaton) H.M.Hall
Arabis hirsuta f. laevis J.Tuzson
Ceanothus greggii subsp. perplexans (Trel.) R.M.Beauch.
Platyspermum scapigerum Hook.
Lupinus ornatus var. obtusilobus (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Leymus multiflorus (Gould) Á.Löve
Opuntia rosarica G.E.Linds.
Cardamine palustris var. jonesii Kuntze
Astragalus newberryi var. watsonianus (Kuntze) M.E.Jones
Arenaria nuttallii var. gracilipes M.E.Jones
Mimulus primuloides var. linearifolius A.L.Grant
Perityle megalocephala var. intricata (Brandegee) Powell
Dudleya alainae Reiser
Ceanothus jepsonii subsp. jepsonii
Sphaeralcea coccinea subsp. coccinea
Atriplex cuneata subsp. introgressa C.A.Hanson
Coreopsis stillmanii var. jonesii Sherff
Krynitzkia glomerata var. virginensis M.E.Jones
Poa rhizomata Hitchc.
Delphinium andersonii subsp. cognatum (Greene) Davidson ex Ewan
Astragalus pephragmenus M.E.Jones
Brachyglottis J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Ledum ×columbianum Piper
Platanthera hyperborea var. gracilis (Lindl.) Luer
Penstemon virgatus subsp. arizonicus (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Argythamnia P.Browne
Aster carnosus Gilib.
Opuntia spinosior var. neomexicana Toumey
Cirsium scariosum var. thorneae S.L.Welsh
Cuscuta californica var. apiculata Engelm.
Astragalus ravenii Barneby
Sphaeralcea elata (Baker.f.) Rydb.
Lupinus nanus var. apricus C.P.Sm.
Gilia lineata Davidson
Astragalus convallarius var. foliolatus Barneby
Ficus dammaropsis Diels
Potentilla dissecta Kharit.
Arenaria congesta var. simulans Maguire
Asclepias vestita subsp. parishii (Jeps.) Woodson
Opuntia stanlyi var. parishii (Orcutt) L.D.Benson
Galium siccatum W.Wight
Ceanothus integerrimus var. integerrimus
Mahonia higginsae (Munz) Ahrendt, 1961
Monardella odoratissima subsp. pinetorum (A.Heller) Epling
Gilia wrightii A.Gray
Astragalus argillosus M.E.Jones
Euphorbia polycarpa var. appendiculata (Engelm.) Munz
Clematis alpina var. ochotensis (Pall.) S.Watson
Pastinaca sativa var. sativa
Polygonum hydropiperoides var. asperifolium Stanford
Abronia fragrans var. pterocarpa (A.Nelson) M.E.Jones
Anogra Spach
Zauschneria californica subsp. californica
Potentilla saxosa Lemmon ex Greene
Arenaria eastwoodiae var. adenophora Kearney & Peebles
Draba cruciata var. cruciata
Lupinus lyallii var. macroflorus B.J.Cox
Pyrrocoma Hook.
Coronopus L.
Abronia umbellata subsp. platyphylla (Standl.) Munz
Rubus leucodermis var. bernardinus (Greene) Jeps.
Lotus scoparius var. veatchii Ottley
Godetia purpurea var. elmeri Jeps.
Yucca brevifolia f. herbertii J.M.Webber
Astragalus arrectus var. eremiticus (E.Sheld.) M.E.Jones
Delphinium roseum A.Heller
Lupinus milo-bakeri C.P.Sm.
Ipomoea acuminata (Vahl) Roem. & Schult.
Bahia desertorum M.E.Jones
Vaccinium coccineum Piper
Erigeron heterotrichus Hara
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. crassifolia Jeps.
Cordylanthus ramosus subsp. setosus Pennell
Lappula coronata Greene
Calandrinia caulescens var. menziesii (Hook.) A.Gray
Heterotheca bolanderi (A.Gray) V.L.Harms
Dalea hutchinsoniae var. anomala M.E.Jones
Plagiobothrys glaber (A.Gray) I.M.Johnst.
Lomatium tracyi Mathias & Constance
Sida leprosa var. hederacea (Douglas ex Hook.) K.Schum.
Penstemon moffatii subsp. moffatii
Argemone rotundata Rydb.
Cordylanthus tenuis subsp. pallescens (Pennell) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Astragalus mitophyllus Kearney
Astragalus sonorae A.Gray
Petalostemon exile A.Gray
Crotalaria sagittalis var. fruticosa (Mill.) Fawc. & Rendle
Epilobium glandulosum var. macounii (Trel.) C.L.Hitchc.
Onagra hookeri (Torr. & A.Gray) Small
Carex meadii Dewey
Epilobium angustifolium var. intermedium (Lange) Fernald
Mentzelia albicaulis var. pectinata (Kellogg) Urb. & Gilg
Lupinus albifrons var. flumineus C.P.Sm.
Hulsea vestita var. vestita
Penstemon azureus subsp. azureus
Alstroemeria pseudospathulata Ehr.Bayer
Cercidiphyllum japonicum Siebold & Zucc. ex J.J.Hoffm. & Schult.f.
Aquilegia bernardii Gren. & Godr.
Sorbus commixta Hedl.
Coprosma brunnea (Kirk) Cockayne
Chionanthus pygmaeus Small
Lysichiton camtschatcensis (L.) Schott
Bupleurum spinosum Gouan & Ill.Observ.Bot.
Rhododendron glanduliferum Franch.
Sophora prostrata Buchanan
Rhododendron hodgsonii Hook.fil.
Zantedeschia jucunda Letty
Sassafras tzumu (Hemsl.) Hemsl.
Onosma nanum DC.
Epimedium franchetii Stearn
Phyllostachys nigra var. nigra
Bomarea edulis (Tussac) Herb.
Scutellaria baicalensis Georgi
Roscoea alpina Royle
Hosta Tratt.
Primula japonica A.Gray
Rhododendron maddenii subsp. crassum (Franch.) Cullen
Rhododendron serotinum Hutch.
Berberis wilsoniae Hemsl.
Clematis tongluensis (Brühl) Tamura
Acer stachyophyllum subsp. betulifolium (Maxim.) P.C.de Jong
Sarcococca orientalis C.Y.Wu
Acer cappadocicum subsp. sinicum (Rehder) Hand.-Mazz.
Paeonia rockii (S.G.Haw & Lauener) T.Hong & J.J.Li
Elaeagnus glabra Thunb.
Rodgersia podophylla A.Gray
Rhododendron exasperatum Tagg
Filipendula multijuga Maxim.
Rhododendron denudatum H.Lév.
Cornus racemosa Lam.
Philadelphus delavayi L.Henry
Eucalyptus pauciflora subsp. niphophila (Maiden & Blakely) L.A.S.Johnson & Blaxell
Gentiana acaulis L.
Skimmia japonica var. intermedia Komatsu
Coprosma petriei Cheeseman
Zanthoxylum oxyphyllum Edgew.
Sorbus verrucosa var. subulata J.E.Vidal
Rhododendron kesangiae D.G.Long & Rushforth
Photinia beauverdiana C.K.Schneid.
Buddleja loricata Leeuwenb.
Anemone americana (DC.) Hara
Rhododendron prinophyllum (Small) Millais
Gerbera piloselloides (L.) Cass.
Glumicalyx goseloides (Diels) Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Rhododendron arborescens (Pursh) Torr.
Festuca novae-zelandiae (Hack.) Cockayne
Magnolia insignis Wall.
Rhododendron decorum subsp. cordatum W.K.Hu
Rosa helenae Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Hydrangea hydrangeoides (Siebold & Zucc.) Bernd Schulz
Rhododendron degronianum subsp. yakushimanum (Nakai) H.Hara
Rhododendron bureavii Franch.
Magnolia sprengeri Pamp.
Allium flavum subsp. tauricum (Besser ex Rchb.) Stearn
Rhodiola semenovii (Regel & Herder) Boriss.
Solenomelus segethi (Phil.) Kuntze
Rhododendron arboreum subsp. cinnamomeum (Wall. ex Lindl.) Tagg
Arenaria tetraquetra L.
Stephania Lour.
Rhododendron asterochnoum Diels
Rhododendron schlippenbachii Maxim.
Chamaedaphne calyculata (L.) Moench
Metapanax davidii (Franch.) J.Wen & Frodin
Hydrangea petiolaris Siebold & Zucc.
Rhododendron faithiae Chun
Magnolia cavaleriei var. platypetala (Hand.-Mazz.)
Arum byzantinum Blume
Epimedium sempervirens Nakai ex Maek.
Acer sinense Pax
Acer longipes subsp. longipes
Carpinus coreana Nakai
Rhododendron heliolepis var. heliolepis
Rhododendron fortunei subsp. discolor (Franch.) D.F.Chamb.
Primula glomerata Pax
Hydrangea aspera Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Saxifraga cotyledon L.
Rhododendron phaeochrysum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Petrophytum cinerascens (Piper) Rydb.
Campanula sarmatica Ker Gawl.
Quercus shumardii Buckley
Euonymus L.
Rhododendron canescens (Michx.) Sweet
Magnolia patungensis (Hu) Noot.
Dierama igneum Klatt
Asperula gussonei Boiss.
Lonicera quinquelocularis Hardw.
Betula pumila subsp. pumila
Rhododendron oligocarpum W.P.Fang
Bistorta tenuicaulis (Biss. & Moore) Nakai
Gleditsia aquatica Marshall
Begonia taliensis Gagnep.
Hypericum forrestii (Chitt.) N.Robson
Rhododendron thymifolium Maxim.
Rhododendron polylepis Franch.
Zanthoxylum americanum Mill.
Crocus speciosus subsp. xantholaimos B.Mathew
Stachyurus chinensis Franch.
Onosma rigidum Ledeb.
Epimedium rhizomatosum Stearn
Crataegus mollis (Torr. & A.Gray) Scheele
Muscari comosum (L.) Mill.
Salvia transsylvanica (Schur ex Griseb. & Schenk) Schur
Crocus rujanensis Randjel. & D.A.Hill
Clematis lasiandra Maxim.
Rhododendron traillianum var. dictyotum (Balf.fil. ex Tagg)
Stachyurus Siebold & Zucc.
Sorbaria tomentosa (Lindl.) Rehder
Planocarpa petiolaris (DC.) C.M.Weiller
Acer pentaphyllum Diels
Paeonia ludlowii (Stern & G.Taylor) D.Y.Hong
Rhododendron sinofalconeri Balf.fil.
Sorbus aronioides Rehder
Corydalis omeiana (C.Y.Wu & H.Chuang) Z.Y.Su & Lidén
Delosperma deleeuwiae Lavis
Epimedium dolichostemon Stearn
Allium flavum L.
Hydrangea heteromalla D.Don
Stachys macrantha (K.Koch) Stearn
Rhododendron charitopes subsp. charitopes
Rhododendron cinnabarinum Hook.fil.
Actaea simplex (DC.) Wormsk. ex Prantl
Rhodanthemum hosmariense (Ball) B.H.Wilcox, K.Bremer & Humphries
Tropaeolum speciosum Poepp. & Endl.
Haberlea rhodopensis Friv.
Rhus copallina L.
Rhododendros Adanson, 1763
Cotoneaster ambiguus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Veronica kiusiana Furumi
Acer maximowiczii Pax
Crinum bulbispermum (Burm.f.) Milne-Redh. & Schweick.
Vaccinium moupinense Franch.
Epimedium myrianthum Stearn
Primula sieboldii É.Morren
Saxifraga ferdinandi-coburgi Kellerer & Sünd.
Leucothoe grayana Maxim.
Rhododendron ochraceum Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron maximum L.
Lindera reflexa Hemsl.
Bletilla striata (Thunb.) Rchb.f.
Lyonia lucida (Lam.) K.Koch
Asimina triloba (L.) Dunal
Inula helenium Hook.fil. & Thomson
Mammillaria heyderi subsp. heyderi
Rhododendron leucaspis Tagg
Styrax japonicus Siebold & Zucc.
Veronica cupressoides Hook.fil.
Rhododendron uvariifolium Diels
Exochorda giraldii Hesse
Rhododendron brachycarpum D.Don ex G.Don
Helichrysum trilineatum DC.
Acer sieboldianum Miq.
Rhododendron dignabile Cowan
Sorbus koehneana C.K.Schneid.
Rhododendron edgeworthii Hook.fil.
Actaea japonica Thunb.
Impatiens omeiana Hook.fil.
Fothergilla major (Sims) Lodd.
Carpinus henryana var. simplicidentata (Hu) Rushforth
Coreopsis auriculata L.
Rhododendron souliei Franch.
Digitalis grandiflora Mill.
Rhododendron campylogynum Franch.
Arisaema ringens (Thunb.) Schott
Acer carpinifolium Siebold & Zucc.
Acer tsinglingense W.P.Fang & C.C.Hsieh
Chionochloa Zotov
Diplarrena moraea Labill.
Eurya japonica Thunb.
Euphorbia clavarioides Boiss.
Viburnum cylindricum Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Viburnum rufidulum Raf.
Elaeagnus umbellata var. rotundifolia Makino
Helichrysum marginatum DC.
Magnolia zenii W.C.Cheng
Cotoneaster rhytidophyllus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Ilex latifolia Thunb.
Rhododendron longesquamatum C.K.Schneid.
Epimedium wushanense T.S.Ying
Deutzia pulchra S.Vidal
Viburnum mongolicum (Pall.) Rehder
Viburnum erosum Thunb.
Rhododendron fastigiatum Franch.
Rhododendron hemsleyanum E.H.Wilson
Camellia reticulata Lindl.
Epimedium ×omeiense Stearn
Scabiosa drakensbergensis B.L.Burtt
Iris milesii Baker ex Foster
Fraxinus griffithii C.B.Clarke
Acer saccharum subsp. saccharum
Hertia cheirifolia (L.) Kuntze
Banksia marginata Cav.
Meliosma myriantha Siebold & Zucc.
Hylotelephium ewersii (Ledeb.) H.Ohba
Halesia macgregorii Chun
Geranium himalayense Klotzsch
Halesia diptera J.Ellis
Emmenopterys henryi Oliv.
Kirengeshoma palmata Yatabe
Rhododendron stewartianum Diels
Trillium erectum L.
Trochodendron aralioides Siebold & Zucc.
Rhododendron hanceanum Hemsl.
Stachys spathulata Burch. ex Benth.
Rhododendron oldhamii Maxim.
Pyrus communis
Rhododendron japonicum (A.Gray) Suringar
Rhododendron heatherae Rushforth
Rhododendron praestans Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Rhododendron vaseyi A.Gray
Vaccinium arboreum Marshall
Carex flagellifera Colenso
Sempervivum L.
Paeonia tenuifolia L.
Philadelphus hirsutus Nutt.
Akebia longeracemosa Matsum.
Rhododendron oreodoxa var. fargesii (Franch.) D.F.Chamb.
Rhododendron wallichii Hook.fil.
Erigeron aurantiacus Regel
Sycopsis sinensis Oliv.
Hydrangea caerulea (Stapf) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Epimedium ×rubrum E.Morren
Castanopsis sieboldii (Makino) Hatus.
Mulguraea tridens (Lag.) N.O'Leary & P.Peralta
Rhododendron qiaojiaense L.M.Gao & D.Z.Li
Campanula cochleariifolia Lam.
Hydrangea radiata Walter
Stachys lavandulifolia Vahl
Geum andicola (Phil.) Reiche
Aconitum sinomontanum Nakai
Rhododendron augustinii subsp. augustinii
Dianthus acicularis Fisch. ex Ledeb.
Rhododendron argipeplum Balf.fil. & R.E.Cooper
Veronica lavaudiana Raoul
Saxifraga ×apiculata Engl.
Viburnum cinnamomifolium Rehder
Zephyranthes fosteri Traub
Geranium renardii Trautv.
Acer saccharum subsp. nigrum (F.Michx.) Desmarais
Epimedium chlorandrum Stearn
Rhododendron campylocarpum Hook.fil.
Acer wilsonii Rehder
Rhododendron bhutanense D.G.Long & Bowes Lyon
Aphyllanthes monspeliensis L.
Astilbe Buch.-Ham.
Rhododendron auriculatum Hemsl.
Gaultheria semiinfera (C.B.Clarke) Airy Shaw
Schisandra rubriflora (Franch.) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Pieris formosa (Wall.) D.Don
Fothergilla L.
Actinidia rufa (Siebold & Zucc.) Planch. ex Miq.
Sasa veitchii (Carrière) Rehder
Lysimachia paridiformis var. stenophylla Franch.
Hylotelepbium
Oxydendrum arboreum (L.) DC.
Rhododendron strigillosum Franch.
Cistus inflatus Pourr. ex Demoly
Sorbus pseudovilmorinii McAll.
Alchemilla lithophila Juz.
Moraea alticola Goldblatt
Rhododendron rex H.Lév.
Selago flanaganii Rolfe
Ilex verticillata (L.) A.Gray
Crataegus schuettei Ashe
Rhododendron rubiginosum Franch.
Rhododendron hyperythrum Hayata
Wahlenbergia akaroa J.A.Petterson
Rhododendron simsii Planch.
Albuca humilis Baker
Leucogenes grandiceps (Hook.fil.) Beauverd
Celmisia gracilenta Hook.fil.
Rhododendron fulvum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Bistorta amplexicaulis (D.Don) Greene
Rhododendron macabeanum Watt ex Balf.fil.
Iris bulleyana Dykes
Carya tomentosa (Lam.) Nutt.
Acer micranthum Siebold & Zucc.
Rodgersia aesculifolia Batalin
Celtis tenuifolia Nutt.
Salix ×boydii E.F.Linton
Ribes longeracemosum Franch.
Styphnolobium affine (Torr. & A.Gray) Walp.
Magnolia lotungensis Chun & C.H.Tsoong
Rhododendron vernicosum Franch.
Corylus fargesii (Franch.) C.K.Schneid.
Rudbeckia fulgida var. sullivantii (C.L.Boynton & Beadle) Cronquist
Polygonatum zanlanscianense Pamp.
Quercus schottkyana Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Hydrangea xanthoneura Diels
Viburnum grandiflorum Wall. ex DC.
Rhododendron falconeri Hook.fil.
Globularia cordifolia L.
Rhododendron yuefengense G.Z.Li
Filipendula camtschatica (Pall.) Maxim.
Heuchera cylindrica var. orbicularis (Rosend., Butters & Lakela) Calder & Saville
Echinocereus reichenbachii (Terscheck) F.Haage ex Britton & Rose
Rhododendron huanum W.P.Fang
Teucrium marum L.
Ilex litseifolia Hu & Tang
Lindera salicifolia (Blume) Boerl.
Salix jejuna Fernald
Rhododendron arizelum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Alcea rugosa Alef.
Betula alleghaniensis Britton
Rhododendron pseudochrysanthum Hayata
Kniphofia triangularis subsp. obtusiloba (Diels ex A.Berger) Codd
Eremurus zenaidae Vved.
Rhododendron tephropeplum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Crocosmia pottsii (Baker) N.E.Br.
Rhamnus alpina L.
Carpinus caroliniana Walter
Globularia nudicaulis L.
Camellia lutchuensis T.Itô
Primula auricula L.
Rhododendron degronianum Carrière
Styrax confusus Hemsl.
Berkheya cirsiifolia (DC.) Roessler
Tropaeolum tricolor Sweet
Fraxinus paxiana Lingelsh.
Schisandra sphenanthera Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron ×lochmium Balf.f.
Colchicum parnassicum Sart., Orph. & Heldr.
Ranunculus constantinopolitanus (DC.) d'Urv.
Silene viscaria (L.) Jess.
Ungnadia speciosa Endl.
Rhododendron arboreum subsp. delavayi (Franch.) D.F.Chamb.
Schisandra perulata Gagnep.
Rhododendron spiciferum Franch.
Carpinus polyneura Franch.
Actinidia hemsleyana Dunn
Hydrangea ampla (Chun) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Hydrangea sikokiana Maxim.
Delosperma lavisiae L.Bolus
Indigofera decora var. alba Sarg.
Edraianthus graminifolius (L.) A.DC.
Rhododendron morii Hayata
Artemisia morrisonensis Hayata
Distylium racemosum Siebold & Zucc.
Fargesia scabrida T.P.Yi
Veronicastrum sibiricum var. yezoense Hara
Lonicera nitida E.H.Wilson
Deutzia hookeriana (Schneid.) Airy Shaw
Rhododendron principis Bureau & Franch.
Cotoneaster lancasteri J.Fryer & B.Hylmö
Rhododendron calophytum var. calophytum
Schisandra Michx.
Silene araratica Schischk.
Castanopsis cuspidata (Thunb.) Schottky
Rhododendron ambiguum Hemsl.
Paederota lutea (Scop.) L.fil.
Kalmia latifolia L.
Rohdea japonica (Thunb.) Roth
Clethra alnifolia L.
Magnolia sapaensis (N.H.Xia & Q.N.Vu) Grimshaw & Macer
Rhododendron purdomii Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Clematis recta L.
Hydrangea sargentiana Rehder
Rhododendron viscosum (L.) Torr.
Nepeta racemosa subsp. racemosa
Hydrangea barbara (L.) Bernd Schulz
Digitalis obscura L.
Acaena myriophylla Lindl.
Rhododendron falconeri subsp. eximium (Nutt.) Chamb.
Geranium dalmaticum (Beck) Rech.f.
Camellia L.
Edraianthus wettsteinii subsp. lovcenicus E.Mayer & Blecic
Genista radiata (L.) Scop.
Cotoneaster frigidus Wall.
Roscoea cautleoides Gagnep.
Dianthus petraeus subsp. noeanus (Boiss.) Tutin
Leucothoe keiskei Miq.
Epimedium davidii Franch.
Dianthus simulans Stoyanoff & Stef. ex Stef. & Jordanov
Rhododendron adenopodum Franch.
Buxus bodinieri H.Lév.
Hydrangea hirsuta (Gagnep.) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Carya laciniosa (F.Michx.) Loudon
Helianthemum croceum (Desf.) Pers.
Acer oliverianum Pax
Acer rubescens Hayata
Actaea pachypoda Elliott
Thymus polytrichus subsp. britannicus (Ronniger) Kerguélen
Acer ceriferum Rehder
Akebia trifoliata (Thunb.) Koidz.
Rhododendron kiusianum var. sataense (Nakai) D.F.Chamb. & Rae
Hydrangea glaucescens (Rehder) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Cornus schindleri subsp. schindleri
Roscoea auriculata K.Schum.
Cotoneaster rotundifolius Wall.
Bistorta officinalis Delarbre
Menispermum canadense L.
Sorbus meliosmifolia Rehder
Rhododendron sperabile var. weihsiense Tagg & Forrest
Sorbus forrestii McAll. & Gillham
Rhododendron valentinianum Forrest ex Hutch.
Sorbus setschwanensis (C.K.Schneid.) Koehne
Rhododendron pemakoense Kingdon-Ward
Sempervivum borissovae Wale
Skimmia anquetilia N.P.Taylor & Airy Shaw
Rhododendron arboreum subsp. arboreum
Rhododendron traillianum Forrest & W.W.Sm.
Rhododendron campanulatum subsp. campanulatum
Rhododendron williamsianum Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Pyracantha atalantioides (Hance) Stapf
Hydrangea indochinensis Merr.
Rubus parkeri Hance
Narcissus bulbocodium subsp. bulbocodium
Cistanthe grandiflora (Lindl.) Carolin ex Hershk.
Pimelea prostrata (J.R. & G.Forst.) Willd.
Sorbus monbeigii (Cardot) N.P.Balakr.
Hypericum tenuicaule Hook.fil. & Thomson ex Dyer
Dierama latifolium N.E.Br.
Reineckea carnea (Andrews) Kunth
Daphne ×thauma Farrer
Meliosma oldhamii var. oldhamii
Rhododendron lutescens Franch.
Hemerocallis fulva var. angustifolia Baker
Staphylea holocarpa var. rosea Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Hedychium J.Koenig
Hesperantha pauciflora G.J.Lewis
Rhododendron coeloneurum Diels
Prostanthera cuneata Benth.
Baccharis magellanica (Lam.) Pers.
Polyspora speciosa (Kochs) B.M.Barthol. & T.L.Ming
Magnolia denudata Desr.
Rhododendron sikangense var. exquisitum (T.L.Ming) T.L.Ming
Veronicastrum virginicum (L.) Farw.
Camellia oleifera Abel.
Sempervivum montanum L.
Rhododendron argyrophyllum subsp. argyrophyllum
Lithocarpus variolosus (Franch.) Chun
Buxus sinica var. insularis (Nakai) M.Cheng
Daphne arbuscula Celak.
Lonicera acuminata Wall.
Quercus serrata Murray
Nerine undulata (L.) Herb.
Rhododendron glaucophyllum Rehder
Fraxinus insularis Hemsl.
Corydalis buschii Nakai
Rehderodendron macrocarpum Hu
Hosta ventricosa Stearn
Rhododendron magniflorum W.K.Hu
Colchicum agrippinum Baker
Daphniphyllum macropodum Miq.
Photinia villosa f. maximowicziana (H.Lév.) Rehder
Neolitsea aciculata (Blume) Koidz.
Carex platyphylla J.Carey
Cortusa matthioli L.
Rhododendron irroratum Franch.
Rhododendron sutchuenense Franch.
Ostrya japonica Sarg.
Epimedium pauciflorum K.C.Yen
Hydrangea paniculata Siebold
Pittosporum truncatum E.Pritz. ex Diels, 1900
Rhododendron rex subsp. rex
Lithocarpus mairei (Schottky) Rehder
Paeonia anomala subsp. veitchii (Lynch) D.Y.Hong & K.Y.Pan
Thermopsis lupinoides (L.) Link
Rhododendron thomsonii subsp. thomsonii
Eucalyptus rodwayi R.T.Baker & H.G.Sm.
Cornus controversa Hemsl.
Beschorneria rigida Rose
Kalopanax septemlobus (Thunb.) Koidz.
Hydrangea integrifolia Hayata
Disporum cantoniense (Lour.) Merr.
Rhododendron cyanocarpum (Franch.) W.W.Sm.
Euonymus myrianthus Hemsl.
Rhododendron galactinum Balf.fil. ex Tagg
Rhododendron adenogynum Diels
Neillia incisa (Thunb.) S.H.Oh
Brachyglottis monroi (Hook.fil.) B.Nord.
Acaena Mutis ex L.
Pulsatilla violacea Rupr.
Thalictrum delavayi var. acuminatum Franch.
Paeonia delavayi Franch.
Epimedium brevicornu Maxim.
Celtis jessoensis Koidz.
Salix magnifica Hemsl.
Trollius pumilus D.Don
Speirantha gardenii (Hook.) Baill.
Rosa henryi Boulenger
Waldsteinia ternata (Stephan) Fritsch
Veronica odora Hook.fil.
Dasiphora davurica (Nestler) Kom.
Thamnocalamus spathiflorus (Trin.) Munro
Sempervivum tectorum L.
Fargesia murielae (Gamble) T.P.Yi
Anemone rivularis Buch.-Ham. ex DC.
Escallonia ×exoniensis H.J.Veitch
Rhododendron griffithianum Wight
Clematis armandii Franch.
Berberis stenophylla Lindl.
Epimedium grandiflorum f. violaceum (C.Morren) Stearn
Corylopsis stelligera Guill.
Acer pauciflorum W.P.Fang
Rhododendron cinnabarinum subsp. cinnabarinum
Rhododendron concinnum Hemsl.
Aquilegia brevistyla Hook.
Clethra acuminata Michx.
Aristea juncifolia Eckl.
Enkianthus cernuus f. rubens (Maxim.) Ohwi
Kalmia buxifolia (Bergius) Gift & Kron
Rhododendron beesianum Diels
Cyrtanthus brachyscyphus Baker
Paederota bonarota (L.) L.
Rhododendron augustinii subsp. chasmanthum (Diels) Cullen
Primula florindae Kingdon-Ward
Colchicum montanum L.
Rhododendron ciliatum Hook.fil.
Genista sagittalis L.
Clethra barbinervis Siebold & Zucc.
Polyspora axillaris (Roxb.) Sweet
Rhododendron changii (W.P.Fang) W.P.Fang
Carex montana L.
Magnolia yunnanensis (Hu) Noot.
Viburnum lentago L.
Plocama calabrica (L.f.) M.Backlund & Thulin
Prunus maackii Rupr.
Acer shirasawanum Koidz.
Betula delavayi var. delavayi
Rhododendron pachytrichum Franch.
Hosta venusta F.Maek.
Thalictrum ichangense Lecoy. ex Oliv.
Stranvaesia davidiana Decne.
Carex oshimensis Nakai
Rhododendron faucium D.F.Chamb.
Stewartia pseudocamellia Maxim.
Schefflera minutistellata Merr. ex H.L.Li
Enkianthus campanulatus var. palibinii (Craib) Bean
Stewartia serrata Maxim.
Callistemon subulatus Cheel
Rosa pendulina L.
Sinopodophyllum hexandrum (Royle) T.S.Ying
Rhododendron mekongense Franch.
Lindera benzoin (L.) Blume
Magnolia campbellii Hook.f. & Thomson
Erodium rupestre (Pourr. ex Cav.) Guitt.
Scabiosa columbaria L.
Sorbus reducta Diels
Genista pulchella Vis.
Sorbus thibetica (Cardot) Hand.-Mazz.
Teucrium polium subsp. aureum (Schreb.) Arcang.
Betula lenta L.
Rhododendron catawbiense Michx.
Astilbe chinensis (Maxim.) Knoll
Khadia alticola Chess. & H.E.K.Hartmann
Rhododendron orbiculare Decne.
Chrysosplenium davidianum Decne. ex Maxim.
Rhododendron indicum (L.) Sweet
Babiana rubrocyanea (Jacq.) Ker Gawl.
Dierama dracomontanum Hilliard
Ilex franchetiana var. franchetiana
Androsace lanuginosa Wall.
Lonicera crassifolia Batalin
Platycarya strobilacea Siebold & Zucc.
Rhododendron microgynum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Astrantia major subsp. involucrata (W.D.J.Koch) Ces.
Rhododendron sperabile var. sperabile
Hydrangea serrata (Thunb.) Ser.
Clethra delavayi Franch.
Fargesia denudata T.P.Yi
Rodgersia pinnata Franch.
Cornus schindleri Wangerin
Weigela florida (Bunge) A.DC.
Pterocarya macroptera var. insignis (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) W.E.Manning
Rhododendron petrocharis Diels
Iris chrysographes Dykes
Artemisia pedemontana subsp. assoana (Willk.) Rivas Mart.
Acer pectinatum Wall. ex G.Nicholson
Fraxinus sikkimensis (Lingelsh.) Hand.-Mazz.
Cornus kousa Bürger
Olearia ×haastii Hook.fil.
Hamamelis virginiana L.
Veronica albicans Petrie
Astilbe grandis Stapf ex E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron recurvoides Tagg & Kingdon-Ward
Lilium formosanum A.Wallace
Helichrysum coralloides (Hook.fil.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Sinopanax formosanus (Hayata) H.L.Li
Asphodelus aestivus Brot.
Itea virginica L.
Philadelphus subcanus var. subcanus
Magnolia martini H.Lév.
Potentilla nepalensis Hook.
Rhododendron yunnanense Franch.
Muehlenbeckia axillaris (Hook.f.) Endl.
Salix hylematica C.K.Schneid.
Rhododendron hippophaeoides Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Ostrya carpinifolia Scop.
Bergeranthus vespertinus (Berger) Schwantes
Hypericum densiflorum Pursh
Rhododendron arboreum var. roseum Lindl.
Shibataea kumasaca (Zoll. ex Steud.) Nakai, 1933
Primula poissonii Franch.
Skimmia reevesiana (Fortune) Fortune
Rhododendron strigillosum var. monosematum (Hutch.) T.L.Ming
Orthrosanthus chimboracensis (Kunth) Baker
Ligularia dentata (A.Gray) Hara
Roscoea Sm.
Rhododendron bureavioides Balf.fil.
Weigela praecox (Lemoine) L.H.Bailey
Rhododendron keiskei Miq.
Felicia rosulata Yeo
Veronica catarractae G.Forst.
Skimmia Thunb.
Paris quadrifolia L.
Hamamelis ×intermedia Rehder
Cornus asperifolia Michx.
Rhododendron basilicum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Sorbus zahlbruckneri C.K.Schneid.
Nerine Herb.
Rhododendron calophytum var. openshawianum (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Chamb.
Gaultheria antipoda G.Forst.
Kniphofia hirsuta Codd
Brachyglottis lagopus (Raoul) B.Nord.
Bergenia emeiensis var. rubellina J.T.Pan
Rhododendron pingianum D.Fang
Androsace villosa subsp. koso-poljanskii (Ovcz.) Fed.
Phylliopsis ×hillieri Cullen & Lancaster
Ochagavia litoralis (Phil.) Zizka, Trumpler & Zöllner
Primula marginata Curtis
Viburnum atrocyaneum C.B.Clarke
Chionanthus virginicus L.
Rhododendron aganniphum var. aganniphum
Lavandula pedunculata subsp. pedunculata
Rhododendron sanguineum Franch.
Gladiolus ecklonii Lehm.
Cistus ×argenteus Dans.
Carpinus fangiana Hu
Betula insignis subsp. fansipanensis Ashburner & McAll., 2013
Physaria arctica (Wormsk. ex Hornem.) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Actaea racemosa L.
Miscanthus sinensis var. condensatus (Hack.) Makino
Rhododendron zaleucum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Sambucus ebulus L.
Rhaphiolepis umbellata (Thunb.) Makino
Tetradium glabrifolium (Champ. ex Benth.) T.G.Hartley
Gaultheria fragrantissima Wall.
Astilbe chinensis (Maxim.) Franch. & Sav.
Fraxinus quadrangulata Michx.
Campanula cenisia L.
Carrierea calycina Franch.
Salix arbuscula L.
Filipendula vestita (Wall. ex G.Don) Maxim.
Acer campbellii subsp. flabellatum (Rehder) A.E.Murray
Vitis rotundifolia Michx.
Lilium rosthornii Diels
Iris sintenisii Janka
Beesia calthifolia (Maxim. ex Oliv.) Ulbr.
Paeonia jishanensis T.Hong & W.Z.Zhao
Ilex suaveolens (H.Lév.) Loes.
Rhododendron tanastylum Balf.fil. & Kingdon-Ward
Parodia mammulosa (Lem.) N.P.Taylor
Kniphofia ×hybrida Gumbl.
Magnolia maudiae (Dunn) Figlar
Quercus bicolor Willd.
Quercus lungmaiensis (Hu) C.C.Huang & Y.T.Chang
Carpinus rankanensis Hayata
Melica persica Kunth
Rhododendron pachysanthum Hayata
Clematis ×durandii T.Durand ex Kuntze
Huodendron Rehder
Veronica rupicola Cheeseman
Thalictrum rochebruneanum Franch. & Sav.
Rhododendron cowanianum Davidian
Euonymus hamiltonianus Wall.
Viburnum rafinesqueanum Schult.
Kniphofia rooperi (T.Moore) Lem.
Rhododendron floccigerum Franch.
Salix breviserrata Flod.
Phyteuma scheuchzeri All.
Fagus hayatae Palib.
Cypripedium acaule Aiton
Rhododendron minus var. minus
Rhododendron watsonii Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Clematis integrifolia L.
Sempervivum heuffelii Schott
Helwingia Willd.
Styrax obassia Siebold & Zucc.
Zenobia pulverulenta (Bartram ex Willd.) Pollard
Rhododendron lacteum Franch.
Trillium smallii Maxim.
Luzuriaga radicans Ruiz & Pav.
Davidia involucrata Baill.
Polyspora Sweet
Sauromatum venosum (Dryand. ex Aiton) Kunth
Schefflera gracilis (Miq.) R.Vig.
Allium hollandicum R.M.Fritsch
Rhododendron arboreum Sm.
Acer serrulatum Hayata
Viburnum cassinoides L.
Aubrieta olympica Boiss.
Stranvaesia microphylla Vidal
Astilbe glaberrima var. saxatilis (Nakai) H.Ohba
Aristolochia macrophylla Lam.
Lonicera microphylla Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Brunsvigia radulosa Herb.
Inula hookeri C.B.Clarke
Corylopsis sinensis Hemsl.
Sorbus hemsleyi (C.K.Schneid.) Rehder
Primula hybrida E.H.L.Krause
Hylotelephium ussuriense (Kom.) H.Ohba
Bergenia stracheyi (Hook.fil. & Thomson) Engl.
Staphylea holocarpa Hemsl.
Mukdenia rossii (Oliv.) Koidz.
Phlox nivalis Lodd.
Rhododendron bainbridgeanum Tagg & Forrest
Saponaria pumila Janch.
Echinospartum horridum (Vahl) Rothm.
Arnica montana L.
Molopospermum peloponnesiacum (L.) W.D.J.Koch
Cotoneaster hebephyllus Diels
Crataegus flava Aiton
Salix integra Thunb.
Osmanthus decorus (Boiss. & Balansa) Kasapligil
Calycanthus floridus L.
Androsace sempervivoides Jacquem. ex Duby
Rhododendron rigidum Franch.
Betula apoiensis Nakai
Elaeagnus macrophylla Thunb.
Skimmia japonica f. repens (Nakai) Hara
Acer spicatum Lam.
Rhododendron maoerense W.P.Fang & G.Z.Li
Bergenia ciliata (Haw.) Sternb.
Lindera obtusiloba Blume
Viburnum farreri Stearn
Physocarpus opulifolius (L.) Maxim.
Anthyllis hermanniae L.
Cotoneaster integerrimus Medik.
Saxifraga paniculata Mill.
Disporum megalanthum F.T.Wang & Tang
Gladiolus murielae Kelway
Elliottia paniculata (Siebold & Zucc.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Callistemon pityoides F.Muell.
Tetracentron sinense Oliv.
Schefflera alpina Grushv. & Skvortsova
Leptospermum rupestre Hook.fil.
Rosa macrophylla Lindl.
Sempervivum ciliosum Craib
Hydrangea fauriei (Hayata) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Chusquea montana Phil.
Amsonia tabernaemontana var. salicifolia (Pursh) Woodson
Rhododendron prattii Franch.
Tritoniopsis lata (L.Bolus) G.J.Lewis
Cotula socialis Hilliard
Helleborus lividus subsp. corsicus (Briq.) Yeo
Rhododendron eclecteum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Staphylea trifolia L.
Salix repens subsp. arenaria (L.) Hiitonen
Rhododendron bachii H.Lév.
Rhododendron keleticum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Teucrium pyrenaicum L.
Geranium rubifolium Lindl.
Helichrysum italicum subsp. serotinum (Boiss.) P.Fourn.
Arisaema Mart.
Libertia sessiliflora (Poepp.) Skottsb.
Thymus thracicus Velen.
Schefflera fantsipanensis Bui
Erodium chrysanthum L'Hér. ex DC.
Uvularia grandiflora Sm.
Euonymus carnosus Hemsl.
Phlomis cashmeriana Royle ex Benth.
Austrocactus spiniflorus (Phil.) F.Ritter
Iris lazica Albov
Geranium psilostemon Ledeb.
Eryngium eburneum Decne.
Sorbus glomerulata Koehne
Lyonia Nutt.
Helonias bullata L.
Stauntonia chapaensis (Gagnep.) Christenh.
Rhododendron heliolepis Franch.
Potentilla atrosanguinea Lodd.
Gelasine elongata (Graham) Ravenna
Primula anisodora Balf.fil. & Forrest
Eremurus himalaicus Baker
Polemonium reptans L.
Minuartia verna (L.) Hiern
Rhododendron mallotum Balf.fil. & Kingdon-Ward
Kunzea muelleri Benth.
Castanopsis calathiformis (Skan) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Sageretia thea var. thea
Ribes luridum Hook.fil. & Thomson
Rhododendron faberi Hemsl.
Saponaria sicula Raf.
Catalpa speciosa Teas
Primula wulfeniana Schott
Cornus kousa subsp. chinensis (Osborn) Q.Y.Xiang
Aesculus chinensis Bunge
Origanum pulchellum Boiss.
Amana edulis (Miq.) Honda
Betula utilis var. utilis
Rhododendron kiusianum Makino
Soldanella alpina L.
Rhododendron ririei Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Embothrium coccineum J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Pelargonium endlicherianum Fenzl
Lilium henryi Baker
Epimedium epsteinii Stearn
Enkianthus campanulatus var. sikokianus Palib.
Viburnum betulifolium Batalin
Cotoneaster nanshan Vilm. ex Mottet
Litsea populifolia (Hemsl.) Gamble
Staphylea bumalda DC.
Rheum alexandrae Batalin
Tritonia disticha subsp. rubrolucens (R.C.Foster) M.P.de Vos
Osteomeles schwerinae var. microphylla Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Geranium subcaulescens L'Hér. ex DC.
Onosma confertum W.W.Sm.
Erysimum pulchellum (Willd.) J.Gay
Osbeckia L.
Rhododendron decorum Franch.
Rhododendron tubiforme Davidian
Spiraea ×arguta Zabel
Allium virgunculae F.Maek. & Kitam.
Zephyranthes concolor (Lindl.) Benth. & Hook.f.
Cistanthe tweedyi (A.Gray) Hershk.
Aster incisus Fisch.
Polemonium caeruleum subsp. yezoense (Miyabe & Kudô) Hara
Rhododendron wumingense W.P.Fang
Sorbus pallescens Rehder
Aristolochia guichardii P.H.Davis & M.S.Khan
Thymus sibthorpii Benth.
Rhododendron calophytum Franch.
Bistorta vacciniifolia (Wall. ex Meisn.) Greene
Spiraea fritschiana C.K.Schneid.
Rhododendron taiwanalpinum Ohwi
Philadelphus sericanthus Koehne
Pterostyrax psilophyllus Diels ex Perkins
Cotoneaster konishii Hayata
Leucothoe axillaris (Lam.) D.Don
Eutrema japonicum (Miq.) Koidz.
Acer morifolium Koidz.
Rhododendron tsariense Cowan
Trillium luteum (Muhl.) Harb.
Yucca constricta Buckley
Geranium albanum M.Bieb.
Ilex melanotricha Merr.
Callicarpa japonica Thunb.
Thymus leucotrichus subsp. neiceffii (Degen & Urum.) Jalas
Fagus grandifolia Ehrh.
Kniphofia sarmentosa (Andrews) Kunth
Gladiolus hybridus C.Morren
Fritillaria stenanthera (Regel) Regel
Litsea cubeba (Lour.) Pers.
Aesculus chinensis var. wilsonii (Rehder) Turland & N.H.Xia
Viburnum parvifolium Hayata
Saxifraga ×irvingii A.S.Thomps.
Salix grahami Borrer ex Baker
Indigofera kirilowii Maxim. ex Palibin
Silene sieboldii (Van Houtte) H.Ohashi & H.Nakai
Sorbus caloneura (Stapf) Rehder
Rhododendron insigne Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Echinopsis bruchii (B. & R.) H.Friedrich & Glaetzle
Acer palmatum subsp. amoenum (Carrière) H.Hara
Rosmarinus L.
Veronica gentianoides Vahl
Coprosma atropurpurea (Cockayne & Allan) L.B.Moore
Clethra petelotii Dop & Troch.-Marq.
Illicium simonsii Maxim.
Adinandra millettii (Hook. & Arn.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hance
Weigela floribunda (Siebold & Zucc.) K.Koch
Scrophularia nodosa L.
Rhododendron orbiculare subsp. orbiculare
Asphodeline lutea (L.) Rchb.
Rhododendron barbatum Wall. ex G.Don
Epimedium acuminatum Franch.
Rhododendron ungernii Trautv.
Puschkinia scilloides var. libanotica (Zucc.) Boiss.
Pseudomuscari coeleste (Fomin) Garbari
Cornus foemina Mill.
Hedychium densiflorum Wall.
Primula juliae Kusnezowa
Podophyllum delavayi Franch.
Quercus morii Hayata
Polygonatum biflorum (Walter) Elliott
Dahlia Cav.
Primula chionantha Balf.fil. & Forrest
Sorbus globosa T.T.Yu & H.T.Tsai
Euonymus hamiltonianus var. sieboldianus (Blume) Kom.
Veronica subalpina Cockayne
Maihuenia patagonica (Phil.) Britton & Rose
Camassia quamash subsp. walpolei (Piper) Gould
Dierama K.Koch
Rhododendron coryanum Tagg & Forrest
Rhododendron luteum Sweet
Tripterospermum Blume
Viburnum dilatatum Thunb.
Liquidambar acalycina H.T.Chang
Heptacodium miconioides Rehder
Asphodeline liburnica (Scop.) Rchb.
Aristea bakeri Klatt
Pieris floribunda (Pursh) Benth. ex Hook.
Lithocarpus cleistocarpus (Seemen) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron mucronulatum Turcz.
Sempervivum marmoreum Griseb.
Dianthus pavonius Tausch
Rhododendron venator Tagg
Rhododendron dendrocharis Franch.
Paris polyphylla Sm.
Eucalyptus risdonii Hook.fil.
Rhododendron adenosum Davidian
Corylopsis sinensis var. calvescens Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Populus ×generosa A.Henry
Saxifraga marginata var. rocheliana (Sternb.) Engl. & Irmsch.
Styrax hemsleyanus Diels
Rhodoleia parvipetala K.Y.Tong
Corylus americana Marshall
Gaultheria ×wisleyensis Marchant ex D.J.Middleton
Callicarpa longifolia Lam.
Paxistima canbyi A.Gray
Camellia lutchuensis var. lutchuensis
Acis autumnalis (L.) Herb.
Rhododendron racemosum Franch.
Decaisnea insignis (Griff.) Hook.fil. & Thomson
Rodgersia sambucifolia Hemsl.
Zingiber Mill.
Hylotelephium spectabile (Boreau) H.Ohba
Saxifraga exarata Vill.
Sanguinaria canadensis var. multiplex E.H.Wilson
Haplocarpha rueppellii (Sch.Bip.) Lewin
Saxifraga juniperifolia Adams
Magnolia sargentiana Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Lavatera ×clementii Cheek
Sorbus sargentiana Koehne
Dianthus basuticus Burtt Davy
Trochocarpa thymifolia (R.Br.) Spreng.
Astilbe macroflora Hayata
Nassella trichotoma (Nees) Hack. & Arechav.
Physoplexis comosa (L.) Schur
Primula kisoana Miq.
Betula papyrifera var. papyrifera
Rosa moyesii Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron floribundum Franch.
Deutzia glomeruliflora Franch.
Parietaria officinalis L.
Narcissus romieuxii Braun-Blanq. & Maire
Tilia chingiana Hu & W.C.Cheng
Rosa morrisonensis Hayata
Magnolia officinalis var. biloba Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron brachycarpum subsp. fauriei (Franch.) Chamb.
Glandularia corymbosa (Ruiz & Pav.) N.O'Leary & P.Peralta
Rhododendron pachytrichum var. pachytrichum
Lindera praecox (Siebold & Zucc.) Blume
Gladiolus oppositiflorus Herb.
Rhodiola macrocarpa (Praeger) S.H.Fu
Wisteria floribunda f. multijuga (Van Houtte) J.Compton & Thijsse
Rhododendron dauricum L.
Rhododendron augustinii Hemsl.
Gaultheria mucronata Hook. & Arn.
Alstroemeria hookeri Sweet
Acer palmatum subsp. matsumurae Koidz.
Leptospermum riparium D.I.Morris
Cyrilla racemiflora L.
Cornus amomum subsp. obliqua (Raf.) J.S.Wilson
Helwingia chinensis Batalin
Indigofera amblyantha Craib
Sempervivum flagelliforme Fisch. ex Link
Epimedium perralderianum Coss.
Rhododendron bracteatum Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Hosta sieboldiana (Hook.) Engl.
Magnolia conifera (Dandy) V.S.Kumar
Rhododendron thayerianum Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Berberis buxifolia Lam.
Chrysanthemum yezoense Maek.
Primula blinii H.Lév.
Moraea spathulata (L.f.) Klatt
Iris wilsonii C.H.Wright
Saxifraga cochlearis Rchb.
Rhododendron decorum subsp. decorum
Narcissus assoanus Dufour
Sempervivum marmoreum subsp. reginae-amaliae (Maire & Petitm.) Zonn.
Osmanthus Lour.
Rhododendron dilatatum Miq.
Prunus maritima Marshall
Helleborus ×hybridus H.Vilm.
Sorbus bissetii McAll.
Erinacea anthyllis Link
Rodgersia A.Gray
Salix fargesii Burkill
Jeffersonia dubia (Maxim.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Baker & Moore
Ajania scharnhorstii (Regel & Schmalh.) Tzvelev
Lonicera setifera Franch.
Dianthus squarrosus M.Bieb.
Gaultheria cuneata (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Bean
Meliosma cuneifolia Franch.
Cinnamomum septentrionale Hand.-Mazz.
Merrilliopanax alpinus (C.B.Clarke) C.B.Shang
Rhododendron degronianum subsp. heptamerum (Maxim.) H.Hara
Magnolia chevalieri (Dandy) V.S.Kumar
Rhododendron fortunei T.Moore ex Lindl.
Ficus tinctoria G.Forst.
Rubus lineatus Reinw. ex Blume
Agapanthus L'Hér.
Viburnum atrocyaneum subsp. harryanum (Rehder) P.S.Hsu
Aster ×frikartii Silva Tar. & C.K.Schneid.
Lonicera zeravshanica Pojark.
Soldanella villosa Darracq
Clematis koreana var. carunculosa (Gagnep.) Tamura
Berkheya purpurea (DC.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Mast.
Acer davidii subsp. davidii
Lilium brownii var. viridulum Baker
Dictamnus albus L.
Primula polyneura Franch.
Rosa brunonii Lindl.
Spiraea hayatana H.L.Li
Eucalyptus pauciflora Sieber ex Spreng.
Crataegus kansuensis E.H.Wilson
Euonymus echinatus Wall.
Daphne alpina L.
Stauntonia hexaphylla (Thunb.) Decne.
Juglans mandshurica Maxim.
Hydrangea arborescens L.
Rhododendron sinogrande Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Carpinus turczaninovii Hance
Brucea javanica (L.) Merr.
Solidago virgaurea var. leiocarpa (Benth.) A.Gray
Rhododendron kaempferi Planch.
Lonicera tragophylla Hemsl.
Fraxinus baroniana Diels
Clematis macropetala Ledeb.
Satureja spicigera (K.Koch) Boiss.
Thalictrum pubescens Pursh
Campanula bellidifolia subsp. besenginica (Fomin) Victorov
Fargesia apicirubens Stapleton
Rhododendron virgatum Hook.fil.
Corylopsis glandulifera Hemsl.
Clematis montana var. rubens E.H.Wilson
Trollius europaeus L.
Tapiscia sinensis Oliv.
Actinidia Lindl.
Primula vialii Delavay ex Franch.
Osmanthus yunnanensis (Franch.) P.S.Green
Osmanthus suavis King ex C.B.Clarke
Sinojackia rehderiana Hu
Spiraea morrisonicola Hayata
Rhododendron niveum Hook.fil.
Calycanthus chinensis W.C.Cheng & S.Y.Chang ex P.T.Li
Pseudosasa humilis (Mitford) T.Q.Nguyen
Pulsatilla montana (Hoppe) Rchb.
Kadsura japonica (L.fil.) Dunal
Phedimus obtusifolius (C.A.Mey.) 't Hart
Lindera glauca (Siebold & Zucc.) Blume
Astilbe rivularis Buch.-Ham., 1825
Zephyranthes hybr
Cistus albidus L.
Actinidia callosa Lindl.
Rhododendron stenopetalum (Hogg) Mabb.
Ribes laurifolium Jancz.
Clematis marmoraria Sneddon
Acer pubinerve Rehder
Thymus L.
Sanguisorba hakusanensis Makino
Photinia niitakayamensis Hayata
Chimonobambusa tumidissinoda Ohrnb.
Lonicera ×purpusii Rehder
Grevillea australis R.Br.
Begonia palmata D.Don
Ardisia pusilla A.DC.
Rhododendron impeditum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Aconitum japonicum Thunb.
Bergenia emeiensis var. emeiensis
Gymnocladus chinensis Baill.
Rhododendron wiltonii Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Meliosma veitchiorum Hemsl.
Kniphofia multiflora J.M.Wood & M.S.Evans
Bistorta affinis (D.Don) Greene
Azorella trifurcata (Gaertn.) Pers.
Symphytum ibericum Stev.
Roscoea tibetica Batalin
Astilboides tabularis (Hemsl.) Engl.
Lilium henryi var. citrinum Wallace
Moraea robusta (Goldblatt) Goldblatt
Crocus versicolor Ker Gawl.
Salvia forsskaolei L.
Codonopsis lanceolata Benth. & Hook.f., 1876
Lonicera myrtillus Hook.fil. & Thomson
Stewartia pteropetiolata W.C.Cheng
Epigaea repens L.
Cotoneaster horizontalis var. perpusillus C.K.Schneid.
Rubus alceifolius Vidal
Magnolia macrophylla Michx.
Gaultheria pumila (L.fil.) D.J.Middleton
Rhododendron coelicum Balf.fil. & Farrer
Crocus sieberi subsp. atticus (Boiss. & Orph.) B.Mathew
Melliodendron xylocarpum Hand.-Mazz.
Rhododendron hirtipes Tagg
Rhododendron spinuliferum Franch.
Zanthoxylum piperitum (L.) DC.
Euryops decumbens B.Nord.
Primula tangutica Duthie
Adinandra bockiana var. acutifolia (Hand.-Mazz.) Kobuski
Lindera umbellata var. membranacea (Maxim.) Momiy.
Rhododendron russatum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Hamamelis vernalis Sarg.
Sempervivum ×barbulatum Schott
Rhododendron longipes Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Ourisia caespitosa Hook.fil.
Rhododendron gongshanense T.L.Ming
Globularia trichosantha Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Rosa davidii Crép.
Aciphylla scott-thomsonii Cockayne & Allan
Gaultheria depressa var. novae-zealandiae D.A.Franklin
Stauntonia angustifolia (Wall.) Christenh.
Eucomis pallidiflora subsp. pole-evansii (N.E.Br.) Reyneke ex J.C.Manning
Phyteuma hemisphaericum L.
Ilex ×meserveae S.Y.Hu
Lilium martagon L.
Rhododendron rufum Batalin
Cornus kousa var. chinensis Osborn
Paris polyphylla var. polyphylla
Eucalyptus coccifera Hook.fil.
Wahlenbergia rivularis Diels
Acer pectinatum subsp. forrestii (Diels) A.E.Murray
Hakonechloa macra (Munro) Makino
Berberis coxii C.K.Schneid.
Rhododendron obtusum (Lindl.) Planch.
Rhododendron proteoides Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Disporum nantouense S.S.Ying
Globularia repens Lam.
Epimedium ecalcaratum G.Y.Zhong
Trachystemon orientalis (L.) G.Don
Rhododendron davidsonianum Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Crinodendron hookerianum Gay
Boehmeria platanifolia Franch. & Sav.
Oxalis adenophylla Gill.
Alniphyllum fortunei (Hemsl.) Makino
Veronica epacridea Hook.fil.
Leptinella squalida Hook.fil.
Tilia mongolica Maxim.
Hesperantha baurii Baker
Lilium philadelphicum var. andinum Ker Gawl.
Paulownia tomentosa var. tsinlingensis (Y.Y.Pai) T.Gong
Cinnamomum parthenoxylon (Jack) Meisn.
Tiarella polyphylla D.Don
Actinidia melanandra Franch.
Daphne sericea Vahl
Rhododendron aberconwayi Cowan
Dianthus arpadianus Ade & Bornm.
Polyspora chrysandra (Cowan) Hu ex B.M.Barthol. & T.L.Ming
Nardophyllum bryoides (Lam.) Cabrera
Gaultheria depressa Hook.fil.
Hydrangea robusta Hook.fil. & Thomson
Gladiolus italicus Mill.
Yucca flaccida Haw.
Festuca glauca Vill.
Persea humilis Nash
Fritillaria michailovskyi Fomin
Ilex corallina Franch.
Desmodium multiflorum DC.
Viburnum propinquum Hemsl.
Dianthus haematocalyx subsp. ventricosus Maire & Petitm.
Thymus brachychilus Jalas
Epimedium flavum Stearn
Sideritis syriaca L.
Primula fangii F.H.Chen & C.M.Hu
Sedum pluricaule Kudô
Rhododendron hypoleucum (Kom.) Harmaja
Cyrtanthus epiphyticus J.M.Wood
Magnolia dawsoniana Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Betula albosinensis Burkill
Potentilla cinerea Chaix ex Vill.
Zanthoxylum schinifolium Siebold & Zucc.
Salix nakamurana var. yezoalpina (Koidz.) Kimura
Viburnum plicatum var. tomentosum (Thunb.) Miq.
Sisyrinchium striatum Sm.
Iris forrestii Dykes
Tripterygium wilfordii Hook.fil.
Lindera umbellata Thunb.
Thalictrum delavayi Franch.
Crocus sativus L.
Rhodiola recticaulis Boriss.
Lobelia tupa L.
Nepeta racemosa Lam.
Genista pilosa L.
Gaultheria hispida R.Br.
Dianthus microlepis Boiss.
Disporum cantoniense var. y-tiense Wynn-Jones, V.D.Nguyen & J.M.H.Shaw
Daphniphyllum glaucescens Blume
Schefflera rhododendrifolia (Griff.) Frodin
Arabis alpina subsp. caucasica (Willd. ex Schlecht.) Briq.
Lomatia polymorpha R.Br.
Hemerocallis minor Mill.
Ruscus hypoglossum L.
Maihuenia poeppigii (Otto) F.A.C.Weber
Geranium maculatum L.
Sorbus multijuga Koehne
Haplocarpha scaposa Harv.
Berchemia scandens (Hill) K.Koch
Rhododendron clementinae Forrest ex W.W.Sm.
Salix gracilistyla Miq.
Primula elatior Hill
Phyllodoce caerulea (L.) Bab.
Hydrangea strigosa Rehder
Gaylussacia baccata (Wangenh.) K.Koch
Crataegus chungtienensis W.W.Sm.
Disanthus cercidifolius Maxim.
Lavandula angustfolia
Cercis glabra Pamp.
Arisaema tortuosum (Wall.) Schott
Pachystegia rufa Molloy
Acer miyabei subsp. miyabei
Veronica peduncularis M.Bieb.
Cornus rugosa Lam.
Alchemilla erythropoda Juz.
Cyclamen mirabile Hildebr.
Cladrastis kentukea (Dum.Cours.) Rudd
Origanum amanum Post
Pterostyrax hispidus Siebold & Zucc.
Narcissus cantabricus subsp. cantabricus
Acer chienii Hu & W.C.Cheng
Betula utilis var. jacquemontii (Spach) H.J.P.Winkl.
Rosa mulliganii Boulenger
Iris ensata Thunb.
Margyricarpus pinnatus (Lam.) Kuntze
Corydalis solida subsp. solida
Cistus laurifolius L.
Erinus alpinus L.
Franklinia alatamaha Bartram ex Marshall
Schefflera taiwaniana (Nakai) Kaneh.
Kniphofia angustifolia (Baker) Codd
Aristolochia manshuriensis Kom.
Geum pentapetalum (L.) Makino
Prunus prostrata Labill.
Digitalis ferruginea L.
Vitis coignetiae Pulliat ex Planch.
Biarum tenuifolium subsp. zelebori (Schott) P.C.Boyce
Rhododendron hippophaeoides var. occidentale M.N.Philipson & Philipson
Echinopsis huascha (F.A.C.Weber) Friedrich & G.D.Rowley
Castanopsis orthacantha Franch.
Rhododendron irroratum subsp. irroratum
Rhododendron primuliflorum Bureau & Franch.
Berberis ×bristolensis Ahrendt
Hylotelephium caucasicum (Grossh.) H.Ohba
Rhodothamnus chamaecistus (L.) Rchb.
Rubus ludwigii Eckl. & Zeyh.
Hylotelephium erythrostictum (Miq.) H.Ohba
Saxifraga moschata Wulfen
Glandora diffusa (Lag.) D.C.Thomas
Persicaria virginiana (L.) Gaertn.
Crataegus tanacetifolia (Poir.) Pers.
Rhododendron trichanthum Rehder
Achillea ×kellereri Sünd.
Trillium grandiflorum (Michx.) Salisb.
Habranthus tubispathus (L'Hér.) Traub
Celmisia spectabilis Hook.fil.
Ilex collina Alexander
Narcissus rupicola subsp. watieri (Maire) Maire & Weiller
Veronica topiaria (L.B.Moore) Garn.-Jones
Carpinus viminea var. viminea
Anthemis cretica subsp. argaea (Boiss. & Balansa) Grierson
Actaea cimicifuga L.
Allium clathratum Ledeb.
Ligularia fischeri (Ledeb.) Turcz.
Celmisia hookeri Cockayne
Arisaema flavum (Forssk.) Schott
Echium amoenum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Olearia virgata (Hook.fil.) Hook.fil.
Sisyrinchium macrocarpum Hieron.
Pieris D.Don
Acer caudatum Wall.
Stewartia monadelpha Siebold & Zucc.
Carpinus tschonoskii Maxim.
Colchicum L.
Epimedium pinnatum subsp. colchicum (Boiss.) N.Busch
Coprosma J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Eryngium agavifolium Griseb.
Magnolia nitida W.W.Sm.
Junellia micrantha (Phil.) Moldenke
Meliosma cuneifolia var. cuneifolia
Achillea nana L.
Stachys officinalis (L.) Trevis.
Maihueniopsis glomerata (Haw.) R.Kiesling
Fraxinus nigra Marshall
Deutzia schneideriana Rehder
Gaultheria trichophylla Royle
Geum montanum L.
Impatiens tinctoria A.Rich.
Cotoneaster adpressus Bois
Brachyglottis bellidioides (Hook.fil.) B.Nord.
Cytisus ×kewensis Bean
Sempervivum tectorum var. andreanum (Wale) O.Bolòs & Vigo
Sorbus yuana Spongberg
Hieracium pannosum Boiss.
Senna hebecarpa (Fernald) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Magnolia cylindrica E.H.Wilson
Adinandra glischroloma Hand.-Mazz.
Neolitsea sericea (Blume) Koidz.
Quercus phillyreoides A.Gray
Phlomis grandiflora H.S.Thomps.
Enkianthus perulatus (Miq.) C.K.Schneid.
Magnolia obovata Thunb.
Luzula sylvatica (Huds.) Gaudin
Sempervivum nevadense Wale
Arisaema erubescens (Wall.) Schott
Viburnum henryi Hemsl.
Rhododendron pocophorum Balf.fil. ex Tagg
Rhododendron sikangense W.P.Fang
Chionodoxa luciliae Boiss.
Neillia thibetica Bureau & Franch.
Euphorbia sikkimensis Boiss.
Phuopsis stylosa (Trin.) Hook.f. ex B.D.Jacks.
Weigela subsessilis (Nakai) L.H.Bailey
Gunnera monoica Raoul
Geranium sessiliflorum subsp. novaezelandiae Carolin
Viburnum nervosum D.Don
Philadelphus calvescens (Rehder) S.M.Hwang
Hosta crispula F.Maek.
Gaultheria procumbens L.
Dianthus longicalyx Miq.
Fascicularia bicolor (Ruiz & Pav.) Mez
Corylus jacquemontii Decne.
Sorbus thomsonii (King ex Hook.fil.) Rehder
Ellisiophyllum pinnatum (Wall. ex Benth.) Makino
Euonymus planipes (Koehne) Koehne
Androsace tanggulashanensis Y.C.Yang & R.F.Huang
Sedum spurium Sibth. ex Nyman, 1879
Iris graminea L.
Gaultheria phillyreifolia (Pers.) Sleumer
Sempervivum montanum subsp. stiriacum (Wettst. ex Hayek) Hayek
Rhododendron brachyanthum Franch.
Allium hookeri var. muliense Airy Shaw
Teucrium capitatum subsp. majoricum (Rouy) T.Navarro & Rosua, 1990
Carpinus laxiflora (Siebold & Zucc.) Blume
Hedychium coronarium J.Koenig
Empetrum rubrum Vahl ex Willd.
Rhododendron formosanum Hemsl.
Colletia hystrix Clos
Acer laevigatum Wall.
Castanopsis purpurella subsp. purpurella
Magnolia acuminata (L.) L.
Tricyrtis Wall.
Acanthus sennii Chiov.
Hypericum uralum Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Rosa ecae Aitch.
Alangium platanifolium (Siebold & Zucc.) Harms
Saxifraga bryoides L.
Tiarella cordifolia L.
Amorpha nana Nutt.
Rhododendron wardii W.W.Sm.
Primula pulverulenta Duthie
Daphne oleoides Schreb.
Stauntonia DC.
Euryops acraeus M.D.Hend.
Quercus hypargyrea (Seemen ex Diels) C.C.Huang & Y.T.Chang
Carpinus L.
Rhododendron dichroanthum Diels
Aconitum carmichaeli Debeaux
Heteropterys glabra Hook. & Arn.
Salix lapponum L.
Phygelius E.Mey. ex Benth.
Macleaya microcarpa (Maxim.) Fedde
Deutzia gracilis Siebold & Zucc.
Clethra L.
Styrax perkinsiae Rehder
Carex egmontiana (Hamlin) K.A.Ford
Rosa rubus H.Lév. & Vaniot
Malus yunnanensis (Franch.) C.K.Schneid.
Phlox stolonifera Sims
Wahlenbergia gloriosa Lothian
Geranium maculatum Andrews
Liriodendron chinense (Hemsl.) Sarg.
Betula michauxii Spach
Machilus viridis Hand.-Mazz.
Primula bulleyana Forrest
Magnolia biondii Pamp.
Acer miyabei Maxim.
Orostachys malacophylla (Pall.) Fisch.
Chrysosplenium alternifolium L.
Syringa pubescens subsp. patula (Palib.) M.C.Chang & X.L.Chen
Hemerocallis lilioasphodelus L.
Sorbus foliolosa (Wall.) Spach
Fraxinus chinensis var. rhynchophylla (Hance) Hemsl.
Campsis ×tagliabuana (Vis.) Rehder
Geranium reinii Franch. & Sav.
Eucalyptus urnigera Hook.fil.
Acer caesium subsp. giraldii (Pax) A.E.Murray
Euphorbia amygdaloides var. robbiae (Turrill) Radcl.-Sm.
Lobelia siphilitica L.
Rosa pulverulenta M.Bieb.
Sorbus poteriifolia Hand.-Mazz., Anz.Kaiserl.Akad.Wiss.Wien & Math.-Naturwiss.Kl.
Gladiolus Tourn. ex L.
Borinda Stapleton
Viburnum odoratissimum var. awabuki (K.Koch) Zabel
Vaccinium henryi Hemsl.
Stewartia ovata (Cav.) Weath.
Carpinus cordata Blume
Tricyrtis macrantha Maxim.
Celtis koraiensis Nakai
Cornus bretschneideri L.Henry
Iris robusta E.S.Anderson
Lithocarpus hancei (Benth.) Rehder
Litsea pungens Hemsl.
Senecio macrospermus DC.
Sinomenium acutum (Thunb.) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Colchicum laetum Steven
Scilla hyacinthoides L.
Actinidia kolomikta (Maxim. & Rupr.) Maxim.
Rhododendron seinghkuense Kingdon-Ward
Geum leiospermum Petrie
Yucca neomexicana Wooton & Standl.
Dierama luteoalbidum I.Verd.
Rhododendron oreotrephes W.W.Sm.
Aesculus pavia L.
Santolina rosmarinifolia subsp. rosmarinifolia
Epipactis gigantea Douglas
Eomecon chionantha Hance
Adenophora remotiflora (Siebold & Zucc.) Miq.
Rhododendron campanulatum D.Don
Vitis davidii (Rom.Caill.) Föex
Sorbus glabriuscula McAll.
Primula vulgaris subsp. sibthorpii (Hoffmanns.) W.W.Sm. & Forrest
Campanula zangezura (Lipsky) Kolak. & Serdyuk.
Betula utilis D.Don
Paeonia cambessedesii (Willk.) Willk.
Sempervivum grandiflorum Haw.
Nipponanthemum nipponicum (Franch. ex Maxim.) Kitam.
Draba sakuraii Makino
Semiarundinaria fastuosa (Lat.-Marl. ex Mitford) Makino ex Nakai
Ranunculus gramineus L.
Daphne circassica Woronow ex Pobed.
Rebutia flavistyla F.Ritter
Rhododendron nitidulum var. omeiense M.N.Philipson & Philipson
Daphne retusa Hemsl.
Armeria pseudarmeria (Murray) Mansf.
Philadelphus brachybotrys Koehne
Paeonia obovata var. obovata
Calycanthus ×raulstonii (F.T.Lass. & Fantz) F.T.Lass. & Fantz ex Bernd Schulz
Epimedium koreanum Nakai
Ilex ×wandoensis C.F.Mill. & M.Kim
Rosa filipes Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Epimedium fangii Stearn
Rhododendron mariesii Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Pterocarya macroptera Batalin
Prunus serrulata var. spontanea (Maxim.) E.H.Wilson
Hydrangea bifida (Maxim.) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Viburnum schensianum Maxim.
Salix eleagnos Scop.
Rhododendron weyrichii Maxim.
Corylopsis willmottiae Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Sorbus keissleri (C.K.Schneid.) Rehder
Hippocrepis emerus (L.) Lassen
Veronica buchananii Hook.fil.
Viburnum chingii P.S.Hsu
Rosa roxburghii f. normalis Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Crataegus crus-galli L.
Rosularia turkestanica (Regel & C.Winkl.) Berger
Hypericum orientale L.
Rhododendron praevernum Hutch.
Umbilicus oppositifolius (Ledeb.) Ledeb.
Erigeron scopulinus G.L.Nesom & V.D.Roth
Polylepis tomentella Wedd.
Mandragora officinarum L.
Epimedium grandiflorum Morren
Euonymus atropurpureus Jacq.
Mammillaria mammillaris (L.) Karst.
Alstroemeria revoluta Ruiz & Pav.
Rhododendron yedoense Maxim. ex Regel
Colchicum wendelboi K.Perss.
Acer ×conspicuum van Gelderen & H.J.Oterdoom
Eryngium variifolium Coss.
Gypsophila patrinii Ser.
Salix hastata L.
Huodendron tibeticum (J.Anthony) Rehder
Peltoboykinia tellimoides (Maxim.) H.Hara
Cyclamen peloponnesiacum (Grey-Wilson) Kit Tan
Diervilla lonicera Mill.
Idesia polycarpa Maxim.
Chaenorhinum glareosum (Boiss.) Willk.
Rhododendron alutaceum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Pyrus ussuriensis Maxim.
Hydrangea viburnoides (Hook.fil. & Thomson) Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Dianthus haematocalyx subsp. pindicola (Vierh.) Hayek
Trillium recurvatum L.C.Beck
Teucrium cossonii D.Wood
Rhododendron nakaharae Hayata
Rhododendron piercei Davidian
Bretschneidera sinensis Hemsl.
Sorbus henryi Rehder
Osmanthus serrulatus Rehder
Verbascum adzharicum N.V.Gritz.
Arisaema taiwanense J.Murata
Rhodiola primuloides (Franch.) S.H.Fu
Agastache foeniculum (Pursh) Kuntze
Cremanthodium decaisnei C.B.Clarke
Artemisia lactiflora Wall. ex DC.
Schima sinensis (Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson) Airy Shaw
Actaea asiatica H.Hara
Catalpa fargesii Bureau
Rhododendron annae Franch.
Xanthorhiza simplicissima Marshall
Rhododendron caucasicum Pall.
Rhododendron balangense W.P.Fang
Rhododendron canadense (L.) Torr.
Caragana jubata (Pall.) Poir.
Rhododendron aureodorsale (W.P.Fang ex J.Q.Fu) Y.P.Ma & J.Nielsen
Pulsatilla grandis Wender.
Saxifraga ×boydii Dewar
Teucrium scorodonia L.
Sempervivum ossetiense Wale
Paronychia capitata (L.) Lam.
Senecio cannabifolius Less.
Deutzia discolor Hemsl.
Vitis betulifolia Diels & Gilg
Malus sieboldii (Regel) Rehder
Cotoneaster langei G.Klotz
Saxifraga cuneifolia L.
Campanulastrum americanum (L.) Small
Crocus L.
Psephellus simplicicaulis (Boiss. & A.Huet) Wagenitz
Santolina etrusca (Lacaita) Marchi & D' Amato
Styrax faberi Perkins
Ursinia alpina N.E.Br.
Habranthus brachyandrus (Baker) Sealy
Rhododendron moulmainense Hook.
Ribes cucullatum Hook. & Arn.
Clethra fargesii Franch.
Crambe cordifolia Steven
Albuca nelsonii N.E.Br.
Sorbus aucuparia subsp. pohuashanensis (Hance) McAll.
Enkianthus chinensis Franch.
Echinacea Moench
Coreopsis rosea Nutt.
Ugni molinae Turcz.
Tropaeolum ciliatum Ruiz & Pav.
Dierama reynoldsii I.Verd.
Fargesia dracocephala T.P.Yi
Oxalis griffithii Edgew. & Hook.fil.
Hemerocallis forrestii Diels
Veronica macrantha Hook.fil.
Leucothoe fontanesiana (Steud.) Sleumer
Acer caudatum subsp. multiserratum (Maxim.) A.E.Murray
Daphniphyllum oldhamii (Hemsl.) K.Rosenth.
Koeleria vallesiana Asch. & Graebn.
Acer capillipes Maxim.
Draba kotschyi Stur
Hypericum bellum H.L.Li
Cladanthus scariosus (Ball) Oberpr. & Vogt
Rhododendron platypodum Diels
Fargesia robusta T.P.Yi
Kirengeshoma Yatabe
Delosperma basuticum L.Bolus
Clematis finetiana H.Lév. & Vaniot
Spiraea ×hitchcockii W.J.Hess & Stoynoff
Exbucklandia tonkinensis (Lecomte) H.T.Chang
Cornus obliqua Raf.
Phillyrea latifolia L.
Gypsophila cerastioides D.Don
Lithocarpus edulis (Makino) Nakai
Cotoneaster glabratus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Symplocos paniculata (Thunb.) Miq.
Paeonia mascula subsp. mascula
Anacyclus pyrethrum (L.) Lag.
Bergenia purpurascens (Hook.fil. & Thomson) Engl.
Veronica bachofenii Heuff.
Magnolia globosa Hook.f. & Thomson
Paeonia obovata Maxim.
Clematoclethra scandens subsp. hemsleyi (Baill.) Y.C.Tang & Q.Y.Xiang
Raoulia hectori Hook.fil.
Sempervivum arachnoideum subsp. tomentosum (C.B.Lehm. & Schnittsp.) Schinz & Thell.
Aquilegia grata Maly ex Borbás
Aesculus flava Sol.
Iris histrioides Fost. ex Hayek
Magnolia sieboldii subsp. japonica K.Ueda
Hosta sieboldiana var. elegans Hyl.
Narcissus bulbocodium L.
Halesia carolina L.
Clematis heracleifolia DC.
Myrsine seguinii H.Lév.
Acantholimon caryophyllaceum Boiss.
Moraea ochroleuca (Salisb.) Drapiez
Koenigia campanulata (Hook.fil.) T.M.Schust. & Reveal
Ceanothus americanus L.
Sarcococca hookeriana var. digyna Franch.
Weigela Thunb.
Acer stachyophyllum Hiern
Veronica decumbens Armstr.
Hydrangea anomala D.Don
Nyssa sinensis Oliv.
Rhododendron wasonii Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Lindera erythrocarpa Makino
Helwingia japonica (Thunb.) F.Dietr.
Callicarpa bodinieri var. giraldii (Hesse ex Rehder) Rehder
Noccaea vesicaria (L.) Al-Shehbaz
Phyllodoce nipponica Makino
Styrax faberi var. formosanus (Matsum.) S.M.Hwang
Epimedium ×hybridum C.Morren
Anemone hupehensis (Lemoine) Lemoine
Arisaema sikokianum Franch. & Sav.
Sorbus rehderiana Koehne
Carex albula Allan
Rhododendron parmulatum Cowan
Raoulia tenuicaulis Hook.fil.
Rhododendron hypoglaucum Hemsl.
Veronica decora (Ashwin) Garn.-Jones
Lilium distichum Nakai
Pulmonaria L.
Rhododendron argyrophyllum subsp. nankingense (Cowan) Chamb.
Lavandula latifolia Medik.
Anthemis marschalliana Willd.
Sedum tenellum M.Bieb.
Phedimus stoloniferus (S.G.Gmel.) 't Hart
Syringa pinnatifolia Hemsl.
Cornus elliptica (Pojark.) Q.Y.Xiang & Boufford
Vestia foetida Hoffmanns.
Aciphylla simplex Petrie
Polygonatum cirrhifolium (Wall.) Royle
Vaccinium stamineum L.
Watsonia pillansii L.Bolus
Lathyrus venetus Rouy, 1899
Strobilanthes attenuatus (Jacq. ex Nees) Nees
Kniphofia linearifolia Baker
Alyssum spinosum L.
Sempervivum macedonicum Praeger
Sempervivum arachnoideum L.
Erigeron miyabeanus Tatew. & Kitam.
Parthenocissus henryana (Hemsl.) Diels & Gilg
Ipheion Raf.
Magnolia salicifolia (Siebold & Zucc.) Maxim.
Acer triflorum Kom.
Acer acuminatum Wall. ex D.Don
Corylopsis sinensis f. veitchiana (Bean) B.D.Morley & J.M.Chao
Toona sinensis (A.Juss.) M.Roem.
Pachyphragma macrophyllum (Hoffm.) N.Busch
Acer elegantulum W.P.Fang & P.L.Chiu
Sorbus pseudohupehensis McAll.
Iris hartwegii subsp. columbiana L.W.Lenz
Dicentra Bernh.
Carex solandri Boott
Parrotia subaequalis (Hung T.Chang) R.M.Hao & H.T.Wei
Maihueniopsis ovata (Pfeiff.) F.Ritter
Epimedium sutchuenense Franch.
Actinidia polygama (Siebold & Zucc.) Maxim.
Acanthocalycium klimpelianum (Weidlich & Werderm.) Backeb.
Disanthus ovatifolius Aver., P.K.Endress, B.H.Quang & K.S.Nguyen
Erica cinerea L.
Tritonia disticha (Klatt) Baker
Gaultheria poeppigii DC.
Caryopteris incana (Thunb. ex Houtt.) Miq.
Rhododendron calostrotum var. calostrotum
Scleranthus uniflorus P.A.Will.
Olearia capillaris Buchanan
Fuchsia microphylla Kunth
Saurauia roxburghii Wall.
Sorbus alnifolia (Siebold & Zucc.) K.Koch
Alchemilla xanthochlora Rothm.
Nothofagus antarctica (G.Forst.) Oerst.
Clematis patens Morren & Decne.
Veronica lyallii Hook.fil.
Sempervivum octopodes Turrill
Cysticapnos pruinosa (Bernh.) Lidén
Sempervivum ciliosum var. borisii (Degen & Urum.) P.Mitch.
Parthenocissus semicordata var. roylei (King ex Parker) Nazim. & Qaiser
Rhododendron discolor Franch.
Betula maximowicziana Regel
Gleditsia japonica var. japonica
Crassula sarcocaulis subsp. rupicola Toelken
Berberis sanguinea Franch.
Fraxinus chinensis Roxb.
Viburnum foetidum Wall.
Cotoneaster hodjingensis Klotz
Heuchera pulchella Wooton & Standl.
Phlox divaricata L.
Rhododendron glischrum subsp. rude (Tagg & Forrest) D.F.Chamb.
Geranium gymnocaulon DC.
Rhododendron noriakianum Suzuki
Viburnum odoratissimum var. arboricolum (Hayata) Yamam.
Rhododendron facetum Balf.fil. & Kingdon-Ward
Tulipa montana Lindl.
Neoshirakia japonica (Siebold & Zucc.) Esser
Stewartia sinensis Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Actinidia arguta var. arguta
Lycoris aurea (L'Hér.) Herb.
Clematis stans Siebold & Zucc.
Acer pectinatum subsp. laxiflorum (Pax) A.E.Murray
Ilex leucoclada Makino
Amsonia hubrichtii Woodson
Aciphylla aurea W.R.B.Oliv.
Betula fargesii Franch.
Magnolia fordiana var. fordiana
Allium forrestii Diels
Peucedanum verticillare Spreng., 1827
Ruschia laxipetala L.Bolus
Rosa glomerata Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Jovibarba heuffelii (Schott) A. & D.Löve
Crocus pulchellus Herb.
Podophyllum versipelle Hance
Luculia gratissima (Wall.) Sweet
Rhododendron campylocarpum subsp. campylocarpum
Digitalis parviflora Jacq.
Rodgersia aesculifolia var. henrici (Franch.) C.Y.Wu ex J.T.Pan
Sorbus megalocarpa Rehder
Carya glabra (Mill.) Sweet
Gladiolus illyricus W.D.J.Koch
Rhododendron fulgens Hook.fil.
Delphinium vestitum Wall. ex Royle
Buddleja colvilei Hook.fil. & Thomson
Inula rhizocephala Schrenk
Fortunearia sinensis Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Anemone sylvestris L.
Phedimus selskianus (Regel & Maack) 't Hart
Sempervivum pumilum M.Bieb.
Galanthus L.
Delosperma dyeri L.Bolus
Disanthus cercidifolius subsp. cercidifolius
Linum hypericifolium Salisb. ex Steud., 1821
Raoulia australis Hook.fil. ex Raoul
Amelanchier canadensis (L.) Medik.
Polygonatum pubescens (Willd.) Pursh
Iberis gibraltarica L.
Schefflera fengii C.J.Tseng & G.Hoo
Androsace lactea L.
Crataegus ×grignonensis Mouill.
Magnolia liliiflora Desr.
Spiraea alba Du Roi
Psephellus dealbatus (Willd.) K.Koch
Berberis praecipua C.K.Schneid.
Austroderia fulvida (Buchanan) N.P.Barker & H.P.Linder
Vernonia gigantea (Walter) Trel.
Thalictrum dioicum L.
Calceolaria polyrrhiza Cav.
Rhododendron maculiferum subsp. maculiferum
Peltoboykinia watanabei (Yatabe) Hara
Crassula coccinea L.
Tilia chinensis Maxim.
Olearia mollis Cockayne
Carex testacea Sol. ex Boott
Rhodanthemum atlanticum (Ball) B.H.Wilcox, K.Bremer & Humphries
Dracocephalum imberbe Bunge
Colchicum cilicicum (Boiss.) Dammer
Leucosidea sericea Eckl. & Zeyh.
Celtis choseniana Nakai
Magnolia conifera var. chingii (Dandy) V.S.Kumar
Hedychium spicatum Sm.
Allium stellatum Nutt. ex Ker Gawl.
Rhododendron keysii Nutt.
Hypericum lagarocladum N.Robson
Sorbus discolor (Maxim.) Maxim.
Rhododendron calostrotum subsp. riparium (Ward) Cullen
Coryphantha macromeris (Engelm.) Lem.
Schizanthus grahamii Gillies
Heuchera villosa var. macrorhiza (Small) Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Iris suaveolens Boiss. & Reut.
Actinidia arguta var. giraldii (Diels) C.F.Liang ex C.W.Chang
Garrya ×issaquahensis Talbot ex E.C.Nelson
Ranunculus crithmifolius Hook.fil.
Lobelia montana Reinw. ex Blume
Horminum pyrenaicum L.
Veronica brachysiphon (Summerh.) Bean
Fritillaria grandiflora Grossh.
Hibanobambusa tranquillans (Koidz.) Maruy. & H.Okamura
Sophora microphylla Aiton
Tilia chinensis var. intonsa (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Y.C.Hsu & R.Zhuge
Carpinus shensiensis Hu
Achillea clypeolata Sibth. & Sm.
Diphylleia cymosa Michx.
Artemisia pontica L.
Phoebe sheareri (Hemsl.) Gamble
Serratula tinctoria subsp. seoanei (Willk.) M.Laínz
Carex dallii Kirk
Geranium clarkei Yeo
Spiraea schneideriana var. amphidoxa Rehder
Saxifraga callosa var. australis (Moric.) D.A.Webb
Poa buchananii Zotov
Draba korabensis Kümmerle & Degen
Colchicum byzantinum Ker Gawl.
Helichrysum plicatum subsp. plicatum
Eucalyptus pauciflora subsp. debeuzevillei (Maiden) L.A.S.Johnson & Blaxell
Potentilla chinensis var. concolor Franch. & Sav.
Sorbus gracilis (Siebold & Zucc.) K.Koch
Rhododendron tsusiophyllum Sugim.
Salvia jurisicii Kosanin
Malus halliana Koehne
Hydrangea longipes Franch.
Pleioblastus argenteostriatus (Regel) Nakai
Arenaria purpurascens Ramond ex DC.
Erica spiculifolia Salisb.
Dianthus freynii Vandas
Cornus hemsleyi C.K.Schneid. & Wangerin
Cautleya spicata (Sm.) Baker
Rhododendron amundsenianum Hand.-Mazz.
Erica oatesii Rolfe
Lyonia ovalifolia (Wall.) Drude
Dipelta floribunda Maxim.
Stachyurus praecox Siebold & Zucc.
Viburnum opulus var. sargentii (Koehne) Takeda
Oxalis depressa Eckl. & Zeyh.
Rhododendron tschonoskii var. trinerve (Fr. ex Boiss.) Makino
Camassia scilloides (Raf.) Cory
Fuchsia regia subsp. regia
Rhododendron diversipilosum (Nakai) Harmaja
Freesia viridis (Aiton) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Agapanthus coddii F.M.Leight.
Convolvulus boissieri subsp. boissieri
Convolvulus compactus Boiss.
Narcissus jonquilla subsp. cordubensis (Fern.Casas) Zonn.
Rosa longicuspis Bertol.
Sandersonia aurantiaca Hook.
Sisyrinchium palmifolium L.
Maytenus magellanica (Lam.) Hook.fil.
Ballota acetabulosa (L.) Benth.
Calceolaria biflora Lam.
Meconopsis Vig.
Euonymus oxyphyllus Miq.
Paris rugosa H.Li & Kurita
Camellia grijsii Hance
Rhododendron taliense Franch.
Rhodophiala araucana (Phil.) Traub
Magnolia ashei Weath.
Geranium shikokianum Matsum.
Edraianthus dalmaticus (A.DC.) A.DC.
Chionochloa flavicans Zotov
Narcissus minor L.
Wahlenbergia albomarginata Hook.
Symphytum tuberosum L.
Aristolochia griffithii Hook.fil. & Thomson ex Duch.
Cotoneaster harrysmithii Flinck & B.Hylmö
Rhododendron titapuriense A.A.Mao, K.N.E.Cox & D.F.Chamb.
Primula bullata Franch.
Stachyurus retusus Y.C.Yang
Denmoza rhodacantha (Salm-Dyck) Britton & Rose
Magnolia wilsonii (Finet & Gagnep.) Rehder
Chrysanthemum zawadskii subsp. acutilobum Kitag.
Primula palinuri Petagna
Maackia fauriei Nakai
Viburnum sieboldii Miq.
Rhododendron roxieanum var. roxieanum
Sibbaldiopsis tridentata (Aiton) Rydb.
Boehmeria tricuspis (Hance) Makino
Saxifraga ×gaudinii Brügger
Salvia guaranitica A.St.-Hil. ex Benth.
Syringa yunnanensis Franch.
Rhododendron brachyanthum subsp. hypolepidotum (Balf.fil. & Forrest) Cullen
Biarum marmarisense (P.C.Boyce) P.C.Boyce
Potentilla alba L.
Epimedium stellulatum Stearn
Aloinopsis spathulata (Thunb.) L.Bolus
Prunus pseudocerasus Lindl.
Nothaphoebe cavaleriei (H.Lév.) Yen C.Yang
Rhododendron aganniphum Balf.fil. & Kingdon-Ward
Rhododendron argyrophyllum Franch.
Anthyllis vulneraria L.
Eucalyptus perriniana F.Muell. ex Rodway
Quercus guyavifolia H.Lév.
Ferula communis L.
Caryopteris clandonensis A.Simmonds
Bulbinella nutans (Thunb.) T.Durand & Schinz
Rhododendron haematodes Franch.
Arthropodium candidum Raoul
Enkianthus deflexus (Griff.) C.K.Schneid.
Rhododendron succothii Davidian
Euonymus obovatus Nutt.
Eucalyptus rubida H.Deane & Maiden
Rhodiola ishidae (Miyabe & Kudô) Hara
Daphne blagayana Freyer
Rhododendron haofui Chun & W.P.Fang
Aesculus assamica Griff.
Arisaema consanguineum Schott
Sorbus ulleungensis Chin S.Chang
Rosa villosa L.
Dianthus sylvestris subsp. sylvestris
Pterostyrax corymbosus Siebold & Zucc.
Triosteum pinnatifidum Maxim.
Ribes davidii Franch.
Anemone narcissiflora Hook. & Arn.
Kniphofia laxiflora Kunth
Allium scabriscapum Boiss.
Iris tectorum Maxim.
Scleranthus biflorus (J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.) Hook.fil.
Daphne giraldii Nitsche
Sanguisorba obtusa Maxim.
Acer pictum subsp. okamotoanum (Nakai) H.Ohashi
Cotula lineariloba (DC.) Hilliard
Saxifraga fortunei Hook.
Begonia grandis Dryand.
Skimmia ×confusa N.P.Taylor
Hosta fortunei (Baker) L.H.Bailey
Tulipa vvedenskyi Botschantz.
Rhododendron maculiferum subsp. anwheiense (E.H.Wilson) D.F.Chamb.
Bergenia crassifolia var. pacifica (Kom.) Nekr.
Epimedium brachyrrhizum Stearn
Kniphofia ensifolia Baker
Echinops L.
Berberis kawakamii Hayata
Leucanthemopsis alpina (L.) Heywood
Clematoclethra (Franch.) Maxim.
Stewartia L.
Magnolia laevifolia (Y.W.Law & Y.F.Wu) Noot.
Acer velutinum Boiss.
Rhododendron ovatum (Lindl.) Planch. ex Maxim.
Betula ermanii Cham.
Hylotelephium cyaneum (Rudolph) H.Ohba
Deutzia calycosa var. calycosa
Sorbus coronata (Cardot) T.T.Yu & H.T.Tsai
Campanula saxifraga M.Bieb.
Astilbe japonica f. pygmaea S.Akiyama
Incarvillea diffusa Royle
Campanula L.
Phyteuma pseudorbiculare Pant.
Helichrysum thianschanicum Regel
Anemone transsilvanica (Fuss) Heuff.
Rebutia minuscula K.Schum.
Carpinus japonica Blume
Hypericum kouytchense H.Lév.
Inula magnifica Lipsky
Primula capitata Hook.
Arisaema triphyllum (L.) Schott
Rhododendron trichostomum Franch.
Primula reticulata Wall.
Artemisia rutifolia Steph. ex Spreng.
Borinda utilis (T.P.Yi) Stapleton
Rosa ×alba L.
Rhododendron magnificum Kingdon-Ward
Cardiocrinum giganteum (Wall.) Makino
Camellia brevistyla (Hayata) Cohen-Stuart
Salvia multicaulis Vahl
Ilex triflora Brandegee
Hylotelephium cauticola (Praeger) H.Ohba
Acer buergerianum var. buergerianum
Epimedium truncatum H.R.Liang
Rhododendron balfourianum Diels
Rhododendron balfourianum var. aganniphoides Tagg & Forrest
Sorbus karchungii Rushforth
Phedimus floriferus (Praeger) 't Hart
Narcissus rupicola Dufour ex Schult.f., 1830
Genista tenera (Jacq. ex Murray) Kuntze
Lithocarpus grandifolius (D.Don) S.N.Biswas
Geranium soboliferum Kom.
Alstroemeria ligtu subsp. incarnata Ehr.Bayer
Rhododendron lanatum Hook.fil.
Rhodiola pachyclados (Aitch. ex Hemsl.) H.Ohba
Aster amellus L.
Helwingia himalaica Hook.fil. & Thomson ex C.B.Clarke
Rohdea nepalensis (Raf.) N.Tanaka
Rhododendron triflorum subsp. triflorum
Paeonia mlokosewitschii Lomakin
Digitalis trojana Ivan.
Dianthus superbus L.
Allium atropurpureum Waldst. & Kit.
Muscari aucheri (Boiss.) Baker
Liriope minor (Maxim.) Makino
Styrax tonkinensis (Pierre) Craib ex Hartwich
Castanopsis carlesii (Hemsl.) Hayata
Helianthemum canum (L.) Baumg.
Moraea huttonii (Baker) Oberm.
Carex grayi J.Carey
Petasites albus (L.) Gaertn.
Epimedium leptorrhizum Stearn
Carex morrowii Boott
Daphne albowiana Woronow ex Pobed.
Ramonda myconi (L.) Rchb.
Ilex shennongjiaensis T.R.Dudley & S.C.Sun
Sempervivum cantabricum hort. ex Praeger
Prometheum muratdaghense (Kit Tan) 't Hart
Acer cordatum Pax
Dactylicapnos scandens (D.Don) Hutch.
Tulipa altaica Pall. ex Spreng.
Aristolochia tomentosa Sims
Celastrus scandens L.
Gaultheria parvula D.J.Middleton
Erodium glandulosum (Cav.) Willd.
Narcissus jonquilla L.
Asphodelus acaulis Desf.
Dianthus gratianopolitanus Vill.
Styrax formosanus var. formosanus
Betula platyphylla Sukaczev
Clinopodium nepeta subsp. nepeta
Disporum longistylum (H.Lév. & Vaniot) H.Hara
Schefflera dongnaiensis var. langbianensis Bui
Lathyrus aureus (Steven) Bornm.
Sedum palmeri S.Watson
Lobelia speciosa Sweet
Berberis pruinosa Franch.
Acer mono Maxim.
Globularia meridionalis (Podp.) O.Schwarz
Begonia emeiensis C.M.Hu ex C.Y.Wu & T.C.Ku
Veronica ochracea (Ashwin) Garn.-Jones
Saxifraga caesia L.
Rhododendron degronianum var. kyomaruense (T.Yamaz.) H.Hara
Enkianthus campanulatus var. longilobus (Nakai) Makino
Agave stricta Salm-Dyck
Acer sikkimense Miq.
Kniphofia albescens Codd
Kageneckia oblonga Ruiz & Pav.
Deutzia calycosa Rehder
Sternbergia lutea Orph. ex Nyman, 1882
Litsea moupinensis var. szechuanica (C.K.Allen) Yen C.Yang & P.H.Huang
Geranium regelii Nevski
Armeria juniperifolia (Vahl) Hoffmanns. & Link
Cotoneaster nitidus var. parvifolius (T.T.Yu) T.T.Yu
Alyssum lenense Adams
Sorbus vilmorinii C.K.Schneid.
Illicium henryi Diels
Tigridia orthantha (Lem.) Ravenna
Kniphofia northiae Baker
Carlina acaulis subsp. caulescens (Lam.) Schübl. & G.Martens
Noccaea bellidifolia (Griseb.) F.K.Mey.
Callicarpa cathayana C.H.Chang
Trollius hondoensis Nakai
Pulsatilla pratensis subsp. nigricans (Störck) Zämelis
Arum creticum Boiss. & Heldr.
Pittosporum subulisepalum Hu & F.T.Wang
Rhododendron tschonoskii Maxim.
Photinia villosa (Thunb.) DC.
Tigridia van-houttei (Baker) Espejo & López-Ferr.
Actaea cordifolia DC.
Clematis paniculata J.F.Gmel.
Lindera triloba (Siebold & Zucc.) Blume
Rostrinucula dependens (Rehder) Kudô
Cercidiphyllum magnificum (Nakai) Nakai
Dirca palustris L.
Clematis montana var. wilsonii Sprague
Potentilla cuneata Wall. ex Lehm.
Hedera pastuchovii Woronow ex Grossh., 1926
Leptospermum namadgiensis Lyne
Rhododendron luteiflorum (Davidian) Cullen
Tanacetum haradjanii (Rech.fil.) Grierson
Corylus ferox var. tibetica (Batalin) Franch.
Tigridia durangensis Molseed ex Cruden
Astilbe rivularis var. myriantha (Diels) J.T.Pan
Plantago subulata L.
Berchemia racemosa Siebold & Zucc.
Gladiolus saundersii Hook.f.
Kniphofia typhoides Codd
Rudbeckia subtomentosa Pursh
Asimina parviflora (Michx.) Dunal
Geranium ×magnificum Hyl.
Spiraea wilsonii Duthie ex Veitch
Geranium platypetalum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Selinum wallichianum (DC.) Raizada & H.O.Saxena
Sedum laxum var. heckneri (M.Peck) H.Ohba
Heuchera hallii A.Gray
Phlomis samia L.
Dianthus alpinus L.
Dianthus sternbergii Sieber ex Capelli
Draba rigida Willd.
Thymus longicaulis C.Presl
Clematis glaucophylla Small
Sinofranchetia chinensis Hemsl.
Synthyris missurica subsp. stellata (Pennell) Kartesz & Gandhi
Jovellana violacea (Cav.) G.Don
Asterotrichion discolor (Hook.) Melville
Quercus mongolica Fisch. ex Turcz.
Rhododendron selense Franch.
Celtis biondii Pamp.
Lonicera ferdinandii Franch.
Phedimus takesimensis (Nakai) 't Hart
Blitum bonus-henricus (L.) Rchb.
Allium splendens Willd. ex Schult. & Schult.f.
Rhododendron ×trichophorum Balf.f.
Gillenia trifoliata (L.) Moench
Phlomis russeliana (Sims) Lag. ex Benth.
Polygonatum kingianum Collett & Hemsl.
Ceratostigma minus Stapf ex Prain
Acanthus hungaricus (Borbás) Baen.
Cornus chinensis Wangerin
Sempervivum calcareum Jord.
Hypericum buckleyi M.A.Curtis
Myrceugenia ovata var. nannophylla (Burret) Landrum
Corylus chinensis Franch.
Yushania brevipaniculata (Hand.-Mazz.) T.P.Yi
Aethionema schistosum Boiss. & Kotschy
Phlox glaberrima L.
Lonicera ferruginea Rehder
Rhododendron levinei Merr.
Euonymus clivicolus W.W.Sm.
Acer saccharum subsp. floridanum (Chapm.) Desmarais
Polygonatum geminiflorum Decne.
Rhododendron lepidotum Wall. ex G.Don
Stauntonia brachyandra (H.N.Qin) Christenh.
Veronica lycopodioides Hook.fil.
Jovibarba globifera subsp. glabrescens (Sabr.) Holub
Thalictrum aquilegiifolium var. intermedium Nakai
Rhododendron calostrotum Balf.fil. & Kingdon-Ward
Androsace vitaliana subsp. cinerea (Sünd.) Kress
Primula munroi Lindl.
Lobelia roughii Hook.f.
Narcissus pseudonarcissus subsp. nobilis (Haw.) A.Fern.
Androsace studiosorum Kress
Lilium lankongense Franch.
Deutzia purpurascens (Franch. ex L.Henry) Rehder
Tradescantia longipes E.S.Anderson & Woodson
Euphorbia griffithii Hook.f.
Pulsatilla halleri (All.) Willd.
Solidago flexicaulis L.
Cotoneaster microphyllus var. thymifolius (Baker) Koehne
Inula racemosa Hook.fil.
Cornus alternifolia L.f.
Primula clusiana Tausch
Acer palmatum var. dissectum (Thunb.) Miq.
Staphylea pinnata L.
Stachyurus salicifolius Franch.
Primula allionii Hausm.
Comptonia peregrina (L.) Coult.
Helichrysum albobrunneum S.Moore
Rhododendron habrotrichum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Tanakaea radicans Franch. & Sav.
Malus rockii Rehder
Eumorphia sericea subsp. robustior Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Rosa willmottiae Hemsl.
Allium paradoxum var. normale Stearn
Sasa Makino & Shibata
Chrysogonum virginianum L.
Carex berggrenii Petrie
Daphne domini Halda
Androsace sarmentosa Wall.
Manfreda virginica (L.) Salisb. ex Rose
Fagus longipetiolata Seemen
Salix gilgiana Seemen
Scilla autumnalis L.
Colchicum speciosum Steven
Geranium stapfianum Hand.-Mazz.
Gymnospermium albertii (Regel) Takht.
Sorbus cashmiriana Hedl.
Paulownia fargesii Franch.
Triosteum aurantiacum E.P.Bicknell
Malus doumeri (Bois) A.Chev.
Monarda punctata L.
Daphne ×rollsdorfii C.D.Brickell & A.R.White
Rhododendron lanigerum Tagg
Acanthocalycium spiniflorum (K.Schum.) Backeb.
Origanum sipyleum L.
Kniphofia pauciflora Baker
Sorbus harrowiana (Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.) Rehder
Crocus nudiflorus Sm.
Magnolia ×wiesneri Carr
Acer metcalfii Rehder
Tricyrtis latifolia Maxim.
Daboecia cantabrica (Huds.) K.Koch
Kniphofia triangularis Kunth
Magnolia foveolata (Merr. ex Dandy) Figlar
Rheum tanguticum Maxim. ex Balf.
Gaultheria borneensis Stapf
Rhododendron excellens Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Polygala chamaebuxus var. grandiflora Gaudin, 1829
Silene keiskei Miq.
Elsholtzia stauntonii Benth.
Thalictrum thalictroides (L.) A.J.Eames & B.Boivin
Penstemon digitalis Nutt.
Calamagrostis hakonensis Franch. & Sav.
Aristea africana (L.) Hoffmanns.
Quercus myrsinifolia Blume
Hypericum beanii N.Robson
Berberis morrisonensis Hayata
Acer caesium Wall. ex Brandis
Pontechium maculatum (L.) Böhle & Hilger
Harpochloa falx (L.f.) Kuntze
Sorbaronia ×alpina C.K.Schneid.
Draba bruniifolia subsp. olympica (DC.) Coode & Cullen
Lyonia ligustrina (L.) DC.
Crocosmia masoniorum (L.Bolus) N.E.Br.
Stewartia rostrata Spongberg
Achillea atrata L.
Rhododendron cinnabarinum subsp. xanthocodon (Hutch.) Cullen
Umbilicus rupestris (Salisb.) Dandy
Phyllostachys makinoi Hayata
Ranunculus glacialis L.
Zantedeschia rehmannii Engl.
Hieracium tomentosum L.
Xerophyta viscosa Baker
Rhodiola rosea subsp. arctica (Boriss.) A. & D.Löve
Triosteum himalayanum Wall.
Eriosyce curvispina (Bertero ex Colla) Katt.
Veronica bellidioides L.
Thamnocalamus spathiflorus var. crassinodus (T.P.Yi) Stapleton
Lilium lancifolium Thunb.
Ligularia amplexicaulis (Wall.) DC.
Gentiana septemfida Pall.
Ilex macropoda Miq.
Maianthemum oleraceum (Baker) LaFrankie
Dactylorhiza Neck. ex Nevski
Heloniopsis umbellata Baker
Hakea epiglottis Labill.
Luzula ulophylla (Buchenau) Cockayne & Laing
Cypella herbertii (Lindl.) Herb.
Dianthus knappii Asch. ex Nyman, 1878
Trillium apetalon Makino
Rhodophiala montana (Phil.) Traub
Aethionema saxatile (L.) W.T.Aiton
Primula denticulata Sm.
Scutellaria indica L.
Trillium pusillum Michx.
Gaultheria adenothrix (Miq.) Maxim.
Corylopsis gotoana Makino
Euonymus verrucosus Scop.
Coprosma depressa Colenso ex Hook.f.
Lonicera ×brownii (Regel) Carrière
Fagus lucida Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Iris henryi Baker
Rhododendron quinquefolium Bisset & S.Moore
Iris confusa Sealy
Carya cordiformis (Wangenh.) K.Koch
Hyssopus officinalis subsp. aristatus (Godr.) Nyman
Philadelphus henryi Koehne
Rhododendron wardii var. wardii
Skimmia arborescens T.Anderson ex Gamble
Wisteria brachybotrys Siebold & Zucc.
Magnolia virginiana L.
Erodium pelargoniiflorum Boiss. & Heldr.
Magnolia delavayi Franch.
Beesia deltophylla C.Y.Wu
Shibataea chinensis Nakai
Thymus citriodorus (Pers.) Schreb.
Acer cissifolium (Siebold & Zucc.) K.Koch
Rubus pubescens var. pubescens
Aquilegia flabellata var. pumila (Huth) Kudô
Helleborus purpurascens Waldst. & Kit.
Thymus mastichina (L.) L.
Myosotis traversii Hook.fil.
Bergenia pacumbis (Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don) C.Y.Wu & J.T.Pan
Lilium superbum L.
Armeria welwitschii Boiss.
Lonicera caerulea var. kamtschatica Sevast.
Primula beesiana Forrest
Gentiana angustifolia subsp. corbariensis (Braun-Blanq.) Renob.
Hamamelis mollis Oliv. ex F.B.Forbes & Hemsl.
Phyllostachys atrovaginata C.S.Chao & H.Y.Chou
Thalictrum coreanum H.Lév.
Petasites japonicus subsp. giganteus (F.Schmidt ex Trautv.) Kitam.
Persicaria microcephala (D.Don) H.Gross
Epimedium membranaceum K.I.Mey.
Aesculus indica (Colebr. ex Cambess.) Hook.
Olearia Moench
Brodiaea californica Lindl.
Eucryphia ×intermedia J.Bausch
Rhododendron tschonoskii var. tschonoskii
Thalictrum lucidum L.
Clematis montana var. grandiflora Hook.
Rhodophiala phycelloides (Herb.) Hunz.
Rhododendron minus var. chapmanii (A.Gray) W.H.Duncan & Pullen
Rosa ×damascena Mill.
Pittosporum illicioides var. angustifolium C.C.Huang ex S.Y.Lu
Tulipa saxatilis subsp. bakeri (A.D.Hall) Zonn.
Weigela japonica Thunb.
Eremurus robustus (Regel) Regel
Geranium multisectum N.E.Br.
Acer truncatum Bunge
Caulophyllum thalictroides (L.) Michx.
Deutzia setchuenensis Franch.
Corylopsis pauciflora Siebold & Zucc.
Styrax japonicus var. calycothrix Gilg
Eranthis cilicicus Schott & Kotschy
Magnolia kobus DC.
Berberis empetrifolia Lam.
Rhododendron trilectorum Cowan
Acer pictum subsp. macropterum (W.P.Fang) H.Ohashi
Abeliophyllum distichum Nakai
Trigonotis cavaleriei (H.Lév.) Hand.-Mazz.
Poliothyrsis sinensis Hook.f.
Salvia glutinosa L.
Rhododendron coriaceum Franch.
Bryonia cretica subsp. dioica (Jacq.) Tutin
Acer miyabei subsp. miaotaiense (P.C.Tsoong) A.E.Murray
Catalpa bungei C.A.Mey.
Acer longipes Franch. ex Rehder
Phlomis tuberosa L.
Hydrangea schizomollis Y.De Smet & C.Granados
Alchemilla alpina L.
Carex scaposa var. scaposa
Viburnum kansuense Batalin
Nepeta subsessilis Maxim.
Clematis hirsutissima var. scottii (Porter & Coult.) R.O.Erickson
Parrotiopsis jacquemontiana (Decne.) Rehder
Cotinus obovatus Raf.
Gentiana verna L.
Sanguisorba tenuifolia var. alba Trautv. & C.A.Mey.
Anemonopsis macrophylla Siebold & Zucc.
Staphylea coulombieri André
Styrax roseus Dunn
Lychnis sieboldii Van Houtte
Betula pamirica Litv.
Rhododendron micranthum Turcz.
Ceratostigma griffithii C.B.Clarke
Iris aphylla L.
Peltoboykinia (Engl.) Hara
Veronica gibbsii Kirk
Peucedanum oreoselinum (L.) Moench
Bergenia Moench
Lysimachia ephemerum L.
Arabis carduchorum Boiss.
Lilium kesselringianum Miscz.
Rhodiola kirilowii (Regel) Maxim.
Francoa ramosa D.Don
Epimedium ×perralchicum Stearn
Prunus speciosa (Koidz.) Nakai
Berberis japonica (Thunb.) Spreng.
Stauntonia coriacea (Diels) Christenh.
Eremogone gypsophiloides (L.) Fenzl
Hamamelis japonica Siebold & Zucc.
Rosa sertata var. sertata
Lespedeza thunbergii subsp. thunbergii
Rhododendron mucronatum (Blume) G.Don
Euptelea pleiosperma Hook.fil. & Thomson
Arisaema ciliatum H.Li
Magnolia cathcartii (Hook.f. & Thomson) Noot.
Eucomis comosa (Houtt.) Wehrh.
Alstroemeria ligtu L.
Achillea clavennae L.
Tulipa iliensis Regel
Thalictrum diffusiflorum C.Marquand & Airy Shaw
Satureja montana L.
Fargesia Franch.
Clematoclethra scandens subsp. actinidioides (Maxim.) Y.C.Tang & Q.Y.Xiang
Eryngium bourgatii Gouan
Amsonia elliptica (Thunb.) Roem. & Schult.
Neillia tanakae Franch. & Sav.
Iris latifolia (Mill.) Voss
Dierama pauciflorum N.E.Br.
Primula grandis Trautv.
Epimedium zhushanense K.F.Wu & S.X.Qian
Thymus serpyllum L.
Carpinus viminea Wall. ex Lindl.
Chrysosplenium macrophyllum Oliv.
Felicia uliginosa (J.M.Wood & M.S.Evans) Grau
Yucca rupicola Scheele
Lilium mackliniae Sealy
Fuchsia procumbens R.Cunn.
Doronicum grandiflorum Lam.
Eucomis autumnalis (Mill.) Chitt.
Machilus ichangensis Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Sempervivum nevadense var. hirtella Wale
Kadsura heteroclita (Roxb.) Craib
Prometheum sempervivoides (M.Bieb.) H.Ohba
Muscari latifolium J.Kirk
Daphne longilobata (Lecomte) Turrill
Jovibarba hirta (L.) Opiz
Daphne ×hendersonii Hodgkin ex C.D.Brickell & B.Mathew
Othonna capensis L.H.Bailey
Begonia flaviflora Hara
Freesia laxa subsp. azurea (Goldblatt & Hutchings) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Asarum europaeum L.
Sorbus prattii Koehne
Rhododendron mucronatum var. ripense (Makino) Wilson
Saxifraga burseriana L.
Ligustrum tschonoskii Decne.
Lagerstroemia subcostata var. fauriei (Koehne) Hatus. ex Yahara
Hacquetia epipactis (Scop.) DC.
Colchicum confusum K.Perss.
Rhododendron grande Wight
Eleutherococcus giraldii (Harms) Nakai
Astilbe biternata (Vent.) Britton
Trifolium rubens L.
Rhododendron crinigerum var. crinigerum
Galanthus reginae-olgae subsp. reginae-olgae
Camellia yunnanensis Cohen-Stuart
Celmisia sessiliflora Hook.fil.
Ampelopsis megalophylla Diels & Gilg
Arum concinnatum Schott
Lomatia myricoides (C.F.Gaertn.) Domin
Wahlenbergia congesta (Cheeseman) N.E.Br.
Yucca intermedia McKelvey
Saxifraga scardica Griseb.
Weigela coraeensis Thunb.
Wachendorfia paniculata Burm.
Osmanthus delavayi Franch.
Sempervivum zeleborii Schott
Aconitum uchiyamaii Nakai
Sempervivum ×funckii F.Braun
Acaena magellanica subsp. laevigata (Aiton) Bitter
Tulipa batalinii Regel
Elliottia racemosa Muhl. ex Elliott
Carya ovata (Mill.) K.Koch
Iris delavayi Micheli
Thalictrum kiusianum Nakai
Ornithogalum viridiflorum (I.Verd.) J.C.Manning & Goldblatt
Dierama jucundum Hilliard
Tradescantia hirsuticaulis Small
Magnolia floribunda (Finet & Gagnep.) Figlar
Corylopsis sinensis var. sinensis
Lonicera ligustrina var. yunnanensis Franch.
Saxifraga longifolia Lapeyr.
Hemerocallis thunbergii Baker
Rhododendron pachypodum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Tricyrtis macropoda Miq.
Anemone acutiloba (DC.) G.Lawson
Dasylirion texanum Scheele
Thymus argaeus (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Boiss. & Balansa
Rhoiptelea chiliantha Diels & Hand.-Mazz.
Populus maximowiczii A.Henry
Paeonia peregrina Mill.
Magnolia ernestii Figlar
Sempervivum ingwersenii Wale
Aucuba chinensis Benth.
Sempervivum kindingeri Adamovic
Iris histrio subsp. aintabensis (G.P.Baker) B.Mathew
Silene schafta S.G.Gmel. ex Hohen.
Iris acutiloba C.A.Mey.
Rhododendron rothschildii Davidian
Coprosma nitida Hook.f.
Baptisia alba (L.) R.Br.
Dianthus callizonus Schott & Kotschy
Sasa palmata (Burb.) E.G.Camus
Carex lupulina Muhl. ex Willd.
Gladiolus papilio Hook.f.
Francoa sonchifolia Cav.
Daphne oleoides subsp. kurdica (Bornm.) Bornm.
Santolina pinnata subsp. neapolitana (Jord. & Fourr.) Guinea ex C.Jeffrey
Jeffersonia diphylla (L.) Pers.
Sempervivum leucanthum Pancic
Primula vulgaris Huds.
Berberis ×hortensis Mabb.
Eurybia ×herveyi (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Polygonatum prattii Baker
Colchicum bivonae Guss.
Crataegus viridis L.
Myrteola nummularia (Poir.) O.Berg
Magnolia aromatica (Dandy) V.S.Kumar
Maianthemum purpureum (Wall.) LaFrankie
Eurya Thunb.
Stachys turcomanica Trautv.
Sorbus macrantha Merr.
Cypripedium formosanum Hayata
Borinda macclureana (Bor) Stapleton
Symphyotrichum novi-belgii (L.) G.L.Nesom
Borinda fungosa (T.P.Yi) Stapleton
Convolvulus assyricus Griseb.
Schefflera hoi (Dunn) R.Vig.
Berberis duclouxiana (Gagnep.) Laferr.
Scabiosa japonica var. alpina Takeda
Asarum canadense L.
Alyssum propinquum Jos.Baumgartner
Anemone pavonina Lam.
Hylotelephium viride (Makino) Ohba
Allium maximowiczii Regel
Paradisea lusitanica (Cout.) Samp.
Rosa elegantula Rolfe
Teucrium orientale L.
Sorbus decora (Sarg.) C.K.Schneid.
Hemiboea subcapitata C.B.Clarke
Rhododendron liliiflorum H.Lév.
Pteroceltis tatarinowii Maxim.
Begonia chitoensis T.S.Liu & M.J.Lai
Arbutus unedo var. rubra W.T.Aiton, 1811
Hemerocallis L.
Antennaria chilensis J.Rémy
Acantholimon ulicinum var. purpurascens (Bokhari) Bokhari & J.R.Edm.
Styrax calvescens Perkins
Primula waltonii Watt ex Balf.fil.
Meliosma dilleniifolia (Wall. ex Wight & Am.) Walp.
Quercus oxyodon Miq.
Catalpa ovata G.Don
Aconitum napellus L.
Gladiolus imbricatus L.
Alstroemeria psittacina Lehm.
Rosa sericea Lindl.
Rhododendron citriniflorum var. citriniflorum
Rhododendron albrechtii Maxim.
Trautvetteria fonticalcarea Floden
Astilbe rubra Hook. & Thomson
Ligustrum compactum var. compactum
Hylotelephium populifolium (Pall.) H.Ohba
Sempervivum pittonii Schott, Nyman & Kotschy
Thalictrum minus L.
Sorbus wilsoniana C.K.Schneid.
Anaphalis sinica Hance
Digitalis ×valinii J.D.Arm.
Aloe aristata Haw.
Berberis gyalaica Ahrendt & Ahrendt
Jovellana repens (Hook.fil.) Kraenzl.
Hosta sieboldii (Paxton) J.W.Ingram
Rhododendron nuttallii Booth ex Nutt.
Quercus macranthera Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Penstemon mensarum Pennell
Draba subcapitata Simmons
Phyteuma globulariifolium Sternb. & Hoppe
Actaea simplex (DC.) Wormsk. ex Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Clematis cirrhosa L.
Eubotrys racemosa (L.) Nutt.
Betula utilis var. jacquemontii (Spach) Winckler, 1904
Fuchsia ×bacillaris Lindl.
Philadelphus satsumanus Miq.
Salix kurilensis Koidz.
Draba olgae Regel & Schmalh.
Melicytus angustifolius (DC.) Garn.-Jones
Carpinus pubescens Burkill
Cornus drummondii C.A.Mey.
Phygelius aequalis Harv. ex Hiern
Heloniopsis orientalis (Thunb.) Tanaka
Sorbus sudetica (Tausch) Bluff, Nees & Schauer
Sorbus arranensis Hedl.
Yushania anceps (Mitford) W.C.Lin
Allium siculum Ucria
Quercus rehderiana Hand.-Mazz.
Anemone palmata L.
Carex punicea K.A.Ford
Chionodoxa forbesii Baker
Sinojackia xylocarpa Hu
Cotoneaster buxifolius var. rockii (G.Klotz) L.T.Lu & Brach
Arnebia pulchra (Roem. & Schult.) J.R.Edm.
Ozothamnus ericifolius Hook.fil.
Narcissus triandrus L.
Piptanthus nepalensis (Hook.) Sweet
Symphytum caucasicum M.Bieb.
Iris pumila L.
Saxifraga federici-augusti subsp. grisebachii (Degen & Dörfl.) D.A.Webb
Phyllostachys vivax f. aureocaulis N.X.Ma
Zanthoxylum dissitum Hemsl.
Narcissus rupicola subsp. rupicola
Opuntia fragilis hort.
Rhododendron alutaceum var. alutaceum
Cardamine heptaphylla (L.) O.E.Schulz
Schefflera delavayi (Franch.) Harms
Salvia viscosa Jacq.
Kniphofia brachystachya (Zahlbr.) Codd
Cyclamen purpurascens Mill.
Lilium duchartrei Franch.
Alcea ficifolia L.
Pterocactus fischeri Britton & Rose
Erythronium americanum Ker Gawl.
Euptelea polyandra Siebold & Zucc.
Origanum rotundifolium Boiss.
Rodgersia nepalensis Cope ex Cullen
Orostachys minuta (Kom.) A.Berger
Dierama erectum Hilliard
Phyllostachys vivax McClure
Phyllostachys edulis (Carrière) J.Houz.
Quercus acuta Thunb.
Actinidia arguta (Siebold & Zucc.) Planch. ex Miq.
Hibbertia obtusifolia DC.
Syringa pubescens subsp. julianae (C.K.Schneid.) M.C.Chang & X.L.Chen
Rhododendron pilosum (Michx.) Craven
Aristea capitata (L.) Ker Gawl.
Saxifraga hostii Tausch
Potentilla calabra Ten.
Polylepis lanata (Kuntze) M.Kessler & Schmidt-Leb.
Ourisia glandulosa Hook.fil.
Sorbus chamaemespilus (L.) Crantz
Euonymus nanus M.Bieb.
Arisaema heterocephalum Koidz.
Primula bullata var. bullata
Oenothera macrocarpa subsp. fremontii (S.Watson) W.L.Wagner
Picrasma quassioides (D.Don) Benn.
Rhodophiala C.Presl
Aesculus parviflora Walter
Thalictrum aquilegifolium L.
Corylus ferox Wall.
Lonicera floribunda Boiss. & Buhse
Gymnocalycium baldianum (Speg.) Speg.
Prunus ×hybrida (Schmidt) Banfi, Galasso & Bartolucci
Pulmonaria angustifolia L.
Chaenomeles thibetica T.T.Yu
Rosa longicuspis var. sinowilsonii (Hemsl.) T.T.Yu & T.C.Ku
Parthenocissus thomsonii (M.A.Lawson) P.Singh & B.V.Shetty
Polyspora longicarpa (Hung T.Chang)
Iris germanica var. florentina (L.) Dykes
Vaccinium angustifolium Aiton
Geranium robustum Kuntze
Rhododendron erosum Cowan
Carex plantaginea Muhl.
Iris laevigata Fisch.
Rhododendron triflorum var. bauhiniiflorum (Watt ex Hutch.) Cullen
Salix candida Flüggé
Ilex macrocarpa Oliv.
Syringa sweginzowii Koehne & Lingelsh.
×Amarine tubergenii Sealy
Rhododendron forrestii Balf.fil. ex Diels
Callicarpa shirasawana Makino
Chosenia arbutifolia (Pall.) A.K.Skvortsov
Lilium leucanthum (Baker) Baker
Draba lasiocarpa Rochel ex DC., 1821
Cytisus hirsutus subsp. polytrichus (M.Bieb.) Hayek
Campanula ardonensis Rupr.
Vincetoxicum hirundinaria Medik.
Pachysandra procumbens Michx.
Clematis tibetana Kuntze
Meliosma alba (Schltdl.) Walp.
Actinidia eriantha Benth.
Rhododendron brachycarpum subsp. brachycarpum
Chaenomeles cathayensis (Hemsl.) C.K.Schneid.
Aralia chinensis L.
Eucryphia glutinosa (Poepp. & Endl.) Baill.
Lindera angustifolia W.C.Cheng
Fritillaria persica L.
Mespilus germanica L.
Allium togashii H.Hara
Epimedium pubigerum (DC.) Morren & Decne.
Juglans cathayensis Dode
Arisaema candidissimum W.W.Sm.
Pterocephalus perennis Coult.
Vaccinium delavayi Franch.
Geranium sinense R.Knuth
Rhododendron trichocladum Franch.
Galanthus reginae-olgae Orph.
Olearia phlogopappa (Labill.) DC.
Silphium laciniatum L.
Phlomis purpurea L.
Ranzania japonica (T.Itô) T.Itô
Camellia cuspidata (Kochs) Bean
Stauntonia leucantha Diels ex Wu
Potentilla dombeyi Nestler
Mitraria coccinea Cav.
Kunzea Rchb.
Nyssa ogeche W.Bartram ex Marshall
Rosa cymosa Tratt.
Rhododendron mollicomum Balf.fil. & W.W.Sm.
Sorbus folgneri (C.K.Schneid.) Rehder
Anisodus luridus Link ex Spreng.
Allium kiiense (Murata) Hir.Takah.bis & M.Hotta
Lewisia ×whiteae Purdy
Pleioblastus viridistriatus (Regel) Makino
Chionochloa conspicua (G.Forst.) Zotov
Omphalodes cappadocica (Willd.) DC.
Mertensia pterocarpa var. yezoensis Tatew. & Ohwi
Eurybia divaricata (L.) G.L.Nesom
Buxus sinica var. sinica
Schisandra propinqua Hook.f. & Thomson, 1872
Jasminum parkeri Dunn
Mitchella repens L.
Saxifraga rufescens Balf.fil.
Poa cita Edgar
Phyllostachys sulphurea (Carrière) Rivière & C.Rivière
Ononis spinosa L.
Acantholimon glumaceum (Jaub. & Spach) Boiss.
Aucuba chinensis var. chinensis
Cardiocrinum giganteum var. yunnanense (Leichtlin ex Elwes) Stearn
Kniphofia gracilis Harv. ex Baker
Alyssum stribrnyi Velen.
Alnus lanata Duthie ex Bean
Veronica baylyi Garn.-Jones
Galanthus lagodechianus Kem.-Nath.
Osmanthus burkwoodii (Burkwood & Skipwith) P.S.Green
Paulownia kawakamii T.Itô
Rhodoleia championii Hook.
Delosperma ashtonii L.Bolus
Raoulia subsericea Hook.fil.
Cornus schindleri subsp. poliophylla (C.K.Schneid. & Wangerin) Q.Y.Xiang
Libertia peregrinans Cockayne & Allan
Oenothera depressa Greene
Pisonia aculeata L.
Lupinus laxus Rydb.
Aristida dichotoma Michx.
Arnica alpina (L.) Olin & Ladau
Castilleja nervosa A.Nelson
Trifolium goniocarpum Lojac.
Leibnitzia occimadrensis G.L.Nesom
Ipomoea arborescens var. glabrata (A.Gray) Gentry
Aster subulatus Michx.
Euphorbia radioloides Boiss.
Geranium deltoideum Rydb.
Tauschia tarahumara Constance & Bye
Echinocereus rigidissimus var. rigidissimus
Solanum grayi var. grayi
Gnaphalium pensylvanicum Willd.
Spiranthes aurantiaca (Lex.) Hemsl.
Hybanthus mexicanus subsp. occidentalis C.V.Morton
Pherotrichis balbisii (Decne.) Gray
Gnaphalium americanum Mill.
Desmodium macrostachyum Hemsl.
Echinocereus stoloniferus var. tayopensis (W.T.Marshall) N.P.Taylor
Mammillaria wrightii var. wilcoxii (Toumey ex K.Schum.) W.T.Marshall
Drymaria effusa var. effusa
Telosiphonia hypoleuca (Benth.) Henrickson
Ranunculus petiolaris Humb., Bonpl. & Kunth ex DC.
Paspalum squamulatum E.Fourn.
Alchemilla aphanoides var. subalpestris (Rose) Perry
Bursera fagaroides subsp. elongata Mc Vaugh & Rzed.
Russelia sonorensis var. pubescens Carlson
Calochortus spatulatus S.Watson
Echeveria paniculata A.Gray
Polygala aparinoides Hook. & Arn.
Dioscorea jaliscana S.Watson
Ranunculus arizonicus Lemmon, 1886
Dyssodia porophyllum subsp. cancellata (Cass.) Strother
Evolvulus prostratus B.L.Rob.
Plumeria rubra f. acutifolia (Poir.) Woodson
Begonia martiana Link & Otto
Pseuderanthemum praecox (Benth.) Leonard
Anoda thurberi A.Gray
Physalis minima L.
Physalis maxima Mill.
Drymaria villosa Cham. & Schltdl.
Verbena elegans var. asperata L.M.Perry
Cyperus manimae var. divergens (Kunth) Kük.
Eupatorium collinum var. mendezii (DC.) McVaugh
Vitis monticola Buckley
Digitaria panicea (Sw.) Urb.
Lobelia palmeri Greene
Mimulus dentilobus B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Tephrosia leucantha Kunth
Dodonaea viscosa var. angustifolia (L.fil.) Benth.
Priva aspera Kunth
Asclepias gentryi Standl.
Mimosa diplotricha var. odibilis Barneby
Hedyotis spellenbergii G.L.Nesom & Vorobik
Salvia tepicensis Fernald
Ipomoea aristolochiifolia (Kunth) G.Don
Agave vivipara var. vivipara
Peperomia campylotropa A.W.Hill
Spiranthes lanceolata (Aubl.) León
Ludwigia octovalvis subsp. octovalvis
Mammillaria yaquensis R.T.Craig
Eupatorium palmeri var. tonsum B.L.Rob.
Mimulus calciphilus Gentry
Crusea parviflora Hook. & Arn.
Kyllinga odorata Vahl
Digitaria ternata (A.Rich.) Stapf
Bouvardia multiflora (Cav.) Schult. & Schult.f.
Conyza apurensis Kunth
Diphysa thurberi (A.Gray) Rydb. ex Standl.
Triphora trianthophora (Sw.) Rydb.
Browallia eludens Van Devender & P.D.Jenkins
Ornithocarpa torulosa Rollins
Drymaria leptophylla var. nodosa (Engelm.) J.A.Duke
Begonia angustiloba A.DC.
Hyptis septentrionalis Epling
Panicum hians Elliott
Cynanchum wigginsii Shinners
Senecio riomayensis B.L.Turner
Tripsacum zopilotense Hern.-Xol. & Randolph
Pectis exilis D.J.Keil
Asclepias standleyi Woodson
Vernonia triflosculosa Kunth
Rotala dentifera (Gray) Koehne
Asclepias glaucescens Kunth
Tinantia erecta (Jacq.) Schltdl.
Triteleia piutensis Kentner & K.E.Steiner
Dypsis lutescens (H.Wendl.) Beentje & J.Dransf.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. glaberrimum (Gand.) Reveal
Navarretia gowenii L.A.Johnson
Nandina Thunb.
Bassia prostrata (L.) A.J.Scott
Erica vagans L.
Oreocarya propria A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Epipactis helleborine subsp. helleborine
Symphyotrichum dumosum (L.) G.L.Nesom
Pyrrocoma hirta var. sonchifolia (Greene) Kartesz & Gandhi
Ganosma Decne.
Distimake quinquefolius (L.) A.R.Simões & Staples
Leptosiphon rosaceus (Hook.fil.) Battaglia
Foeniculum vulgare var. azoricum (Mill.) Holub
Physaria tumulosa (Barneby) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Cypripedium columbianum Sheviak
Penstemon rydbergii var. aggregatus (Pennell) K.Holmgren
Dombeya wallichii (Lindl.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Frasera albomarginata var. albomarginata
Eritrichium howardii (A.Gray) Rydb.
Coryphantha robustispina Britton & Rose
Tradescantia zebrina Bosse
Scandix pecten-veneris subsp. macrorhyncha (C.A.Mey.) Rouy & Camus
Pappophorum Schreb.
Lewisia stebbinsii Gankin & Hildreth
Coccoloba uvifera (L.) L.
Erigeron uncialis var. uncialis
Helianthella californica subsp. californica
Boechera lasiocarpa (Rollins) Dorn
Mentha longifolia (L.) Huds.
Centaurea solstitialis subsp. solstitialis
Iris japonica Thunb.
Mammillaria saboae subsp. haudeana (A.B.Lau & K.Wagner) D.R.Hunt
Tragopogon porrifolius subsp. porrifolius
Sclerocactus pubispinus (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Physaria garrettii (Payson) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Amblyolepis setigera DC.
Schiedeella arizonica P.M.Br.
Opuntia ×rugosa Griffiths
Astragalus mollissimus var. bigelovii (A.Gray) Barneby ex B.L.Turner
Solanum aethiopicum L.
Platanus gentryi Nixon & J.M.Poole
Mammillaria schumannii Hildm.
Laelia eyermaniana Rchb.f.
Sprekelia formosissima (L.) Herb.
Sorbaria sorbifolia (L.) A.Braun
Euphorbia cotinifolia L.
Panicum barbipulvinatum Nash ex Rydb.
Aster adscendens var. delectabilis (H.M.Hall) Jeps.
Penstemon cristatus Nutt.
Dentaria Tourn. ex L.
Troximon heterophyllum Greene
Ranunculus eschscholtzii var. eximius (Greene) L.D.Benson
Senecio cymbalarioides (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt.
Cuscuta approximata var. urceolata Yunck.
Allium fimbriatum var. abramsii Ownbey & Aase ex Traub
Convolvulus althaeoides L.
Verbena incompta P.W.Michael
Erica persoluta Curtis
Zigadenus micranthus var. micranthus
Thysanolaena latifolia (Roxb. ex Hornem.) Honda
Malus coronaria (L.) Mill.
Arctotis acaulis L.
Arctotis fastuosa Jacq.
Argyranthemum broussonetii (Pers.) Humphries
Crassula falcata J.C.Wendl.
Crassula helmsii (Kirk) Cockayne
Cotyledon orbiculata var. oblongata (Haw.) DC.
Aeonium ×hybridum (Haw.) G.D.Rowley
Aeonium canariense var. virgineum (Webb ex Christ) H.Y.Liu
Hypodiscus aristatus (Thunb.) C.Krauss
Cistus crispus L.
Coriaria microphylla Poir.
Acacia spinosa Marloth & Engl.
Arnica discoidea subsp. eradiata (A.Gray) Cronquist
Artemisia caucasica Willd.
Reinwardtia indica Dumort.
Cucumis melo subsp. chito (Morren) Naudin
Linum trigynum L.
Bryonia dioica Jacq.
Sedum telephium L.
Sedum rupestre L.
Mentzelia congesta var. davidsoniana (Abrams) J.F.Macbr.
Callitriche peploides var. semialata Fassett
Centaurea nicaeensis All.
Eucalyptus tetraptera Turcz.
Asteriscus maritimus (L.) Less.
Leymus multiflorus (Gould) Barkworth & R.J.Atkins
Eryngium foetidum L.
Aster oregonensis subsp. oregonensis
Aster oregonensis subsp. californicus (Durand) D.D.Keck
Hydrocleys nymphoides (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Buchenau
Aster praealtus var. coerulescens (DC.) A.G.Jones
Linum aureum Waldst. & Kit.
Linum flavum L.
Chenopodium ambrosioides var. anthelminticum (L.) Aellen
Solanum anguivi Lam.
Lolium remotum var. aristatum (Döll) Asch.
Chrysanthemum balsamita (L.) Baill.
Manisuris L.
Manisuris cylindrica (Michx.) Kuntze
Lycurus phalaroides Kunth
Semele androgyna (L.) Kunth
Anoda cristata var. digitata (A.Gray) Hochr.
Bulbinella floribunda (Aiton) T.Durand & Schinz
Eremurus M.Bieb.
Madia gracilis subsp. collina D.D.Keck
Verbena bonariensis var. conglomerata Briq.
Astilbe ×lemoinei
Malva sylvestris subsp. mauritiana (L.) Thell.
Miscanthus sinensis var. zebrinus Beal
Microlaena stipoides (Labill.) R.Br.
Amberboa moschata (L.) DC.
Melinis minutiflora P.Beauv.
Piper sarmentosum Roxb.
Solanum sanitwongsei Craib
Mayaca Aubl.
Paliurus spina-christi Mill.
Hibbertia cuneiformis (Labill.) Sm.
Quercus falcata Michx.
Poteridium Spach
Laportea interrupta (L.) Chew
Noccaea fendleri subsp. californica (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz & M.Koch
Limonium sinuatum subsp. sinuatum
Ornithopus sativus subsp. sativus
Rhamnus frangula L.
Iridaceae
Buxus L.
Rhamnus purshiana var. purshiana
Sesbania tomentosa Hook. & Arn.
Vicia fulgens Batt.
Malvaviscus arboreus var. drummondii (Torr. & A.Gray) Schery
Napaea dioica L.
Cryptandra amara Sm.
Ceanothus prostratus subsp. prostratus
Carex scoparia var. fulva W.Boott
Carex retroflexa var. texensis (Torr. ex L.H.Bailey) Fernald
Amelanchier bartramiana (Tausch) M.Roem.
Amelanchier utahensis subsp. oreophila (A.Nelson) Clokey
Cotoneaster apiculatus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Elytrigia intermedia (Host) Nevski
Acaena argentea Ruiz & Pav.
Cedrela odorata L.
Cedrela fissilis Vell.
Heterocentron elegans (Schltdl.) Kuntze
Bauera rubioides Banks ex Andrews
Tupidanthus calyptratus Hook.f. & Thomson
Watsonia meriana var. bulbillifera (J.W.Mathews & L.Bolus) D.A.Cooke
Vallisneria P.Micheli ex L.
Nesaea pedicellata Hiern
Rotala L.
Ludwigia uruguayensis (Cambess.) Hara
Manihot dulcis (J.F.Gmel.) Baill.
Magnolia acuminata var. cordata (Michaux) Seringe
Rotala macrandra Koehne
Magnolia soulangeana Soul.-Bod.
Abutilon pauciflorum A.St.-Hil.
Abutilon pictum (Gillies ex Hook.) Walp.
Neptunia lutea (Leavenw.) Benth.
Pyracantha rogersiana A.B.Jacks.
Nymphaea L.
Cuphea heterophylla Benth.
Cuphea hookeriana Walp.
Ammannia gracilis Guill. & Perr.
Ammannia multiflora Roxb.
Didiplis diandra (DC.) Wood
Cirsium japonicum Fisch. ex DC.
Trigonella corniculata (L.) L.
Lavatera trimestris L.
Luma A.Gray
Ceanothus griseus var. griseus
Alyogyne hakeifolia (Giord.) Alefeld
Hibiscus coccineus (Medik.) Walter
Zanthoxylum armatum DC.
Quercus montana Willd.
Brassica pekinensis (Lour.) Rupr.
Brassica perviridis (L.H.Bailey) L.H.Bailey
Quercus muhlenbergii Engelm.
Dolichos lablab L.
Chenopodium bonus-henricus L.
Lithocarpus densiflorus var. parvus Hoover
Quercus nigra L.
Brassica oleracea var. acephala DC.
Brassica oleracea var. italica Plenck
Cichorium endivia L.
Mazus japonicus (Thunb.) Kuntze
Brassica napus var. biennis Rchb.
Brassica chinensis L.
Brassica juncea var. japonica (Thunb.) L.H.Bailey
Myriophyllum spicatum subsp. spicatum
Brassica carinata A.Braun
Quercus laevis Walter
Quercus lyrata Walter
Crossandra infundibuliformis (L.) Nees
Prenanthes altissima Pall.
Erodium chamaedryoides (Cav.) L'Hér.
Pseudocydonia sinensis (Thouin) C.K.Schneid.
Gaillardia pulchella var. picta (D.Don) A.Gray
Aeschynanthus lobbianus Hook.
Deutzia scabra Thunb.
Quercus grosseserrata Blume
Prunus besseyi L.H.Bailey
Triteleia grandiflora var. howellii (S.Watson) Hoover
Atriplex elegans subsp. fasciculata (S.Watson) Hall & Clem.
Brassica rapa var. amplexicaulis Yo.Tanaka & Ono
Prunus japonica Thunb.
Prunus kansuensis Rehder
Pontederia cordata var. lanceolata (Nutt.) Griseb.
Solanum capsicastrum Link ex Schauer
Centaurea ×pouzinii DC.
Panicum repens L.
Prunus pedunculata (Pall.) Maxim.
Prunus mandshurica (Maxim.) Koehne
Piptochaetium stipoides (Trin. & Rupr.) Hack. & Arechav.
Prunus lannesiana (Carr) E.H.Wilson
Prunus triloba Lindl.
Prunus tenella Batsch
Prunus subcordata var. oregana (Greene) M.Peck
Prunus tangutica (Batalin) Koehne
Prunus webbii (Spach) Vierh.
Aster dumosus var. coridifolius (Michx.) Torr. & A.Gray
Fagopyrum tataricum (L.) Gaertn.
Muhlenbergia torreyana (Schult.) Hitchc.
Pyrus pyrifolia var. culta (Makino) Nakai
Hemigraphis Nees
Cucurbita pepo var. medullosa Alef.
Luffa acutangula (L.) Roxb.
Ruellia makoyana Hort.Makoy ex Closon
Sonchus arvensis subsp. uliginosus Trautv.
Navarretia prolifera Greene
Bacopa nobsiana Mason
Aeschynanthus pulcher (Blume) G.Don
Columnea gloriosa Sprague
Pipturus skottsbergii Krajina
Caesalpinia mexicana A.Gray
Afraegle paniculata (Schum.) Engl.
Aegle marmelos (L.) Corrêa
Coincya monensis (L.) Greuter & Burdet
Senecio eurycephalus Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray
Gnaphalium japonicum Thunb.
Oxalis corymbosa DC.
Quercus robur var. fastigiata (Lam.) Spach
Quercus rysophylla Weath.
Isolepis prolifera (Rottb.) R.Br.
Eriogonum angulosum var. maculatum (A.Heller) Jeps.
Vitex negundo var. heterophylla (Franch.) Rehder
Psidium littorale Raddi
Rubus ursinus var. vitifolius (Cham. & Schltdl.) Focke
Wolffia Horkel ex Schleid
Holodiscus argenteus (L.fil.) Maxim.
Diodia virginiana L.
Prinsepia uniflora Batalin
Umbellularia californica var. fresnensis Eastw.
Vicia sicula (Raf.) Guss.
Horkelia fusca var. tenella S.Watson
Hackelia setosa (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Vigna unguiculata subsp. sesquipedalis (L.) Verdc.
Eritrichium scouleri (Hook. & Arn.) A.DC.
Echium onosmifolium Webb & Berthel.
Crataegus brevispina Douglas ex Steud.
Acacia denticulosa F.Muell.
Crataegus mexicana Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Phyllanthus amarus Schumach. & Thonn.
Phyllanthus tenellus Roxb.
Boykinia major var. major
Polygonum polystachyum Meisn.
Alternanthera dentata Stuchlík ex R.E.Fr.
Crataegus pinnatifida Bunge
Crataegus phaenopyrum (L.f.) Medik.
Exochorda racemosa (Lindl.) Rehder
Mertensia sibirica (L.) G.Don
Myosotidium hortensia (Decne.) Baill.
Ulmus serotina Sarg.
Brodiaea ixioides Sims
Symphytum peregrinum Ledeb.
Gaura drummondii (Spach) Torr. & A.Gray
Ludwigia grandiflora subsp. hexapetala (Hook. & Arn.) G.L.Nesom & Kartesz
Ludwigia glandulosa Walter
Mimulus primuloides subsp. primuloides
Axonopus fissifolius (Raddi) Kuhlm.
Potentilla lactea (Greene) Greene
Potentilla glandulosa var. intermedia (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Quercus canariensis Willd.
Plagiobothrys rufescens Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Poterium annuum Nutt.
Prunus argentea (Lam.) Rehder
Dopatrium junceum (Roxb.) Buch.-Ham. ex Benth.
Potentilla anserina var. concolor Ser.
Fagus sylvatica var. atropunicea Weston
Potentilla flabelliformis Lehm.
Tilia ×euchlora K.Koch
Arabis rectissima var. rectissima
Arabis suffrutescens var. suffrutescens
Solanum scabrum Mill.
Orobanche vallicola (Jeps.) Heckard
Oxalis hirta L.
Malus ×purpurea (A.Barbier) Rehder
Osteomeles Lindl.
Arabis glabra var. furcatipilis M.Hopkins
Hyoscyamus pusillus L.
Alyssum homalocarpum (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Boiss.
Cirsium pannonicum (L.fil.) Link
Blepharipappus scaber subsp. laevis (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Brachycome multifida DC.
Centromadia parryi var. australis (D.D.Keck) B.L.Turner
Arctostaphylos wellsii W.Knight
Abelia floribunda (Mart. & Galeotti) Decne.
Rapistrum rugosum subsp. rugosum
Solanum cardiophyllum Lindl.
Daboecia cantabrica (Huds.) C.Koch
Xerochrysum bracteatum (Vent.) Tzvelev
Lupinus albus L.
Acaena dumicola B.H.Macmill.
Mackaya bella Harv.
Poa triflora Gilib.
Kalmia polifolia subsp. polifolia
Adenocarpus foliolosus (Aiton) DC.
Bidens pilosa var. radiata (Sch.Bip.) J.A.Schmidt
Carduus nutans subsp. leiophyllus (Petrovic) Arènes
Carduus arvensis (L.) Robson
Calotis cuneifolia R.Br.
Calomeria amaranthoides Vent.
Calycadenia multiglandulosa subsp. bicolor (Greene) D.D.Keck
Physalis viscosa var. cinerascens (Dunal) Waterf.
Callistephus chinensis (L.) Nees
Erysimum suffrutescens var. suffrutescens
Poa arachnifera Torr.
Michelia champaca L.
Amaranthus spinosus L.
Hordeum marinum var. gussoneanum (Parl.) Hyl.
Quercus marilandica (L.) Münchh.
Genista sylvestris var. pungens (Vis.) Rehder
Leucadendron macowanii Phillips
Setaria scabrifolia (Nees) Kunth
Sitanion hystrix var. californicum (J.G.Sm.) F.D.Wilson
Centaurea babylonica (L.) L.
Solanum chrysotrichum Schltdl.
Sorghum almum Parodi
Silene pseudatocion Desf.
Geum virginianum L.
Pernettya mucronata Gaudich. ex G.Don, 1834
Curio rowleyanus (H.Jacobsen) P.V.Heath
Curio articulatus (L.fil.) P.V.Heath
Centaurea ×kleinii C.T.Roché & Susanna
Pyrola picta var. dentata (Sm.) Dorn
Curio talinoides (DC.) P.V.Heath
Rhododendron neoglandulosum Harmaja
Centaurea depressa M.Bieb.
Crepis vesicaria subsp. taraxacifolia (Thuill.) Boivin
Rottboellia exaltata L.f.
Paspalum commersonii Lam.
Paspalum conjugatum P.J.Bergius
Erythrina variegata L.
Acaena inermis Hook.fil.
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. latior Hall & Clem.
Berberis atrocarpa C.K.Schneid.
Cytisus supranubius (L.f.) Kuntze
Panicum maximum Jacq.
Panicum lindheimeri Nash
Stachys floridana Shuttlew. ex Benth.
Viburnum veitchii C.H.Wright
Freesia alba (G.L.Mey.) Gumbl.
Panicum rigidulum Bosc ex Nees
Erodium obtusiplicatum (Maire, Weiller & Wilczek) J.T.Howell
Prosopis strombulifera (Lam.) Benth.
Geranium columbianum R.Knuth
Panicum capillare subsp. capillare
Astragalus lentiginosus var. macrolobus (Rydb.) Barneby
Stokesia laevis (Hill) Greene
Streptanthus morrisonii subsp. kruckebergii R.W.Dolan & LaPré
Episcia cupreata (Hook.fil.) Hanst.
Olearia paniculata (J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.) Druce
Achillea millefolium var. rubra Sadler, 1826
Centaurium venustum subsp. abramsii Munz
Anagallis monellii subsp. linifolia (L.) Maire
Ruellia malacosperma Greenm.
Rudbeckia triloba var. pinnatiloba Torr. & A.Gray
Bocconia frutescens L.
Ulmus hollandica Mill.
Phalaris elongata Braun-Blanq.
Nematanthus gregarius D.L.Denham
Anemone hybrida hort. ex E.Vilm., 1863
Aster novi-belgii L.
Grindelia camporum var. parviflora Steyerm.
Cleome serrulata var. angusta (M.E.Jones) Tidestr.
Piptatherum holciforme (M.Bieb.) Roem. & Schult.
Cirsium monspessulanum (L.) Hill
Paspalum quadrifarium Lam.
Pennisetum dichotomum Delile
Pennisetum petiolare (Hochst.) Chiov.
Pennisetum macrourum Trin.
Pennisetum massaicum Stapf
Episcia dianthiflora H.E.Moore & R.G.Wilson
Trifolium ornithopodioides L.
Illicium verum Hook.fil.
Croton capitatus Michx.
Scirpus fluviatilis (Torr.) A.Gray
Scirpus glaucus Lam.
Scirpus koilolepis (Steud.) Gleason
Eucalyptus sideroxylon subsp. sideroxylon
Ageratina riparia (Regel) R.King & H.Rob.
Bartlettina sordida (Less.) R.King & H.Rob.
Felicia fruticosa (L.) Nicholson
Felicia echinata (Thunb.) Nees
Farfugium japonicum (L.) Kitam.
Eucalyptus viminalis subsp. viminalis
Euryops speciosissimus DC.
Euthamia Elliott
Laportea aestuans (L.) Chew
Cytisus ×praecox Bean
Euphorbia barrelieri Savi
Eucalyptus pilularis Sm.
Euphorbia atropurpurea Brouss. ex Willd.
Oenothera macrocarpa Nutt.
Eucalyptus saligna Sm.
Brickellia microphylla subsp. microphylla
Galax urceolata (Poir.) Brummitt
Curatella americana L.
Ludwigia longifolia (DC.) Hara
Eucalyptus erythronema var. marginata (Benth.) Domin
Eucalyptus erythronema var. erythronema
Ludwigia arcuata Walter
Jussiaea repens var. peploides (Kunth) Griseb.
Godetia williamsonii Durand & Hilg.
Scirpus saximontanus Fernald
Eucalyptus globulus var. compacta Maiden
Scirpus mucronatus L.
Eucalyptus maidenii F.Muell.
Oenothera campestris Greene
Oenothera alyssoides var. villosa S.Watson
Oenothera berlandieri (Spach) Steud.
Euphorbia ceratocarpa Ten.
Eucalyptus cephalocarpa Blakely
Xanthoxalis fontana (Bunge) Holub
Oxalis tetraphylla Cav.
Oxalis triangularis subsp. papilionacea (Hoffmanns. ex Zucc.) Lourteig
Aldrovanda vesiculosa L.
Dracaena fragrans (L.) Ker Gawl.
Knautia L.
Allionia floribunda (Choisy) Kuntze
Oxalis carnosa Molina
Oxalis corniculata var. purpurea Parl.
Ochna pulchra Hook.
Polygonum lapathifolium var. salicifolium Sibth.
Escallonia illinita C.Presl
Nolana paradoxa Lindl.
Verticordia densiflora Lindl.
Eryngium oblanceolatum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Elaeocarpus reticulatus Sm.
Polygonum ×bohemicum (Chrtek & Chrtková) Zika & Jacobson
Elaeagnus triflora Roxb.
Elaeagnus multiflora Thunb.
Elaeagnus moorcroftii Wall.
Elaeagnus ×ebbingei J.Door.
Linanthus latisectus E.G.Buxton
Panicum anceps Michx.
Leptospermum rotundifolium (Maiden & Betche) F.A.Rodway ex Cheel
Melaleuca coccinea George
Vallisneria spiralis L.
Melaleuca elliptica Labill.
Melaleuca fulgens R.Br.
Melaleuca flammea Craven
Paederia lanuginosa Wall.
Melaleuca megacephala F.Muell.
Pimenta dioica (L.) Merr.
Cladium angustifolium (Gaudich.) Benth. & Hook.f. ex Drake
Cyperus albostriatus Schrad.
Centaurea squarrosa Willd.
Ficus microcarpa var. nitida (King) F.C.Ho
Calotropis gigantea (L.) W.T.Aiton
Doronicum L.
Musa L.
Morus alba var. multicaulis (Perr.) Loudon
Musa acuminata Colla
Myoporum floribundum A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Cyperus gracilis R.Br.
Cyperus polystachyos Rottb.
Ardisia Sw.
Myrica rubra (Lour.) Siebold & Zucc.
Myrica cerifera L.
Myrica cordifolia L.
Epilobium spicatum Lam.
Enchylaena tomentosa var. glabra Benth.
Chaenactis douglasii var. achilleifolia (Hook. & Arn.) A.Gray
Fuchsia fulgens Moc. & Sessé ex DC.
Eucalyptus bosistoana F.Muell.
Crotalaria pallida Aiton
Calothamnus quadrifidus R.Br.
Centaurea trichocephala M.Bieb. ex Willd.
Chamaesyce hypericifolia (L.) Millsp.
Eleocharis obtusa var. obtusa
Eleocharis obtusa var. engelmannii (Steud.) Gilly
Euphorbia pinea L.
Gnaphalium stagnale I.M.Johnst.
Lewisia kelloggii subsp. hutchisonii Dempster
Escallonia rubra var. macrantha (Hook. & Arn.) Reiche
Maclura tricuspidata Carrière
Acalypha virginica L.
Plectranthus L'Hér.
Ficus deltoidea Jack
Piper methysticum G.Forst.
Epilobium ciliatum var. glandulosum (Lehm.) Dorn
Rosa ×reversa Waldst. & Kit.
Chrysanthemum cinerariifolium (Trevis.) Vis.
Tonina fluviatilis Aubl.
Amaranthus tuberculatus (Moq.) Sauer
Syngonanthus elegans (Bong.) Ruhland
Adenandra uniflora (L.) Willd.
Agathosma betulina (Bergius) Pillans
Agathosma crenulata (L.) Pillans
Boronia heterophylla F.Muell.
Boronia megastigma Nees ex Bartl.
Glossostigma elatinoides (Benth.) Benth. ex Hook.fil.
Boronia elatior Bartl.
Correa pulchella J.Mackay ex Sweet
Correa alba Andr.
Coleonema album (Thunb.) Bartl. & H.L.Wendl.
Correa backhousiana Hook., 1834
Correa reflexa (Labill.) Vent.
Fortunella margarita (Lour.) Swingle
Gymnocoronis spilanthoides DC.
Garcinia L.
Chasmanthium latifolium (Michx.) H.O.Yates
Arundo formosana Hack.
Hesperis incana (L.) Kuntze
Erysimum linifolium (Pers.) J.Gay
Micranthemum umbrosum (Walter ex J.F.Gmel.) Blake
Mimulus bifidus subsp. fasciculatus Pennell
Mimulus evanescens Meinke
Limnophila aquatica (Roxb.) Alston
Limnophila aromatica (Lam.) Merr.
Limnophila sessiliflora (Vahl) Blume
Azara serrata Ruiz & Pav.
Citroncirus webberi J.W.Ingram & H.E.Moore
Zanthoxylum L.
Lesquerella gracilis (Hook.) S.Watson
Populus ×canadensis Moench
Populus ×berolinensis Dippel
Geranium traversii var. elegans Cockayne
Streptocarpus ×hybridus Voss
Robinia pseudoacacia var. bessoniana G.Nicholson
Achimenes longiflora DC.
Saintpaulia diplotricha B.L.Burtt
Goodenia scapigera R.Br.
Dampiera diversifolia de Vriese
Tinospora crispa (L.) Miers ex Hook.fil. & Thomson
Bryophyllum proliferum Bowie ex Hook.
Dicentra spectabilis (L.) Lem.
Saxifraga virginiensis Michx.
Tellima bolanderi A.Gray
Saxifraga peltata Torr. ex Benth.
Bothriochloa hybrida (Gould) Gould
Alonsoa warscewiczii Regel
Echinochloa esculenta (A.Braun) H.Scholz
Antirrhinum glandulosum Lindl.
Celastrus orbiculatus Thunb.
Pisum sativum var. arvense (L.) Poir.
Stachytarpheta Vahl
Rosa setigera Michx.
Meconopsis heterophylla Benth.
Meconopsis cambrica (L.) Vig.
Rosa soulieana Crép.
Egeria najas Planch.
Searsia glauca (Thunb.) Moffett
Crassula muscosa (L.) Roth
Paeonia ×suffruticosa Andrews
Rosa beggeriana Schrenk
Rhodotypos scandens (Thunb.) Makino
Xanthoceras sorbifolia Bunge
Pentaschistis airoides subsp. airoides
Bergenia cordifolia (Haw.) Sternb.
Schlumbergera truncata (Haw.) Moran
Tovara virginiana (L.) Raf.
Rosa laxa Retz.
Rosa micrantha Borrer
Heliopsis helianthoides (L.) Sw.
Ligustrum obtusifolium Siebold & Zucc.
Phillyrea angustifolia L.
Arbutus ×andrachnoides Link
Dicentra oregana Eastw.
Agapetes serpens (Wight) Sleumer
Harpullia arborea (Blanco) Radlk.
Mimulus luteus L.
Mimulus glutinosus J.C.Wendl.
Limonium sventenii A.Santos & M.Fernández
Prunus salicifolia Kunth
Hermannia pulchella L.fil.
Galium ambiguum var. siskiyouense Ferris
Hibbertia microphylla Steud.
Castilleja hispida subsp. brevilobata (Piper) T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Papaver fugax Poir.
Platystigma lineare Benth.
Spiraea discolor Pursh
Calceolaria Loefl.
Calceolaria integrifolia Murray
Rubus rosaefolius S.Vidal
Rubus trifidus Thunb. ex A.Murray
Passiflora jamesonii (Mast.) Bailey
Sporobolus fimbriatus (Nees ex Trin.) Nees
Stenotaphrum secundatum subsp. variegatum Hitchc.
Hemizonia congesta var. lutescens (Greene) Jeps.
Stipa pennata L.
Callitriche fassettii Schotsman
Rhipsalis teres (Vell.) Steud.
Cabomba aquatica Aubl.
Streptanthus breweri var. breweri
Cabomba furcata Schult.fil.
Colutea arborescens subsp. gallica Browicz
Buxus sempervirens var. arborescens L.
Sarcococca humilis Stapf
Sarcococca saligna (D.Don) Müll.Arg.
Buxus balearica Lam.
Themeda quadrivalvis (L.) Kuntze
Themeda triandra Forssk.
Lepidium hirtum (L.) Sm.
Arundinaria gigantea (Walter) Muhl.
Serissa foetida (L.f.) Lam.
Isolepis levynsiana Muasya & D.A.Simpson
Sorghum roxburghii Stapf
Canna warszewiczii A.Dietr.
Capparis spinosa var. rupestris (Sm.) Viv.
Spartina alterniflora Loisel.
Sorghum vulgare var. caffrorum (Retz.) F.T.Hubb. & Rehder
Pratia angulata (G.Forst.) Hook.f.
Cannabis indica Lam.
Parishella californica A.Gray
Atriplex patula var. obtusa (Cham.) M.Peck
Githopsis pulchella var. pulchella
Lomatium marginatum var. purpureum Jeps.
Zea mays subsp. mexicana (Schrad.) Iltis
Zeugites mexicanus (Kunth) Trin. ex Steud.
Zoysia japonica Steud.
Zoysia tenuifolia Thiele
Spiloxene Salisb.
Homeria elegans (Jacq.) Sweet
Dietes vegeta (L.) N.E.Br.
Trisetum cernuum var. projectum (Louis-Marie) Beetle
Uniola paniculata L.
Triticum spelta L.
Hypericum balearicum L.
Thysanolaena maxima (Roxb.) Kuntze
Paspalum texanum Swallen
Hypericum mutilum subsp. boreale (Britton) J.M.Gillett
Sedum roseum subsp. integrifolium (Raf.) Hultén
Cardiospermum grandiflorum f. hirsutum (Willd.) Radlk.
Orthocarpus micranthus Greene ex A.Heller
Alectryon excelsus Gaertn.
Paulownia fortunei (Seem.) Hemsl.
Hypericum mutilum subsp. mutilum
Noccaea fendleri subsp. siskiyouense (P.K.Holmgren) Al-Shehbaz & M.Koch
Noccaea fendleri subsp. idahoense (Payson) Al-Shehbaz & M.Koch
Myriophyllum brasiliense Cambess.
Mimulus gracilipes B.L.Rob.
Proserpinaca palustris L.
Lagerstroemia L.
Hamamelis mollis Oliv.
Hamamelis L.
Exbucklandia populnea (R.Br. ex Griff.) R.W.Br.
Loropetalum chinense var. rubrum Yieh
Juncus diffusissimus Buckley
Aesculus ×carnea Hayne
Matudaea trinervia Lundell
Eleocharis parvula var. coloradoensis (Britton) Beetle
Streptanthus albidus subsp. albidus
Comarostaphylis glaucescens (Kunth) Zucc. ex Klotzsch
Comarostaphylis arbutoides Lindl.
Buddleja globosa Hope
Limnobium spongia subsp. spongia
Arbutus andrachne L.
Puya violacea (Brongn.) Mez
Berzelia lanuginosa (L.) Brongn.
Puya mirabilis (Mez) L.B.Sm.
Puya Molina
Billbergia nutans H.Wendl. ex Regel
Puya alpestris (Poepp.) Gay
Hakea saligna (Andrews) Knight
Lagarosiphon madagascariensis Casp.
Lagarosiphon verticillifolius Oberm.
Hydrocharis dubia (Blume) Backer
Muehlenbeckia axillaris (Hook.fil.) Walp.
Hieracium scouleri subsp. nudicaule (A.Gray) Cronquist
Nigella orientalis L.
Aeschynomene rudis Benth.
Adesmia bicolor (Poir.) DC.
Polygala chamaebuxus var. purpurea Neilr., 1859
Anthyllis barba-jovis L.
Emilia sonchifolia (L.) DC. ex Wight
Astragalus antisellii A.Gray ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Najas marina var. intermedia (Wolfg. ex Gorski) Rendle
Achillea ptarmica L.
Onopordum tauricum Willd.
Acacia linifolia (Vent.) Willd.
Centaurea dealbata Willd.
Monnina Ruiz & Pav.
Rosa davurica Pall.
Muehlenbeckia sagittifolia (Ortega) Meisn.
Polygonum affine D.Don
Salvia chamaedryoides Cav.
Consolida orientalis (Gay) Schröd.
Iva axillaris var. robustior Hook.
Ixodia R.Br.
Trifolium stellatum L.
Canavalia ensiformis (L.) DC.
Castanospermum australe A.Cunn. & C.Fraser
Cassia phyllodinea R.Br.
Cassia bicapsularis L.
Vicia bithynica (L.) L.
Silene campanulata subsp. greenei (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Cercis chinensis Bunge
Origanum vulgare subsp. prismaticum Gaudin
Lolium multiflorum var. ramosum (Guss.) Arcang.
Cladrastis sinensis Hemsl.
Arabis subpinnatifida S.Watson
Coronilla cretica L.
Colutea ×media Willd.
Blepharipappus scaber var. laevis A.Gray ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Digitalis L.
Prunus capuli Cav. ex Spreng.
Lagophylla ramosissima subsp. congesta (Greene) D.D.Keck
Ixia polystachya L.
Astragalus sinaicus Boiss.
Mentha piperita subsp. citrata (Ehrh.) Briq.
Bauhinia corymbosa Roxb.
Baphia racemosa (Hochst.) Baker
Gnaphalium collinum Labill.
Gazania rigens var. leucolaena (DC.) Rössler
Gazania rigens var. uniflora (L.fil.) Rössler
Senecio argentinus Baker
Eriastrum densifolium var. elongatum (Benth.) Hoover
Gilia androsacea Steud.
Haplopappus acradenius subsp. bracteosus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Gynura aurantiaca (Blume) DC.
Gnaphalium purpureum subsp. falcatum (Lam.) Torr. & Gray
Cirsium ochrocentrum subsp. ochrocentrum
Gnaphalium microcephalum var. thermale (E.E.Nelson) Cronquist
Jatropha curcas L.
Macaranga tanarius (L.) Müll.Arg.
Hemizonella parvula (A.Gray) A.Gray
Salvia virgata Jacq.
Euphorbia portlandica L.
Helleborus lividus Aiton ex Curtis
Euphorbia stygiana H.C.Watson
Euphorbia stricta L.
Viola purpurea subsp. dimorpha M.S.Baker & Clausen
Kochia scoparia var. culta Farw.
Oxalis vallicola Knuth
Arnica discoidea subsp. alata (Rydb.) Cronquist
Linanthus parviflorus var. luteolus Milliken
Phyllanthus acidus (L.) Skeels
Phyllanthus fluitans Benth. ex Müll.Arg.
Manihot palmata Müll.Arg.
Gilia sessei G.Don
Gilia dichotoma (Benth.) Benth.
Gilia tenella Benth.
Euphorbia leuconeura Boiss.
Hygrophila corymbosa (Blume) Lindau
Linanthus acicularis Greene
Penstemon hirsutus (L.) Willd.
Penstemon gentianoides (Kunth) Poir.
Amphibromus nervosus (Hook.f.) Baill.
Oreopanax Decne. & Planch.
Haemanthus coccineus L.
Centaurea stoebe subsp. australis (A.Kern.) Greuter
Aframomum K.Schum.
Achnatherum splendens (Trin.) Nevski
Gynandropsis gynandra (L.) Briq.
Eryngium vaseyi var. globosum (Jeps.) Hoover
Dracaena aubryana Brongn. ex É.Morren
Justicia rizzinii Wassh.
Limonium ramosissimum subsp. provinciale (Pignatti) Pignatti
Drymaria cordata var. pacifica M.Mizush.
Tarenaya spinosa (Jacq.) Raf.
Dorstenia foetida (Forssk.) Schweinf.
Staurogyne Wall.
Ruellia devosiana Hort.Makoy ex É.Morren
Ruellia longepetiolata (Oerst.) Hemsl.
Pseuderanthemum variabile (R.Br.) Radlk.
Hygrophila balsamica (L.fil.) Raf.
Hygrophila R.Br.
Hemigraphis alternata (Burm.fil.) T.Anderson
Hygrophila triflora (Roxb.) Fosberg & Sachet
Hygrophila polysperma (Roxb.) T.Anderson
Synthyris cordata (A.Gray) A.Heller
Hygrophila pinnatifida (Dalzell) Sreem.
Hygrophila difformis (L.fil.) Blume
Amelichloa caudata (Trin.) Arriaga & Barkworth
Najas gracillima (A.Braun ex Engelm.) Magnus
Agrostis exarata var. microphylla (Steud.) Hitchc.
Phragmites australis subsp. maximus (Forssk.) Soó
Alyxia Banks ex R.Br.
Montinia caryophyllacea Thunb.
Eichhornia paniculata (Spreng.) Solms
Arenaria congesta var. crassula Maguire
Isachne globosa (Thunb.) Kuntze
Brachypodium mucronatum Willk.
Genista germanica L.
Layia elegans (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Dolichos biflorus L.
Acaena pallida (Kirk) Allan
Liatris squarrosa (L.) Michx.
Leucophyta brownii Cass.
Crataegus ×lavallei Herincq ex Lavallée
Tragopogon hybridus L.
Cytisus proliferus var. palmensis Christ
Cytisus proliferus L.f.
Cytisus proliferus var. canariae Christ
Plantago patagonica var. californica Greene
Euphorbia stenoclada Baill.
Parahebe perfoliata (R.Br.) B.G.Briggs & Ehrend.
Oxalis debilis var. corymbosa (DC.) Lourteig
Polygonum odoratum Lour.
Veronica beccabunga L.
Plantago hookeriana Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Billardiera longiflora Labill.
Piper auritum Kunth
Piper ossanum (C.DC.) Trel.
Piper betle L.
Bacopa myriophylloides (Benth.) Wettst.
Bacopa lanigera (Cham. & Schltdl.) Wettst.
Elytrigia juncea (L.) Nevski
Isoplexis canariensis (L.) Loudon
Derwentia perfoliata Raf.
Plantago arborescens Poir.
Penstemon menziesii var. newberryi (A.Gray) A.Gray
Ludwigia sedoides (Humb. & Bonpl.) Hara
Retama monosperma (L.) Boiss.
Genista spachiana Webb
Deeringia amaranthoides (Lam.) Merr.
Amaranthus hypochondriacus L.
Juglans rupestris Engelm. ex Torr.
Pterocarya rhoifolia Siebold & Zucc.
Lychnis flos-cuculi L.
Petasites pyrenaicus (L.) G.López
Staphylea pringlei S.Watson
Drymaria pachyphylla Wooten & Standl.
Monardella follettii (Jeps.) Jokerst
Solanum melanocerasum All.
Solanum physalifolium subsp. nitidibaccatum (Bitter) Edmonds
Sagina apetala var. barbata Fenzl
Juglans formosana Hayata
Paronychia mexicana subsp. monandra (Brandegee) Chaudhri
Iresine lindeni Van Houtte
Juglans honorei Dode
Juncus repens Michx.
Pterospermum acerifolium (L.) Willd.
Sterculia L.
Hermannia cuneifolia Jacq.
Hermannia trifurca L.
Catha edulis (Vahl) Endl.
Fremontodendron californicum subsp. napense (Eastw.) Munz
Styrax californica Torr.
Fraxinus profunda (Bush) Bush
Fraxinus caroliniana Mill.
Aira elegantissima Schur
Stellaria calycantha subsp. interior Hultén
Lycianthes ciliolata (M.Martens & Galeotti) Bitter
Heterosmilax Kunth
Smilax L.
Smilax glauca var. leurophylla S.F.Blake
Smilax pseudochina L.
Smilax glauca Walter
Smilax aspera L.
Cyphomandra crassicaulis (Ortega) Kuntze
Andropogon sudanensis (Piper) Leppan & Bosman
Arrhenatherum P.Beauv.
Acer negundo var. variegatum Jacques
Arundo donax subsp. versicolor (P.Mill.) Stokes
Solanum aculeatissimum Jacq.
Tetragonia arbuscula Fenzl ex Harv. & Sond.
Glottiphyllum linguiforme N.E.Br.
Galenia fruticosa (L.fil.) Sond.
Lapeirousia laxa (Thunb.) N.E.Br.
Cordyline fruticosa (L.) A.Chev.
Nolina longifolia (Karw. ex Schult. & Schult.f.) Hemsl.
Sisyrinchium pruinosum E.P.Bicknell
Beschorneria Kunth
Watsonia bulbillifera J.W.Mathews & L.Bolus
Viburnum rigidum Vent.
Alternanthera reineckii Briq.
Alternanthera sessilis (L.) DC.
Arenaria montana L.
Alternanthera ficoidea (L.) P.Beauv.
Alternanthera hassleriana Chodat ex Chodat & Hassl.
Alternanthera flavescens (Mart.) Kunth
Arenaria serpyllifolia subsp. serpyllifolia
Allium howellii subsp. sanbenitense (Traub) Traub & Ownbey
Alternanthera aquatica (Parodi) Chodat
Sagittaria lancifolia L.
Sagittaria montevidensis Cham. & Schltdl.
Echinodorus Rich.
Sagittaria subulata (L.) Buchenau
Physalis alkekengi L.
Ranalisma rostrata Stapf
Cirsium horridulum var. megacanthum (Nutt.) D.J.Keil
Fagopyrum dibotrys (D.Don) Hara
Cirsium remotifolium var. remotifolium
Pogogyne douglasii subsp. minor J.T.Howell
Pogogyne serpylloides subsp. intermedia J.T.Howell
Pogostemon yatabeanus (Makino) Press
Dorotheanthus bellidiformis (Burm.fil.) N.E.Br.
Kennedia nigricans Lindl.
Indigofera patens Eckl. & Zeyh.
Ranunculus trilobus Desf.
Gaudinia fragilis (L.) P.Beauv.
Hippocrepis comosa L.
Hedysarum spinosissimum L.
Microseris laciniata var. siskiyouensis K.L.Chambers
Polygonum hartwrightii A.Gray
Daucus carota var. sativus Hoffm.
Sanicula bipinnatifida var. flava Jeps.
Polygonum bellardii All.
Juncus nodatus Coville
Polygonum baldschuanicum Regel
Polygonum aviculare subsp. rurivagum (Boreau) Berher
Lavandula lanata Boiss.
Marrubium cylleneum Boiss. & Heldr.
Penstemon laetus subsp. leptosepalus (Greene ex Gray) D.D.Keck
Bilderdykia aubertii (L.Henry) Moldenke
Elsholtzia ciliata (Thunb.) Hyl.
Lamiastrum galeobdolon (L.) Ehrend. & Polatschek
Hyptis lorentziana O.Hoffm.
Euonymus bungeanus Maxim.
Euonymus americanus L.
Luzula forsteri subsp. forsteri
Atriplex lindleyi subsp. inflata (F.Muell.) Paul G.Wilson
Calamintha nepeta (L.) Savi
Emilia fosbergii Nicolson
Chenopodium album var. mediterraneum Aellen
Eriogonum fasciculatum var. revolutum (Goodd.) S.Stokes
Monardella villosa var. subglabra Hoover
Physostegia leptophylla Small
Perilla frutescens var. crispa (Benth.) W.Deane
Trifolium squarrosum L.
Mentha viridis (L.) L.
Eriogonum croceum Small
Chenopodium ambrosioides var. chilense (Schrad.) Speg.
Bambusa Schreb.
Avena sterilis subsp. macrocarpa Briq
Avena nuda L.
Acacia craspedocarpa F.Muell.
Senecio hesperius Greene
Iva axillaris var. pubescens A.Gray, 1874
Senecio eurycephalus var. eurycephalus
Avena brevis Roth
Senecio bolanderi var. bolanderi
Lupinus micranthus var. bicolor (Lindl.) S.Watson
Shinnersia rivularis (A.Gray) R.M.King & H.Rob.
Genista lydia Boiss.
Senecio triangularis var. angustifolius G.N.Jones
Senecio seminivea J.M.Wood & M.S.Evans
Senecio pseudaureus var. pseudaureus
Senecio serpens G.D.Rowley
Alyxia oliviformis Gaudich.
Leontodon muelleri (Sch.Bip.) Fiori
Solidago californica var. nevadensis A.Gray ex W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Euphorbia mauritanica L.
Medicago tuberculata (Retz.) Willd.
Stephanomeria exigua subsp. macrocarpa Gottlieb
Medicago intertexta (L.) Mill.
Medicago orbicularis var. microcarpa Rouy
Medicago ciliaris (L.) All.
Brachypodium pinnatum (L.) P.Beauv.
Brachypodium phoenicoides (L.) Roem. & Schult.
Agrostis nebulosa Boiss. & Reut.
Lotus grandiflorus var. macranthus (Greene) Isely
Oyedaea verbesinoides DC.
Montanoa Cerv.
Montanoa grandiflora (DC.) Hemsl.
Rumex obtusifolius subsp. agrestis (Fr.) Danser
Lessertia montana (E.Phillips & R.A.Dyer) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Lespedeza striata (Thunb.) Hook. & Arn.
Lespedeza stipulacea Maxim.
Lotus argyraeus subsp. multicaulis (Ottley) Munz
Rytidosperma racemosum (R.Br.) Connor & Edgar
Lotus berthelotii Masf.
Cuscuta reflexa Roxb.
Amaranthus hybridus subsp. quitensis (Kunth) Costea & Carretero
Eichhornia Kunth
Lebeckia multiflora E.Mey.
Phymaspermum parvifolium (DC.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Phymaspermum acerosum (DC.) Källersjö
Carthamus oxyacanthus M.Bieb.
Pentachaeta exilis subsp. exilis
Psilocarphus oregonus var. brevissimus (Nutt.) Jeps.
Pseudogynoxys chenopodioides (Kunth) Cabrera
Lupinus albicaulis var. bridgesii S.Watson
Lupinus aridus subsp. lenorensis (C.P.Sm.) B.J.Cox
Hydrothrix gardneri Hook.f.
Polyscias scutellaria (Burm.f.) Fosberg
Heteranthera zosterifolia Mart.
Allocasuarina helmsii (Ewart & Gordon) L.A.S.Johnson
Lotus sessilifolius DC.
Eryngium amethystinum L.
Cymopterus williamsii R.L.Hartm. & Constance
Valerianella macrocera A.Gray
Polygonum muhlenbergii S.Watson
Echinochloa crus-galli subsp. praticola Ohwi
Cleomella obtusifolia var. pubescens A.Nelson
Echinochloa crus-galli f. longiseta (Trin.) Farw.
Pilea pumila (L.) A.Gray
Pilea pubescens Liebm.
Pilea depressa (Sw.) Blume
Parietaria praetermissa Hinton
Pilea cadierei Gagnep. & Guillaumin
Lilaeopsis novae-zelandiae (Gand.) A.W.Hill
Digitaria violascens Link
Dichanthelium acuminatum subsp. acuminatum
Deschampsia flexuosa (L.) Trin.
Digitaria decumbens Stent
Dichanthium aristatum (Poir.) C.E.Hubb.
Lomatium tamanitchii Darrach & Thie
Lomatium ciliolatum Jeps.
Melicytus ramiflorus J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Verbena tenera Spreng.
Verbena venosa Gillies & Hook.
Phyla nodiflora var. incisa (Small) Moldenke
Valeriana sitchensis var. scouleri (Rydb.) Piper
Chloris distichophylla Lag.
Rhus typhina var. laciniata Alph.Wood
Schinus longifolia (Lindl.) Speg.
Bromus lanceolatus Roth
Rhus standleyi F.A.Barkley
Pyrrocoma racemosa var. congesta (Greene) Mayes ex G.K.Br. & D.J.Keil
Lasthenia chrysantha (Greene ex A.Gray) Greene
Malus ×purpurea f. eleyi (Bean) Rehder
Brodiaea lactea (Lindl.) S.Watson
Brodiaea lutea var. scabra (Greene) Munz
Brodiaea grandiflora (Lindl.) J.F.Macbr.
Pimelea ferruginea Labill.
Thymelaea passerina (L.) Coss. & Germ.
Tilia petiolaris DC.
Tilia ×moltkei Späth ex C.K.Schneid.
Tetratheca thymifolia Sm.
Trapa bicornis Osbeck
Tetratheca ciliata Lindl.
Senegalia pennata subsp. insuavis (Lace) Maslin, Seigler & Ebinger
Ochroma Sw.
Stachytarpheta urticifolia Sims
Cassia alata L.
Chenopodium glaucum subsp. glaucum
Catharanthus pusillus (Murray) G.Don
Aglaia odorata Lour.
Cynodon transvaalensis Burtt Davy
Cyanella Royen ex L.
Heterogaura heterandra (Torr.) Coville
Cymbopogon nardus (L.) Rendle
Brodiaea capitata Benth.
Ternstroemia impressa Lundell
Ternstroemia sylvatica Choisy
Oxytheca hirtiflora (Gray ex S.Watson) Greene
Allium saxatile M.Bieb.
Rorippa aquatica (Eaton) E.J.Palmer & Steyerm.
Aloe ukambensis Reynolds
Aloe tenuior Haw.
Aloe striatula Haw.
Aloe dichotoma Masson
Aloe cameronii Hemsl.
Asparagus falcatus L.
Prunus incisa Thunb. ex Murray
Acaena anserinifolia (J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.) Druce
Utricularia graminifolia Vahl
Agapanthus walshii L.Bolus
Trifolium medium L.
Allium ampeloprasum var. babingtonii (Borrer) Syme
Acacia karroo Hayne
Acacia schaffneri var. bravoensis Isely
Allium canadense L.
Allium odorum L.
Allium paniculatum var. paniculatum
Allium porrum L.
Inga Mill.
Mahonia oiwakensis Hayata
Halimiocistus sahucii (H.J.Coste & Soulié) Janch.
Suaeda fruticosa (L.) Forssk.
Evodia hortensis J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Camassia quamash var. breviflora (Gould) C.L.Hitchc.
Calochortus venustus var. purpurascens S.Watson
Cotula hispida (DC.) Harv.
Sporobolus creber De Nardi
Bomarea caldasii (Kunth) Herb.
Aspidistra elatior Blume
Argyreia Lour.
Anubias gracilis A.Chev. ex Hutch.
Aeonium decorum Webb ex Bolle
Callisia fragrans (Lindl.) Woodson
Lechea mucronata Raf.
Cistus symphytifolius Lam.
Halimium lasianthum (Lam.) Spach
Ampelopsis arborea (L.) Koehne
Chenopodium vagans Standl.
Chenopodium schraderianum Roem. ex Schult.
Scutellaria suffrutescens S.Watson
Trachelium caeruleum L.
Vitis aestivalis Michx.
Rhoicissus tomentosa (Lam.) Wild & R.B.Drumm.
Salvia uliginosa Benth.
Salvia wagneriana Pol.
Hedychium gardnerianum Sheppard ex Ker Gawl.
Salvia lavandulifolia Vahl
Rhagodia spinescens R.Br.
Viola tienschiensis W.Becker
Salvia aurea L.
Viola rupestris F.W.Schmidt
Sium L.
Salvia confertiflora Pohl
Salvia dorisiana Standl.
Westringia Sm.
Westringia raleighii B.Boivin
Laurus L.
Ilex cassine var. angustifolia Aiton
Ilex glabra (L.) A.Gray
Vinca difformis Pourr.
Mandevilla laxa (Ruiz & Pav.) Woodson
Celosia spicata (Thouars) Spreng.
Tetradymia comosa subsp. tetrameres S.F.Blake
Psoralea glandulosa L.
Tanacetum ptarmiciflorum (Webb & Berthel.) Sch.Bip.
Robinia hispida var. macrophylla DC.
Ranunculus asiaticus L.
Peltophorum africanum Sond.
Ranunculus cortusifolius Willd.
Stevia lucida Lag.
Stevia polycephala Bertol.
Vernonia missurica Raf.
Vernonia Schreb.
Atriplex spongiosa F.Muell.
Neptunia oleracea Lour.
Pachyrhizus erosus (L.) Urb.
Oxytropis albiflora (A.Nelson) K.Schum.
Ranunculus bonariensis Poir.
Gypsophila L.
Trifolium ambiguum M.Bieb.
Xanthium canadense Sabbati ex Nyman
Sophora tomentosa L.
Trifolium albopurpureum var. olivaceum (Greene) Isely
Senna septentrionalis (Viv.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Elegia elephantina H.P.Linder
Alnus glutinosa (L.) Gaertn.
Epimedium pinnatum DC.
Thalictrum fendleri var. platycarpum Trel.
Ischyrolepis capensis (L.) H.P.Linder
Ceanothus ×pallidus Koehne
Ceanothus ×delileanus Spach
Lonicera hispidula var. hispidula
Samolus valerandi L.
Triteleia grandiflora var. grandiflora
Grevillea johnsonii Mc Gill.
Dryandra proteoides Lindl.
Isopogon formosus R.Br.
Lambertia formosa Sm.
Hakea erinacea Meisn.
Eucalyptus leptopoda Benth.
Eucalyptus erythronema Turcz.
Hakea elliptica (Sm.) R.Br.
Protea repens (L.) L.
Ornithogalum thyrsoides Jacq.
Sansevieria trifasciata Prain
Polygonatum odoratum var. thunbergii (C.Morren & Decne.) H.Hara
Carex scoparia var. scoparia
Anagallis arvensis f. azurea Hyl.
Lysimachia L.
Calibrachoa Cerv.
Delphinium apiculatum Greene
Anemone hupehensis (Hort.) hort. ex Boynton
Anemone hupehensis var. japonica (Thunb.) Bowles & Stearn
Aquilegia flavescens var. flavescens
Arabis constancei Rollins
Festuca rubra var. commutata Gaudin
Trifolium albopurpureum var. neolagopus McDermott
Chloris crinita Lag.
Carlina acaulis L.
Hakonechloa macra (Munro) Honda
Gynerium sagittatum (Aubl.) P.Beauv.
Holcus halepensis L.
Eragrostis trichodes (Nutt.) Alph.Wood
Eriochloa acuminata var. minor (Vasey) R.B.Shaw
Eriochloa polystachya Kunth
Eremochloa ophiuroides (Munro) Hack.
Vicia calcarata Desf.
Vicia monanthos (L.) Desf.
Vicia monantha Retz.
Vicia peregrina L.
Hydrocotyle asiatica L.
Hordeum stebbinsii Covas
Cryptocoryne lingua Becc. ex Engl.
Epipremnum aureum (Linden & André) G.S.Bunting
Ilex ×attenuata Ashe
Ilex serrata Thunb.
Aglaonema modestum Schott ex Engl.
Acorus gramineus Aiton
Ilex perado Sol. ex Aiton
Oenothera biennis var. muricata (L.) Torr. & A.Gray
Leptochloa fusca Linnaeus, 1753
Ischaemum indicum (Houtt.) Merr.
Iseilema anthephoroides Hack.
Buxus microphylla var. japonica (Müll.Arg. ex Miq.) Rehder & Wilson
Chamaedorea elegans Mart.
Calamus ornatus Blume
Hordeum brevisubulatum (Trin.) Link
Salacca edulis Reinw.
Trevesia palmata (Roxb. ex Lindl.) Vis.
Cotoneaster conspicuus Messel
Centaurea eriophora L.
Centaurea salmantica L.
Ribes odoratum H.L.Wendl.
Erodium macrophyllum var. californicum (Greene) Jeps.
Trifolium isthmocarpum Brot.
Kalmia polifolia var. microphylla (Hook.) Rehder
Trifolium longipes subsp. pedunculatum (Rydb.) J.M.Gillett
Trifolium latinum Sebast.
Trifolium michelianum Savi
Acalypha australis L.
Scabiosa caucasica M.Bieb.
Strobilanthes dyeriana Mast.
Trifolium carmelii Boiss.
Gaura neomexicana Wooton
Trifolium cherleri L.
Adansonia digitata L.
Allocarya californica (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Greene
Trifolium desvauxii Boiss. & Blanche
Trifolium fragiferum subsp. bonannii (C.Presl) Soják
Plectritis macrocera var. mamillata (Suksd.) Dyal
Thunbergia grandiflora (Roxb. ex Rottler) Roxb.
Vicia unijuga A.Braun
Swertia albicaulis (Griseb.) Douglas ex Kuntze
Elytrigia intermedia subsp. barbulata (Schur) Á.Löve
Vigna mungo (L.) Hepper
Trifolium xerocephalum Fenzl
Trifolium neglectum Fisch., C.A.Mey. & Avé-Lall.
Ehrharta longifolia Schrad.
Trifolium ochroleucon Huds.
Trifolium pallidum Waldst. & Kit.
Trifolium purpureum Loisel.
Cryptantha dissita I.M.Johnst.
Trifolium resupinatum var. robustum Rouy
Trifolium semipilosum Fresen.
Trifolium trichocephalum M.Bieb.
Dittrichia graveolens Linnaeus, 1755
Cotoneaster glaucophyllus var. vestitus W.W.Sm.
Carex divulsa subsp. leersii (F.W.Schultz) W.Koch
Mimulus longiflorus subsp. calycinus (Eastw.) Munz
Arctostaphylos glauca var. glauca
Astragalus deterior (Barneby) Barneby
Ranunculus acriformis var. aestivalis L.D.Benson
Delphinium parishii var. pallidum Munz
Castilleja pilosa subsp. jusselii (Eastw.) Munz
Plectritis ciliosa var. davyana (Jeps.) Dyal
Kochia Roth
Galium serpenticum subsp. dayense Dempster & Ehrend.
Androsace septentrionalis var. subumbellata A.Nelson
Prunus capellin Zucc.
Arabis sabulosa var. frigida M.E.Jones
Boisduvalia cleistogama Curran
Grindelia hirsutula var. hallii (Steyerm.) M.A.Lane
Elymus riparius Wiegand
Draba carnosula O.E.Schulz
Eriogonum saurinum Reveal
Eriogonum corymbosum var. davidsei Reveal
Atriplex welshii C.A.Hanson
Draba asprella var. zionensis (C.L.Hitchc.) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Chorizanthe staticoides subsp. chrysacantha (Goodman) Munz
Berberis californica Jeps.
Chamaesyce ocellata subsp. rattanii (S.Watson) Koutnik
Agave deserti var. pringlei (Engelm. ex Baker) W.C.Hodgs. & Reveal
Arabis tiehmii Rollins
Castilleja arachnoidea subsp. schizotricha (Greenm.) Pennell
Austrodanthonia caespitosa (Gaudich.) H.P.Linder
Silene menziesii subsp. menziesii
Kalmia polifolia subsp. occidentalis (Small) Abrams
Hemizonia parryi subsp. congdonii (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) D.D.Keck
Townsendia mensana var. jonesii Beaman
Castilleja anacapensis Dunkle
Rhamnus ursina Greene
Astragalus wingatanus var. dodgianus (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Pyrola rotundifolia var. incarnata DC.
Hemizonia parryi subsp. rudis (Greene) D.D.Keck
Astragalus peabodianus M.E.Jones
Eschscholzia frutescens (Greene) J.T.Howell
Mimulus densus Grant
Stipa manicata É.Desv.
Laphamia palmeri var. tenella M.E.Jones
Sedum spathulifolium subsp. anomalum (Britton) Clausen & C.H.Uhl
Arctostaphylos canescens var. candidissima (Eastw.) Munz
Salicornia maritima S.L.Wolff & Jefferies
Sedum valens Björk
Lepidium draba subsp. chalepensis (L.) Thell.
Acacia angustissima var. shrevei (Britton & Rose) Isely
Euphorbia robusta (Engelm.) Small
Poa abbreviata subsp. marshii Soreng
Eriogonum lanosum Eastw.
Lessingia lemmonii var. peirsonii (J.T.Howell) Ferris
Verbena lilacina Greene
Erigeron bloomeri var. typicus Cronquist
Rosa brachycarpa Rydb.
Castilleja miniata subsp. dixonii (Fernald) Kartesz
Iostephane heterophylla (Cav.) Benth.
Fraxinus pistaciifolia Torr.
Sitanion Raf.
Plectritis congesta subsp. nitida (Heller) Morey
Calycadenia truncata subsp. scabrella (Drew) D.D.Keck
Valerianella olitoria (L.) Willd.
Dalea foliolosa (Aiton) Barneby
Maurandya antirrhiniflora subsp. antirrhiniflora
Sidalcea robusta A.Heller ex Roush
Brodiaea multiflora Benth.
Brodiaea lugens (Greene) Baker
Solanum wallacei var. wallacei
Orobanche uniflora var. uniflora
Pyrola crypta Jolles
Cistanthe grandiflora (Lindl.) Schltdl.
Evolvulus linifolius L.
Stenotopsis linearifolius (DC.) Rydb.
Horkelia mollis Eastw.
Potentilla rhyolitica var. chiricahuensis Ertter
Lagophylla dichotoma Benth.
Aster mucronatus E.Sheld.
Spiraea millefolium Torr.
Lotus cupreus Greene
Ranunculus occidentalis var. rattanii (Howell) A.Gray
Gilia lutea Steud.
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. sessilis (Greene) M.L.Canby
Hemizonia pungens subsp. maritima (Greene) D.D.Keck
Eriogonum angulosum var. victorense M.E.Jones
Dudleya grandiflora Rose ex Britton & Rose
Trifolium fucatum var. fucatum
Matricaria globifera (Thunb.) Fenzl ex Harv. & Sond.
Colocasia Schott
Allionia L.
Limnophila R.Br.
Gastridium P.Beauv.
Valeriana L.
Amsinckia tessellata var. macrosepala M.E.Jones
Chamaerhodos erecta subsp. nuttallii (Torr. & A.Gray) Hultén
Malacothrix polycephala W.S.Davis
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. triglochidiatus
Santalaceae
Monardella linoides subsp. viminea (Greene) Abrams
Lathyrus ornatus var. incanus J.G.Sm. & Rydb.
Psoralea lanceolata var. purshii (Vail) Piper
Sedum wrightii A.Gray
Opuntia polyacantha subsp. erinacea (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) Guiggi
Loeselia glandulosa subsp. sonorae Namoff & J.M.Porter
Juncus elliottii Chapm.
Navarretia nigelliformis var. radians J.T.Howell
Delphinium scopulorum var. glaucum (S.Watson) A.Gray
Lupinus concinnus var. optatus C.P.Sm.
Arctostaphylos stanfordiana var. repens Roof
Agrimonia striata var. campanulata Fernald
Carex peninsulae Naczlet et al.
Yucca elata var. utahensis (McKelvey) Reveal
Potentilla lasia Rydb.
Eremogone cliftonii Rabeler & R.L.Hartm.
Vicia exigua var. hassei (S.Watson) Jeps.
Galactia tephrodes A.Gray
Astragalus debilis Ovcz. & Rassulova
Penstemon obtusifolius Pennell
Festuca viviparoidea Krajina ex Pavlick
Urochloa maxima (Jacq.) R.D.Webster
Pteryxia davidsonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias & Constance
Machaeranthera ammophila Reveal
Papaver nudicaule L.
Polygonum fusiforme Greene
Opuntia megalantha Griffiths
Delphinium scopulorum var. scopulorum
Arctostaphylos andersonii var. viridissima (Eastw.) Jeps.
Sphaeralcea rosea (DC.) G.Don
Acacia glandulifera S.Watson
Mimulus moschatus var. moschatus
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. washoensis L.C.Anderson
Cnicus nidulus M.E.Jones
Cuscuta jepsonii Yunck.
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi var. uva-ursi
Arenaria kingii subsp. uintahensis (A.Nelson) Maguire
Galium pubens A.Gray
Ribes oxyacanthoides var. cognatum (Greene) Morin
Astragalus glareosus Hook.
Pyrola bracteata Hook.
Parosela jamesii Torr.
Lupinus holosericeus var. utahensis S.Watson
Cypripedium calceolus var. parviflorum (Salisb.) Fernald
Pentacaena ramosissima (Weinm.) Hook. & Arn.
Sphaerostigma (Ser.) Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Senecio pauciflorus Baker
Phlox densa Brand
Sidalcea hickmanii subsp. viridis C.L.Hitchc.
Aster copelandii Greene
Grindelia hirsutula var. brevisquama Steyerm.
Penstemon deustus subsp. heterander (Torr. & A.Gray) Pennell & D.D.Keck
Penstemon deustus subsp. sudans (M.E.Jones) Pennell & D.D.Keck
Opuntia leptocarpa Mackensen
Mimulus latifolius A.Gray
Stenolobium alatum (DC.) Sprague
Isomeris aborea Nutt. ex Greene
Ficus pseudocarica Miq.
Erigeron foliosus var. blochmaniae (Greene) H.M.Hall
Astragalus pictus var. magnus M.E.Jones
Saltugilia grinnellii subsp. grantii (Brand) L.A.Johnson
Carpobrotus aequilateralis (Willd.) S.T.Blake
Streptanthus orbiculatus Greene
Mimosa lemmonii A.Gray
Hasseanthus variegata (S.Watson) Rose
Cycloloma Moq.
Gerardia wrightii A.Gray
Delphinium armeniacum A.Heller
Aster peirsonii Sharsm.
Astragalus purshii var. interior M.E.Jones
Phlox hoodii subsp. muscoides (Nutt.) Wherry
Viola cucullata Aiton
Camissonia claviformis subsp. wigginsii (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Festuca arvernensis Auquier, Kerguélen & Markgr.-Dann.
Silene occidentalis subsp. longistipitata C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Githopsis pulchella subsp. campestris Morin
Mammillaria grahamii var. oliviae (Orcutt) L.D.Benson
Astragalus sileranus M.E.Jones
Acacia cuspidata Schltdl.
Menziesia Sm.
Hedysarum pabulare A.Nelson
Mertensia paniculata var. paniculata
Habenaria stricta (Lindl.) Rydb.
Calystegia malacophylla var. malacophylla
Hedysarum mackenzii Richardson
Penstemon floridus subsp. floridus
Corethrogyne viscidula var. greenei Jeps.
Delphinium hansenii subsp. arcuatum (Greene) Ewan
Astragalus chuckwallae Abrams
Linanthus nuttallii subsp. pubescens R.Patt.
Aster subulatus var. parviflorus (Nees) Sünd.
Brickellia laxiflora (Brandegee) B.L.Turner
Dalea cylindriceps Barneby
Eriogonum flavissimum Gand.
Agrostis filiculmis M.E.Jones
Rhamnus crocea subsp. pilosa (Trel.) C.B.Wolf
Peucedanum juniperinum M.E.Jones
Yucca guatemalensis Baker
Oenothera micrantha var. exfoliata (A.Nelson) Munz
Xanthoxalis californica Abrams
Hedysarum occidentale var. canone S.L.Welsh
Lupinus platanophilus M.E.Jones
Mentzelia pinetorum A.Heller
Rytidosperma pilosum (R.Br.) Connor & Edgar
Rubus ursinus var. ursinus
Lupinus lyallii var. roguensis B.J.Cox
Polygonum aviculare subsp. rurivagum (Jord. ex Boreau) O.Bolòs & Vigo
Eriogonum microthecum subsp. ambiguum (M.E.Jones) Munz
Arctostaphylos glauca var. eremicola Jeps.
Phaca davidsonii Rydb.
Plagiobothrys californicus var. fulvescens I.M.Johnst.
Townsendia incana var. ambigua M.E.Jones
Echeveria saxosa (M.E.Jones) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Salvia palmeri A.Gray
Gilia virgata var. yageri M.E.Jones
Euphorbia novomexicana (Klotzsch & Garcke) L.C.Wheeler
Tibouchina semidecandra (Schrank & Mart. ex DC.) Cogn.
Oenothera hookeri var. wolfii Munz, 1949
Isomeris Nutt.
Cuscuta applanata Engelm.
Mammillaria mainae K.Brandegee, 1900
Ledum Ruppius ex L.
Amsinckia helleri Brand
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. viridulus H.M.Hall & Clem.
Layia glandulosa subsp. lutea D.D.Keck
Cryptantha spithamaea I.M.Johnst.
Lotus americanus (Nutt.) Bisch.
Parryella rotundata Wooton
Cassia leptocarpa Benth.
Chamaecytisus prolifer (L.f.) Link
Aster fremontii var. parishii A.Gray
Agave utahensis var. discreta M.E.Jones
Chorizanthe chrysacantha var. compacta Goodman
Cotyledon lanceolata Forssk.
Neillia D.Don
Batrachium bakeri Greene
Euphorbia dictyosperma Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Viola mamillata Greene
Forsellesia pungens (Brandegee) A.Heller
Gilia linearis (Nutt.) A.Gray
Ribes purpurascens A.Heller
Calochortus nuttallii var. subalpinus M.E.Jones
Thermopsis macrophylla var. agnina J.T.Howell
Saracha procumbens (Cav.) Ruiz & Pav.
Trifolium eriocephalum subsp. cusickii (Piper) J.M Gillett
Erigeron wahwahensis S.L.Welsh
Scleranthus L.
Vicia exigua Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Gentiana oregana Engelm. ex Gray
Astragalus panguicensis (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Monardella odoratissima var. follettii Jeps.
Krynitzkia Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Scrophularia californica var. californica
Zigadenus exaltatus Eastw.
Astragalus pygmaeus var. laccoliticus M.E.Jones
Amelanchier jonesiana C.K.Schneid.
Phyllodoce Salisb.
Agoseris cinerea Greene
Galium aculeolatum Dempster
Draba cusickii var. pedicellata Rollins & R.A.Price
Eriogonum effusum subsp. durum S.Stokes
Townsendia incana var. prolixa M.E.Jones
Potentilla elmeri Rydb.
Schmaltzia affinis Greene
Amsinckia tessellata var. lemmonii Jeps.
Arctostaphylos roofii Gankin
Argemone intermedia var. corymbosa (Greene) Eastw.
Phaeostoma mildredae A.Heller, 1940
Gilia peduncularis Eastw. ex Milliken
Quercus chrysolepis f. grandis Jeps.
Eschscholzia ludens Greene
Arctostaphylos ×coloradensis Rollins
Astragalus thompsonae S.Watson
Lathyrus leucanthus var. laetivirens (Greene ex Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Stipa comata subsp. comata
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. versicolor (S.Stokes) Munz
Drymocallis micropetala Rydb.
Sophora L.
Apocynum pumilum var. rhomboideum (Greene) Bég. & Belosersky
Petrophytum acuminatum Rydb.
Erythronium oregonum subsp. leucandrum (Applegate) Applegate
Eriophyllum confertiflorum var. tridactylum (Rydb.) Munz
Cereus engelmannii Parry ex Engelm.
Mentzelia peirsonii Jeps.
Festuca jonesii Vasey
Dieteria Nutt.
Potentilla amicarum Ertter
Achillea millefolium subsp. alpicola (Rydb.) Garrett
Delphinium hanseni var. kernense A.Davidson
Gilia liniflora var. pharnaceoides (Benth.) A.Gray
Hedeoma drummondii var. drummondii
Penstemon cinereus subsp. foliatus D.D.Keck
Arabis perfoliata Lam.
Lepidium virginicum var. californicum Jeps.
Rosa brownii Tratt.
Zigadenus diegoensis Davidson
Neostyphonia ovata (S.Watson) Abrams
Aeonium simsii (Sweet) Stearn
Triodia R.Br.
Acacia farnesiana subsp. minuta (M.E.Jones) Ebinger, Seigler & H.D.Clarke
Gnaphalium chilense var. confertifolia Greene
Cutandia memphitica (Spreng.) K.Richt.
Rhus virens var. virens
Atriplex tenuissima A.Nelson
Eritrichium cooperi A.Gray
Galium munzii var. subalpinum Hilend & J.T.Howell
Anthoxanthum odoratum subsp. odoratum
Astragalus coltonii var. aphyllus M.E.Jones
Agave neglecta Small
Psorodendron spinosum (A.Gray) Rydb.
Alyxia stellata var. deckeri Fosberg & Sachet
Abronia pedunculata (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Gayophytum helleri var. erosulatum Jeps.
Salix laevigata f. araquipa Jeps.
Madia dissitiflora (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Avicennia marina (Forssk.) Vierh.
Actaea spicata var. arguta (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Torr.
Zauschneria garrettii A.Nelson
Machaeranthera carnosa var. intricata (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Lupinus caudatus var. argophyllus (A.Gray) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus maculatus Rydb.
Trifolium longipes var. pygmaeum A.Gray
Henrya laxa Happ
Oxybaphus L'Hér. ex Willd.
Quercus chrysolepis var. hansenii (Jeps.) Jeps.
Erysimum suffrutescens var. lompocense Rossbach
Penstemon puberulus M.E.Jones
Poinsettia heterophylla (L.) Klotzsch & Garcke
Potentilla sabulosa M.E.Jones
Malvastrum leptophyllum A.Gray
Opuntia ursina F.A.C.Weber
Brachyactis frondosus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Casuarina glauca Sieber ex Spreng.
Astragalus capillipes M.E.Jones
Monardella douglasii subsp. douglasii
Allium tenellum Davidson
Peteria A.Gray
Lotus oblongifolius var. cupreus Ottley
Kalmia L.
Erigeron pulvinatus Rydb.
Arnica spathulata subsp. eastwoodiae (Rydb.) Maguire
Gilia debilis S.Watson
Ribes hesperium McClatchie
Astragalus arietinus M.E.Jones
Viola pedunculata subsp. tenuifolia Baker & Clausen
Rosa bidenticulata Rydb.
Eriogonum marifolium var. cupulatum (S.Stokes) Reveal
Fendlera Engelm. & A.Gray
Cissus L.
Arnica jonesii Rydb.
Epilobium canescens Endl.
Lupinus stinchfieldiae C.P.Sm.
Haplopappus crispus L.C.Anderson
Triteleia crocea var. crocea
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. pacifica H.M.Hall
Arabis hoffmanii (Munz) Rollins
Sisymbrium diffusum var. jaegeri Munz
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. nana (Jeps.) C.L.Hitchc.
Parthenium alpinum var. ligulatum M.E.Jones
Bigelowia howardii var. attenuata M.E.Jones
Agoseris confinis Greene
Erythronium quinaultense G.A.Allen
Polemonium pulcherrimum var. pilosum (Greenm.) J.F.Davidson
Lesquerella gordonii var. gordonii
Phlox stansburyi var. stansburyi
Salicornia pacifica var. utahensis (Tidestr.) Munz
Trifolium andersonii subsp. andersonii
Crepis runcinata subsp. andersonii (A.Gray) Babc. & Stebbins
Rosa eastwoodiae Rydb.
Salvia carnosa Douglas ex Greene
Calochortus nuttallii var. australis Munz
Castilleja trisecta Greene
Papaver L.
Dentaria californica var. sinuata (Greene) Detling
Gilia arenicola M.E.Jones
Buglossoides arvensis Linnaeus, 1753
Eriogonum microtheca var. rigidum Eastw.
Paspalum virgatum L.
Astragalus carinatus (Hook. & Arn.) Reiche
Castilleja arachnoidea subsp. arachnoidea
Astragalus hosackiae Greene
Opuntia whipplei var. whipplei
Picradenia davidsonii Greene
Trifolium longipes subsp. shastense (House) J.M.Gillett
Dalea nummularia M.E.Jones
Mammillaria fera-rubra F.Schmoll ex R.T.Craig
Cirsium tioganum (Congdon) Petr.
Ipomopsis congesta var. goodrichii S.L.Welsh
Eriastrum sparsiflorum subsp. harwoodii (T.T.Craig) H.K.Harrison
Quercus impressa Trel.
Thermopsis gracilis var. gracilis
Coptis Salisb.
Dalea multiflora (Nutt.) Shinners
Lupinus cusickii subsp. brachypodus (Piper) B.J.Cox
Camissonia luciae Raven
Mimulus atropurpureus Kellogg
Aconitum viviparum Greene
Cerastium alpinum var. beeringianum (Cham. & Schltdl.) Regel
Mimulus wolfii Eastw.
Escobaria vivipara var. alversonii (Coult.) D.R.Hunt
Boisduvalia densiflora f. imbricata (Greene) Munz
Solanum wallacei var. clokeyi (Munz) McMinn
Oenothera boothii subsp. inyoensis Munz
Aster thermalis M.E.Jones
Arctostaphylos ×parvifolia Howell
Calochortus longebarbatus var. longebarbatus
Boechera cusickii (S.Watson) Al-Shehbaz
Cassia bauhinioides var. arizonica J.F.Macbr.
Salvia canescens C.A.Mey.
Oenothera spiralis Hook.
Senecio prionophyllus Franch.
Clematis ligusticifolia var. californica S.Watson
Cotyledon saxosum M.E.Jones
Eriogonum heermannii subsp. humilius S.Stokes
Castilleja culbertsonii Greene
Oenothera contorta Douglas ex Lehm.
Collinsia monticola Davidson
Dracocephalum L.
Fraxinus viridis Bosc
Sedum variegatum S.Watson
Poa festucoides Lam.
Monardella epilobioides var. erecta Abrams
Dianthus deltoides subsp. deltoides
Calochortus montanus (Purdy) Davidson
Acamptopappus microcephalus M.E.Jones
Antirrhinum mohavea D.J.Keil
Astragalus pictus var. angustus M.E.Jones
Astragalus diehlii M.E.Jones
Lupinus argenteus var. prati-harti C.P.Sm.
Bigelowia turbinata M.E.Jones
Erodium cygnorum Nees
Parosela mollis (Benth.) A.Heller
Phlox speciosa subsp. nitida (Suksd.) Wherry
Sanicula bipinnatifida var. hoffmannii Munz
Euphorbia polycarpa var. vestita S.Watson
Arabis maxima var. hoffmanii Munz
Stephanomeria tenuifolia var. uintaensis Goodrich & S.L.Welsh
Eriogonum anserinum Greene
Cotyledon pulverulenta (Nutt.) Baker
Juglans microcarpa var. microcarpa
Arctostaphylos canescens var. canescens
Astragalus nuttallianus var. canescens Torr. & A.Gray ex S.Watson
Trifolium eriocephalum subsp. arcuatum (Piper) J.M.Gillett
Lupinus spathulatus Rydb.
Boisduvalia glabella var. typica Munz
Oenothera organensis Munz
Boerhavia diffusa var. diffusa
Eriogonum rubiflorum M.E.Jones
Atriplex cristata Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Lycium ruthenicum Murray
Atriplex centralasiatica Iljin
Entandrophragma cylindricum (Sprague) Sprague
Lauraceae
Graminophyllum Conwentz, 1886
Quercoxylon E.Hofmann, 1929
Tetracera L.
Cinnamomophyllum R.Kräusel & Weyland, 1950
Platanaceae
Aristolochiaceae
Astronium Jacq.
Trapa L.
Betulaceae
Persea pseudocarolinensis Lesquereux, 1878
Pachysandra Michx.
Cladrastis Raf.
Laurophyllum Göppert, 1854
Palaeophytocrene E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Macginitiea J.A.Wolfe & W.Wehr, 1986
Rhizopalmoxylon W.Gothan, 1942
Macginicarpa S.R.Manchester, 1986
Halesia Ellis ex L.
Desmodium lineatum DC.
Litseaphyllum J.A.Wolfe, 1977
Coryloides S.R.Manchester, 1994
Avicennia L.
Emmenopterys Oliv.
Catalpa Scop.
Goweri dilleri Knowlton, 1900
Sabalites G.Saporta, 1865
Spiraea densiflora subsp. splendens (Baumann ex K.Koch) Abrams
Liabum igniarium (Humb. & Bonpl.) Less.
Androsace septentrionalis var. glandulosa (Wooton & Standl.) H.St.John
Vernonanthura nudiflora (Less.) H.Rob.
Tessaria dodoneifolia (Hook. & Arn.) Cabrera
Physaria eriocarpa Grady & O'Kane
Baileya multiradiata var. thurberi (Rydb.) Kittell
Chrysocoma coma-aurea L.
Poa trivialis subsp. sylvicola (Guss.) H.Lindb.
Sphenopholis interrupta (Buckley) Scribn.
Mortonia A.Gray
Ageratina ligustrina (DC.) R.King & H.Rob.
Tillandsia capitata Griseb.
Smelowskia fremontii S.Watson
Paspalum setaceum var. pubiflorum Vasey
Trisetum filifolium Scribn. ex Beal
Coreopsis mutica DC.
Crepis runcinata var. imbricata (Babc. & Stebbins) M.Peck, 1941
Helenium pinnatifidum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Festuca rubra subsp. mediana (Pavlick) Pavlick
Scutellaria albida L.
Aloe vera L., 1753
Lonicera etrusca Santi
Kobresia Willd.
Claytonia lanceolata subsp. lanceolata
Viola nuttallii var. nuttallii
Bromus pumpellianus subsp. pumpellianus
Crepis modocensis var. modocensis
Maianthemum F.H.Wigg.
Eriocoma nelsonii subsp. nelsonii
Muhlenbergia ammophila P.M.Peterson
Festuca saximontana subsp. saximontana
Fragaria cuneifolia Nutt. ex Howell
Elymus virginicus var. intermedius (Vasey ex A.Gray) Bush
Psathyrostachys Nevski ex Roshev.
Hesperidanthus Rydb.
Nothocalais (A.Gray) Greene
Leucopoa Griseb.
Euphorbia missurica Raf.
Townsendia Hook.
Rosa woodsii subsp. woodsii
Drymocallis arguta subsp. convallaria (Rydb.) Soják
Symphoricarpos rotundifolius var. vaccinioides (Rydb.) A.Nelson
Balsamorhiza Hook. ex Nutt., 1840
Eriogonum subalpinum Greene
Potentilla fissa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Arnica chamissonis var. bernardina (Greene) Jeps. ex Maguire
Mimulus guttatus subsp. litoralis Pennell
Comptonia L'Hér. ex Aiton
Salix heartensis Hickey, 1977
Populus balsamoides Goeppert
Arundo pseudogoepperti Berry, 1914
Persea praelingue Sanborn, 1935
Ficus goshenensis Chaney & Sanborn, 1933
Diospyros haguei Knowlton, 1899
Platanus montana Knowlton, 1899
Cinnamomum Schaeff.
Liquidambar californicum Lesquereux, 1878
Acalypha aequalis MacGinitie, 1941
Populus daphnogenoides Ward
Cissus pyriformis MacGinitie, 1941
Diospyros lamarensis Knowlton, 1899
Celtis aspera Manchester, 2014
Fraxinus yubaensis MacGinitie, 1941
Chaetoptelea Liebm.
Berchemia Neck.
Engelhardia nevadensis MacGinitie, 1941
Myrica wardii Knowlton, 1899
Palaeocarpinus P.R.Crane, 1981
Fagus L.
Calycites Massalongo, 1850
Bursericarpum E.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Magnolia pollardi Knowlton, 1899
Carya antiquorum Newberry, 1868
Leguminosites Bowerbank, 1840
Ptelea L.
Calyptranthes myrtifolia MacGinitie, 1941
Quercus hesperia Knowlton, 1899
Ficus tiliaefolia Br
Cruciptera S.R.Manchester, 1991
Ampelocissus Planch.
Hamamelites voyana (Lesquereux, 1878)
Celastrus culveri Knowlton, 1899
Quercus furcinervis Rossm
Corylus insignis Heer, 1871
Chaetoptelea microphylla
Ostrya Scop.
Aphananthe Planch.
Menispermites parvareolatus Hickey, 1977
Populus xantholithensis Knowlton, 1899
Lepidophyllum Cass.
Ailanthus lesquereuxi Cockerell, 1927
Planera longifolia Lesquereux, 1878
Araceaeites Fritel, 1910
Meliosma Blume
Hyperbaena diforma Potbury, 1935
Quercus consimilis Newby, 1883
Acacia wardii Knowlton, 1899
Platanus guillelmae Goeppert
Palaeocarya G.Saporta, 1873
Ternstroemites E.W.Berry, 1916
Magnolia spectabilis Knowlton, 1899
Sabal grayana Brown, 1962
Cleomella DC.
Phaseolus vulgaris var. nanus (L.) Aschers.
Phaseolus vulgaris var. vulgaris
Glyceria airoides A.Gray
Calamovilfa (A.Gray) Hack.
Begoniaceae
Hordeum procerum Nevski
Hordeum lechleri (Steud.) Schenck
Monardella sheltonii Torr.
Vicia sativa var. nigra (L.) Ehrh.
Leucothoe racemosa (L.) Gray
Erigeron vreelandii Rydb.
Hymenoxys ambigens var. neomexicana W.L.Wagner
Brodiaea grandiflora Pursh
Pachgerocereus orcuttii (K.Brandegee) Moran
Pachycereus schottii var. australis (K.Brandegee) P.V.Heath
Pilosocereus chrysacanthus (F.A.C.Weber) Byles & G.D.Rowley
Polaskia chende (Gosselin) A.C.Gibson & K.E.Horak
Pilosocereus leucocephalus (Poselg.) Byles & G.D.Rowley
Pachycereus schottii var. tenuis (G.E.Linds.) P.V.Heath
Stenocereus stellatus (Pfeiff.) Riccob.
Pilosocereus purpusii (Britton & Rose) Byles & G.D.Rowley
Backebergia militaris (Audot) Bravo ex Sánchez-Mej.
Megathyrsus (Pilg.) B.K.Simon & S.W.L.Jacobs
Agropyron trachycaulum (Link) Steud.
Phaseolus anisotrichos Schltdl.
Loeflingia squarrosa var. artemisiarum (Barneby & Twisselm.) Dorn
Astragalus applegatii M.Peck
Ageratina jucunda (Greene) Clewell & Wooton
Euphorbia martini Rouy
Oenothera rubricaulis Kleb.
Veronica ×andersonii Lindl. & Paxton
Mammillaria lindsayi R.T.Craig
Pleroma urvilleanum (DC.) P.J.F.Guim. & Michelang.
Ferocactus tiburonensis (G.E.Linds.) Backeb.
Echinopsis oxygona (Link) Zucc. ex Pfeiff. & Otto
Echinocereus scheeri subsp. paridensis W.Rischer & Trocha
Brahea nitida Lind, 1889
Aria edulis (Willd.) M.Roem.
Phoenix roebelenii O'Brien
Persicaria orientalis (L.) Spach
Ipomoea carnea Jacq.
Calochortus vestae Purdy
Apocynum venetum L.
Ferocactus peninsulae subsp. peninsulae
Hilaria ciliata (Scribn.) Nash
Polygala lindheimeri A.Gray
Ceanothus divergens var. divergens
Kleinia articulata (L.fil.) Haw.
Geissois Labill.
Lupinus orcuttii S.Watson
Filago L.
Larrea divaricata var. arenaria (L.D.Benson) Felger
Gomphrena decumbens Jacq.
Fouquieria splendens f. splendens
Houstonia asperuloides var. brandegeeana (Rose) Wiggins
Hyoscyamus L.
Bursera ariensis (Kunth) Mc Vaugh & Rzed.
Triumfetta L.
Melilotus albus Desr.
Nemacladus glanduliferus var. australis (Munz) McVaugh
Lantana macropoda Torr.
Coccoloba barbadensis Jacq.
Croton morifolius Willd.
Horkelia fusca subsp. fusca
Tamarix aralensis Bunge
Jasminum L.
Sanguinaria canadensis L.
Vetiveria zizanioides (L.) Nash
Dioscorea opposita Thunb.
Uncaria Schreb.
Pinellia ternata (Thunb.) Breitenb.
Belladona Mill.
Potentilla rubida L.O.Williams
Aeschynomene pinetorum Brandegee
Oncidium ascendens Lindl.
Gaudichaudia Kunth
Brachistus stramonifolius (Kunth) Miers
Armeniaca Mill., 1768
Phaedranthus buccinatorius (DC.) Miers
Clematis chinensis Osbeck
Fagonia californica var. californica
Artemisia anomala S.Moore
Myristica fragrans Houtt.
Vicia cracca Benth.
Saccharum officinarum L.
Silene verecunda var. platyota (S.Watson) Jeps.
Opuntia maxonii J.G.Ortega
Matelea quercetorum (Standl.) W.D.Stevens
Tinospora sinensis (Lour.) Merr.
Cotyledon linearis Greene
Holographis virgata var. virgata
Carduus nutans subsp. nutans
Carex invisa L.H.Bailey
Ipomoea trichocarpa Elliott
Stenocereus (A.Berger) Riccob.
Stevia puricana B.L.Turner
Lupinus sericeus J.G.Cooper
Livistona chinensis (Jacq.) R.Br., 1810
Myrtillocactus geometrizans Console
Ziziphus sativa Gaertn.
Ratibida latipalearis E.L.Richards
Triticum polonicum L.
Tragia scandens L.
Sphaeralcea arida Rose
Sideroxylon palmeri (Rose) T.D.Penn.
Chromolaena odorata (L.) R.King & H.Rob.
Triantha occidentalis subsp. montana (C.L.Hitchc.) Packer
Impatiens bicolor Hook.f.
Dipteryx odorata (Aubl.) Willd.
Euphorbia ingens E.Mey. ex Boiss.
Acalypha microphylla var. microphylla
Hypericum patulum var. henryi Veitch ex Bean
Albizia tomentosa (Micheli) Standl.
Quercus infectoria G.Olivier
Gilia pusilla Benth.
Mesosphaerum urticoides (Kunth) Kuntze
Dicoria Torr. & A.Gray
Lozanella enantiophylla (Donn.Sm.) Killip & Morton
Oreocarya revealii W.A.Weber & R.C.Wittmann
Fraxinus velutina var. toumeyi (Britton) Rehder
Ipomoea gentryi Standl.
Indigofera argentata I.M.Johnst.
Rhoicissus rhomboidea (E.Mey. ex Harv.) Planch.
Ericameria arborescens subsp. parishii (Greene) Urbatsch
Glycyrrhiza uralensis Fisch. ex DC.
Ipomoea temascaltepecensis Wilkin
Melothria scabra Naudin
Sphaeralcea coulteri var. californica (Rose) Kearney
Chromolaena glaberrima (DC.) R.King & H.Rob.
Drymaria arenarioides subsp. arenarioides
Piper cubeba L.fil.
Eremosis palmeri (Rose) Gleason
Hordeum marinum subsp. gussoneanum (Parl.) Anghel & Velican
Thlaspi alpestre L.
Astragalus bicarinatus Steud.
Acacia catechu (L.f.) Willd.
Abutilon coahuilae Kearney
Matricaria L.
Caesalpinia gracilis Miq.
Paspalum paucispicatum Vasey
Forestiera rhamnifolia Griseb.
Poa serotina Ehrh. ex Hoffm.
Aloysia gratissima var. schulziae (Standl.) L.D.Benson
Quercus gambelii Liebm.
Halimiocistus Janch.
Oplismenus burmanni var. nudicaulis (Vasey) McVaugh
Ranunculus montigenitus L.D.Benson
Brongniartia Kunth
Cissus verticillata subsp. verticillata
Zingiber officinale Roscoe
Pueraria DC.
Drymaria gentryi Fosberg
Tephrosia cinerea (L.) Pers.
Langloisia punctata A.Heller
Swida pubescens Standl.
Gentiana catesbaei Walter
Seriphidium canum subsp. bolanderi (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Minuartia pungens (Lag.) Mattf.
Amsinckia papillata Suksd.
Ribes villosum Nutt.
Gilia lanata (Lindl.) Walp.
Astephanus utahensis Engelm.
Cylindropuntia imbricata var. imbricata
Croton argyranthemus Michx.
Eriophyllum pedunculatum A.Heller
Layia chrysanthemoides subsp. maritima D.D.Keck
Sedum chihuahuense S.Watson
Asclepias tomentosa Elliott
Vaccinium confertum Kunth
Rorippa officinalis (R.Br.) P.Royen
Lupinus stiveri Kellogg
Veronica alpina L.
Noccaea parviflora (A.Nelson) Holub
Thelypodium palmeri Rydb.
Cynanchum barbigerum (Scheele) Shinners
Wolffia oblonga (Phil.) Hegelm.
Arbutus petiolaris Kunth
Vincetoxicum N.M.Wolf
Asclepias feayi Chapm. ex A.Gray
Elymus strigatus H.St.John
Agastache cusickii var. parva Cronquist
Asclepias rubra L.
Cryptantha muriculata (A.DC.) Greene
Luzula multiflora var. multiflora
Asclepias arenaria Torr.
Asclepias incarnata var. pulchra (Ehrh. ex Willd.) Pers.
Asclepias viridiflora var. lanceolata (Ives) Torr.
Lemna gibba Weber ex Mert. & W.D.J.Koch, 1823
Wolffia lingulata Hegelm.
Euphorbia wulfenii Hoppe, 1829
Ribes mariposanum Congdon
Ericameria linearis (Rydb.) R.P.Roberts & Urbatsch
Echinocactus polyancistrus Engelm. & Bigelow
Amsonia pogonosepala Woodson
Aruncus dioicus var. vulgaris (Maxim.) H.Hara
Croton pringlei S.Watson
Ceropegia woodii Schltr.
Comarostaphylis oaxacana (DC.) Klotzsch
Boisduvalia parviflora A.Heller
Mimulus ampliatus A.L.Grant
Asclepias latifolia Britton
Jatropha dioica var. graminea McVaugh
Astragalus reclinatus Cronquist
Holocarpha obconica subsp. autumnalis D.D.Keck
Juglans hindsii (Jeps.) Jeps.
Marsdenia R.Br.
Cotyledon parviflora Hemsl.
Periploca graeca L.
Euphorbia montana Engelm.
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. macrocarpum (A.Gray) Reveal
Amsonia ciliata Walter
Convolvulus villosus A.Gray
Eriophyllum lanatum subsp. lanatum
Asclepias humistrata Walter
Bromus scoparius L.
Pyrola americana Sweet
Ribes aridum Greene
Lactuca graminifolia var. mexicana McVaugh
Thymophylla anomala (Canby & Rose) Rydb.
Castilleja tenuiflora var. tenuiflora
Androsace occidentalis var. arizonica (A.Gray) H.St.John
Brongniartia nudiflora S.Watson
Conoclinium greggii (A.Gray) Small
Nolina texana S.Watson
Lycium berlandieri var. parviflorum (A.Gray) A.Terracc.
Salvia townsendii Fernald
Artemisia pringlei Greenm.
Salix exilifolia Dorn
Fraxinus velutina var. glabrata Lingelsh.
Cuphea leptopoda Hemsl.
Centaurium calycosum var. arizonicum (A.Gray) Tidestr.
Lygodesmia ramosissima Greene
Aloysia gratissima var. schulziana (Moldenke) Botta
Juncus tenuis var. dichotomus (Elliott) Alph.Wood
Acacia penicillata Standl.
Coursetia pumila (Rose) Lavin
Peniocereus greggii var. greggii
Buddleja parvifolia Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Carlowrightia texana Henrickson & T.F.Daniel
Urtica dioica var. gracilis (Aiton) R.L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Aloysia lycioides Cham.
Sphaeralcea polychroma La Duke
Vallesia glabra var. glabra
Euphorbia velleriflora (Klotzsch & Garcke) Boiss.
Sida physocalyx F.Muell.
Adenophyllum cancellatum (Cass.) Villarreal
Melampodium moctezumum B.L.Turner
Thamnosma texana var. purpurea (Wooton & Standl.) L.P.Woodruff
Anisacanthus wrightii (Torr.) Gray
Mammillaria saboae subsp. goldii (Glass & R.A.Foster) D.R.Hunt
Echinocereus pseudopectinatus (N.P.Taylor) N.P.Taylor
Panicum hirticaule var. verrucosum Zuloaga & Morrone
Kallstroemia hirsutissima Vail
Thelesperma megapotamicum var. megapotamicum
Halimolobos pubens (A.Gray) Al-Shehbaz & C.D.Bailey
Hordeum aegiceras Nees ex Royle
Juncus ebracteatus E.Mey.
Alopecurus carolinianus Spreng.
Glaucium corniculatum subsp. corniculatum
Digitaria patens (Swallen) Henrard
Fendlera rupicola var. wrightii A.Gray
Nothoscordum bivalve var. bivalve
Condalia sonorae Henrickson
Nemastylis tenuis var. tenuis
Panicum hallii var. hallii
Waltheria rotundifolia Schrank
Mortonia sempervirens subsp. scabrella (A.Gray) Prigge
Rhamnus betulifolia var. betulifolia
Metastelma mexicanum (Brandegee) Fishbein & R.A.Levin
Viguiera cordifolia var. cordifolia
Cuscuta tinctoria Mart. ex Engelm.
Operculina pinnatifida (Kunth) O'Donell
Mammillaria heyderi var. bullingtoniana Castetter, Pierce & K.H.Schwer.
Asclepias suberosa Roxb.
Bouteloua rigidiseta (Steud.) Hitchc.
Evolvulus sericeus var. discolor (Benth.) Gray
Cyperus uniflorus Torr. & Hook.
Buddleja scordioides Kunth
Penstemon campanulatus subsp. subglandulosus (S.S.White) Straw
Gnaphalium sonorae I.M.Johnst.
Muhlenbergia distans Swallen
Pedicularis thompsonii Pennell
Lyrocarpa coulteri var. typica Rollins
Schoenoplectus lacustris (L.) Palla
Eucalyptus rostrata Schltdl.
Celastraceae
Quercus dunnii Kellogg ex Curran
Ranunculus natans C.A.Mey.
Serjania sonorensis (S.Watson) Ferrucci & V.W.Steinm.
Deyeuxia pringlei Scribn. ex Beal
Trollius laxus subsp. laxus
Metalasia muricata (L.) D.Don
Franseria bipinnatifida (Nutt.) A.Gray
Parentucellia viscosa Edwall
Cercis canadensis var. texensis (S.Watson) M.Hopkins
Salix lucida subsp. lasiandra (Benth.) Argus
Schoenoplectus mucronatus Linnaeus, 1753
Leontodon saxatilis (Ten.) Rchb.
Hackelia gracilenta (Eastw.) I.M.Johnst.
Lappula cenchrusoides A.Nelson
Taraxacum angustifolium Greene
Oxytropis multiceps Nutt.
Astragalus parryi A.Gray
Spraguea multiceps Howell
Oryzopsis contracta (B.L.Johnson) Schltr.
Artemisia laciniata subsp. parryi (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Zigadenus paniculatus var. gramineus (Rydb.) Ackerf.
Solidago nemoralis var. longipetiolata (Mack. & Bush) E.J.Palmer & Steyerm.
Sporobolus heterolepis (A.Gray) A.Gray
Eremogone capillaris var. capillaris
Lesquerella occidentalis subsp. cinerascens (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) Rollins & E.A.Shaw
Lesquerella subumbellata Rollins
Draba porsildii G.A.Mulligan
Packera dimorphophylla (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Tonestus pygmaeus (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Nelson
Mentzelia humilis var. humilis
Eriastrum brandegeae Mason
Cycladenia Benth.
Astragalus debequaeus S.L.Welsh
Penstemon osterhoutii Pennell
Oenothera latifolia (Rydb.) Munz
Lomatium orientale J.M.Coult. & Rose
Physaria integrifolia (Rollins) Lichvar
Androsace chamaejasme subsp. lehmanniana (Spreng.) Hultén
Oreoxis alpina (A.Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eriogonum cronquistii Reveal
Arenaria congesta var. lithophila (Rydb.) Maguire
Carex magellanica subsp. irrigua (Wahlenb.) Hultén
Cuscuta cuspidata Engelm. & Gray
Anthoxanthum monticola subsp. alpinum (Sw. ex Willd.) Soreng
Oenothera minor (A.Nelson) Munz
Penstemon buckleyi Pennell
Tonestus kingii var. barnebyana (Welsh & Goodrich) G.L.Nesom
Synthyris wyomingensis (A.Nelson) A.Heller
Mulgedium oblongifolium (Nutt.) Reveal
Salix myricoides Muhl.
Ipomopsis spicata subsp. orchidacea (Brand) Wilken & R.L.Hartm.
Ipomopsis spicata var. cephaloidea (Rydb.) Wilken & R.L.Hartm.
Lathyrus vestitus subsp. ochropetalus (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Lathyrus polyphyllus Torr. & A.Gray
Cercocarpus ledifolius Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Betula utahensis Britton
Quercus garryana var. fruticosa (Engelm.) Govaerts
Ipomopsis gloriosa (Brandegee) A.D.Grant
Amelanchier laevis Wiegand
Streptopus amplexifolius var. amplexifolius
Cassiope tetragona var. saximontana (Small) C.L.Hitchc.
Dalea frutescens A.Gray
Ceanothus masonii Mc Minn
Eurybia wasatchensis (M.E.Jones) G.L.Nesom
Bidens beckii Torr.
Malacothamnus involucratus (B.L.Rob.) K.Morse
Livistona drudei F.Muell. ex Drude
Odontites vulgaris Moench
Kalmia microphylla var. microphylla
Brassica oleracea var. oleracea
Hottonia palustris L.
Ipomoea corymbosa (L.) Roth
Micranthes lyallii subsp. hultenii (Calder & Savile) Elven & D.F.Murray
Trifolium subterraneum subsp. oxaloides Bunge ex Nyman
Dodonaea viscosa subsp. angustifolia (L.fil.) J.G.West
Streptanthus insignis subsp. insignis
Alisma plantago-aquatica subsp. plantago-aquatica
Acacia verticillata subsp. ovoidea (Benth.) Court
Urochloa panicoides var. panicoides
Petasites Mill.
Schoenus L.
Eleocharis palustris subsp. palustris
Impatiens ecalcarata Collett & Hemsl.
Poa chambersii Soreng
Symphyotrichum subulatum var. subulatum
Mariosousa heterophylla (Benth.) Seigler & Ebinger
Plagiobothrys figuratus subsp. figuratus
Veronica wormskjoldii subsp. wormskjoldii
Ornithopus pusillus Lepech.
Senecio subnudus DC.
Monerma cylindrica (Willd.) Coss. & Durieu
Helianthemum suffrutescens Schreib.
Ayenia truncata Rose
Saxifraga bronchialis subsp. funstonii (Small) Hultén
Palafoxia Lag.
Sonchus palmensis (Sch.Bip.) Boulos
Flourensia laurifolia DC.
Tridens Roem. & Schult.
Dodecatheon clevelandii var. patulum (Greene) Reveal
Calamagrostis emodensis Griseb.
Mimulus tilingii var. caespitosus (Greene) A.L.Grant
Senecio inaequidens DC.
Andromeda polifolia var. latifolia Lodd., 1821
Eragrostis intermedia var. oreophila (L.H.Harv.) Withersp.
Tithonia palmeri Rose
Phippsia algida (Sol.) R.Br.
Physostegia nuttallii (Britton) Fassett
Porophyllum tridentatum var. tridentatum
Brickellia diffusa M.E.Jones
Mimulus moniliformis Greene
Physalis hirsuta M.Martens & Galeotti
Linanthus androsaceus subsp. androsaceus
Alvordia fruticosa Brandegee
Portulaca oleracea var. granulatostellulata Poelln.
Lantana notha Moldenke
Impatiens L.
Sidalcea elegans Greene
Casuarina monilifera L.A.S.Johnson
Lotus crassifolius var. subglaber (Ottley) C.L.Hitchc.
Acacia senegal (L.) Willd.
Nepenthes L.
Metastelma watsonianum Standl.
Helianthella uniflora subsp. uniflora
Perityle plumigera Harv. & Gray ex A.Gray
Aizoaceae
Caesalpinia gilliesii (Wall. ex Hook.) Benth.
Erysimum wheeleri Rothr.
Lomandra spicata A.T.Lee
Strychnos nux-vomica L.
Ligusticum levisticum L.
Elytrigia repens (L.) Desv. ex B.D.Jacks.
Evolvulus filipes Mart.
Mirabilis laevis var. cedrosensis (Standl.) Munz
Koeberlinia Zucc.
Hepatica Mill.
Ribes campanulatum Moench
Eriogonum atrorubens var. atrorubens
Phyllanthus viridis M.E.Jones
Cistanthe parryi var. arizonica (J.T.Howell) Kartesz & Gandhi
Curculigo orchioides Gaertn.
Piper longum L.
Taxillus chinensis (DC.) Danser
Leymus simplex (Scribn. & T.A.Williams) D.R.Dewey
Poa buckleyana Nash
Scilla hispanica Mill.
Sphinctospermum Rose
Gossampinus Buch.-Ham.
Penstemon gentryi Standl.
Horsfordia purissimae Brandegee
Menodora Bonpl.
Ranunculus adoneus var. alpinus (S.Watson) L.D.Benson
Oenothera caespitosa Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.
Smilacina racemosa var. racemosa
Morus celtidifolia Kunth
Imperata cylindrica (L.) Raeusch.
Diodia L.
Hypericum pauciflorum Kunth
Pinaropappus roseus subsp. roseus
Epidendrum ibaguense Kunth
Encyclia ovulum (Lindl.) Schltr.
Persicaria scabra (Moench) Moldenke
Quercus turbinella var. turbinella
Opuntia pycnantha Engelm.
Chrysothamnus parryi var. attenuatus (M.E.Jones) Kittell
Kleinia repens L.
Fritillaria verticillata Willd.
Eriogonum foliosum var. hastatum (Wiggins) Reveal
Changium smyrnioides H.Wolff
Amomum Roxb.
Oroxylum Vent.
Combretum fruticosum (Loefl.) Stuntz
Poa laeviculmis T.A.Williams
Machaeranthera gentryi (Standl.) Jackson ex B.L.Turner
Cimicifuga racemosa (L.) Nutt.
Chloris elegans Kunth
Drimys granadensis L.fil.
Dasyochloa Willd. ex Steud., 1840
Citrus maxima (Burm.) Merr.
Taraxacum scopulorum (A.Gray) Rydb.
Castilleja stenophylla M.E.Jones
Ensete ventricosum (Welw.) Cheesman
Mesembryanthemum edule L.
Dioscorea villosa L.
Oryza glutinosa Lour.
Dictamnus dasycarpus Turcz.
Periploca L.
Cuphea lobophora var. occidentalis S.A.Graham
Stachys officinalis (L.) Trevis. ex Briq.
Delphinium parryi f. maritimum (Davidson) Ewan
Carex oederi Ehrh.
Vallesia aurantiaca (M.Martens & Galeotti) J.F.Morales
Lupinus leucopsis var. mollis (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Poa tenuifolia Buckley
Primula conjugens var. conjugens
Benincasa Savi
Teloxys cornuta Torr.
Physalis filipendula Brandegee
Mitella stenopetala Piper
Jacquemontia albida Wiggins & Rollins
Panicum pampinosum Hitchc. & Chase
Cantinoa mutabilis (Rich.) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Aster chilensis var. medius Jeps.
Styrax benzoin Dryand.
Barroetea A.Gray
Stipa arnowiae S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Akebia trifoliata var. australis (Diels) Rehder
Jateorhiza Miers
Gaultheria odorata Bredem. ex Willd.
Porophyllum filiforme Rydb.
Hesperolinon sharsmithiae R.O'Donnell
Hoffmanseggia glauca (Ortega) Eifert
Asclepias pumila (Gray) Vail
Tephrosia rhodantha Brandegee
Psilocarphus globifer Nutt.
Scirpus sylvaticus L.
Zanthoxylum ciliatum Engl.
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. cusickii (Greene) Reveal
Pithecollobium dulce (Roxb.) Benth.
Triglochin Riv. ex L.
Eriogonum parvifolium subsp. paynei C.B.Wolf ex Munz
Amblyopappus Hook. & Arn.
Doellingeria breweri (A.Gray) Semple, Brouillet & G.A.Allen
Mentha gracilis Sole
Corallorrhiza mertensiana Bong.
Tropidocarpum gracile var. scabriusculum (Hook.) Greene
Grindelia camporum var. abbreviata Steyerm.
Hieracium griseum (Norrl.) Norrl.
Petalostemon purpureus (Vent.) Rydb.
Agrostis longiligula Hitchc.
Diplacus ×lompocensis Mc Minn
Bromus sitchensis var. maritimus (Piper) Otting & R.E.Brainerd
Aster tanacetifolius Kunth
Gentiana strictiflora (Rydb.) A.Nelson
Simpsonanthus jonesii (A.Gray) Guilliams, Hasenstab & B.G.Baldwin
Acmispon glabrus (Vogel) Brouillet
Erodium L'Hér. ex Aiton
Lonicera Adans.
Agave desmetiana Jacobi
Asparagus tenuifolius Lam.
Erythranthe inflatula (Suksd.) G.L.Nesom
Gamochaeta antillanum (Urb.) Anderb.
Arisaema dracontium (L.) Schott
Achillea millefolium subsp. rosea (Desf.) Torr. & A.Gray
Pistacia khinjuk Stocks ex Stocks
Lepechinia Willd.
Koelreuteria formosana Hayata
Sapindus rarak DC.
Pyracantha yunnanensis (Vilm.) Chitt.
Cotoneaster amoenus E.H.Wilson
Extriplex E.H.Zacharias
Alphitonia excelsa (Fenzl) Benth.
Veronica maritima L.
Hasseanthus nesioticus Moran
Thymus pectinatus Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Teucrium betonicum L'Hér.
Ligustrum quihoui Carrière
Hyssopus officinalis L.
Lavandula vera DC.
Mentha requienii Benth.
Quercus acutissima Carruth.
Salvia horminum L.
Castanopsis indica (Roxb. ex Lindl.) A.DC.
Lupinus hartwegii Lindl.
Nepeta mussinii Spreng. ex Henckel
Westringia rosmariniformis Sm.
Arabis albida Steven
Cryptantha torreyana var. torreyana
Brassica petsai (Lour.) L.H.Bailey
Cytisus perezii Hutch.
Erica stricta Donn.
Opuntia echios Howell
Heliophila pilosa Lam.
Convolvulus japonicus Thunb.
Verbesina crocata (Cav.) Less.
Ammobium alatum R.Br.
Aconitum howellii A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Argemone platyceras var. hispida (A.Gray) Prain
Mentzelia albicaulis var. gracilis (Rydb.) J.Darl.
Gambelia Nutt.
Trixis P.Browne, 1756
Artemisia norvegica var. saxatilis (H.M.Hall & Clem.) Jeps.
Haplopappus tenuisectus (Greene) S.F.Blake
Malacothrix junakii W.S.Davis
Malacothrix foliosa subsp. crispifolia W.S.Davis
Triteleia ixioides var. anilina (Greene) Hoover
Aster cichoriaceus (Greene) S.F.Blake
Geum ciliatum Pursh
Quercus moreha Trel.
Smithiastrum M.R.Morin, 2020
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. glandulosa
Purshia DC. ex Poir.
Solidago canadensis subsp. scabra Torr. & Gray
Centaurea cineraria Pall.
Sonchus tenerrimus Schur
Plantago afra L.
Senecio monoensis Greene
Campanula petiolata A.DC.
Constancea B.G.Baldwin
Acmispon glabrus var. brevialatus (Ottley) Brouillet
Callistemon rugulosus (Link) DC.
Cissus incisa (Nuttall) Des Moulins, 1862
Koelreuteria henryi Dümmer
Harpullia pendula Planch. ex F.Muell.
Clematis dioscoreifolia var. robusta (Carrière) Rehder
Sporobolus capensis Kunth
Asarina Mill.
Bromus haenkeanus (J.Presl) Kunth
Fraxinus malacophylla Hemsl.
Cytisus filipes Webb
Erica L.
Lepachys columnaris (Sims) Torr. & A.Gray
Rhus javanica L.
Navarretia divaricata var. vividior Jeps. & V.L.Bailey
Centunculus L.
Oligomeris Cambess.
Hordeum geniculatum M.Bieb., 1808
Malvastrum A.Gray
Aster adenolepis S.F.Blake
Solidago ciliosa Greene
Malacothrix squalida Greene
Linaria linaria (L.) H.Karst.
Collomia macrocalyx Leiberg ex Brand
Sonnea hispida (A.Gray) Greene
Bebbia Greene
Centromadia Greene
Holodiscus saxicola A.Heller
Piptatherum miliaceum subsp. miliaceum
Ancistrocarphus A.Gray
Ulmus campestris L.
Achillea tomentosa L.
Ulmus carpinifolia Borkh.
Salix babylonica var. crispa Loudon
Sedella Britton & Rose
Micropus L.
Raphiolepis Lindl.
Cotoneaster parneyi R.Hoyt
Clematis flammula L.
Ceanothus ×veitchianus Hook.
Ceanothus ×pallidus Lindl.
Gilia grandiflora (Douglas ex Lindl.) A.Gray
Primulaceae
Hebe carnea A.Wall
Stachys olympica Poir.
Plantago purpusii Brandegee
Olea chrysophylla Lam.
Diospyros cargillia F.Muell.
Echium giganteum L.fil.
Alnus nepalensis D.Don
Helianthus scaberrimus Elliott
Ilex vomitoria Sol. ex Aiton
Rhus verniciflua Stokes
Coreopsis basalis (Otto & A.Dietr.) S.F.Blake
Leucaena pulverulenta Benth.
Penstemon jamesii subsp. ophianthus (Pennell) D.D.Keck
Eriogonum bakeri Greene
Osmadenia Nutt.
Acanthoscyphus parishii var. abramsii (E.A.Mc Gregor) Reveal
Erythranthe hardhamiae N.S.Fraga
Sida hastata A.St.-Hil.
Nasturtium occidentale Greene
Chorizanthe blakleyi Hardham
Triteleia ixioides var. cookii Hoover
Acacia macracantha Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Hofmeisteria Walp.
Aster andersonii (A.Gray) A.Gray
Ayenia reflexa Brandegee
Lutkea Steud.
Goodyera decipiens (Hook.) F.T.Hubb.
Eriogonum simpsonii Benth.
Trifolium longipes subsp. oreganum (Howell) J.M.Gillett
Streptanthus tortuosus var. pallidus Jeps.
Agave lecheguilla Torr.
Yucca elephantipes Regel ex Trel.
Furcraea roezlii André
Asparagus acutifolius L.
Viola cornuta L.
Alectryon tomentosus (F.Muell.) Radlk.
Rosa omeiensis Rolfe
Prunus cerasifera var. pissardii (Carrière) L.H.Bailey
Pyracantha formosana Kaneh.
Penstemon wrightii Hook.
Hebe macroura (Hook.fil. ex Benth.) Cockayne & Allan
Coccoloba P.Browne
Monardella australis subsp. occidentalis Elvin, R.A.Burgess & A.C.Sanders
Ligustrum amurense Carrière
Hauya ruacophila Donn.Sm. & Rose
Origanum dictamnus L.
Iris susiana L.
Salvia longistyla Benth.
Pycnostachys dawei N.E.Br.
Tulipa persica (Lindl.) Sweet
Cytiscus racemosus
Malacothrix incana var. succulenta (Elmer) E.W.Williams, 1957
Artemisia arborescens L.
Tuctoria mucronata (Crampton) Reeder
Streptanthus tortuosus var. oblongus Jeps.
Angelica lineariloba var. culbertsonii Jeps.
Dudleya gnoma S.W.McCabe
Machaerocereus Britton & Rose
Dyssodia pentachaeta subsp. pentachaeta
Galium glabrescens subsp. harticum Dempster & Ehrend.
Hesperocnide Torr.
Malaxis monophyllos subsp. brachypoda (A.Gray) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Aira elegans Willd. ex Kunth
Cordyline stricta (Sims) Endl.
Asparagus sprengeri Regel
Caladium macrophyllum Lem.
Ulmus pumila var. arborea Litv.
Lithraea caustica Hook. & Arn.
Diplopeltis huegelii Endl.
Triplaris americana L.
Vauquelinia pauciflora Standl.
Filipendula hexapetala Gilib. ex Maxim.
Ceanothus papillosus var. regius Jeps.
Ceanothus thyrsiflorus var. repens McMinn
Linaria origanifolia (L.) Cav.
Veronica traversii Hook.fil.
Rheum rhaponticum L.
Ipomopsis multiflora subsp. whitingii (Kearney & Peebles) Wilken
Ligustrum delavayanum Har.
Ligustrum coriaceum W.Bull
Gossypium sturtianum J.H.Willis
Tulipa cornuta Redouté
Lappula arida Piper
Anchusa capensis Thunb.
Cryptantha clevelandii var. brandegeei (I.M.Johnst.) Brand
Eriogonum baratum Elmer
Doellingeria tomentella (Greene) Semple, Brouillet & G.A.Allen
Iberis Dill. ex L.
Epilobium canum subsp. mexicanum (C.Presl) P.H.Raven
Amsinckia spectabilis var. nicolai (Jeps.) Munz
Cordylanthus tenuifolius Pennell
Medusa Lour.
Spergularia alata Wiegand
Senecio fastigiatus var. layneae (Greene) A.Gray
Linanthus pygmaeus subsp. pygmaeus
Penstemon antirrhinoides var. microphyllus (A.Gray) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Mycroseris Hook. & Arn., 1836
Catapodium Link
Stebbinsoseris K.L.Chambers
Cirsium clavatum var. clavatum
Ditaxis Vahl ex A.Juss.
Goodyera menziesii Lindl.
Opuntia stanlyi var. wrightiana (E.M.Baxter) L.D.Benson
Lilaea Bonpl.
Cordyline Comm. ex R.Br.
Pleiogynium solandri (Benth.) Engl.
Pistacia terebinthus L.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. costafolia Bartel & Shevock
Dodonaea microzyga F.Muell.
Rubus ellipticus Sm.
Heteromeles M.Roem.
Fagopyrum sagittatum Gilib.
Colletia cruciata Gillies & Hook.
Macleaya cordata (Willd.) R.Br.
Veronica latifolia L.
Hasseanthus blochmaniae subsp. insularis (Moran) Moran
Crocanthemum Spach
Oenothera acaulis Cav.
Oenothera missouriensis Sims
Lopezia lineata Zucc.
Salvia columbariae var. argillacea S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Quercus hybrida Small
Erica subdivaricata P.J.Bergius
Silphium perfoliatum L.
Camissonia lacustris Raven
Agrostis clivicola var. punta-reyesensis Crampton
Bromus vulgaris var. vulgaris
Carlowrightia sinaloensis Leonard & Gentry
Robinia neomexicana var. luxurians Dieck
Polygonum newberryi Small
Cassia biflora Mill.
Acaena californica Bitter
Centaureum Ruppius
Viburnum japonicum (Thunb.) Spreng.
Liquidambar orientalis Mill.
Euphorbia regis-jubae Webb & Berthel.
Anthurium Schott
Apiastrum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Pistacia weinmannifolia J.Poiss. ex Franch.
Kigelia africana (Lam.) Benth.
Dodonaea thunbergiana Eckl. & Zeyh.
Rhaphiolepis delacourii André
Prunus cerasifera var. atropurpurea H.Jaeger, 1884
Cotoneaster rotundifolius Wall. ex Lindl.
Thalictrum speciosissimum L.
Ceanothus ×lobbianus Hook.
Colletia ephedra Vent.
Tetradenia riparia (Hochst.) Codd
Lavandula multifida L.
Iris ochroleuca L.
Satureja alpina (L.) Scheele
Helianthus strumosus L.
Stephanomeria exigua var. coronaria (Greene) Jeps.
Agropogon littoralis C.E.Hubb.
Poa douglasii subsp. macrantha (Vasey) Keck
Caucalis L.
Salix lasiolepis var. bracelinae C.R.Ball
Hesperevax (A.Gray) A.Gray
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. typicum C.L.Hitchc.
Nitrophila S.Watson
Dirca L.
Salvia dorrii subsp. carnosa (Douglas ex Greene) Abrams
Geraea Torr. & A.Gray
Quercus wislizeni subsp. frutescens (Engelm.) A.E.Murray
Descurainia pinnata subsp. paradisa (A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.) Detling
Scirpus chilensis var. longisetis (Kük.) Beetle
Tessaria sericea (Nutt.) Shinners
Harpagonella A.Gray
Cordyline terminalis var. cannifolia (R.Br.) Benth.
Alpinia speciosa (Blume) D.Dietr.
Salix babylonica var. annularis Asch.
Raphiolepis ×delacourii
Pyracantha crenulata subsp. yunnanensis Vilm.
Hagenia abyssinica (Bruce) J.F.Gmel.
Polygonum amplexicaule D.Don
Iris tingitana Boiss. & Reut.
Salacca Reinw.
Quercus glandulifera Blume
Betula verrucosa Ehrh.
Gomphocarpus R.Br.
Pleuropogon R.Br.
Viola primulifolia subsp. occidentalis (A.Gray) L.E.Mc Kinney & R.J.Little
Spergula L.
Viola adunca var. glabra Brainerd
Lupinus concinnus var. pallidus C.P.Sm.
Argemone hispida A.Gray
Lophochlaena refracta A.Gray
Sibara Greene
Aphanisma Nutt. ex Moq.
Agave striata Zucc.
Agave fourcroydes Lem.
Furcraea selloa K.Koch
Ulmus davidiana var. japonica (Rehder) Nakai
Brodiaea bridgesii S.Watson
Uropappus Nutt.
Dodonaea madagascariensis Radlk.
Rosa moschata Herrm.
Salix hookerana Barratt ex Hook.
Pyracantha crenulata var. yunnanensis M.Vilm. ex Mottet
Prunus cerasoides D.Don
Cotoneaster taitoensis Hayata
Chaenomeles sinensis (Thouin) Koehne
Ceanothus ×mendocinensis Mc Minn
Primula obconica Hance
Veronica spicata L.
Oenothera lamarckiana Ser.
Ligustrum massalongianum Vis.
Salvia patens Cav.
Erica ciliaris L.
Geranium lucidium L.
Hordeum gussoneanum Parl.
Asarina antirrhiniflora (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Pennell
Coriandrum L.
Pleuropogon davyi L.D.Benson
Thryallis angustifolia (Benth.) Kuntze
Allium lacunosum var. kernense McNeal & Ownbey
Euphorbia lamarckii Sweet
Stipa occidentalis var. minor (Vasey) C.L.Hitchc.
Monotropa latisquama (Rydb.) Hultén
Poa bolanderi subsp. howellii (Vasey & Scribner) Keck
Panicum agrostoides Spreng.
Mentzelia pumila var. integra (M.E.Jones) Kearney
Jepsonia Small
Agave atrovirens Karw. ex Salm-Dyck
Pterostegia Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Dovyalis E.Mey. ex Arn.
Xylosma senticosum Hance
Sapindaceae
Sapindus mukorossi Gaertn.
Margyricarpus setosus Ruiz & Pav.
Crataegus oxyacantha L.
Ranunculus montanus Willd.
Muehlenbeckia chilensis Meisn.
Noltea africana (L.) Rchb.fil. ex Harv. & Sond.
Cyclamen indicum L.
Primula polyantha Mill.
Digitalis lanata Ehrh.
Oenothera speciosa var. childsii (L.H.Bailey) Munz
Colquhounia vestita Wall.
Quercus hemisphaerica W.Bartram ex Willd.
Erica verticillata P.J.Bergius
Erysimum perofskianum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Mertensia laevigata Piper
Artemisia albula Wooton
Rhodiola L.
Piperia elegans subsp. elegans
Ribes malvaceum var. clementinum Dunkle
Panicum fasciculatum var. reticulatum (Torr.) Beal
Aster adscendens (DC.) Reiche
Astragalus pachycarpus Torr. & A.Gray
Rhaphiolepis Lindl.
Xylorhiza Nutt.
Crataegus arnoldiana Sarg.
Ipomopsis congesta var. viridis (Cronquist) Reveal
Trollius chinensis Bunge
Teucrium lucidum L.
Coleus blumei Benth.
Quercus incana W.Bartram
Onosma tauricum Pall. ex Willd.
Sisymbrium ambiguum (S.Watson) Payson
Lonicera ×americana (Mill.) K.Koch
Asparagus myriocladus Baker
Polemonium humile Lindl.
Solidago velutina subsp. califonica (Nutt.) Semple
Juncaceae
Mimetanthe Greene
Sideroxylon L.
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides subsp. cheiranthoides
Penstemon rattanii var. minor A.Gray
Cordylanthus wrightii var. pauciflorus Kearney & Peebles
Fagonia L.
Eriogonum deflexum subsp. insigne (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Chrysothamnus pulcherrimus A.Nelson
Pholistoma Lilja
Sanguisorba L.
Euclea pseudebenus E.Mey. ex A.DC.
Acer laxiflorum Pax
Prunus communis (L.) Arcang.
Crataegus oxyacantha Thuill.
Eschscholzia caespitosa var. hypecoides (Benth.) A.Gray
Colletia ferox Gillies & Hook.
Ceanothus ovatus Desf.
Ceanothus jepsonii var. purpureus (Jeps.) Jeps.
Iris aurea Link
Salvia arborescens Urb. & Ekman
Onosma L.
Cytisus maderensis (Webb & Berthel.) Masf.
Helianthus debilis Nutt.
Coreopsis nuecensis A.Heller
Smilacina sessilifolia publ
Holodiscus dumosus var. cedrorus Raiche & Reveal
Ceanothus megacarpus var. pendulus McMinn
Acmispon argophyllus var. ornithopus (Greene) Brouillet
Lathyrus parvifolius S.Watson
Heuchera parvifolia var. arizonica Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Senecio millelobatus Rydb.
Agave decipiens Baker
Cordyline indivisa (G.Forst.) Endl.
Vitis sagittifolia M.A.Lawson
Pilea nummulariifolia (Sw.) Wedd.
Oreocarya virginiensis (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Salix cinerea L.
Dudleya cymosa subsp. gigantea (Rose) Moran
Uribea Dugand & Romero
Ranunculus repens var. pleniflorus Fernald
Primula sinensis Sabine ex Lindl.
Diplacus longiflorus var. rutilus (A.L.Grant) McMinn
Plecostachys Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Echinochloa crus-galli f. crus-galli
Salvia involucrata Cav.
Salvia discolor Kunth
Garrya longifolia Rose
Coreopsis pubescens Elliott
Rhus viminalis Aiton
Tetragonia L.
Pelargonium zonale (L.) L'Hér.
Arenaria saxosa var. cinerascens B.L.Rob.
Vagnera sessilifolia (Nutt. ex Baker) Greene
Juncus gerardi var. gerardi
Chrysothamnus greenei var. filifolius (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Pterospora Nutt.
Eriogonum giganteum subsp. formosum (K.Brandegee) P.H.Raven
Pedicularis surrecta Benth.
Opuntia acanthocarpa var. major (Engelm. & Bigelow) L.D.Benson
Dianthus plumarius L.
Eastwoodiella M.R.Morin, 2020
Athysanus Greene
Triodanis Raf. ex Greene
Androsace septentrionalis var. subulifera A.Gray
Ranunculus gormanii Greene
Apera spica-venti (L.) P.Beauv.
Asparagus crispus Lam.
Delphinium antoninum Eastw.
Cissus striata Ruiz & Pav.
Ulmus racemosa D.Thomas
Scutellaria austinae Eastw.
Crataegus lavallei Hort.Paris ex Sarg.
Ceanothus grandiflorus Dippel
Primula verticillata Forssk.
Hebe cupressoides (Hook.fil.) Andersen
Narcissus pseudonarcissus var. bicolor (L.) Willk. & Lange
Satureja mexicana (Benth.) Briq.
Rhododendron ×fragrantissimum Rollisson
Erica caffra L.
Lonicera pileata var. yunnanensis (Franch.) Bernd Schulz
Lepachys pinnata (Vent.) Torr. & A.Gray
Centaurea imperialis Hausskn. ex Bornm.
Lindernia anagallidea (Michx.) Pennell
Euphorbia palmeri var. subpubens (Engelm.) L.C.Wheeler
Corallorrhiza wisteriana Conrad
Panicum lassenianum Schmoll
Trifolium stenophyllum Nutt.
Collinsia torreyi var. linearis (A.Gray) Jeps.
Senecio stygius Greene
Asparagus laricinus Burch.
Viola tricolor var. hortensis DC.
Amorphophallus Blume ex Decne.
Erysimum franciscanum var. crassifolium Rossbach
Sorbaria aitchisonii Hemsl.
Caltha biflora subsp. howellii (Huth) Abrams
Primula malacoides Franch.
Penstemon ternatus Torr. ex Gray
Hebe hulkeana (F.Muell.) Andersen
Oenothera tetragona var. fraseri (Pursh) Munz
Leonotis laxifolia MacOwan
Quercus dumosa var. kinseliae C.H.Mull.
Salvia grandiflora Etl.
Gossypium stocksii Mast.
Rhododendron pudorinum Sleumer
Isatis glauca Aucher ex Boiss.
Anchusa L.
Solidago serotina Aiton
Arnica cordifolia subsp. cordifolia
Corallorrhiza striata Lindl.
Osmorhiza nuda Torr.
Funastrum E.Fourn.
Fritillaria roderickii W.Knight
Commelina erecta var. crispa (Wooton) E.J.Palmer & Steyerm.
Nymphoides indica (L.) Kuntze
Eriastrum pluriflorium (A.Heller) H.Mason
Berberis canadensis Mill.
Agave geminiflora (Tagl.) Ker Gawl.
Ampelopsis aconitifolia Bunge
Pistacia atlantica var. latifolia DC.
Tamarix tetrandra Pall. ex M.Bieb.
Medicago apiculata Willd.
Spiraea hypericifolia L.
Pyrus pulcherrima Asch. & Graebn.
Ipomopsis crebrifolia (Nutt.) Dorn
Anemone globosa (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt. ex Pritz.
Phytolacca L.
Iris florentina L.
Iris alata Poir.
Quercus laurifolia Michx.
Rudbeckia serotina Sw.
Lupinus moranii Dunkle
Potentilla ashlandica Greene
Cassia leptocarpa var. glaberrima M.E.Jones
Corallorrhiza bigelovii S.Watson
Festuca kingii (S.Watson) Scribn.
Agropyron trachycaulum var. trachycaulum
Rhus virens subsp. choriophylla (Wooton & Standl.) Young
Calyptridium parryi var. arizonicum J.T.Howell
Jatropha panduraefolia Andri
Orcuttia Vasey
Asclepias engelmanniana var. rusbyi (Vail) Kearney
Melampodium hispidum Kunth
Aster coerulescens DC.
Cordyline terminalis Kunth
Parthenocissus tricuspidata f. veitchii (Carriere) Rehder
Ulmus japonica (Rehder) Sarg.
Pyrus betulifolia Bunge
Rhamnus davurica Pall.
Rhamnus glandulosa Aiton
Ceanothus rigidus var. albus Roof
Bocconia L.
Ceanothus arboreus var. glaber Jeps.
Delphinium grandiflorum L.
Eriogonum racemosum var. desertorum S.Stokes
Eriogonum gracile var. cithariforme (S.Watson) Munz
Centrostegia Gray ex Benth.
Myriophyllum proserpinacoides Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.
Salvia tubifera Cav.
Tulipa sprengeri Baker
Schizopetalon walkeri Sims
Iberis amara L.
Elaeagnus pungens var. variegata Bean
Chimaphila occidentalis Rydb.
Linanthus nuttallii subsp. tenuilobus R.Patt.
Penstemon fruticosus var. douglasii (Hook.) C.K.Schneid.
? navarettia Ruiz & Pav.
Calochortus lobbii Purdy
Penstemon ovatus var. pinetorum Piper
Gayoides crispum (L.) Small
Lagophylla dichotoma subsp. minor D.D.Keck
Haplopappus greenei (A.Gray) A.Gray
Eriogonum fasciculatum subsp. flavoviride (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) S.Stokes
Dodecatheon pulchellum subsp. monanthum (Greene) H.J.Thomps. ex Munz
Aretia Haller ex L.
Ozomelis diversifolia (Greene) Rydb.
Ceanothus connivens Greene
Eriogonum azaleastrum Greene
Elliottia Muhl. ex Elliott
Trifolium depauperatum var. hydrophilum (Greene) J.S.Martin ex Isely
Astronium balansae Engl.
Lithraea gilliesii Griseb.
Olmediella Baill.
Briza minima G.Nicholson
Acer platanoides var. schwedleri G.Nicholson
Consolida regalis Gray
Malacothamnus fasciculatus subsp. catalinensis (Eastw.) Thorne
Jussiaea repens L.
Prostanthera nivea A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Heuchera cespitosa Eastw.
Umbellularia Nutt.
Doellingeria ledophylla var. covillei (Greene) Semple, Brouillet & G.A.Allen
Geranium nervosum Rydb.
Spergularia maritima (All.) Chiov.
Erigeron pecosensis Standl.
Zantedeschia Spreng.
Trifolium bicephalum Elmer
Plagiobothrys verrucosus (Phil.) I.M.Johnst.
Potentilla dissecta (Wallr.) Zimmeter
Scrophularia nodosa var. occidentalis Rydb.
Dissanthelium californicum (Nutt.) Benth.
Rhoicissus erythrodes (Fresen.) Planch.
Greeneocharis Gürke & Harms
Dodonaea lanceolata F.Muell.
Cotoneaster harrovianus Wilson
Clematis dioscoreifolia H.Lév. & Vaniot
Corydalis cheilanthifolia Hemsl.
Calochortus nanus (Alph.Wood) Piper
Cunila origanoides (L.) Britton
Mentha aquatica var. crispa (L.) Benth.
Salvia dichroa Hook.f.
Schoenoplectus pungens subsp. longispicatus (Britton) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Erica terminalis Salisb.
Helianthus mollis Lam.
Coreopsis drummondii (D.Don) Torr. & A.Gray
Oenothera caespitosa var. australis (Wooton & Standl.) Munz
Chrysopsis fulcrata Greene
Fraxinus lowellii Sarg.
Heterotheca sessiliflora var. bolanderioides Semple
Allium bolanderi var. bolanderi
Pleiogynium timoriense (DC.) Leenh.
Gilia sinistra M.E.Jones
Hornungia Rchb.
Alectryon subcinereus (A.Gray) Radlk.
Ribes thatcherianum (Jeps.) Munz
Cotoneaster salicifolius var. floccosus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Cotoneaster acuminatus Lindl.
Clematis paniculata Thunb.
Pennisetum ruppellii Steud.
Hebe imperialis Cockayne
Cunila Royen ex L.
Philadelphus inodorus var. grandiflorus (Willd.) A.Gray
Lupinus mollisifolius Davidson
Cardamine nuttallii var. covilleana (O.E.Schulz) Rollins
Cytisus spinosus (L.) Lam.
Lobelia fulgens Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Iberis saxatilis L.
Helianthus decapetalus L.
Astragalus pubentissimus var. pubentissimus
Parrya nudicaulis Kurtz
Trimorpha acris var. asteroides (Andrz. ex Besser) G.L.Nesom
Genista monspessulana (Linnaeus) O.Bolòs & Vigo
Potentilla millegrana Engelm. ex Lehm.
Elodea densa (Planch.) Casp.
Malus rivularis M.Roem.
Pleiocardia hesperidis (Jeps.) Greene
Lycopersicum esculentum Mill
Bouvardia alexanderae A.M.Carter
Scorzonella paludosa Greene
Eschscholzia picta Greene
Orthocarpus castillejoides var. humboldtiensis D.D.Keck
Palafoxia linearis var. arenicola A.Nelson
Montia rosulata Eastw.
Arctostaphylos tracyi Eastw.
Streptanthus suffrutescens Greene
Sedum laxum subsp. flavidum Denton
Plagiobothrys distantiflorus (Piper) I.M.Johnst. ex M.Peck
Arctotheca Vaill.
Galium munzii var. carneum Hilend & J.T.Howell
Galium muricatum W.Wight
Agrostis longiligula var. australis Howell
Platystemon californicus var. sphaerocarpus Brandegee
Penstemon desertorum M.E.Jones
Phaca arenicola Rydb.
Minuartia stolonifera T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Mimulus micranthus A.Heller
Agalinis heterophylla (Nutt.) Small ex Britton
Corethrogyne spathulata A.Gray
Xerophyllum Michx.
Penstemon procerus subsp. brachyanthus (Pennell) D.D.Keck
Gormania eastwoodiae Rose ex Britton & Rose
Eriogonum ursinum var. congdonii S.Stokes
Ziziphus obtusifolia var. obtusifolia
Erythranthe grayi (A.L.Grant) G.L.Nesom
Linanthus serrulatus Greene
Lathyrus lanszwertii subsp. aridus (Piper) Bradshaw
Plagiobothrys nitens (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Aristida californica Thurb. ex Watson
Quercus vacciniifolia Hittell
Euphorbia cymosa Poir.
Dudleya moranii D.A.Johans.
Zauschneria velutina Eastw. ex Moxley
Sidalcea hickmanii var. parishii B.L.Rob.
Eschscholzia macrantha Greene
Salvia carnosa subsp. gilmanii Epling
Penstemon kingii var. glaucus Kellogg
Pimpinella parishii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Melica geyeri var. aristulata Howell
Carex danaensis Stacey
Frangula rubra subsp. modocensis (C.B.Wolf) Kartesz & Gandhi
Ziziphus jujuba (L.) Lam.
Helianthella covillei A.Nelson
Monardella siskiyouensis Hardham
Stachys bergii G.A.Mulligan & D.B.Munro
Grossulariaceae
Stuckenia filiformis subsp. alpina (Blytt) R.R.Haynes, Les & M.Král
Villadia squamulosa Rose
Eschscholzia modesta Greene
Ranunculus marmorarius Jeps. & Tracy
Populus macdougalii Rose
Lupinus danaus var. bicolor Eastw.
Lupinus keckianus C.P.Sm.
Arabis juniperina M.E.Jones
Castilleja ochracea Eastw.
Eleocharis acicularis var. gracilescens Svenson
Limnia bracteosa Rydb.
Lithophragma austromontanum A.Heller
Horkelia scandularis Rydb.
Hulsea californica subsp. inyoensis D.D.Keck
Hemizonia grandiflora Abrams
Gilia sapphirina Eastw.
Aira caryophyllea var. capillaris (Host) Mutel
Tulipa ×gesnerana L.
Triteleia crocea var. modesta (H.M.Hall) Hoover
Sidalcea nitrophila Parish
Scorzonella lepidota A.Heller
Madia stebbinsii T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson
Lupinus pilosellus Eastw.
Lupinus munzii Eastw.
Amsinckia johnstonii Suksd.
Arabis pulchra var. glabrescens Wiggins
Aster defoliatus Parish
Cirsium amblylepis Petr.
Drymocallis viscida Parish
Eriogonum effusum var. limbatum S.Stokes
Downingia cuspidata Greene ex Jeps.
Carex polystachya Sw. ex Wahlenb.
Eriogonum vimineum var. avicularia S.Stokes
Clidemia petiolaris (Schltdl. & Cham.) Schltdl. ex Triana
Dudleya murina Eastw.
Monolopia DC.
Anthriscus arvensis (Huds.) Koso-Pol.
Laportea Gaudich.
Boisduvalia Spach
Scirpus clementis M.E.Jones
Plantago picta E.Morris
Physocarpus alternans subsp. annulatus J.T.Howell
Lupinus sellulus var. elatus Eastw.
Arctostaphylos sonomensis Eastw.
Grindelia rubricaulis var. permixta Steyerm., 1934
Erythranthe marmorata (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Pedicularis howellii A.Gray
Galvezia Dombey ex Juss.
Anthoxanthum aristatum var. aristatum
Eriogonum deflexum subsp. deflexum
Orthocarpus falcatus Eastw.
Carex jacintoensis Parish
Erigeron jacinteus Hall
Heuchera rubescens f. ambigua Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Eucephalus bicolor Eastw.
Heterotheca monarchensis D.A.York, Shevock & Semple
Hosackia oblongifolia var. cuprea (Greene) Brouillet
Orobanche californica subsp. grayana (Beck) Heckard
Grindelia humilis Hook. & Arn.
Platystemon cernuus Greene
Amsinckia exserta Eastw. ex Suksd.
Ribes glanduliferum A.Heller
Berberis nervosa var. mendocinensis Roof
Atrichoseris A.Gray
Gilia inconspicua var. dentiflora Davidson
Gilia splendens subsp. australis H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Flaveria Juss.
Panicum acuminatum var. fasciculatum (Torr.) Lelong
Allium parvum var. jacintense Munz
Escallonia ×rockii Eastw.
Sphaeralcea fasciculata var. elmeri Jeps.
Penstemon linarioides var. californicus Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Microseris decipiens K.L.Chambers
Boechera tiehmii (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Lupinus kerrii Eastw.
Calamintha chandleri Brandegee
Grindelia maritima f. anomala Steyerm., 1934
Carex bajacalifornica Zika
Alcea L.
Ribes glaucescens Eastw.
Chorizanthe villosa Eastw.
Eriogonum bloomeri Parish
Iris hartwegii var. australis Parish
Euphorbia patellifera J.T.Howell
Allium fimbriatum subsp. purdyi (Eastw.) Traub & Ownbey
Dodecatheon cleavelandii var. insulare H.J.Thomps.
Dudleya orcuttii (Rose) Thomson
Eschscholzia crossophylla Greene
Quercus macdonaldii var. elegantula Greene
Orthocarpus longispicatus Elmer
Mimulus bigelovii var. panamintensis Munz
Microseris obtusata Greene
Malvastrum hallii Eastw.
Amsinckia leucosperma Suksd.
Amarella Gilib.
Bromus orcuttianus var. hallii Hitchc.
Chrysolepis Hjelmq.
Eriogonum apiculatum var. subvirgatum S.Stokes
×Schedolium loliaceum (Huds.) Holub
Dudleya eximia D.A.Johans.
Amsinckia ctenocarpa Suksd.
Amsinckia communis Suksd.
Calamagrostis purpurascens var. ophitidis J.T.Howell
Chrysothamnus corymbosus Elmer
Convolvulus tridactylosus Eastw.
Rhynchospora globularis (Chapm.) Small
Gilia dichotoma var. integra M.E.Jones
Bridelia cathartica Bertol.
Erechtites Raf.
Poterium sanguisorba var. sanguisorba
Sedum paradisum (Denton) Denton
Eschscholzia caruifolia Greene
Rosa aldersonii Greene
Erigeron copelandii Eastw.
Scirpus atrovirens Willd.
Haplopappus racemosus var. praticola J.T.Howell
Heuchera hirsuta Rydb.
Breynia disticha J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Antennaria neodioica Greene
Triantha (Nutt.) Baker
Persicaria minor (Huds.) Opiz
Cryptantha humilis var. commixta (J.F.Macbr.) Higgins
Cryptantha jamesii var. setosa (M.E.Jones) I.M.Johnst. ex Tidestr.
Mimosa albida Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Geranium gracile Engelm.
Oenothera claviformis subsp. aurantiaca (Munz) P.H.Raven
Haplopappus vernicosus Phil. ex Reiche
Artemisia glauca Pall. ex Willd.
Aster leucelene S.F.Blake
Macrosiphon Miq.
Oenothera brevipes var. pallidula Munz
Amelanchier oreophila A.Nelson
Lobularia Desv.
Malvastrum rotundifolium Gray
Thelesperma Less.
Ibervillea tripartita (Naudin) Greene
Suaeda erecta (S.Watson) A.Nelson
Eriogonum jamesii subsp. flavescens (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Parthenium lozanoanum Bartlett
Florestina Cass.
Evax prolifera Nutt. ex DC.
Actinea cooperi (A.Gray) Kuntze
Phlox grayi Wooton & Standl.
Convolvulus villosus Pers.
Convolvulus occidentalis S.Watson
Bouteloua gracilis var. gracilis
Juglans mollis Engelm.
Croton berlandieri Torr.
Quercus hahnii Trel.
Ratibida columnaris (Pursh) D.Don
Senecio utahensis A.Nelson
Sporobolus pumilus (Roth) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Sporobolus purpurascens (Sw.) Ham.
Nymphaea odorata subsp. odorata
Sagittaria rigida Pursh
Sagittaria graminea subsp. graminea
Sporobolus niliacus (Fig. & De Not.) P.M.Peterson
Cryptandra Sm.
Acacia verticillata subsp. cephalantha (F.Muell.) Court
Acourtia wislizenii (A.Gray) Reveal & R.M.King
Oxalis megalorrhiza Jacq.
Magnolia doltsopa (Buch.-Ham. ex DC.) Figlar
Heptapleurum arboricola Hayata
Acalypha hispida Burm.f.
Clematis virginiana L.
Sesbania drummondii (Rydb.) Cory
Plagiobothrys hirtus (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Castilleja chlorotica Piper
Fragaria virginiana subsp. grayana (Vilm.) Staudt
Houstonia pusilla Schoepf
Polygala sanguinea L.
Condalia Cav.
Calycoseris A.Gray
Rudbeckia grandiflora (Sw.) J.F.Gmel. ex DC.
Baeria Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Orobanche ludoviciana subsp. multiflora (Nutt.) Collins ex H.L.White & W.C.Holmes
Acmispon humistratus (Benth.) D.D.Sokoloff
Astranthium integrifolium (Michx.) Nutt.
Aliciella penstemonoides (M.E.Jones) J.M.Porter
Ericameria parryi subsp. parryi
Nicotiana otophora Griseb.
Chorispora bungeana Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Harpalyce formosa DC.
Nuphar luteum var. polysepalum (Engelm.) E.O.Beal
Weinmannia pinnata L.
Daemonorops draco (Willd.) Blume
Pogostemon cablin (Blanco) Benth.
Lawsonia inermis L.
Eustoma silenifolium Salisb.
Arenaria bourgaei Hemsl.
Mahonia moranensis (Schult. & Schult.fil.) I.M.Johnst.
Orthosia Decne.
Gaudichaudia mucronata (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) A.Juss.
Prunus africana (Hook.fil.) Kalkman
Lotus wrightii var. multicaulis Ottley
Layia glandulosa var. glandulosa
Hypoxis humilis Kunth
Agave angustiarum Trel.
Boldoa purpurascens Cav. ex Lag.
Tabebuia Gomes
Codonopsis pilosula (Franch.) Nannf.
Senecio spribillei W.A.Weber
Lupinus douglasii Torr.
Cornus officinalis Siebold & Zucc.
Anacardium occidentale L.
Anoda zuccagnii (Spreng.) Fryxell
Pseudobombax ellipticoideum A.Robyns
Acourtia humboldtii (Less.) B.L.Turner
Ranunculus uncinatus D.Don
Filipendula ulmaria (L.) Maxim.
Fragaria platypetala Rydb.
Ipomopsis gloriosa (Brandegee) V.E.Grant
Erythranthe pallens (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Opuntia phaeacantha var. nigricans Engelm.
Nemastylis Nutt.
Hookera coronaria Salisb.
Tidestromia lanuginosa subsp. eliassoniana Sánch.Pino & Flores Olv.
Cinchona succirubra Pav. ex Klotzsch
Oroxylum indicum (L.) Kurz
Acetosella vulgaris (Koch) Fourr.
Atractylodes macrocephala Koidz.
Pycnostelma Bunge ex Decne.
Quercus alveolata Trel.
Carex straminea Willd. ex Schkuhr
Santalum L.
Scutellaria hispidula B.L.Rob.
Rudbeckia L.
Aloysia citrodora Palau
Agave aurea var. aurea
Acer leucoderme Small
Curio crassulifolius (DC.) P.V.Heath
Ficus macrophylla Desf.
Anemonoides sylvestris (L.) Galasso, Banfi & Soldano
Ipomoea cordatotriloba Dennst.
Astragalus kentrophyta subsp. implexus (Canby ex Porter & J.M.Coult.) W.A.Weber
Zeltnera nevadensis (C.R.Broome) G.Mans.
Galeopsis L.
Cascabela thevetia (L.) Lippold
Alternanthera pungens Kunth
Ipomoea imperati (Vahl) Griseb.
Hesperostipa curtiseta (Hitchc.) Barkworth
Agave flexispina Trel.
Clitoria mariana var. mariana
Vitex trifolia L.
Anemonastrum zephyrum (A.Nelson) Holub
Handroanthus chrysanthus subsp. chrysanthus
Monardella douglasii var. douglasii
Physaria hitchcockii subsp. confluens (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) O'Kane
Cruciata pedemontana (Bellardi) Ehrend.
Iliamna longisepala (Torr.) Wiggins
Vesper constancei (R.L.Hartm.) R.L.Hartm. & G.L.Nesom
Diospyros californica (Brandegee) I.M.Johnst.
Oreoxis trotteri S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Rhinanthus groenlandicus Chabert
Oreocarya jonesiana Payson
Eriophyllum stoechadifolium Lag., 1816
Trifolium longipes subsp. caurinum (Piper) J.M.Gillett
Erigeron reductus (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom
Echinocereus adustus Engelm.
Thalia geniculata L.
Oxalis exilis A.Cunn.
Cyrtanthus elatus (Jacq.) Traub
Cotoneaster zabelii C.K.Schneid.
Pombalia attenuata (Humb. & Bonpl.) Paula-Souza
Amorpha canescens Pursh
Cleome houtteana Raf.
Bromus caroli-henrici Greuter
Eriogonum caespitosum var. douglasii (Benth.) M.E.Jones
Solanum pennellii Correll
Eriogonum oblongifolium Benth.
Stachys nuttallii Shuttlew.
Polemonium lemmonii Brand
Hosackia purshiana Benth.
Hosackia subpinnata G.Don
Oryzopsis kingii (Bol.) Beal
Sida californica Nutt.
Hymenolobus divaricatus Nutt.
Eriogonum confertiflorum var. stansburyi Benth.
Sisyrinchium mucronatum Michx.
Carex arenicola subsp. pansa (L.H.Bailey) T.Koyama & Calder
Carex heteroneura var. epapillosa (Mack.) F.J.Herm.
Protea obtusifolia H.Buek
Phaca encenadae Rydb.
Achnatherum arnowiae (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) Barkworth
Arabis vivariensis S.L.Welsh
Nicandra physalodes Scop.
Astragalus schmollae C.L.Porter
Amphilophium lactiflorum (Vahl) L.G.Lohmann
Artemisia parishii A.Gray
Euphorbia corallifera M.E.Jones
Maurandya wislizenii Engelm. ex A.Gray
Ipomopsis spicata var. spicata
Sedum kamtschaticum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Litsea glaucescens Spreng. ex Nees
Physaria acutifolia var. purpurea S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Mimulus cardinalis var. rigens Greene
Sphaeralcea rusbyi var. gilensis (Kearney) Kearney
Rosa sonomensis Greene
Allium pleianthum S.Watson
Eremophila bignoniiflora (Benth.) F.Muell.
Boykinia major var. intermedia Piper
Gilia cephaloidea Rydb.
Kuhnia leptophylla Scheele
Gilia subalpina Greene ex Brand
Pyrrocoma adsurgens Greene
Polygonum aviculare var. aviculare
Lupinus tenuispicus A.Nelson
Bahia woodhousei (A.Gray) A.Gray
Obetia ficifolia Wedd. ex Baker
Hosackia sericea Benth.
Gilia longisepala Gand.
Sesbania macrocarpa var. picta S.Watson
Lotus brachycarpus Hochst. ex Steud.
Gevuina avellana Molina
Trigonella foenum-graceum
Polygala tenuiloba S.F.Blake
Tillandsia bergeri Mez
Abutilon texense Torr. & A.Gray
Bouteloua micrantha Scribn. & Merr.
Bunchosia parvifolia S.Watson
Hieracium helleri Gand.
Festuca vivipara (L.) Sm.
Ribes grossularia L.
Potentilla comosa Rydb.
Quercus tinctoria var. californica Torr.
Calamagrostis deschampsioides Trin.
Anemone caroliniana Walter
Hugelia lutea Benth.
Eriogonum corymbosum var. thompsoniae (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh
Poa alpina var. alpina
Argythamnia manzanilloana Rose
Stachys rigida subsp. rivularis Epling
Sophia andrenarum Cockerell
Lupinus hellerae A.Heller
Astragalus haydenianus var. nevadensis M.E.Jones
Folotsia grandiflora (Jum. & Perrier) Jum. & Perrier
Senecio lynceus Greene
Eschscholzia helleriana Greene
Amsinckia gloriosa Eastw. ex Suksd.
Fragaria virginiana var. ovalis (Lehm.) R.J.Davis
Chenopodium leptophyllum var. subglabrum S.Watson
Acer nipponicum Hara
Solidago radulina Rydb.
Verbena ×perplexa Moldenke
Eriophorum callitrix Chamisso
Lomatium erythrocarpum Meinke & Constance
Wislizenia scabrida Eastw.
Potentilla kelseyi Rydb.
Ferula parvifolia Hook. & Arn.
Cyperus lupulinus subsp. lupulinus
Erigeron loratus Greene
Drymocallis pseudorupestris var. intermedia Rydb.
Penstemon piliferus A.Heller
Trifolium longipes var. multipedunculatum (P.B.Kenn.) J.S.Martin
Kuhnia eupatorioides var. corymbulosa Torr. & A.Gray
Chamaesyce parishii (Greene) Millsp., 1913
Eriogonum douglasii var. twisselmannii J.T.Howell
Allium davisiae M.E.Jones
Drymocallis albida Rydb.
Penstemon hansonii A.Nelson
Salix melanopsis var. tenerrima (L.F.Hend.) C.R.Ball
Eriogonum obtusum Benth.
Lychnis apetala var. kingii (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus hesperius A.Heller
Saxifraga debilis Engelm.
Amsinckia cristata Eastw.
Saururus cernuus L.
Schizachyrium semiglabrum Nash
Eriogonum niveum var. suksdorfii Gand.
Erysimum capitatum var. washoense Rossbach
Cardamine leibergii Holz.
Hymenopappus nudipes var. alpestris Maguire
Eleocharis parvula var. anachaeta (Torr.) Svenson
Castilleja oreopola subsp. olympica Pennell
Salix flava Rydb.
Monardella franciscana Elmer
Acomastylis depressa Greene
Tetraneuris epunctata (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Achaetogeron chihuahuensis Larsen, 1940
Horkelia beneolens A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Erigeron stansellii K.L.Chambers
Calais linearifolia DC.
Delphinium diversicolor Rydb.
Thelypodium rigidum Greene
Brickellia verbenacea (Greene) B.L.Rob.
Sphaeralcea subhastata var. pumila (Wooton & Standl.) Kearney
Arnica mollis var. silvatica (Greene) Maguire
Neomammillaria dioica (Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Juglans neomexicana Dode
Eriogonum brevicaule var. loganum (A.Nelson) S.L.Welsh
Pectis linifolia var. marginalis Fernald
Ipomopsis polyantha (Rydb.) V.E.Grant
Sapindus marginatus Willd.
Machaeranthera glabriuscula var. confertifolia Cronquist
Tridax balbisioides (Kunth) A.Gray
Hosackia watsonii Vasey & Rose
Ambrosia californica Rydb.
Stevia monardifolia var. amblyolepis B.L.Rob.
Sida californica Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Crataegus doddsii Ramaley
Conyza canadensis var. pusilla (Nutt.) Cronquist
Leptasea vespertina Small
Carex turgidula L.H.Bailey
Castilleja pallida var. lutescens Greenm.
Erysimum desertorum (Wooton & Standl.) Rossbach
Tessaria borealis Torr. & A.Gray
Juncus xiphioides var. littoralis Engelm.
Agoseris dasycarpa Greene
Draba sphaerula J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Thelesperma pubescens var. caespitosum (Dorn) C.J.Hansen
Ranunculus oresterus L.D.Benson
Artemisia cana var. cana
Glaux acutifolia A.Heller
Corydalis aurea var. aurea
Penstemon linarioides var. maguirei (D.D.Keck) A.Nelson
Sphaerostigma minus A.Nelson
Carex borealipolaris S.R.Zhang
Carex elongata L.
Festuca amethystina var. asperrima Hack., 1896
Galium asprellum Michx.
Eriogonum corymbosum var. albiflorum (Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Anoda hastata Cav.
Euphorbia gracilis Elliott
Randia echinocarpa Moc. & Sessé
Onosmodium molle var. occidentale (Mack.) I.M.Johnst.
Eucalyptus annulata Benth.
Phlox speciosa var. woodhousei A.Gray
Angelica leporina S.Watson
Potentilla etomentosa Rydb.
Allocasuarina torulosa (Aiton) L.A.S.Johnson
Townsendia jonesii var. lutea S.L.Welsh
Galium trifidum var. halophilum Fernald & Wiegand
Astragalus matthewsii S.Watson
Erythraea trichantha Griseb.
Eschscholzia jonesii Greene
Cymopterus davidsonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) R.L.Hartm.
Poliomintha bustamanta B.L.Turner
Hymenoxys chrysanthemoides var. juxta Cockerell
Potentilla fragiformis Willd. ex Schltdl.
Euphorbia lurida var. pringlei Norton
Dudleya gigantea Rose ex Britton & Rose
Euryptera lucida Nutt.
Euphorbia serpillifolia var. genuina Boiss
Melica fugax var. inexpansa Suksd.
Galium margaricoccum A.Gray
Linum schiedeanum Cham. & Schltdl.
Ruppia occidentalis S.Watson
Carex vulgaris Fr.
Eleocharis soloniensis (Dubois) H.Hara
Polemonium chartaceum H.Mason ex Jeps.
Sicyos angulata P.J.Bergius
Aristida lemmonii Scribn.
Caltha leptosepala subsp. leptosepala
Chrysopsis villosa var. villosa
Cnicus drummondii (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Resedaceae
Epipactis Zinn
Ceruchis Gaertn. ex Schreb., 1791
Distichlis distichophylla (Labill.) Fassett
Hugelia densifolia Benth.
Calamagrostis canadensis var. macouniana (Vasey) Stebbins
Bigelowia albida M.E.Jones ex A.Gray
Cassia leptadenia var. mensalis Greenm.
Arctostaphylos alpinus (L.) Spreng.
Eritrichium angustifolium Torr.
Lupinus leptophyllus Schltdl. & Cham.
Stylophyllum ×semiteres Rose
Dalea bicolor var. argyrea (A.Gray) Barneby
Calocephalus brownii (Cass.) F.Muell.
Malaxis tenuis (S.Watson) Ames
Erigeron ortegae S.F.Blake
Luina serpentina Cronquist
Carex muhlenbergii Kunth ex Boott
Cercocarpus intricatus var. villosus C.K.Schneid.
Opuntia phaeacantha var. flavispina L.D.Benson
Packera musiniensis (S.L.Welsh) Trock
Lomatium vaseyi (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Mimosa guirocobensis Gentry
Grindelia inuloides var. glandulosa (Greenm.) Steyerm.
Descurainia incisa var. leptophylla (Rydb.) O.E.Schulz
Aloysia gentryi Moldenke
Conyza eriophylla (A.Gray) Cronquist
Delphinium occidentale var. reticulatum A.Nelson
Castilleja latifolia subsp. carmelensis Eastw.
Saxifraga adscendens var. oregonensis (Raf.) Breitung
Arabis divaricarpa var. divaricarpa
Arabis holboellii var. derensis S.L.Welsh
Astragalus lentiginosus var. negundo S.L.Welsh
Prosartes trachyandra Torr.
Arabis davidsonii var. davidsonii
Sparmannia africana L.f.
Phillyrea latifolia Sm., 1806
Artemisia vulgaris var. heterophylla (H.St.John) Jeps.
Chenopodium berlandieri subsp. platyphyllum (Issler) Ludw.
Opuntia castillae Griffiths
Heleniastrum occidentale Greene
Eurybia hemispherica (Alexander) G.L.Nesom
Astragalus argophyllus var. alvius S.L.Welsh
Tonestus alpinus (L.C.Anderson & Goodrich) G.L.Nesom & D.R.Morgan
Physaria hitchcockii var. confluens (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) N.H.Holmgren
Trifolium macilentum var. rollinsii (J.M.Gillett) Barneby
Ozomelis pacifica Rydb.
Calothamnus villosus R.Br.
Heuchera utahensis Rydb.
Erigeron filifolius var. robustior M.Peck
Polygonatum cobrense (Wooton & Standl.) R.R.Gates
Hymenoxys brandegei (Porter ex A.Gray) Parker
Penstemon lemmonii A.Gray
Franseria flexuosa A.Gray
Astragalus platycarpus var. montezumae Barneby
Eschscholzia apiculata Greene
Glaux maritima subsp. maritima
Gilia straminea Rydb.
Erigeron cavernensis S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Oenothera torreyi (S.Watson) S.Watson
Acanthambrosia bryantii (Curran) Rydb.
Metastelma albiflorum S.Watson
Rosa davyi Rydb.
Oenothera subacaulis (Pursh) Garrett
Chenopodium berlandieri f. pedunculare Aellen
Pseuderanthemum alatum (Nees) Radlk.
Calais cyclocarpha A.Gray
Ipomoea cardiophylla A.Gray
Cryptantha humilis var. shantzii (Tidestr.) Higgins
Lithodora diffusa (Lag.) I.M.Johnst.
Senecio musiniensis S.L.Welsh
Lupinus alcis-montis C.P.Sm.
Sanicula serpentina Elmer
Conoclinium coelestinum (L.) DC.
Dalea nelsonii (Rydb.) Barneby
Plectritis gibbosa Suksd.
Senecio serra var. admirabilis (Greene) A.Nelson
Silene luisana S.Watson
Hydastylus longipes E.P.Bicknell
Pediocactus simpsonii var. minor (Engelm.) Cockerell
Hyptis palmeri S.Watson
Carex straminea var. congesta Boott
Sphaeralcea angustifolia var. cuspidata A.Gray
Heuchera rosendahlii R.A.Folk
Aster roseolus Rydb.
Viola beckwithii subsp. beckwithii
Penstemon triphyllus subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Alisma plantago-aquatica var. michaletii (Asch. & Graebn.) Buchenau
Hymenopappus tenuifolius Pursh
Cyperus hansenii Britton
Lonchocarpus Kunth
Styphonia serrata Nutt.
Stylophyllum virens Rose
Betula occidentalis var. occidentalis
Arenaria hookeri var. hookeri
Gormania burnhamii Britton
Dalea versicolor var. versicolor
Amsinckia melanocarpa Suksd.
Gongora histrionica Rchb.f.
Heterotheca pumila (Greene) Semple
Boechera schistacea (Rollins) Dorn
Aster kingii var. kingii
Malacothrix obtusa Benth.
Schefflera arboricola (Hayata) Merr.
Machaeranthera canescens var. commixta (Greene) S.L.Welsh
Dalea angulata M.E.Jones
Vaccinium uliginosum var. uliginosum
Solidago glutinosa var. glutinosa
Hymenopappus nudatus Wooton & Standl.
Picradenia lemmonii Greene
Mentzelia albicaulis (Douglas ex Hook.) Douglas
Crepis glauca (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Kunzea baxteri (Klotzsch) Schauer
Calais parryi A.Gray
Astragalus accidens var. accidens
Artemisia floccosa Rydb.
Astragalus gaviotus Elmer
Franseria incana Rydb.
Arabis rhodantha Greene
Eriogonum racemosum var. cordifolium Gand.
Euphorbia fendleri var. typica L.C.Wheeler
Machaeranthera leptophylla Rydb.
Franseria palmeri Rydb.
Cyperus flavus J.Presl & C.Presl
Vernonia serratuloides subsp. serratuloides
Cirsium aridum Dorn
Artemisia platyphylla Rydb.
Myosotis palustris (L.) Nathh.
Chamaesyce intermixta (S.Watson) Millsp.
Eleocharis monticola Fernald
Stephanomeria coronaria Greene
Abronia acutalata Standl.
Silene pectinata var. subnuda B.L.Rob.
Penstemon hartwegii Benth.
Cenchrus polystachios (L.) Morrone
Bouteloua breviseta Vasey ex J.M.Coult.
Cymopterus decipiens M.E.Jones
Carex monile Tuck.
Carex obovoidea Cronquist
Eriogonum procidum var. mystrium Reveal
Ruellia caroliniensis (J.F.Gmel.) Steud.
Erigeron maguirei Cronquist
Platystemon arizonicus Greene
Potentilla anserina var. sericea (L.) Hayne
Trautvetteria rotundata Greene
Viola purpurea subsp. geophyta M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Amsinckia kennedyi Suksd.
Xylophacos aragalloides Rydb.
Paronychia pulvinata var. longiaristata Chaudhri
Lonicera ciliata Muhl.
Acrocomia totai Mart.
Lupinus ingratus var. arizonicus C.P.Sm.
Helianthus aridus Rydb.
Dudleya brauntonii Rose ex Britton & Rose
Physaria paysonii (Rollins) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Lepidium virginicum var. centrali-americanum (Thell.) C.L.Hitchc.
Eriogonum corymbosum var. matthewsiae Reveal
Viola geminiflora Greene
Escallonia bifida Link & Otto
Neomammillaria macdougalii Britton & Rose
Amsinckia howellii Brand
Oenothera caespitosa var. macroglottis (Rydb.) Cronquist
Mertensia lanceolata var. nivalis (S.Watson) L.C.Higgins
Greyia radlkoferi Szyszyl.
Ranunculus affinis var. micropetalus Greene
Asclepias decumbens (Nutt.) K.Schum.
Xanthium oligacanthum Piper
Astragalus hylophilus (Rydb.) A.Nelson
Antennaria lanulosa Greene
Lathyrus zionis C.L.Hitchc.
Asclepias tuberosa var. tuberosa
Arabis demissa var. languida Rollins
Cryptantha atwoodii Higgins
Campanula linifolia Hegetschw.
Eriogonum effusum var. leptophyllum Torr.
Psilocarphus tenuis Eastw.
Bromus magnificus Elmer
Physaria occidentalis var. occidentalis
Arabis campyloloba Greene
Eriogonum brevicaule var. promiscuum S.L.Welsh
Ribes grantii A.Heller
Saxifraga marshallii subsp. idahoensis (Piper) Krause & Beamish
Hesperomecon strictum Greene
Schizococcus nummularia (A.Gray) Eastw.
Talinum humile Greene
Machaeranthera superba A.Nelson
Tauschia tenuissima (Geyer ex Hook.) Mathias & Constance
Astragalus toanus var. toanus
Potamogeton alpinus subsp. tenuifolius (Raf.) Hultén
Agoseris heterophylla var. quentinii G.I.Baird
Lupinus yakimensis C.P.Sm.
Cordylanthus bicolor A.Nelson
Saxifraga leucathemifolia Lapeyr.
Livistona decipiens Becc.
Hosackia nudiflora Nutt.
Kalanchoe beharensis Drake
Delphinium carolinianum Walter
Acmispon aestivalis A.Heller
Thelesperma subnudum var. alpinum S.L.Welsh
Sphaeralcea grossulariifolia var. fumariensis S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Arnica ventorum Greene
Saxifraga serpyllifolia var. chrysantha (A.Gray) Dorn
Leptocereus (A.Berger) Britton & Rose
Rhus aromatica var. flabelliformis Shinners
Homalobus canovirens Rydb.
Aconitum patens Rydb.
Colletia infausta N.E.Br.
Draba helleriana var. blumeri C.L.Hitchc.
Madia elegans var. elegans
Draba brachystylis Rydb.
Panicum arizonicum var. tenue Scribn. & Merr.
Physaria utahensis (Rydb.) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Elodea brandegeeae H.St.John
Amorpha arizonica Rydb.
Sambucus racemosa var. pubens (Michx.) S.Watson
Erigeron peregrinus var. dawsonii Greene
Cymopterus purpureus var. jonesii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Goodrich
Allocarya glyptocarpa Piper
Glycosma maxima Rydb.
Plantago major var. major
Tetradymia glabrata f. calva Payson
Eriogonum fulvum S.Stokes
Gentiana wislizenii Engelm.
Plagiobothrys hirtus var. figuratus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Juncus pallidus R.Br.
Costus scaber Ruiz & Pav.
Calliandra houstoniana var. anomala (Kunth) Barneby
Panicum arizonicum var. laeviglume Scribn. & Merr.
Eriogonum strictum var. strictum
Rhapidophyllum hystrix (Fraser ex Thouin) H.Wendl. & Drude
Ranunculus hesperoxys Greene
Cephalobembix neomexicana (A.Gray) Rydb.
Lepigonum Wahlenb.
Salix eriocephala var. eriocephala
Opuntia fulgida var. mamillata (Schott) Coult.
Potamogeton columbianus Suksd.
Physaria saximontana Rollins
Butia capitata (Mart.) Becc.
Allium anceps var. aberrans M.E.Jones
Atelophragma townsendii Rydb.
Cartiera cuneata Rydb.
Burrielia tenerrima DC.
Rosa butleri Rydb.
Astragalus limnocharis var. tabulaeus S.L.Welsh
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. sparsiflorus
Horkelia californica subsp. frondosa (Greene) Ertter
Coryphantha rosea Clokey
Lycium carinatum S.Watson
Oenothera flava var. acutissima (W.L.Wagner) S.L.Welsh
Astragalus cremnophylax Barneby
Sedum spathulifolium subsp. yosemitense (Britton) Clausen
Caltha leptosepala var. sulfurea C.L.Hitchc.
Camissonia claviformis var. funerea (Raven) Cronquist
Lupinus latifolius var. subalpinus (Piper & B.L.Rob.) C.P.Sm.
Acuan palmeri Britton & Rose
Eulophus parishii var. rusbyi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Atriplex torreyi var. griffithsii (Standl.) G.D.Br.
Picradenia rusbyi (A.Gray) Greene
Acer argutum Maxim. ex Miq.
Astragalus lotiflorus f. brachypus A.Gray
Anneslia alamosensis Britton & Rose
Panicum ferventicola var. sericeum Schmoll
Pleuricospora densa Small
Oenothera hirta var. jonesii H.Lév.
Draba aurea var. aurea
Musineon naomiensis L.M.Schultz & F.J.Sm.
Verbena stricta Vent.
Lepidium angustifolium Rusby
Collomia leptalea A.Gray
Clintonia pulchella Lindl.
Senecio crepidineus Greene
Evolvulus wilcoxianus House
Casuarina campestris Diels
Allionia pratensis Standl.
Poa brachyglossa Piper
Crepis occidentalis var. costata A.Gray
Lepidium montanum var. papilliferum L.F.Hend.
Scorzonella paludosa var. integrifolia Jeps.
Rubus trivialis Michx.
Potentilla fruticosa var. floribunda (Pursh) Steud.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. multiracemosus S.L.Welsh
Thelypodiopsis sagittata (Nutt.) O.E.Schulz
Aquilegia coerulea var. alpina A.Nelson
Achillea nobilis L.
Lesquerella barnebyi Maguire
Boechera selbyi var. inyoensis (Rollins) N.H.Holmgren
Astragalus convallarius var. scopulorum Barneby
Cuscuta californica var. brachycalyx Yunck.
Rumex occidentalis var. occidentalis
Abutilon berlandieri A.Gray
Hesperaloe funifera (K.Koch) Trel.
Eurybia glauca var. pulchra (S.F.Blake) Brouillet
Aleurites J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Viburnum variabilis MacGinitie, 1941
Dalbergia rubra MacGinitie, 1941
Phytocrene sordida (Lesquereux, 1878)
Chaetoptelea pseudofulva (Lesquereux, 1878)
Salix varians Heer
Leguminosites lesquereuxiana Knowlton, 1898
Sloanea L.
Phragmites falcata Knowlton, 1899
Sapindus wardii Knowlton, 1899
Euproteaciphyllum Jordan et al., 1998
Pistia corrugata Lesquereux, 1878
Cinnamomum acrodromum Potbury, 1935
Craigia W.W.Sm. & W.E.Evans
Dipteronia Oliv.
Platanophyllum angustiloba (Lesquereux, 1878)
Ensete oregonense Manchester & Kress, 1993
Strongylodon falcata MacGinitie, 1941
Paranymphaea crassifolia Newberry, 1935
Parthenocissus ursina Brown, 1962
Ficus deformata Knowlton, 1899
Quercus eoxalapensis MacGinitie, 1941
Cercidiphyllaceae
Myrica scottii Lesquereux
Salix angusta Browne
Artocarpus J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Chrysobalanus L.
Parrotia brevipetiolata Meyer & Manchester, 1997
Myrica bolanderi Lesquereux, 1878
Euchiton gymnocephalus (DC.) Holub
Brodiaea matsonii R.E.Preston
Solidago spathulata subsp. spathulata
Piptochaetium fuscum (Steud.) Barkworth, Ciald. & Gandhi
Mammillaria setispina (J.M.Coult.) Engelm. ex Coult.
Delphinium glareosum subsp. glareosum
Allium ursinum L.
Agave schottii var. treleasei (Toumey) Kearney & Peebles
Gliricidia sepium (Jacq.) Kunth
Trisetum spellenbergii Soreng, Finot & P.M.Peterson
Eriogonum capistratum Reveal
Salvia thormannii Urb.
Eragrostis tenella (L.) P.Beauv. ex Roem. & Schult.
Agrostis elata (Pursh) Trin.
Cynodon pascuus Nees
Erigeron brevicaulis Phil.
Velezia L.
Senecio mikanioides Otto
Calamagrostis arenaria (L.) Roth
Erioneuron nealleyi (Vasey) Tateoka
Melinis P.Beauv.
Cottea Kunth
Cryptantha cana (A.Nelson) Payson
Sporobolus capillipes M.E.Jones
Posidonia K.D.Koenig
Aphanes cuneifolia Rydb.
Sida delphiniifolia Nutt.
Githopsis specularioides var. hirsuta Nutt.
Castanea chrysophylla Douglas ex Hook.
Alchemilla cuneifolia Nutt.
Delphinium subglobosum Wiggins
Acer cissifolium (Siebold & Zucc.) C.Koch
Rubus flosculosus Focke
Allium perdulce S.V.Fraser
Lupinus sinus-meyersi C.P.Sm.
Potentilla anomalofolia M.Peck
Chenopodium subglabrum (S.Watson) A.Nelson
Lathyrus sylvestris subsp. angustifolius (Medik.) Rothm.
Ribes americanum Mill.
Vaccinium virgatum Aiton
Leymus multicaulis (Kar. & Kir.) Tzvelev
Ipomoea plummerae var. cuneifolia (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Lupinus albopilosus A.Heller
Potentilla glandulosa subsp. typica D.D.Keck
Ribes oxyacanthoides var. leucoderme (A.Heller) Jancz.
Rorippa dubia (Pers.) H.Hara
Psathyrostachys juncea var. juncea
Ficus benjamina var. nuda (Miq.) Barrett
Allium sphaerocephalon L.
Cicer rasulovae Lincz.
Elymus curvatus Linnaeus
Diospyros texana Scheele
Secale strictum subsp. strictum
Ipomoea tuberculata Ker Gawl.
Ficus obtusifolia Kunth
Lupinus lyallii subsp. alcis-temporis (C.P.Sm.) B.J.Cox
Acer platanoides subsp. turkestanicum (Pax) P.C.de Jong
Ribes cruentum var. cruentum
Avena eriantha Durieu
Syzygium pycnanthum Merr. & Perry
Lupinus mearnsii C.P.Sm.
Malus macounii Greene
Eucalyptus camaldulensis subsp. camaldulensis
Turritis stricta Host
Pontederia obtusifolia (Raf.) A.DC.
Aster pansus (S.F.Blake) Cronquist
Aristida purpurea var. californica Vasey
Pyrolaceae
Carpenteria Torr.
Hydrangeaceae
Agrostis alba Kunze, 1846
Lilaeopsis Greene
Myosurus minimus subsp. novae-zelandiae (Oliv.) Garn.-Jones
Gentianaceae
Atriplex acanthocarpa var. acanthocarpa
Gutierrezia sphaerocephala A.Gray
Sicyos parviflorus Willd.
Kummerowia striata (Thunb.) Schindl.
Robinia neomexicana var. rusbyi (Wooton & Standl.) W.C.Martin & C.R.Hutchins ex Peabody
Toxicodendron radicans subsp. radicans
Hackelia ursina var. pustulata (J.F.Macbr.) J.L.Gentry
Atriplex nuttallii subsp. cuneata (A.Nelson) Hall & Clem.
Agastache pallidiflora var. neomexicana (Briq.) R.W.Sanders
Hedeoma reverchonii (A.Gray) A.Gray
Sphaeralcea coccinea var. elata (Baker fil.) Kearney
Orobanche ludoviciana var. multiflora (Nutt.) Beck
Physalis subulata var. neomexicana (Rydb.) Waterf. ex Kartesz & Gandhi
Fragaria vesca var. americana Porter
Disporum hookeri Britton, 1888
Astragalus lentiginosus var. albiflorus (A.Gray) Schoener
Glandularia longidentata (L.M.Perry) G.L.Nesom
Gaillardia pulchella var. pulchella
Hymenopappus biennis B.L.Turner
Opuntia imbricata var. imbricata
Acacia roemeriana Scheele
Chamaesyce stictospora (Engelm.) Small
Eurybia pulchra (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Sphaeralcea pumila Wooton & Standl.
Galium mexicanum var. asperrimum (A.Gray) L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh
Mimulus glabratus var. jamesii (Torr. & Gray) Gray
Arida riparia (Kunth) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Osteospermum spinescens Thunb.
Sedum wrightii var. priscum (R.T.Clausen) H.Ohba
Urtica dioica var. gracilis (Aiton) C.L.Hitchc.
Descurainia pinnata var. ochroleuca (Wooton) Shinners
Houstonia acerosa subsp. polypremoides (A.Gray) Terrell
Xanthisma spinulosum var. spinulosum
Mimosa dysocarpa var. dysocarpa
Diaperia Nutt.
Echinocereus fendleri var. rectispinus (Peebles) L.D.Benson
Opuntia kunzei Rose
Sclerocactus intertextus var. intertextus
Gilia lyndana Allred
Yucca baileyi var. navajoa (J.M.Webber) J.M.Webber
Chilopsis linearis var. arcuata Fosberg
Ptelea trifoliata var. cognata (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Corallorrhiza maculata (Raf.) Raf.
Psoralea palmeri Ockendon
Lolium perenne var. aristatum Willd.
Hexalectris colemanii (Catling) A.H.Kenn. & L.E.Watson
Thelesperma simplicifolium (A.Gray) A.Gray
Erigeron sivinskii G.L.Nesom
Iva dealbata A.Gray
Stephanomeria wrightii A.Gray
Chamaesyce serrula (Engelm.) Wooton & Standl.
Desmanthus glandulosus (B.L.Turner) Luckow
Chamaesyce vermiculata (Raf.) House
Sarcobatus Nees
Asclepias oenotheroides Cham. & Schltdl.
Krascheninnikovia ceratoides subsp. lanata (Pursh) Heklau
Sphaeralcea fendleri var. elongata (Kearney) Kearney
Corallorrhiza maculata var. occidentalis (Lindl.) Ames
Echinocereus chloranthus Rümpler
Delphinium carolinianum subsp. virescens (Nutt.) R.E.Brooks
Condalia warnockii var. warnockii
Opuntia erinacea var. hystricina (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) L.D.Benson
Packera neomexicana var. metcalfei (Greene ex Wooton & Standl.) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Solidago altissima var. pluricephala M.C.Johnst.
Chamaesyce fendleri var. chaetocalyx (Boiss.) Shinners
Acacia constricta var. paucispina Wooton & Standl.
Sideroxylon lanuginosum subsp. lanuginosum
Draba helleriana var. helleriana
Polanisia uniglandulosa (Cav.) DC.
Frasera Walter
Gentianella amarella var. heterosepala (Engelm.) Dorn
Polygala longa Blake
Phemeranthus marginatus (Greene) Kiger
Agrimonia L.
Chamerion angustifolium var. canescens (Alph.Wood) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Centaurium calycosum var. calycosum
Physalis foetens var. neomexicana (Rydb.) Waterf.
Sphaeralcea lobata Wooton
Opuntia nicholii L.D.Benson
Senecio eremophilus subsp. macdougalii (A.Heller) G.W.Douglas & Ruyle-Dougl.
Bidens alba var. radiata (Sch.Bip.) Ballard
Schizachyrium scoparium var. neomexicanum (Nash) Gould
Pseudognaphalium jaliscense (Greenm.) Anderb.
Mimosa quadrivalvis var. occidentalis (Wooton & Standl.) Barneby
Aletes sessiliflorus Theob. & Tseng
Philadelphus mearnsii W.H.Evans ex Koehne
Corallorrhiza maculata var. maculata
Physalis longifolia var. longifolia
Opuntia polyacantha var. rufispina (Engelm. & Bigelow) L.D.Benson
Aristolochia wrightii Seem.
Mimosa quadrivalvis var. angustata (Torr. & A.Gray) Barneby
Silene scouleri var. pringlei (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire ex Kartesz & Gandhi
Evolvulus sericeus var. sericeus
Brickellia coulteri var. brachiata (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Sphaeralcea digitata var. tenuipes (Wooton & Standl.) Kearney
Halenia rothrockii A.Gray
Erigeron delphinifolius subsp. neomexicanus (A.Gray) Cronquist
Astragalus bisulcatus subsp. haydenianus (A.Gray ex Brandegee) W.A.Weber
Agave parryi var. neomexicana (Wooton & Standl.) McKechnie
Condalia mexicana Schltdl.
Elytrigia repens subsp. repens
Castilleja tomentosa A.Gray
Palafoxia sphacelata (Nutt. ex Torr.) Cory
Sclerocactus cloverae K.D.Heil & J.M.Porter
Aristida purpurea var. perplexa Allred & Valdés-Reyna
Cardaria draba subsp. draba
Centaurium arizonicum (A.Gray) A.Heller
Phlox triovulata Thurb. ex Torr.
Thymophylla aurea (A.Gray) Greene
Mentzelia sivinskii J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Carex planostachys Kunze
Sclerocactus intertextus var. dasyacanthus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Androsace L.
Thelesperma subnudum var. pubescens (Dorn) S.L.Welsh
Erigeron pumilus var. pumilus
Antiphytum floribunda (Torr.) A.Gray
Gilia rigidula var. acerosa A.Gray
Anemone edwardsiana Tharp
Physocarpus (Cambess.) Raf.
Pedicularis parryi var. mogollonica (Greene) Dorn
Sicyos glaber Wooton
Echinocereus chloranthus var. cylindricus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Stenosiphon linifolius (Nutt. ex E.James) Heynh.
Xanthocephalum Willd.
Elatinaceae
Cyclanthera gracillima Cogn.
Eriogonum abertianum var. ruberrimum Gand.
Eriogonum trichopes subsp. glandulosum (Nutt.) S.Stokes
Actaea rubra var. arguta (Nutt.) M.A.Lawson
Spergulastrum lanuginosum subsp. saxosum (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Poa nervosa var. wheeleri (Vasey) C.L.Hitchc.
Sambucus caerulea var. mexicana (C.Presl ex DC.) L.D.Benson
Hymenothrix biternata (A.Gray) B.G.Baldwin
Castilleja hispida var. acuta (Pennell) Pennell ex M.Peck
Atriplex rydbergii Standl.
Grindelia decumbens var. subincisa (Greene) Steyerm.
Opuntia fragilis var. brachyarthra (Engelm. & Bigelow) Coult.
Potentilla argentea subsp. argentea
Cassia lindheimeriana Scheele
Calylophus berlandieri Spach
Oxalis violacea L.
Atriplex cuneata subsp. cuneata
Mammillaria elegans DC.
Anemone tuberosa var. tuberosa
Argemone munita var. argentea (G.B.Ownbey) Shinners
Vauquelinia californica subsp. pauciflora (Standl.) W.J.Hess & Henrickson
Eragrostis mexicana var. mexicana
Prionopsis ciliata (Nutt.) Nutt.
Senna roemeriana (Scheele) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Petalostemon
Cuscuta draconella Costea & Stefanovic
Sporobolus coromandelianus (Retz.) Kunth
Penstemon cobaea Nutt.
Poa occidentalis (Vasey) Vasey
Oenothera cespitosa var. navajoensis (W.L.Wagner, Stockh. & W.M.Klein) Cronquist
Prunus emarginata W.H.Brewer & S.Watson
Zygadenus venenosus S.Watson
Aster ericoides Lam., 1783
Alnus crispa hort. ex Steud., 1840
Alnus crispa hort.
Alisma plantago L.
Leptarrhena pyrolifolia (D.Don) R.Br.
Arenaria lateriflora L.
Arabis lyrata L.
Viola orbiculata Geyer ex Hook.
Viola orbiculata Geyer
Cirsium arvense Linnaeus, 1753
Camelina microcarpa Andrz.
Cirsium vulgare (Savi) Airy Shaw, 1938
Clematis occidentalis A.Cunn. ex Hook.
Silene acaulis (L.) L., 1762
Festuca doreana Looman & Best
Festuca rubt
Sedum roseum Steven
Artemisia ludoviciana (Besser) Torr. & A.Gray
Erigeron strigosum Muhl., 1956
Heuchera parvifolia Nutt.
Glyceria pulchella (Nash) K.Schum.
Oxytropis campestris Hook.
Helictotrichon hookeri (Scribn.) Henrard
Aster brachyactis S.F.Blake
Cryptantha macounii (Eastw.) Payson
Ranunculus verecundus B.L.Rob. ex Piper
Oxytropis splendens Douglas ex Hook.
Phleum L.
Lithospermum ruderale Douglas
Collinsia parviflora Douglas
Habenaria viridis (L.) R.Br.
Orchis rotundifolia Banks
Potentilla ledebouriana A.E.Porsild
Mimulus membranaceus A.Nelson
Epilobium paniculatum Nutt.
Carex rostrata Stokes ex With.
Danthonia parryi Scribn.
Aster sibiricus Lam., 1783
Scirpus purshianus Fernald
Bouteloua gracilis (Kunth) Lag.
×Agroelymus A.Camus
Agropyron caninum Linnaeus, 1753
Cynoglossum grande Douglas
Alopecurus alpinus Sm.
Elymus piperi Bowden
Lonicera ciliata (Pursh) Muhl. ex DC., 1830
Axyris amaranthoides L.
Penstemon nitidus Douglas
Habenaria dilatata A.Gray, 1867
Carex backii Boott
Penstemon virens Pennell ex Rydb.
Carex heliophila Mack.
Astragalus flexuosus (Hook.) Douglas
Astragalus robbinsii Matthew
Astragalus aboriginum Sprengel
Plantago septata Morris
Agropyron albicans Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Agropyron pectiniforme Roem. & Schult.
Phyllodoce aleutica (Spreng.) A.Heller
Crataegus rotundifolia Moench
Actaea rubra Bigelow, 1824
Sanicula crassicaulis Poepp.
Aruncus sylvestris Kitam.
Comandra umbellata Linnaeus, 1753
Rorippa islandica Schinz & Thell.
Cymopterus acaulis (Pursh) Rydb.
Arenaria rossii R.Br., 1823
Entada gigas (L.) Fawc. & Rendle
Bouteloua polystachya S.Watson
Braya humilis (C.A.Mey.) Rob.
Corydalis montana Engelm.
Encelia farinosa A.Gray
Oldenlandia capensis L.f.
Vaccinium membranaceum Douglas
Anemone sphenophylla Poepp.
Aristida bromoides Kunth
Arctostaphylos pungens A.Gray
Sonchus arboreus Sw. ex DC.
Psorobatus megacarpus (S.Watson) Rydb.
Rhodocistus berthelotianus Spach
Leucophae candicans (Aiton) Webb & Berthel.
Aristida scabra (Kunth) Kunth
Agave triangularis Jacobi
Senecio praecox (Cav.) DC.
Setaria composita Kunth
Opuntia sanfelipensis Rebman
Opuntia calmalliana Coult.
Opuntia parryi var. serpentina (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Ferocactus townsendianus var. santa-maria (Britton & Rose) G.E.Linds.
Mammillaria slevinii (Britton & Rose) Boed.
Pereskiopsis Britton & Rose
Echinocereus pacificus (Engelm.) F.Haage
Opuntia californica var. californica
Ferocactus tortulispinus H.E.Gates
Opuntia ciribe Engelm. ex Coult.
Mammillaria hutchisoniana (H.E.Gates) Backeb. & Knuth
Opuntia ganderi (C.B.Wolf) Rebman & Pinkava
Opuntia bigelovii var. ciribe (Engelm. ex Coult.) Marshall
Cereus thurberi Engelm.
Bartschella schumannii (Hildm.) Britton & Rose
Stenocereus thurberi var. littoralis (K.Brandegee) Bravo
Mammillaria brandegeei var. gabbii (J.M.Coult.) R.T.Craig
Opuntia parryi var. parryi
Mammillaria arida Rose ex Quehl
Echinocactus orcuttii Engelm. ex Orcutt
Opuntia californica (Torr. & A.Gray) Coville
Mammillaria goodridgii var. rectispina Dawson
Mammillaria roseana Brandegee
Vernonia serratuloides Kunth
Pectis stenophylla A.Gray
Senecio toluccanus DC.
Senecio ritoveganus B.L.Turner
Senecio mairetianus DC.
Melanthiaceae
Parthenium L.
Melampodium L.
Bromus lithobius Trin.
Aralia L.
Trillium crassifolium Piper
Cistus ×skanbergii Lojac.
Opuntia riparia Griffiths
Cnidoscolus aconitifolius (Mill.) I.M.Johnst.
Stutzia dioica (Nutt.) E.H.Zacharias
Astragalus cottonii M.E.Jones
Myosotis discolor subsp. discolor
Xanthium strumarium subsp. strumarium
Silene uralensis subsp. uralensis
Echinops ritro L.
Carpobrotus acinaciformis (L.) L.Bolus
Melica subulata var. subulata
Trifolium plumosum Douglas ex Hook.
Xanthium strumarium subsp. glabratum (DC.) Cronquist
Eurybia sibirica subsp. sibirica
Astragalus agrestis Douglas ex Hook.
Aquilegia formosa subsp. truncata (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Payson
Chrysopsis villosa var. fastigiata (Greene) H.M.Hall
Juncus effusus var. conglomeratus (L.) Engelm.
Gasoul nodiflorum (L.) Rothm.
Yucca whipplei subsp. parishii (M.E.Jones) A.L.Haines
Delphinium menziesii subsp. pyramidale Ewan
Collinsia parviflora var. parviflora
Thlaspi perfoliatum L.
Ribes amarum var. amarum
Asclepias eriocarpa var. microcarpa Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Aster abatus S.F.Blake
Venidium fastuosum (Jacq.) Stapf
Rubus idaeus var. aculeatissimus Regel & Tiling
Galium sherardia E.H.L.Krause
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. cinerea (Greene) Payson
Sedella congdonii (Eastw.) Britton & Rose
Epilobium watsonii var. parishii (Trel.) C.L.Hitchc.
Mimulus pennellii Gentry
Cornus alba var. occidentalis (Torr. & A.Gray) B.Boivin
Antennaria monocephala subsp. angustata (Greene) Hultén
Amphiachyris dracunculoides (DC.) Nutt.
Oenothera hexandra (Sessé & Moc. ex Ortega) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Atriplex argentea subsp. typica H.M.Hall & Clem.
Kali tragus (L.) Scop.
Kali soda (L.) Scop.
Heterotheca horrida (Rydb.) V.L.Harms
Phleum alpinum var. alpinum
Poa glauca var. rupicola (Nash) B.Boivin
Poterium sanguisorba subsp. muricatum Bonnier & Layens
Matelea pavonii (Decne.) Woodson
Eupatorium incomptum DC.
Townsendia mexicana A.Gray
Ipomoea microsepala Benth.
Prunus gentryi f. flavipulpa Laferr.
Brachypodium mexicanum (Roem. & Schult.) Link
Trichoneura elegans Swallen
Diodia crassifolia Benth.
Oxalis primavera (Rose) Knuth
Villadia batesii (Hemsl.) Baehni & J.F.Macbr.
Montanoa frutescens Mairet ex DC., 1836
Waltheria conzattii Standl.
Condaliopsis lycioides var. canescens (A.Gray) Suess.
Viola grahamii Benth.
Agropyron vulpinum (Rydb.) Hitchc.
Schizocarpum reflexum Rose
Eupatorium mariarum B.L.Rob.
Grindelia confusa Steyerm.
Viguiera angustifolia (Hook. & Arn.) S.F.Blake
Conostegia xalapensis (Bonpl.) D.Don ex DC.
Opuntia phaeacantha var. chihuahuensis (Rose) Bravo
Castilleja raupii Pennell
Adelia vaseyi (J.M.Coult.) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Grossularia speciosa (Pursh) Coville & Britton
Hordeum pratense Huds.
Ocimum basilicum var. glabratum Benth.
Pennisetum setosum (Sw.) Rich.
Bastardiastrum gracile (Hochr.) D.M.Bates
Agropyron saundersii (Vasey) Hitchc.
Helicteres vegae Cristóbal
Commelina longicaulis Jacq.
Cracca sericea A.Gray
Berginia virgata var. glandulifera Leonard & C.V.Morton
Epilobium suffruticosum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Amaranthus pringlei S.Watson
Campanula scouleri Hook.
Allocarya chorisiana (Cham.) Greene
Heliomeris multiflorus var. nevadensis (A.Nelson)
Bromus carinatus var. densus Shear
Anemopsis californica var. typica Kelso
Thalictrum sparsiflorum var. saximontanum B.Boivin
Rumfordia penninervis S.F.Blake
Fimbristylis dichotoma f. annua (All.) Ohwi
Mahonia aquifolium var. aquifolium
Watsonia knysnana L.Bolus
Eriocaulon benthamii Kunth
Montia fontana subsp. amporitana Sennen
Genista canariensis Bory & Chaub., 1838
Clethra hartwegii Britton
Agave filifera Salm-Dyck
Lachemilla aphanoides (Mutis ex L.fil.) Rothm.
Coreopsis bigelovii (A.Gray) Voss
Eustoma andrewsii A.Nelson
Dodecatheon conjugens subsp. conjugens
Physalis ixocarpa Brot. ex Hornem.
Euphorbia trigona Haw.
Apodanthera aspera Cogn.
Euphorbia coerulescens Haw., 1826
Stillingia sylvatica L.
Euodia ruticarpa (A.Juss.) Benth.
Lupinus holosericeus Torr. & A.Gray
Cestrum mexicanum Francey
Erythranthe flammea G.L.Nesom
Thalictrum pinnatum var. subternatum B.Boivin
Hedyotis L.
Hexasepalum angustifolium Bartl. ex DC.
Haplopappus macraeanus A.Gray
Hibbertia Andrews
Gibasis rhodantha (Torr.) Reveal & W.J.Hess
Agave dasylirioides Jacobi & C.D.Bouché
Croton crassifolius Geiseler
Ephemerantha fimbriata (Blume) P.F.Hunt & Summerh.
Trapa natans L.
Echinopepon paniculatus (Cogn.) Dieterle
Hippobroma longiflora (L.) G.Don
Mentha haplocalyx Briq.
Rhapontica Hill
Gentiana townsendii Briq.
Cuscuta mitriformis Engelm. ex Hemsl.
Buddleja cordata subsp. tomentella (Standl.) Norman
Centaurium babylonicum (Griseb.) Druce
Calopogonium caeruleum (Benth.) C.Wright
Hedyotis alexanderae (A.M.Carter) W.H.Lewis
Echinopepon lanatus (Cogn.) Rose
Perityle fitchii Torr. ex A.Gray
Condea albida (Kunth) Harley & J.F.B.Pastore
Pachyphytum Link, Klotzsch & Otto
Trixis inula Crantz
Colletia spinosissima J.F.Gmel.
Quercus skinneri Benth.
Lonchocarpus megalanthus Pittier
Sphaeralcea ambigua var. versicolor Kearney
Fraxinus alba Marshall
Neopicrorhiza scrophulariiflora (Pennell) D.Y.Hong
Delphinium tenuisectum f. cucullatum Ewan
Glandularia setacea (L.M.Perry) Umber
Metastelma schaffneri A.Gray
Zauschneria californica var. californica
Hermannia L.
Asperula odorata L.
Panax quinquefolius L.
Rhus chinensis Mill.
Psophocarpus tetragonolobus (L.) DC.
Pleradenophora tuerckheimiana (Pax & K.Hoffm.) A.L.Melo & Esser
Cosmos purpureus (DC.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hemsl.
Zanthoxylum bungeanum Maxim.
Sophora subprostrata Chun & H.Y.Chen
Sargentodoxa Rehder & Wilson
Ligusticum sinense Oliv.
Manfreda jaliscana Rose
Lippia triphylla Kuntze
Trisetum palmeri Hitchc.
Atriplex barclayana subsp. magdalenae (Brandegee) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Bacopa sessiliflora (Benth.) Edwall
Bupleurum chinense DC.
Fibraurea Lour.
Trientalis Ruppius ex L.
Dasylirion sereke Bogler
Perityle brandegeeana Rose
Hemizonia parryi var. parryi
Zygophyllaceae
Chrysanthemum indicum L.
Salix reticulata var. nana (Hook.) Andersson
Aster filifolius Vent.
Macroscepis Kunth
Hymenocyclus croceus (Jacq.) Schwantes
Clerodendron trichotomum Thunb., 1780
Peucephyllum schottii var. latisetum I.M.Johnst.
Chamaebatia Benth.
Goodenia ovata Sm.
Alkanna tinctoria (L.) Tausch
Syzygium aromaticum (L.) Merr. & Perry
Euphorbia fischeriana Steud.
Tovariaceae
Mikania micrantha Kunth
Cinnamomum aromaticum Nees
Panicum californicum Benth.
Chamaedorea glaucifolia H.Wendl.
Gnaphalium dioicum L.
Dendrobium Sw.
Clausena Burm.fil.
Schkuhria virgata (La Llave & Lex.) DC.
Encyclia adenocarpos (Lex.) Schltr.
Calamagrostis densa Vasey
Salix hookeriana var. hookeriana
Rhachidospermum mexicanum Vasey
Plectritis macroptera (Suksd.) Rydb.
Caesalpinia sappan L.
Fremontea Lindl.
Justicia phlebodes Leonard & Gentry
Parahebe W.R.B.Oliv.
Cinnamomum cassia (L.) J.Presl
Larrea mexicana Moric.
Persicaria hispida (Kunth) M.Gómez
Stegnosperma cubense A.Rich.
Stipa columbiana var. nelsonii (Scribn.) Hitchc.
Lotus scoparius subsp. brevialatus (Ottley) Munz
Leptospermum phylicoideum (A.Cunn. ex Schauer) Cheel
Alpinia officinarum Hance
Schizonepeta tenuifolia (Benth.) Briq.
Sinomenium Diels
Canotia holacantha Torr. ex A.Gray, 1861
Paullinia fuscescens Kunth
Elysitanion hansenii (Scribn.) Bowden
Basella madagascariensis Boivin ex H.Perrier
Quercus uruapanensis Trel.
Justicia soliana Standl.
Dalea tomentosa (Cav.) Willd.
Ruellia albiflora Fernald
Stellaria montana Raf.
Eupatorium perfoliatum L.
Salvia modesta Boiss.
Calliandra rupestris Brandegee
Bromus brizoides Lam.
Eriogonum flavum subsp. flavum
Microsteris gracilis subsp. humilis (Greene) V.E.Grant
Bromelica bulbosa (Porter & J.M.Coult.) W.A.Weber
Critesion jubatum (L.) Nevski
Cylindropyrum cylindricum (Host) Á.Löve
Danthonia unispicata (Thurb.) Munro, 1888
Mirabilis glandulosa (Standl.) W.A.Weber
Scutellaria galericulata var. epilobiifolia (A.Ham.) Jordal
Adenolinum lewisii (Pursh) Á. & D.Löve
Mesynium puberulum (Engelm.) W.A.Weber
Nuttallia cronquistii (H.J.Thomps. & Prigge) W.A.Weber
Nuttallia pterosperma (Eastw.) Greene
Distegia involucrata (Richardson) Cockerell
Anotites menziesii (Hook.) Greene
Atriplex gardneri Standl.
Bassia sieversiana (Pall.) W.A.Weber
Oreocarya humilis subsp. nana (Eastw.) W.A.Weber
Oreocarya longiflora A.Nelson
Psilochenia acuminata (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Psilochenia occidentalis (Nutt.) Nutt.
Seriphidium tridentatum (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Picradenia richardsonii var. floribunda (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Negundo aceroides (L.) Moench
Aster spathulatus hort.
Aster glaucodes var. glaucodes
Ligularia holmii (Greene) W.A.Weber
Oligosporus filifolius (Torr.) Poljakov
Packera actinella (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Picradenia cooperi (A.Gray) Greene
Psilochenia intermedia (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Psilochenia modocensis (Greene) W.A.Weber
Seriphidium canum (Pursh) W.A.Weber
Seriphidium vaseyanum (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Tetraneuris Greene
Virgulaster ascendens (Lindl.) Semple
Atriplex ×aptera A.Nelson
Suaeda moquinii A.Nelson
Vexibia stenophylla (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Chondrosum hirsutum (Lag.) Sweet
Crypsis niliacea Fig. & De Not.
Pterogonum alatum (Torr.) H.Gross
Acomastylis rossii (R.Br.) Greene
Prunus crenulata Tidestr.
Aletes anisatus (A.Gray) Theob. & Tseng
Aletes J.M.Coult. & Rose
Aletes scabra (J.M.Coult. & Rose) W.A.Weber
Penstemon caespitosus Nutt.
Veronica nutans Bong.
Castilleja lapidicola A.Heller
Leiostemon ambiguus (Torr.) Greene
Minuopsis nuttallii (Pax) W.A.Weber
Erophila verna (L.) Besser
Thelypodium sagittatum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Endl. ex Walp.
Amerosedum lanceolatum (Torr.) Á. & D.Löve
Gentianella acuta (Michx.) Hiitonen
Hypericum prolificum L.
Acrolasia albicaulis (Hook.) Rydb.
Papaver refractum (DC.) K.-F.Günther
Oreobroma pygmaeum (A.Gray) Howell
Galium emeryense Dempster & Ehrend.
Galium septentrionale Roem. & Schult.
Padus virginiana subsp. melanocarpa (A.Nelson) W.A.Weber
Ceratocephala orthoceras DC.
Coriflora hirsutissima (Pursh) W.A.Weber
Critesion brachyantherum (Nevski) Barkworth & D.R.Dewey
Diplachne fascicularis (Lam.) P.Beauv.
Acrolasia gracilis Rydb.
Coryphantha missouriensis (Sw.) Britton & Rose
Eucephalus glaucus Nutt.
Seriphidium tridentatum subsp. tridentatum
Negundo aceroides subsp. interius (Britton) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Seriphidium novum (A.Nelson) W.A.Weber
Fleischmannia pycnocephala (Less.) R.King & H.Rob.
Isocoma scopulorum (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Oligosporus pacificus (Nutt.) Poljakov
Atriplex grayi Collotzi ex W.A.Weber
Caesalpinia repens Eastw.
Anisantha tectorum (L.) Nevski
Lomatium foeniculaceum subsp. foeniculaceum
Aletes latiloba (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Amsonia arenaria Standl.
Swida sericea (L.) Holub
Pneumonanthe calycosa (Griseb.) Greene
Geranium caespitosum E.James ex Torr., 1827
Acrolasia dispersa (S.Watson) Davidson
Leucosyris spinosa (Benth.) Greene
Halerpestes cymbalaria subsp. saximontana (Fernald) Moldenke
Agropyron desertorum (K.Richt.)
Bromopsis lanatipes (Shear) Holub
Phleum commutatum Gaudin
Trisetum spicatum subsp. alaskanum (Nash) Hultén
Tithymalus brachycerus (Engelm.) Small
Calochortus nuttallii var. nuttallii
Boechera drummondii (A.Gray) A.Löve & D.Löve
Oreocarya stricta Osterh.
Antennaria pulcherrima subsp. anaphaloides (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Chrysothamnus greenei subsp. filifolius (Rydb.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Oligosporus dracunculus subsp. glaucus (Pall. ex Willd.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Tragopogon dubius subsp. major (Jacq.) Vollm.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. graveolens (Nutt.) Piper ex H.M.Hall, 1919
Lepidotheca suaveolens (Pursh) Nutt.
Ligularia pudica (Greene) W.A.Weber
Picradenia helenioides Rydb.
Senecio pectinatus (Baker) Herter
Bassia All.
Carex dioica subsp. gynocrates (Nyman) Hultén
Lotus longebracteatus Rydb.
Vicia americana subsp. truncata (Nutt.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Anisantha sterilis (L.) Nevski
Bromopsis canadensis (Michx.) Holub
Ceratochloa breviaristata Hook.
Chondrosum barbatum (Lag.) Clayton
Amygdalus fasciculata (Torr.) Greene
Potentilla modesta Rydb.
Aletes parryi (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Orthocarpus pilosus S.Watson
Pocilla biloba (L.) W.A.Weber
Cordylanthus ramosus Nutt.
Oreocarya breviflora Osterh.
Physaria carinata (Rollins) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Thelypodium ambiguum S.Watson
Maianthemum amplexicaule (Nutt.) W.A.Weber
Armeria scabra Willd.
Mesynium aristatum (Engelm.) W.A.Weber
Nuttallia multicaulis (Osterh.) Osterh.
Atragene columbiana (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt.
Bromopsis inermis (Leyss.) Holub
Bromopsis porteri (Coult.) Holub
Critesion glaucum (Steud.) Á.Löve
Anticlea vaginata Rydb.
Vicia ludoviciana var. texana (Torr. & A.Gray) Shinners
Oreocarya paradoxa A.Nelson
Seriphidium pygmaeum (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Eucephalus perelegans (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) W.A.Weber
Oligosporus dracunculus subsp. dracunculinus (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Ximenesia encelioides Cav.
Vexibia nuttalliana (B.L.Turner) W.A.Weber
Ceratochloa willdenowii (Kunth) W.A.Weber
Chondrosum trifidum (Thurb. ex S.Watson) Clayton
Schoedonardus paniculatus Scribn.
Padus Mill.
Rubacer parviflorum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Aletes nuttallii (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Veronicastrum serpyllifolium (L.) Fourr.
Eritrichium aretioides (Cham.) DC.
Oreocarya mensana Payson
Draba kassii S.L.Welsh
Stanleya bipinnata Greene
Vaccaria pyramidata Medik.
Mesynium australe (A.Heller) W.A.Weber
Acrolasia K.B.Presl, 1831
Acrolasia nitens (Greene) Rydb.
Nuttallia integra (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Gilia tridactyla Rydb.
Physalis pumila Nutt.
Acrolasia humilis Osterh.
Boechera pulchra subsp. pallens (M.E.Jones ex S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. gonacanthus (Engelm. & J.M.Bigelow) Boissev.
Picradenia richardsonii Hook.
Aletes eastwoodiae (J.M.Coult. & Rose) W.A.Weber
Cerastium strictum L.
Breea arvensis (L.) Less.
Erigeron proselyticus G.L.Nesom
Picradenia odorata (DC.) Britton
Virgulus Raf.
Carex stipata Muhl.
Eleocharis calva Torr.
Chondrosum eriopodum Torr.
Phalaroides arundinacea (L.) Rauschert
Phalaroides Wolf
Poa fernaldiana Nannf.
Sorghastrum avenaceum (Michx.) Nash
Condalia lycioides (Gray) Weberb.
Penstemon acaulis var. yampaensis (Penland) Neese
Cryptantha crassisepala var. crassisepala
Oreocarya johnstonii (L.C.Higgins) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Grammica denticulata (Engelm.) W.A.Weber
Chondrophylla prostrata (Haenke) J.P.Anderson
Mesynium subteres (Trel.) W.A.Weber
Nuttallia laevicaulis (Hook.) Greene
Nuttallia pumila (Nutt.) Greene
Sphaeralcea glabrescens Wooton & Standl.
Virgulus falcatus (Lindl.) Reveal & Keener
Aster laevis var. geyeri Gray
Hymenopappus filifolius var. parvulus (Greene) B.L.Turner
Aletes petraea (M.E.Jones) W.A.Weber
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. platylepis (W.M.Sharp) Cronquist
Brickellia rosmarinifolia (Vent.) W.A.Weber
Picradenia richardsonii subsp. richardsonii
Anisantha rubens (L.) Nevski
Angelica ampla A.Nelson
Penstemon schaffneri (Hemsl.) Straw
Oreocarya pustulosa Rydb.
Boechera falcatoria (Rollins) Dorn
Pneumonanthe affinis (Griseb.) Greene
Juncus brunnescens Rydb.
Phlox sibirica L.
Atragene occidentalis Hornem.
Batrachium aquatile (L.) Dumort.
Anemone tetonensis Porter ex Britton
Viticella orientalis (L.) W.A.Weber
Grammica indecora var. neuropetala (Engelmann) W.A.Weber
Ambrosia psilostachya var. coronopifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Farw.
Rudbeckia ampla A.Nelson
Teloxys botrys (L.) W.A.Weber
Zornia diphylla (L.) Pers.
Eriogonum revealianum S.L.Welsh
Rumex aquaticus subsp. occidentalis (Watson) Hultén
Oreobatus deliciosus subsp. neomexicanus (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Rosa spaldingii Crép.
Pocilla polita Fourr.
Spergulastrum lanuginosum Michx.
Oreocarya grahamii (I.M.Johnst.) R.B.Kelley
Oreocarya tenuis Eastw.
Pneumonanthe parryi (Engelm.) Greene
Psychrophila leptosepala (DC.) W.A.Weber
Mesyniopsis kingii (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Acrolasia affinis Rydb.
Acrolasia montana A.Davidson
Boechera oxylobula (Greene) W.A.Weber
Negundo aceroides subsp. violaceus (G.Kirchn.) W.A.Weber
Acosta maculosa (Lam.) Holub
Chlorocrepis tristis (Willd. ex Spreng.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Leucantha Gray
Lupinus lepidus subsp. caespitosus (Nutt.) Detling
Chondrosum Desv.
Critesion pusillum (Nutt.) Á.Löve
Padus serotina (Ehrh.) Borkh.
Mammillaria gummifera Engelm.
Chamaesyce petaloidea (Engelm.) Small
Moneses Gray
Hecatonia scelerata (L.) Fourr.
Pedicularis bracteosa subsp. paysoniana (Pennell) W.A.Weber
Acetosella paucifolia (Nutt.) Á.Löve
Oreobroma nevadensis Howell
Nuttallia marginata Osterh.
Astragalus schmolliae Ced.Porter
Lepidium montanum var. tenellum (L.O.Williams) C.L.Hitchc.
Carduus nutans subsp. macrolepis (Peterm.) Kazmi
Chrysothamnus parryi subsp. parryi
Chrysothamnus greenei subsp. greenei
Cymopterus planosus (Osterh.) Mathias
Erythrocoma triflorum (Pursh) Greene
Sisymbrium kearneyi Rollins
Tithymalus montanus Small
Tithymalus palmeri (Engelm.) Dayton
Philadelphus argenteus Rydb.
Androsace chamaejasme Wulfen ex Host
Viola praemorsa subsp. major (Hook.) M.S.Baker
Lolium perenne subsp. italicum Husn.
Trisetum spicatum var. alaskanum (Nash) Louis-Marie
Trisetum spicatum subsp. congdonii (Scribn. & Merr.) Hultén
Amygdalus andersonii (Gray) W.Wight
Oreoxis bakeri J.M.Coult. & Rose
Gastrolychnis drummondii (Hook.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Grammica campestris (Yunck.) Hadac & Chrtek
Grammica indecora (Choisy) W.A.Weber
Tithymalus spathulatus (Lam.) W.A.Weber
Mentzelia lobata (Hook.) Walp.
Chamerion danielsii (D.Löve) Czerep.
Beckmannia syzigachne subsp. baicalensis (Kuzn.) T.Koyama & Kawano
Atriplex canescens subsp. garrettii (Rydb.) Hall & Clem.
Populus ×brayshawii B.Boivin
Achaetogeron chihuahuaensis Larsen
Erigeron awapensis S.L.Welsh
Machaeranthera leucanthemifolia (Greene) Greene
Machaeranthera spinulosa (Greene) Cory
Astragalus heterophyllus Podlech
Oxytropis deflexa subsp. deflexa
Castilleja cruenta Standl.
Physaria hemiphysaria var. lucens (S.L.Welsh & Reveal) B.L.Turner, 2004
Toumeya papyracantha (Engelm.) Britton, Rose & M.P.Berg
Melandrium dioicum (L.) Coss. & Germ.
Ipomopsis aggregata subsp. candida (Rydb.) V.E.Grant & A.D.Grant
Agropyron mongolicum Keng
Coryphantha vivipara var. radiosa (Engelm.) Backeb.
Descurainia incisa subsp. viscosa (Rydb.) Rollins
Packera dimorphophylla subsp. intermedia (T.M.Barkley) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Lactuca oblongifolia Nutt.
Atriplex pabularis A.Nelson
Agrostis verticillata Vill.
Penstemon suffrutescens Rydb.
Castilleja barnebyana Eastw.
Oreocarya sericea (A.Gray) Greene
Clementsia rhodantha (A.Gray) Rose ex Britton & Rose
Veratrum tenuipetalum A.Heller
Nephrophyllidium Gilg
Platanthera leucophaea (Nutt.) Lindl.
Erocallis triphylla (S.Watson) Rydb.
Oreobatus deliciosus (Torr.) Rydb.
Oxytropis lambertii subsp. lambertii
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi subsp. adenotricha (Fernald & J.F.Macbr.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Cladothrix lanuginosa Nutt.
Chlorocrepis albiflora (Hook.) W.A.Weber
Chlorocrepis fendleri (Sch.Bip.) W.A.Weber
Gaillardia gracilis A.Nelson
Oligosporus pedatifidus (Nutt.) Poljakov
Salicornia utahensis Tidestr.
Sporobolus microspermus (Lag.) Hitchc.
Potentilla subjuga Rydb.
Mimulus moschatus Douglas, 1828
Penstemon congestus (M.E.Jones) Pennell
Lidia biflora (L.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Silene alba (Mill.) E.H.L.Krause
Canotia Torr.
Penstemon hallii A.Gray
Pyrola rotundifolia subsp. asarifolia (Michx.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Chondrosum prostratum (Lag.) Sweet
Teucrium canadense subsp. occidentale (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Grammica occidentalis (Millsp. ex Mill. & Nutt.) Hadac & Chrtek
Allium rubrum Osterh.
Ligularia bigelovii (A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Packera plattensis (Nutt.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Pseudognaphalium viscosum (Kunth) W.A.Weber
Virgulus ericoides (L.) Reveal & Keener
Carex parryana var. parryana
Orophaca sericea (Nutt.) Britton
Critesion marinum (Huds.) Á.Löve
Hierochloe hirta (Schrank) Borbás
Cerasus avium (L.) Moench
Fraxinus trifoliolata (Torr.) F.H.Lewis & Epling
Lidia obtusiloba (Rydb.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Mahonia trifoliolata (Moric.) Fedde
Chlorocrambe Rydb.
Chondrophylla aquatica (L.) W.A.Weber
Laphamia congesta M.E.Jones
Leucantha solstitialis (L.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Machaeranthera kingii (D.C.Eaton) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Oligosporus dracunculus (L.) Poljakov
Eragrostis secundiflora J.Presl
Triticum compactum Host
Diplachne viscida Scribn.
Oreocarya oblata (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Oreocarya wetherillii Eastw.
Selinocarpus diffusus A.Gray
Humulus lupulus subsp. americanus (Nutt.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Cerastium nutans var. brachypodum Engelm. ex A.Gray
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. nauseosus
Erigeron controversus Greene
Grindelia brownii A.Heller
Hymenopappus robustus Greene
Machaeranthera linearis Rydb.
Trimorpha elongata (Ledeb.) Vierh.
Desmanthus jamesii Torr. & A.Gray
Aristida wrightii Nash
Elyonurus muticus (Spreng.) Kuntze
Pterogonum hieracifolium (Benth.) H.Gross
Alsinanthe macrantha (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Eremogone hookeri subsp. desertorum (Maguire) W.A.Weber
Nuttallia rusbyi (Wooton) Rydb.
Acosta diffusa (Lam.) Soják
Tetraneuris acaulis var. arizonica (Greene) K.L.Parker
Oligosporus caudatus (Michx.) Poljakov
Stenotus falcatus (Lindl.) Rydb.
Phaseolus dilatatus Wooton & Standl.
Ceratochloa arizonica (Shear) Holub
Eragrostis bicolor Nees
Fallopia convolvulus Linnaeus, 1753
Polygonum rurivagum Jord. ex Boreau
Gastrolychnis kingii (S.Watson) W.A.Weber
Talinum parviflorum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Adoxa moschatellina L.
Oligosporus campestris (L.) Cass.
Pluchea Cass.
Trifolium attenuatum Greene
Muhlenbergia filiculmis Vasey
Poa abbreviata R.Br.
Stellaria longifolia (Regel) Muhl.
Crataegus wootoniana Eggl.
Grammica californica (Choisy) Hadac & Chrtek
Tithymalus uralensis (Fisch. ex Link) Prokh.
Juncus biglumis L.
Bolboschoenus maritimus subsp. fluviatilis (Torr.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Astragalus bryantii Barneby
Persicaria maculata Gray
Colubrina glomerata (Hook. ex Benth.) Hemsl.
Oreocarya echinoides (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Salvia carnosa Douglas ex Benth., 1832
Solanum lycopersicoides Dunal
Echinopepon racemosus (Steud.) C.Jeffrey
Echinocystis minima (S.Watson) Cogn.
Eriogonum agninum Greene
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. auriculatum (Benth.) S.Stokes
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. westonii S.Stokes
Astragalus allanaris E.Sheld.
Trachynia distachya (L.) Link
Aster butleri Rydb.
Eriogonum campanulatum Nutt.
Eriogonum piperi Greene
Phlox woodhousei subsp. oculata A.Nelson
Astragalus goniatus Torr. & A.Gray
Hemizonia oppositifolia Greene
Eriogonum acetoselloides Torr. ex Benth.
Microseris linearifolia (Nutt.) A.Gray, 1874
Eriogonum trilobatum (A.Gray) S.Stokes
Eriogonum fasciculatum subsp. aspalathoides (Gand.) S.Stokes
Hedysarum cinerascens Rydb.
Phlox visenda A.Nelson
Asparagopsis sanfordiana
Cirsium walkerianum Petr.
Eriogonum vimineum subsp. virgatum (Benth.) S.Stokes
Eriogonum nemacaulis S.Stokes
Eriogonum trichopes subsp. clavatum (Small) S.Stokes
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. decurrens S.Stokes
Eriogonum trachygonum Torr. ex Benth.
Malacothrix parviflora Benth.
Allium vineale var. vineale
Cynophalla flexuosa (L.) J.Presl
Lupinus minimus Douglas
Crataegus rivuloadamensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Calamagrostis canadensis subsp. langsdorffii (Link) Hultén
Arabidopsis kamchatica (Fisch. ex DC.) K.Shimizu & Kudoh
Primula mistassinica Michx.
Zingiberopsis isonervosa Hickey, 1977
Sapindus grandifolioloides Knowlton, 1899
Trochodendroides E.W.Berry, 1922
Rhus mixta Lesquereux, 1878
Micropodium Saporta, 1861
Zingiberopsis L.J.Hickey, 1977
Cornus wrightii Knowlton, 1899
Hamamelites inaequalis Brown, 1962
Quercus sullyi Newberry, 1883
Trema Lour.
Rhamnus plenus MacGinitie, 1937
Betula iddingsi Knowlton, 1899
Leguminosites lamarensis Knowlton, 1899
Icacinoxylon pittiense Thayne et al., 1985
Pyrenacantha Wight
Quercophyllum platanoides MacGinitie, 1941
Quercus magnifolia Knowlton, 1899
Smilax labidurommae Cockerell, 1914
Menispermaceae
Viburnum rotundifolium Lesquereux, 1878
Nyssa californica MacGinitie, 1941
Stillingia casca Hickey, 1977
Hamamelidaceae
Averrhoites L.J.Hickey, 1977
Ailanthus Desf.
Laurinoxylon J.Felix, 1883
Juglans rugosa Lesquereux, 1878
Smilax lamarensis Knowlton, 1899
Populites Göppert, 1829
Carya sessilis MacGinitie, 1941
Inga ionensis MacGinitie, 1941
Malapoenna Adans.
Sapindus grandifoliolus Ward, 1887
Caesalpinia spokanensis Knowlton, 1926
Asclepiadites laterita MacGinitie, 1941
Dillenites E.W.Berry, 1916
Opuntia aciculata Griffiths
Croton pottsii var. thermophilus (M.C.Johnst.) M.C.Johnst.
Begonia paranaensis Brade
Eriogonum depressum (Blank.) Rydb.
Woodfordia fruticosa (L.) Kurz
Habenaria michaelii Greene
Boechera rigidissima (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Spiranthes lacera (Raf.) Raf.
Micropleura renifolia Lag.
Brachychiton diversifolius R.Br.
Delphinium stachydeum (A.Gray) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Erysimum asperum subsp. capitatum (Douglas) B.L.Turner
Althaea cannabina L.
Hosackia argyraea Greene
Myrrhinium loranthoides (Hook. & Arn.) Burret
Physalis angulata var. pendula (Rydb.) Waterf.
Crusea Schltdl. & Cham.
Fragaria vesca subsp. americana (Porter) Staudt
Poliothyrsis sinensis Oliv.
Vulpia grayi (Abrams) Henrard
Callistemon paludosus F.Muell.
Camptotheca acuminata Decne.
Hookera
Grevillea punicea R.Br.
Hosackia tomentella (Greene) Brand
Phlox douglasii var. diffusa (Benth.) A.Gray
Hoheria glabrata Sprague & Summerh.
Leptospermum myrtifolium Sieber ex DC.
Calliandra houstonii Benth.
Hypericum uliginosum Kunth
Silene pendula L.
Cenchrus villosus (Spreng.) Spreng.
Lhotskya brevifolia Schauer
Mimosa ramulosa Benth.
Brachyotum radula Triana
Arisaema triphyllum var. stewardsonii (Britton) Stevens
Moussonia elegans Decne.
Lithospermum mediale I.M.Johnst.
Begonia wallichiana Lehm.
Carex rariflora (Wahlenb.) Sm.
Acacia pravissima F.Muell.
Sagittaria greggii J.G.Sm.
Phaseolus formosus Kunth
Sabazia pinetorum S.F.Blake
Spermacoce L.
Ficus brandegeei Standl.
Plantago linearis Kunth
Brassica nigra Linnaeus, 1753
Hamelia Jacq.
Kunzea recurva Schauer
Selago thunbergii Choisy
Muhlenbergia torreyi Hitchc., 1919
Myoporum viscosum R.Br.
Ectosperma alexandrae Swallen
Draba nemorosa var. hebecarpa Lindblom
Allamanda neriifolia Hook.
Eucalyptus linearis Dehnh.
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. stellatum (Benth.) S.Stokes
Poa canbyi (Scribn.) Piper
Colubrina elliptica (Sw.) Brizicky & W.L.Stern
Acacia ramulosa var. linophylla (W.Fitzg.) Pedley
Cyperus prolifer Lam.
Swainsona Salisb.
Muehlenbeckia tamnifolia (Kunth) Meisn.
Ceratopetalum gummiferum Sm.
Melaleuca violacea Schauer
Acacia decurrens var. pauciglandulosa (F.Muell. ex Benth.) Maiden
Myosurus egglestonii Wooton & Standl.
Peritoma multicaulis (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) Iltis
Passiflora herbertiana Ker Gawl.
Physaria kingii subsp. diversifolia (Greene) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Allium maritimum Torr.
Goodyera repens var. ophioides Fernald
Penstemon antirrhinoides subsp. microphyllus (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Horkelia californica var. cuneata A.Gray
Erysimum asperum var. pumilum S.Watson
Melaleuca scabra R.Br.
Begonia maculata Raddi
Delphinium depauperatum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Kniphofia uvaria (L.) Hook., 1854
Gliricidia sepium (Jacq.) Kunth ex Walp.
Ornithogalum nutans L.
Hudsonia montana Nutt.
Arabis alpina L.
Picradeniopsis oppositifolia (Nutt.) Rydb.
Oxalis brasiliensis Lodd. ex Hildebr.
Astragalus ackermanii Barneby
Solanum pyracanthon Jacq.
Astragalus bisulcatus var. haydenianus (A.Gray ex Brandegee) M.E.Jones
Tanacetum vulgare subsp. boreale (Fisch. ex DC.) A, 1975
Tetrapogon brandegeei (Vasey) P.M.Peterson
Puccinellia stricta (Hook.f.) Blom
Eriogonum strictum subsp. strictum
Ulmus davidiana Planch.
Centaurea thuillieri J.Duvign. & Lambinon
Conicosia pugioniformis subsp. pugioniformis
Sisyrinchium minus Engelm. & A.Gray
Rumex britannica L.
Aspicarpa hyssopifolia A.Gray
Dichanthelium sphaerocarpon (Elliott) Gould
Festuca rosei Piper
Aristida spanospicula Allred, Valdés-Reyna & Sánchez-Ken
Triniochloa laxa Hitchc.
Peyritschia deyeuxioides (Kunth) Finot
Festuca breviglumis Swallen
Chaboissaea decumbens (Swallen) Reeder & C.Reeder
Calamagrostis pringlei Beal
Setariopsis latiglumis (Vasey) Scribn.
Bromus carinatus var. californicus Shear
Sporobolus junceus (P.Beauv.) Kunth
Aristida appressa Vasey
Trisetum filifolium var. aristatum Scribn., 1896
Eragrostis pringlei Mattei
Lasiacis compacta (Sw. ex Wikstr.) Hitchc.
Oxalis corniculata var. atropurpurea Planch.
Habenaria unalaschensis (Spreng.) S.Watson
Orobanche ludoviciana var. cooperi (Gray) Beck
Astragalus hookerianus D.Dietr.
Celosia plumosa (Voss) Burv.
Dodecatheon cleavelandii Greene
Eriogonum baileyi subsp. elegans (Greene) Munz
Montia heterophylla (Torr. & A.Gray) Jeps.
Montia asarifolia (Bong.) Howell
Allium attenuifolium Kellogg
Allium minimum M.E.Jones
Oxalis spiralis G.Don
Astragalus coulteri Benth.
Eriogonum ovalifolium subsp. eximium (Tidestr.) S.Stokes
Astragalus lentiginosus var. negundo Barneby
Astragalus lentiginosus var. cuspidocarpus (E.Sheld.) M.E.Jones
Astragalus lentiginosus var. coulteri (Benth.) M.E.Jones
Polygonum reynoutria (Houtt.) Makino
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. celsum A.Nelson
Habenaria orbiculata (Pursh) Hook.
Lotus douglasii var. nevadensis Ottley
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. saxicola (A.Heller) S.Stokes
Eriogonum nodosum Small
Eschscholzia tenuissima Greene
Lesquerella kingii var. kingii
Cylindropuntia acanthocarpa subsp. coloradensis (L.D.Benson) U.Guzmán
Delphinium cucullatum A.Nelson
Astragalus trichopodus subsp. trichopodus
Brodiaea synandra (A.Heller) Jeps.
Brodiaea ida-maia (Alph.Wood) Greene
Eriogonum vimineum var. californicum Gand.
Capnoides cusickii (S.Watson) A.Heller
Montia sibirica var. heterophylla (Torr. & A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Aconogonum phytolaccifolium (Meisn. ex Small) Small ex Rydb.
Pyrola asarifolia var. bracteata (Hook.) Jeps.
Draba oligosperma subsp. subsessilis (S.Watson) A.E.Murray
Draba glacialis Adams
Downingia bicornuta var. montana (Greene) Jeps.
Acer platanoides var. crispum Spach
Stillingia linearifolia var. paucidentata (S.Watson) Jeps.
Phlox caespitosa subsp. pulvinata Wherry
Euphorbia milii Des Moul.
Euphorbia hirtula Engelm. ex S.Watson
Bromus molliformis J.Lloyd ex Billot
Potamogeton lucens L.
Arabis fendleri var. fendleri
Calyptridium parryi subsp. nevadense (J.T.Howell) Munz
Eriogonum panamintense subsp. panamintense
Ceanothus macrocarpus Nutt.
Steironema ciliatum (L.) Baudo
Delphinium variegatum var. apiculatum Greene
Eriogonum umbellatum var. croceum Stokes ex Davis
Ceanothus ramulosus var. fascicularis McMinn
Avena fatua var. glabrata Peterm.
Schizococcus myrtifolius (Parry) Eastw.
Rumex paucifolius var. minusculus J.T.Howell
Eriogonum nudum subsp. saxicola (A.Heller) Munz
Eburophyton austiniae (A.Gray) A.Heller
Eriogonum trachygonum Torr.
Calandrinia caulescens Phil.
Draba argyraea Rydb.
Raphanus raphanistrum subsp. sativus (L.) Domin
Opuntia horrida Salm-Dyck ex DC.
Phlox caespitosa var. rigida (Benth.) A.Gray
Mammillaria dioica var. incerta (Parish) Munz
Platystemon penicillatus Greene
Platystemon turbinatus Greene
Chorizanthe insignis Curran
Hirsheldia incana (L.) Lagr.-Foss.
Crunocallis chamissoi (Ledeb. ex Spreng.) Rydb.
Delphinium hansenii var. arcuatum Greene
Agropyron violaceum (Hornem.) Lange
Montia perfoliata var. parviflora (Douglas) Jeps.
Symphoricarpos vaccinoides Rydb.
Agropyron sibiricum (Willd.) P.Beauv.
Ranunculus californicus var. crassifolius Greene
Raphanus raphanistrum var. sativus (L.) Beck
Plumbago capensis Thunb.
Armeria maritima var. californica (Boiss. ex DC.) G.H.M.Lawr.
Carduus occidentalis Nutt.
Quercus induta Blume
Rumex salicifolius var. montigenitus Jeps.
Aloe ciliaris Haw.
Atractylodes DC.
Aster tataricus L.fil.
Euryale ferox Salisb. ex K.D.Koenig & Sims
Elettaria cardamomum (L.) Maton
Chenopodium graveolens var. neomexicanum (Aellen) Aellen
Ficus cotonifolia Stokes
Xylosma panamensis Turcz.
Frankenia gypsophila I.M.Johnst.
Artemisia tridentata subsp. trifida H.M.Hall & Clem.
Caesalpinia crista L.
Heteropterys arborescens Brandegee
Alkanna Tausch
Cynanchum atratum Bunge
Bupleurum L.
Heteranthera peduncularis Benth.
Polygala chiapensis Blake
Sida linifolia Cav.
Arbutus tomentosa Pursh
Passiflora arida var. pentaschista Killip
Polemonium albiflorum Eastw.
Lupinus polyphyllus Ch.Anders.
Echeveria coccinea (Cav.) DC.
Eucryphia lucida (Labill.) Baill.
Anemone narcissiflora L.
Astragalus harwoodii (Munz & McBurney) Abrams
Beloperone purpusii Brandegee
Labiatae
Goodyera pubescens (Willd.) R.Br.
Harfordia fruticosa Greene & Parry
Sedum craigii R.T.Clausen
Scirpus tabernaemontani C.C.Gmel.
Ampelopsis denudata Planch.
Juncus effusus var. decipiens Buchenau
Lasianthaea fruticosa (L.) K.Becker
Aloe claviflora Burch.
Pausinystalia johimbe (K.Schum.) Pierre ex Beille
Hypericum schaffneri S.Watson
Luffa quinquefida (Hook. & Arn.) Seem.
Helichrysum Mill.
Graphephorum pringlei Scribn. ex Beal
Peumus boldus Molina
Momordica L.
Cryptotaenia japonica Hassk.
Drymaria townsendii B.L.Rob., 1900
Loeselia mexicana (Lam.) Brand
Piper kadsura (Choisy) Ohwi
Lepidium granulare Rose
Potentilla gracilis subsp. gracilis
Cologania procumbens Kunth
Carpesium abrotanoides L.
Elsholtzia splendens Nakai ex F.Maek.
Marsdenia eriocaulis Kerr
Weinmannia silvicola L.f.
Eupatorium fortunei Turcz.
Phellodendron Rupr.
Habenaria schaffneri S.Watson
Tetraclea A.Gray
Bambusa purpurascens (Hack.) Makino
Ventilago leiocarpa Benth.
Cereus gummosus Engelm.
Cremastopus minimus (S.Watson) Paul G.Wilson
Aceraceae
Dipsacus fullonum var. sativus L.
Solanum annuum C.V.Morton
Aloe ferox Mill.
Sansevieria hyacinthoides (L.) Druce
Passiflora incarnata L.
Zigadenus venenosus var. gramineus (Rydb.) O.S.Walsh ex C.L.Hitchc.
Leucophyllum mojinense Henrickson & T.Van Devender
Coix lacryma L.
Terminalia L.
Dictyanthus tuberosus B.L.Rob.
Porophyllum porfyreum Rose & Standl.
Erigeron pumilus var. intermedius (Cronquist) S.L.Welsh
Dioscorea hispida Dennst.
Triteleiopsis Hoover
Mahonia higginsiae (Munz) Ahrendt
Desmanthus pumilus (Schltdl.) J.F.Macbr.
Talauma A.Juss.
Callirhoe Nutt.
Hexalectris parviflora L.O.Williams
Sabal minor (Jacq.) Pers.
Cnidoscolus Pohl
Acsmithia Hoogland
Kallstroemia californica var. californica
Striga asiatica (L.) Kuntze
Phemeranthus parvulus (Rose & Standl.) D.J.Ferguson & T.M.Price
Nicotiana attenuata Steud.
Corchorus L.
Echium fastuosum Aiton
Hypericum japonicum Thunb.
Sanvitalia tenuis S.Watson
Cornus sericea var. occidentalis Torr. & A.Gray
Bidens bigelovii var. angustiloba (DC.) Ballard ex Melchert
Schizocarpum Schrad.
Borreria remota (Lam.) Bacigalupo & E.L.Cabral
Dodonaea boroniifolia G.Don
Erigeron culbertsonii Greene
Acacia longifolia Paxton
Puccinellia rupestris (With.) Fernald & Weath.
Epilobium subdentatum (Meyen) Lievens & Hoch
Ipomoea chilopsidis Standl.
Osmanthus americanus Benth. & Hook.f., 1876
Dendrobium moniliforme (L.) Sw.
Citrus medica var. sarcodactylis (Noot.) Swingle
Scrophularia kakudensis Franch.
Cereus pecten-aboriginum Engelm. ex S.Watson
Betula ×utahensis Dugle
Euphorbia espirituensis M.E.Jones
Copaifera L.
Cucumis metulifer E.Mey. ex Naudin
Parthenium stramonium Greene
Cuphea wrightii var. meionandra (Koehne) S.A.Graham
Wedelia Jacq.
Artemisia apiacea Hance
Trachyspermum ammi (L.) Sprague
Leptandra virginica (L.) Nutt.
Eragrostis curvula var. conferta Nees
Lobelia chinensis Lour.
Euphorbia canariensis L.
Drosera burmannii Vahl
Cydonia Tourn. ex Mill
Critonia P.Browne
Crypsinna breviglumis M.E.Jones
Lyrocarpa Hook. & Harv.
Cleyera theaeoides (Sw.) Choisy
Aconitum coreanum (H.Lév.) Rapaics
Ilex pubescens Hook. & Arn.
Pouzolzia guatemalana var. guatemalana
Lotus guadalupensis Greene
Wasabia japonica (Miq.) Matsum.
Crotalaria bupleurifolia var. bupleurifolia
Nemoseris neomexicana (A.Gray) Greene
Imperata Cirillo
Vigna umbellata (Thunb.) Ohwi & H.Ohashi
Convolvulus occidentalis Gray
Erythrina lanata Rose
Mesosphaerum suaveolens (L.) Kuntze
Houstonia asperuloides (Benth.) A.Gray
Hemizonia paniculata var. paniculata
Loasa acerifolia Dombey ex A.Juss.
Sporobolus racemosus Vasey
Chaetochloa rigida Scribn. & Merr.
Malacothamnus paniculatus (A.Gray) Kearney
Cnidium monnieri (L.) Cusson
Kaempferia galanga L.
Indigofera trita subsp. scabra (Roth) de Kort & G.Thijsse
Penstemon antirrhinoides Benth. ex A.DC.
Dodecatheon pulchellum var. monanthum (Greene) B.Boivin
Terraria haydenii T.J.Hildebr. & Al-Shehbaz
Jatropha purpura Rose & Pax
Momordica grosvenorii Swingle
Lindera strychnifolia (Siebold & Zucc.) Fern.-Vill.
Cimicifuga Wernisch.
Casuarina L.
Prunus tikalana Lundell
Pectis stenophylla var. biaristata (Rydb.) D.J.Keil
Thalictrum grandifolium S.Watson
Passiflora membranacea Benth.
Porophyllum pinifolium Rydb.
Triplaris Loefl. ex L.
Cola Schott & Endl.
Smilax bockii Warb.
Erigeron ovinus Cronquist
Benincasa pruriens (Parkinson) De Wild. & Duyfjes
Scaevola plumieri (L.) Vahl
Elytrigia smithii (Rydb.) Á.Löve
Lupinus argenteus J.Agardh
Euphorbia caput-medusae L.
Passiflora biflora Lam.
Pogostemon Desf.
Curcuma L.
Cassia occidentalis L.
Physalis mollis Nutt.
Coursetia axillaris J.M.Coult. & Rose
Chamaemelum nobile L.
Moringa Adans.
Hoffmannia cuneatissima B.L.Rob.
Atriplex canescens var. occidentalis (Torr. & Frém.) S.L.Welsh & Stutz
Utricularia livida E.Mey.
Glandularia canadensis (L.) Nutt.
Pilocarpus Vahl
Homalomena occulta (Lour.) Schott
Plantago spinulosa Decne.
Corydalis yanhusuo W.T.Wang ex Z.Y.Su & C.Y.Wu
Piper leucophyllum (Miq.) C.DC.
Cowania stansburyana Torr.
Curcuma longa L.
Amphipappus spinosus (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Capsicum annuum var. annuum
Solanum nannodes Correll
Solidago altissima var. gilvocanescens (Rydb.) Semple
Gilia micrantha Steud.
Trichosanthes L.
Commelina erecta subsp. erecta
Silene verecunda var. andersonii (Clokey) N.H.Holmgren & P.K.Holmgren
Yucca thornberi McKelvey
Bauhinia Plum. ex L.
Lavendula P.Miller, 1754
Stachytarpheta angustifolia (Mill.) Vahl
Diplachne tracyi Vasey
Bletia purpurea (Lam.) A.DC.
Ackama A.Cunn.
Ulmus fulva Michx.
Psidium oligospermum Mart. ex DC.
Condalia obtusifolia (Hook. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Weberb.
Ditaxis palmeri (S.Watson) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Lycium fremontii subsp. viscidum Wiggins
Hexachlamys edulis (Berg) Kausel & D.Legrand
Freesia leichtlinii Klatt
Eriastrum ertterae D.Gowen
Gonolobus naturalistae M.G.Chávez, Pío-León & L.O.Alvarado
Artemisia stelleriana Besser
Primula egaliksensis Wormsk. ex Hornem.
Rhododendron ponticum L.
Halimium chihuahuense (S.Watson) Grosser
Halimium pringlei Grosser, 1903
Eryngium madrense S.Watson
Boechera horizontalis (Greene) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Rosa gymnocarpa subsp. helleri (Greene) Ertter & W.H.Lewis
Festuca trachyphylla (Hack.) Hack.
Malva trimestris (L.) Salisb.
Oenothera gaura W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Sedum pallidum M.Bieb.
Tephrosia capensis (Jacq.) Pers.
Pediocactus peeblesianus subsp. peeblesianus
Drosera regia Stephens
Heterotheca vespertina G.L.Nesom
Galactia wrightii var. mollissima Kearney & Peebles
Carex vallicola var. rusbyi (Mack.) F.J.Herm.
Eriosema crinitum var. pulchellum Benth.
Garrya laurifolia subsp. racemosa (Ramírez) Dahling
Ribes ceriferum Coville & Rose
Ancistrotropis peduncularis (Fawc. & Rendle) A.Delgado
Sisyrinchium pringlei B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Capparis atamisquea Kuntze
Leucaena esculenta subsp. paniculata (Britton & Rose) Zárate
Opuntia feracantha Britton & Rose
Erigeron griseus (Greenm.) G.L.Nesom
Eupatorium isolepis B.L.Rob.
Bulbostylis pubescens (C.Presl) Svenson
Chrysanthellum indicum var. mexicanum (Greenm.) B.L.Turner, 1982
Croton fantzianus F.Seym.
Centaurium quitense (Kunth) B.Rob.
Trichilia P.Browne
Physalis hederifolia var. puberula A.Gray
Oenothera deltoides var. typica Munz
Sympetaleia aurea A.Gray
Senecio watsonii Greenm.
Blechum pyramidatum (Lam.) Urb.
Perymenium pringlei var. lancifolium (S.F.Blake) J.J.Fay
Guardiola rosei B.L.Rob.
Fraxinus trialata Buckley
Sicyos microphyllus Kunth
Mammillaria huitzilopochtli D.R.Hunt
Pinaropappus roseus var. foliosus (A.Heller) Shinners
Piper villiramulum C.DC.
Tridax tenuifolia var. tenuifolia
Capsicum annuum var. minimum (Mill.) Heiser
Triumfetta grandiflora Vahl
Lygodesmia thurberi (A.Gray) Shinners
Echeandia Ortega
Lippia origanoides Kunth
Randia watsonii B.L.Rob.
Chamaesyce leucophylla (Benth.) Millsp.
Drymaria villosa subsp. villosa
Petalonyx Gray
Passiflora porphyretica var. angustata Killip
Acaciella tequilana (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Fraxinus pennsylvanica subsp. velutina (Torr.) G.S.Mill.
Phaseolus lunatus var. silvester Baudet
Ferocactus emoryi var. rectispinus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Bursera covillei (Rose) Engl.
Cologania pallida Rose
Apatzingania Dieterle
Ramirezella strobilophora (B.L.Rob.) Rose
Russelia polyedra Zucc.
Physalis latiphysa Waterf.
Brahea Mart. ex Endl
Muhlenbergia pereilema P.M.Peterson
Euphorbia strigosa Hook. & Arn.
Tidestromia Standl.
Buddleja marrubiifolia subsp. occidentalis E.M.Norman
Physalis chenopodifolia Lam.
Mortonia palmeri Hemsl.
Ipomoea populina House
Acacia mammifera Schltdl.
Oreopanax peltatus Linden ex Regel
Pilocereus alensis F.A.C.Weber ex Gosselin
Tephrosia leiocarpa var. leiocarpa
Packera quebradensis (Greenm.) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Cuscuta boldinghii Urb.
Cleome melanosperma S.Watson
Rumex dentatus subsp. klotzschianus (Meisn.) Rech.fil.
Metastelma multiflorum S.Wats
Lappula redowskii subsp. occidentalis (S.Watson) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Talinum multiflorum Rose & Standl.
Proboscidea fragrans (Lindl.) Decne.
Helenium chihuahuensis Bierner
Dalea urceolata var. urceolata
Salvia regla Cav.
Stachys parvifolia M.Martens & Galeotti
Machaerocereus eruca (Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Abutilon ellipticum Schltdl.
Croton tenuilobus S.Watson
Eysenhardtia byei Cruz Durán & M.Sousa
Spilanthes urens Jacq.
Alnus acuminata subsp. arguta (Schltdl.) Furlow
Cuscuta mitriformis Engelm.
Trophis racemosa (L.) Urb.
Astragalus sinaloae Barneby
Physalis ampla Waterf.
Melampodium rosei B.L.Rob.
Oenothera primiveris var. primiveris
Lycium macrodon var. dispermum (Wiggins) F.Chiang
Polygonum acre Lam.
Castela retusa Liebm.
Dichanthelium laxiflorum (Lam.) Gould
Aristolochia littoralis Parodi
Carex longicaulis Boeckeler
Chlorophora tinctoria (L.) Gaudich.
Metastelma cuneatum Brandegee
Lantana hirta Graham
Lupinus concinnus var. brevior (Jeps.) D.B.Dunn
Scutellaria horridula Epling
Acaciella angustissima var. angustissima
Acalypha skutchii I.M.Johnst.
Matelea trachyantha (Greenm.) W.D.Stevens
Thymophylla setifolia Lag.
Desmanthus obtusus S.Watson
Sapium biglandulosum (L.) Müll.Arg.
Viguiera palmeri A.Gray
Euphorbia vallis-mortuae (Millsp.) J.T.Howell
Ceanothus ferox Standl.
Stachytarpheta incana Moldenke
Eurotia lanata (Pursh) K.Koch
Heterotheca inuloides Cass.
Dalea quercetorum Standl. & L.O.Williams
Ziziphus lloydii (Standl.) M.C.Johnst.
Suaeda mexicana (Standl.) Standl.
Bernardia cinerea Wiggins & Rollins
Verbesina venosa Greene
Deiregyne eriophora (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) Garay
Sphaeralcea emoryi var. arida (Rose) Kearney
Acacia rigens A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Lathyrus strictus var. barbarae (T.G.White) Jeps.
Grevillea banksii R.Br.
Senecio lewisrosei Howell
Muntingia calabura L.
Trichanthera gigantea Humb. & Bonpl. ex Steud.
Justicia betonica L.
Anisacanthus quadrifidus var. wrightii (Torr.) Henrickson
Aphelandra fasciculata Wassh.
Justicia brasiliana Roth
Escallonia macrantha Hook. & Arn.
Oxalis martiana Zucc.
Toxicoscordion fremontii var. minor (Baker) R.R.Gates
Lotus leucophyllus Greene
Lathyrus vestitus var. puperulus (T.G.White ex Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Veratrum L.
Rhus trilobata var. malacophylla (Greene) Munz
Saintpaulia ionantha H.Wendl.
Aloe castanea Schönland
Machaeranthera orcuttii (Vasey & Rose) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Corethrogyne filaginifolia var. rigida (Benth.) A.Gray
Lilium longiflorum var. eximium Baker
Musa paradisiaca var. sapientum (L.) Kuntze
Erigeron linifolius Bertero ex DC.
Chrysopsis villosa var. echioides (Benth.) A.Gray
Acacia decurrens var. mollis Lindl.
Billbergia morelii Brongn.
Arecastrum romanzoffianum (Cham.) Becc.
Chamaedorea costaricana Oerst.
Chamaedorea tepejilote Liebm.
Chamaedorea seifrizii Burret
Dieffenbachia picta Schott
Philodendron Schott
Dalea fremontii var. californica (S.Watson) McMinn
Viola saxatilis F.W.Schmidt
Nierembergia scoparia Sendtn.
Lycium richii var. hassei (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Smilacina racemosa var. glabra (J.F.Macbr.) H.St.John
Oenothera claviformis var. purpurascens (S.Watson) Munz
Philadelphus incanus Koehne
Acacia kempeana F.Muell.
Brunfelsia pauciflora var. calycina (Benth. ex DC.) J.A.Schmidt
Cestrum purpureum (Lindl.) Standl.
Acacia subporosa F.Muell.
Cortaderia atacamensis (Phil.) Pilg.
Vinca rosea L.
Sidalcea malvaeflora (DC.) A.Grey ex Benth.
Polygala ×dalmaisiana Neumann
Polygala subspinosa var. heterorhynca Barneby
Epidendrum radicans Pav. ex Lindl.
Cattleya mossiae C.Parker ex Hook.
Cymbidium Sw.
Agrostis nigra With.
Agrostis stolonifera var. maior (Gaudin) Farw.
Acacia trineura F.Muell.
Baeria chrysostoma var. gracilis (DC.) H.M.Hall
Baeria chrysostoma subsp. gracilis (DC.) Ferris
Matricaria suaveolens (Pursh) Schinz & Thell.
Langloisia Greene
Fuchsia boliviana Carrière
Gilia nyensis Reveal
Gilia arizonica (Greene) Rydb.
Anemone quinquefolia var. grayi (Kellogg & Behr) Jeps.
Barleria L.
Thunbergia erecta (Benth.) T.Anderson
Barleria oenotheroides Dum.Cours.
Cakile edentula subsp. californica (A.Heller) Hultén
Ecbolium viride (Forssk.) Alston
Whitfieldia elongata (P.Beauv.) de Wild. & T.Durand
Ruspolia seticalyx (C.B.Clarke) Milne-Redh.
Dyschoriste thunbergiiflora (S.Moore) Lindau
Convolvulus malacophylla Greene
Convolvulus purpuratus Greene
Oenothera heterochroma S.Watson
Oenothera dentata var. campestris (Greene) Jeps.
Oenothera kernensis subsp. gilmanii (Munz) Munz
Oenothera claviformis var. peirsonii Munz
Oenothera claviformis var. aurantiaca Munz
Veronica speciosa R.Cunn. ex A.Cunn.
Datura tatula L.
Eriophyllum integrifolium (Hook.) Greene
Lupinus albifrons var. hallii (Abrams) Jeps.
Betula populifolia Marshall
Solidago pumila (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Oenothera munzii Raven
Oenothera boothii subsp. condensata (Munz) Munz
Oenothera boothii subsp. intermedia Munz
Lupinus andersonii var. christinae (A.Heller) Munz
Dracaena australis G.Forst.
Phormium tenax var. variegatum W.Holloway
Oenothera megalantha (Munz) Raven
Oenothera multijuga var. parviflora (S.Watson) Munz
Aquilegia canadensis f. flaviflora (Tenney) Britton
Condalia lycioides var. canescens (Gray) Trel.
Condea Adans.
Godetia purpurea var. parviflora (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Godetia cylindrica (Jeps.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lupinus albertensis C.P.Sm.
Sapotaceae
Penstemon laetus f. albus P.C.Everett
Glecoma hederacea L.
Penstemon fruticiformis var. incertus (Brandegee) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Pseudopanax K.Koch
Dizygotheca elegantissima (H.J.Veitch ex Mast.) R.Vig. & Guillaumin
Carissa carandas L.
Montia perfoliata var. depressa (A.Gray) Jeps.
Actinea acaulis subsp. arizonica (Greene) S.F.Blake
Anaphalis margaritacea Linnaeus, 1753
Hieracium axiflorum Arv.-Touv. & Briq. ex Briq.
Acer dasycarpum Ehrh.
Maurandya Ortega
Taraxacum vulgare Lam.
Convolvulus fulcratus (A.Gray) Greene
Lessingia germanorum var. glandulifera (A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. hallii Jeps.
Justicia petiolaris (Nees) T.Anderson
Isoglossa grandiflora C.B.Clarke
Barleria albostellata C.B.Clarke
Rubus ursinus var. loganobaccus (L.H.Bailey) L.H.Bailey
Fragaria chiloensis var. ananassa Weston
Dodonaea jamaicensis DC.
Myriophyllum spicatum subsp. exalbescens (Fernald) Hultén
Begonia manicata Brongn.
Sterculia platanifolia L.fil.
Tamarix articulata Vahl
Coleonema pulchellum I.Williams
Mahonia lomariifolia Takeda
Oenothera bistorta var. hallii (Davidson) Jeps.
Oenothera bistorta var. veitchiana Hook.
Oenothera decorticans var. desertorum Munz
Photinia serrulata var. aculeata G.H.M.Lawr.
Potentilla filipes Rydb.
Foeniculum vulgare var. vulgare
Solanum abitaguense S.Knapp
Impatiens holstii Engl. & Warb. ex Engl.
Achillea borealis subsp. arenicola (A.Heller) D.D.Keck
Achillea millefolium subsp. californica (Pollard) H.M.Hall
Franseria acanthicarpa (Hook.) Coville
Cistus villosus var. undulatus Grosser
Gnidia L.
Baileya Harv. & A.Gray ex A.Gray
Barleria heterotricha Lindau
Barleria obtusa Nees
Eucalyptus elaeophora F.Muell.
Brodiaea gracilis S.Watson
Baeria platycarpha (A.Gray) A.Gray
Zebrina Schnizl.
Zebrina pendula Schnizl.
Gasoul crystallinum (L.) Rothm.
Acacia undulifolia A.Cunn. ex G.Don
Albizia polyphylla E.Fourn.
Annona muricata L.
Acacia decurrens var. normalis (Benth.) Maiden
Cordylanthus helleri (Ferris) J.F.Macbr.
Convolvulus longipes S.Watson
Poinciana gilliesii Hook.
Mentha arvensis f. lanigera S.R.Stewart
Lithophragma scabrella (Greene) Greene
Barleria rotundifolia Oberm.
Aralia chinensis Blume
Lesquerella latifolia A.Nelson
Hedera helix var. cavendishii Paul
Senecio pauciflorus var. jucundulus Jeps.
Melia azedarach var. umbraculifera G.W.Knox
Brassica arvensis (L.) Rabenh.
Salix gooddingii var. gooddingii
Ficus microphylla Salzm.
Doxantha unguis-cati (L.) Miers
Dentaria pachystigma S.Watson
Persea americana var. drymifolia (Schltdl. & Cham.) S.F.Blake
Callistemon coccineus F.Muell.
Heuchera rubescens var. elegans (Abrams) Jeps.
Spergularia tenuis (Greene) B.L.Rob.
Verbena canadensis (L.) Britton
Lathyrus ornatus Nutt.
Cistus ×lusitanicus Maund.
Monadenia Lindl.
Dodonaea Mill.
Diplachne P.Beauv.
Talinum Adans.
Piptatherum P.Beauv.
Thamnosma Torr. & Frém.
Piperia dilatata (Pursh) Szlach. & Rutk.
Panicum angustifolium Elliott
Solidago missouriensis var. tenuissima (Wooton & Standl.) C.E.S.Taylor & R.J.Taylor
Magnolia pacifica subsp. tarahumara Vazquez
Tripsacum laxum Nash
Merostachys Spreng.
Cymopterus megacephalus M.E.Jones
Cercidium torreyanum (S.Watson) Sarg.
Cyperus fendlerianus var. fendlerianus
Rousselia Gaudich.
Euphorbia exstipulata var. lata Warnock & M.C.Johnst.
Jatropha cathartica Terán & Berland.
Verbena elegans Kunth
Morus macrophylla hort. ex Steud.
Rhynchosia americana (Mill.) Metz
Melampodium tenellum Hook. & Arn.
Croton culiacanensis Croizat
Salvia rypara Briq.
Heliocarpus donnellsmithii Rose
Nissolia fruticosa Jacq.
Crotalaria eriocarpa Benth.
Pseudognaphalium semilanatum (DC.) Anderb.
Plantago mexicana Link
Deppea cornifolia (Benth.) Benth.
Desmodium procumbens var. longipes (Schindl.) B.G.Schub.
Metastelma schlechtendalii Decne.
Psychotria L.
Paspalum setaceum var. muhlenbergii (Nash) D.J.Banks
Desmodium guadalajaranum S.Watson
Melothria pringlei (S.Watson) Mart.Crov.
Echinocereus stoloniferus subsp. tayopensis (W.T.Marshall) N.P.Taylor
Muhlenbergia calamagrostidea Kunth
Asarina stricta (Hook. & Arn.) Pennell
Salvia melissodora Lag.
Lithospermum discolor M.Martens & Galeotti
Gaudichaudia diandra (Nied.) Chodat
Tilia americana var. americana
Xanthisma spinulosum var. incisifolium (I.M.Johnst.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Arctostaphylos rupestris Rob. & Seaton
Verbena perennis Wooton
Brickellia vernicosa B.L.Rob.
Opuntia wigginsii L.D.Benson
Lomatium martindalei var. flavum (G.N.Jones) Cronquist
Cercidium peninsulare Rose
Fraxinus jonesii Lingelsh.
Cryptantha ramosa (Willd. ex Lehm.) Greene
Buchnera pusilla Kunth
Opuntia kleiniae var. tetracantha (Toumey) W.T.Marshall
Stevia pilosa Lag.
Yabea Koso-Pol.
Stachys bigelovii A.Gray
Ferocactus cylindraceus subsp. tortulispinus (H.E.Gates) N.P.Taylor
Solanum reflexum Schrank
Quercus glaucoides M.Martens & Galeotti
Geraea canescens var. paniculata (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Hybanthus mexicanus Ging.
Prunus rhamnoides Koehne
Euryops (Cass.) Cass.
Athanasia pinnata L.fil.
Packera pseudaurea var. semicordata (Mack. & Bush) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Scleria muehlenbergii Steud.
Piptatherum miliaceum E.Fourn., 1866
Mentzelia oligosperma Nutt. ex Sims
Crocosmia paniculata (Klatt) Goldblatt
Epilobium nivium Brandegee
Artemisia tridentata subsp. xericensis Winward ex Winward
Justicia hilsenbeckii T.F.Daniel
Salix exigua var. sericans (Nees) Dorn
Gardenia jasminoides J.Ellis
Sporobolus michauxianus (Hitchc.) P.M.Peterson & Saarela
Aphyllon multiflorum (Nutt.) A.Gray
Cynoglossum creticum Mill.
Physaria gooddingii (Rollins & E.A.Shaw) O'Kane & Al-Shehbaz
Centaurea psammogena Gáyer
Crassula muscosa L.
Suaeda maritima (L.) Dumort.
Iris nelsonii Randolph
Echinocactus horizonthalonius subsp. horizonthalonius
Erythranthe willisii G.L.Nesom
Pyrus communis subsp. pyraster Schübl. & G.Martens, 1834
Senna artemisioides nothosubsp. coriacea (Benth.) Randell
Osteospermum incanum Burm.fil.
Malaxis abieticola Salazar & Soto Arenas
Stellaria americana (Porter ex B.L.Rob.) Standl.
Pappophorum bicolor E.Fourn.
Ambrosia coronopifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Besseya cinerea (Raf.) Pennell
Epicampes crassiculmis Piper
Astragalus fastidiosus Greene
Chaetopappa bellidifolia (A.Gray & Engelm. ex A.Gray) Shinners
Sieversia triflora (Pursh) R.Br.
Ibervillea insularis (Brandegee) Wiggins
Melica subulata var. pammelii (Scribn.) C.L.Hitchc.
Crataegus chrysocarpa var. vernonensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Salix sessilifolia var. vancouverensis Brayshaw
Crataegus sheridana A.Nelson
Crataegus okanaganensis var. okanaganensis
Crataegus rivulopugnensis J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Crataegus cupressocollina J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Crataegus rubribracteolata J.B.Phipps & O'Kennon
Crataegus okanaganensis var. longispina J.B.Phipps
Crataegus ×media Bechst.
Crataegus sanguinea Pall.
Crataegus phaenopyrum (L.fil.) Borkh.
Crataegus wattiana Hemsl. & Lace
Crataegus macracantha var. pertomentosa (Ashe) Kruschke
Stephanandra incisa (Thunb.) Zabel
Crataegus germanica (L.) K.Koch
Crataegus lumaria Ashe
Neillia sinensis Oliv.
Crataegus mexicana Mo. & Sess
Dryas drummondii Richardson
Dichotomanthes tristaniicarpa Kurz
Citrus trifoliata hort. ex M.Roem.
Solidago multiradiata subsp. multiradiata
Galanthus woronowii Losinsk.
Centaurium pulchellum (Sw.) Druce
Physaria newberryi subsp. newberryi
Opuntia fragilis var. fragilis
Aphyllon corymbosum subsp. mutabile (Heckard) A.C.Schneid.
Hypericum tetrapterum Fries
Erythranthe thermalis (A.Nelson) G.L.Nesom
Trichocentrum brachyphyllum (Lindl.) R.Jiménez
Physocarpus monogynus (Torr.) Kuntze
Anemonastrum richardsonii (Hook.) Mosyakin
Argentina egedei (Wormsk.) Rydb.
Carduus L.
Spiraea thunbergii Siebold ex Blume
Valerianella eriocarpa Desv.
Annona squamosa L.
Symphoricarpos ×chenaultii Rehder
Bidens brandegeei Sherff
Calochortus longibarbatus var. peckii Ownbey
Salsola kali subsp. ruthenica (Iljin) Soó
Callitriche heterophylla subsp. heterophylla
Opuntia trichophora (Engelm. & Bigelow) Britton & Rose
Malephora purpureocrocea (Haw.) Schwantes
Rosa dumalis Bechst.
Persicaria microcephala (Wall. ex D.Don) Sasaki
Hedyosmum Sw.
Lithocarpus Blume
Polygonum persicaria Wahlenb. ex Nyman, 1881
Typhaceae
Notholithocarpus Manos, Cannon & S.H.Oh
Sedum stenopetalum var. subalpinum Fröd.
Cryptopleura brevis Gardner, 1926
Cardamine lucens Suksd.
Laurentia eximia (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Senecio andersonii C.B.Clarke
Sedum pinetorum Brandegee
Centaurea debeauxii Godr.
Centaurea virgata Lam.
Hieracium caespitosum Dahlst., 1894
Halogeton C.A.Mey.
Hieracium atramentarium (Nägeli & Peter) Zahn
Acaena novae-zelandica Kirk
Polygonum polystachyum Wall., 1829
Prosopis alpataco Phil.
Prosopis argentina Burkart
Ipomoea eriocarpa R.Br.
Cynodon nlemfuensis Vanderyst
Centaurea triumfettii All.
Acacia auriculiformis A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Cinchona officinalis L.
Hypericum boreale (Britton) E.P.Bicknell
Iris douglasiana var. major Torr.
Oxalis bowiei W.T.Aiton ex G.Don
Obione pacifica (A.Nelson) S.C.Sand. & G.L.Chu
Calamintha mimuloides Benth.
Eriogonum trachygonum subsp. wrightii (Torr. ex Benth.) S.Stokes
Oenothera ovata Nutt.
Amsinckia jonesii Suksd.
Mimulus multiflorus Pennell
Polygala rectipilis S.F.Blake
Carex eurycarpa var. attenuata Kük.
Lupinus densiflorus var. austrocollium C.P.Sm.
Spraguea umbellata var. montana M.E.Jones
Bignonia speciosa Graham
Eriophorum brachyantherum Trautv. & C.A.Mey.
Clitoria L.
Ranunculus adoneus var. adoneus
Lupinus volcanicus var. rupestricola C.P.Sm.
Cucurbita perennis A.Gray
Xanthorrhoea arborea R.Br.
Heliconia psittacorum L.f.
Senecio townsendii Greenm.
Senecio thornberi Greenm.
Aconogonon (Meisn.) Rchb.
Alternanthera repens J.F.Gmel.
Cryptantha muriculata var. montana A.Nelson
Erigeron maniopotamicus G.L.Nesom & T.W.Nelson
Descurainia halictorum f. brachypoda O.E.Schulz
Hymenatherum concinnum A.Gray
Peperomia dolabriformis Kunth
Luina Benth.
Claytonia arctica var. megarhiza A.Gray
Calais macrochaeta A.Gray
Apocynum cannabinum var. cannabinum
Sclerocactus pubispinus var. pubispinus
Mentha ×caroliana Sennen
Arabis pratincola Greene
Gilia hookerii Benth.
Arenaria palustris S.Watson
Madronella sessilifolia Rydb.
Erysimum bakeri (Greene) Rydb.
Pachylophis cespitosa (Nutt.) Raim.
Lupinus persistens A.Heller
Begonia vitifolia Schott
Physalis longifolia var. subglabrata (Mack. & Bush) Cronquist
Lupinus superbus var. bernardinus Abrams ex C.P.Sm.
Aliciella tenuis (F.J.Sm. & Neese) J.M.Porter
Aster venustus M.E.Jones
Linaria genistifolia subsp. genistifolia
Lycium hassei Greene
Coryphantha scheerii var. uncinata L.D.Benson
Asclepias cryptoceras var. davisii (Woodson) W.H.Baker
Acacia sieberiana var. woodii (Burtt Davy) Keay & Brenan
Chloroleucon undulatum Britton & Rose
Carex torreyi Tuck.
Aster hallii A.Gray
Turritis lasiophylla Hook. & Arn.
Lathyrus watsonii T.G.White
Lupinus densiflorus var. versabilis C.P.Sm.
Maireana brevifolia (R.Br.) Paul G.Wilson
Euphorbia pediculifera var. minor Millsp.
Gilia jonesii A.Gray
Juncus alpinus subsp. nodulosus (Wahlenb.) Lindm.
Duckeodendron cestroides Kuhlm.
Elymus velutinus Scribn. & Merr.
Batidophaca sabinarum Rydb.
Tetradymia linearis Rydb.
Phyla caespitosa (Rusby) Moldenke
Tupidanthus pueckleri K.Koch
Chrysogonum virginianum var. australe (Alexander ex Small) H.E.Ahles
Habenaria zothecina L.C.Higgins & S.L.Welsh
Teucrium laciniatum Torr.
Alopecurus californicus Vasey
Ptelea ambigens Greene
Cystium tehatchapiense Rydb.
Ribes greeneianum A.Heller
Phlox speciosa var. stansburyi Torr.
Coniothele californica DC.
Astragalus gracilis Nutt.
Geum coccineum Lindl.
Gilia pallida A.Heller
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides var. cheiranthoides
Prunus californica Koehne
Emplectocladus fasciculatus Torr.
Neomammillaria palmeri (Coult.) Britton & Rose
Chamaefistula collinsii Britton & Rose
Carex stellata Mack.
Scutellaria nana var. nana
Astragalus dodgianus M.E.Jones
Arabis arcuata (Nutt.) A.Gray
Sphaeralcea wrightii A.Gray
Eleocharis palustris (L.) R.Br.
Astelia chathamica (Skottsb.) L.B.Moore
Erigeron katiae S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Peucedanum graveolens var. alpinum S.Watson
Limnia hassei Rydb.
Phaca douglasii Torr. & A.Gray
Ficus sonorae S.Watson
Festuca hallii (Vasey) Piper
Zieria pilosa Rudge
Potentilla frondosa Greene
Homalobus plummerae Rydb.
Astragalus cremnophylax var. cremnophylax
Megarrhiza californica Torr.
Trillium sessile var. giganteum Hook. & Arn.
Gaura coccinea var. glabra (Lehm.) Torr. & A.Gray
Psoralea stenophylla Rydb.
Thelypodiopsis barnebyi S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Polymnia maculata Cav.
Primula cusickiana var. nevadensis (N.H.Holmgren) N.H.Holmgren & S.Kelso
Grindelia nana var. integrifolia Nutt.
Lupinus gracilis J.Agardh
Dendromecon leiophylla Greene
Sparganium greenei Morong
Meryta sinclairii (Hook.f.) Seem.
Amsinckia arenaria Suksd.
Arabis rigidissima var. demota Rollins
Haplopappus carthamoides var. cusickii A.Gray
Sphaeromeria compacta (H.M.Hall) A.H.Holmgren, L.M.Shultz & Lowrey
Claytonia parviflora var. sparsiflora Suksd.
Eriophyllum bolanderi Rydb.
Rosa megalantha G.N.Jones
Aconitum ferox Wall.
Homalobus humilis Rydb.
Drymocallis amplifolia Rydb.
Ribes churchii A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Parietaria occidentalis Rydb.
Penstemon cyananthus subsp. longiflorus Pennell
Claytonia tenuifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Sphaeralcea grandiflora Rydb.
Draba mogollonica Greene
Saxifraga fragosa Suksd., 1896
Viola parnassifolia Greene
Anaphalis margaritaceae L.
Schoenocrambe decumbens Rydb.
Lessingia leptoclada var. tenuis A.Gray
Wolffiella Hegelm.
Lycium fremontii var. bigelovii A.Gray
Krynitzkia lithocarya Greene ex A.Gray
Malvastrum fasciculatum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Smilax rotundifolia L.
Achaetogeron purpurascens Greenm.
Carex elrodii M.E.Jones
Phlox amplifolia Britton
Agoseris maritima Eastw.
Pedicularis mogollonica Greene
Penstemon productus Greene
Psoralea rafaelensis var. magna M.E.Jones
Solidago ptarmicoides (Torr. & A.Gray) B.Boivin
Cirsium bernardinum (Greene) Petr.
Aster subracemosus Rydb.
Gunnera manicata Delchev.
Pedicularis ctenophora Rydb.
Lappula ursina Greene
Steviopsis fendleri (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Ligusticum brevilobum Rydb.
Castilleja blumeri Standl.
Rosa greenei Rydb.
Claytonia bulbifera A.Gray
Dyssodia porophylla Lag., 1816
Syrmatium niveum Greene
Angelica lyallii S.Watson
Physaria hemiphysaria var. hemiphysaria
Batidophaca stipulacea Rydb.
Horkelia brownii Rydb.
Hesperastragalus milesianus Rydb.
Juncoides piperi Coville
Erigeron huberi S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Pedicularis angustissima Greene
Zizia aptera var. aptera
Hymenoclea fasciculata A.Nelson
Lupinus pseudoparviflorus Rydb.
Erythronium purpurascens var. uniflorum S.Watson
Linanthastrum nuttallii var. pubescens (R.Patt.) Cronquist
Schotia afra Thunb.
Atriplex subdecumbens M.E.Jones
Thysanocarpus curvipes subsp. madocarpus Piper
Sisymbrium incisum Engelm. ex A.Gray
Silene wrightii A.Gray
Potentilla vreelandii Rydb.
Penstemon lentus subsp. albiflorus D.D.Keck
Sida filicaulis Torr. & A.Gray
Caulanthus hastatus S.Watson
Stachys latipes Greenm.
Circaea alpina var. aleutica Nieuwl.
Ionoxalis metcalfei Small
Ipomoea palmeri S.Watson
Hemizonia leucocephala Tanowitz
Neomammillaria goodridgei (Scheer ex Salm-Dyck) Britton & Rose
Gayophytum hirtellum Greene
Draba maguirei var. maguirei
Laelia purpurata Lindl. & Paxton
Platystemon termini Fedde
Syrmatium dendroideum Greene
Zigadenus intermedius Rydb.
Homalobus uniflorus Rydb.
Eleocharis engelmannii f. leviseta Svenson, 1929
Mertensia leptophylla Piper
Pectis ambigua Fernald
Rosa nutkana subsp. melina (Greene) W.H.Lewis & Ertter
Calandrinia muricata Rydb.
Blepharipappus scaber subsp. scaber
Gentiana amabilis Petrie
Carduus olivescens Rydb.
Stevia lemmonii var. hispidula Grashoff
Cheiranthus aridus A.Nelson
Senecio toiyabensis S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Dichanthelium dichotomum (L.) Gould
Cleomella palmeriana var. goodrichii S.L.Welsh
Crossosoma glaucum Small
Marina victoriae León de la Luz
Orthocarpus mariposanus Congdon
Limnorchis ensifolia Rydb.
Agropyron brevifolium Scribn.
Hosackia argophylla var. fremontii A.Gray
Lithophragma glabrum var. ramulosum (Suksd.) B.Boivin
Chorizanthe californica var. suksdorfii J.F.Macbr.
Eriocarpum scabrellum Greene
Allocarya cervina Piper
Arnica ocreata A.Nelson
Pyrrocoma howellii (A.Gray) Greene
Euphorbia paralias L.
Plectritis anomala var. lactiflora Suksd.
Physalis versicolor var. microphylla Rydb.
Elymus hirtiflorus Hitchc.
Eriophyllum tenuifolium Rydb.
Claytonia caroliniana Michx.
Carex neurochlaena Holm
Delphinium novomexicanum Wooton
Schkuhria anthemoidea var. wislizeni (A.Gray) Heiser
Sedum pruinosum Britton
Mimosa quadrivalvis var. jaliscensis (J.F.Macbr.) Beard ex Barneby
Angelonia angustifolia Benth.
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. rosulatum C.L.Hitchc.
Oxytropis campestris var. davisii S.L.Welsh
Penstemon laricifolius var. exilifolius (A.Nelson) Payson
Sida filiformis A.Cunn.
Astragalus vaseyi S.Watson
Draba fladnizensis var. pattersonii (O.E.Schulz) Rollins
Ilex decidua Walter
Silene drummondii var. striata (Rydb.) Bocquet
Alocasia odora (G.Lodd.) Spach
Arctostaphylos rubra (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Fernald
Monardella villosa var. leptosiphon Torr.
Salix lasiandra var. abramsii C.R.Ball
Poa helleri Rydb.
Schrebera argyrotricha Gilg
Cycladenia jonesii Eastw.
Wedelia stenophylla Merr.
Arabis platysperma var. typica Rollins
Berlandiera ×macrophylla (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Rosa chrysocarpa Rydb.
Camassia quamash var. utahensis (Gould) C.L.Hitchc.
Apocynum ×incanum Greene
Burrielia microglossa DC.
Saxifraga rivularis var. debilis (Engelm. ex A.Gray) Dorn
Trifolium eriocephalum subsp. martini J.M.Gillett
Comandra linearis Rydb.
Saxifraga peltata Torr.
Haplopappus enormidens Moran
Panicum lachnanthum Torr.
Sarcobatus vermiculatus var. vermiculatus
Potentilla concinna var. modesta (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh & B.C.Johnst.
Salix exigua var. luteosericea (Rydb.) C.K.Schneid.
Silene acaulis subsp. subacaulescens (F.N.Williams) Hultén
Waltheria alamosana Standl.
Peucedanum confusum Piper
Salvia lanceolata Brouss.
Cleyera japonica Thunb.
Rosa nutkana var. pallida Suksd.
Sphaeromeria ruthiae A.H.Holmgren, L.M.Shultz & Lowrey
Abronia breviflora Standl.
Bauhinia peninsularis Brandegee
Lycium umbellatum Rose
Arabis pendulocarpa A.Nelson
Hackelia patens var. semiglabra Cronquist
Sisyrinchium lineatum Torr.
Chrysopsis graminifolia var. graminifolia
Thelypodium howellii var. howellii
Frasera nitida var. albida Suksd.
Xylophacos melanocalyx Rydb.
Bidens kelloggii Greene
Stanleya annua M.E.Jones
Alangium Lam.
Albizzia Durazz.
Eucommia Oliv.
Paliurus Mill.
Nymphaeites Sternberg, 1825
Rosa hilariae Juz.
Quercus berryi Trelease, 1918
Diplodipelta S.R.Manchester & M.J.Donoghue, 1995
Cupanites W.P.Schimper, 1874
Chandlera lacunosa Scott, 1954
Columbia Pers.
Pachyphyllum Kunth
Laurus fremontensis (Berry, 1930)
Musophyllum complicatum Lesquereux, 1874
Magnolia magnifolia (Lozano) Govaerts
Magnolia californica Lesquereux, 1878
Ilex acuminata Willd.
Siparuna Aubl.
Viguiera cronquistii B.L.Turner
Platanophyllum Fontaine, 1889
Cornus newberryi Hollick
Acer trilobatum Lam.
Potentilla salwinensis (Soják) Soják
Salix ×wimmeriana Gren. & Godr.
Attalea Kunth
Quercus carmenensis C.H.Mull.
Populus glandulifera Heer
Zelkova ungeri Kovats, 1865
Amborellaceae
Caesalpinites G.de Saporta, 1862
Sapindus affinis (Hickey, 1977)
Laurus primigenia Ung
Fagopsis longifolia Lesquereux, 1909
Rhus obscura M.Bieb.
Quercus pseudoserrata Liou
Prunus scottii Heer
Aralia macrophylla hort.
Cedrelospermum G.Saporta, 1889
Davidia Baill.
Ampelopsis Michx.
Leucaena californica Axelrod, 1939
Paracarpinus S.R.Manchester & P.R.Crane, 1987
Mahonia lobodonta Becker, 1959
Spiraea decumbens Koch
Pithecolobium Benth.
Langtonia E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Chloranthaceae
Myrica serrata Lam.
Laurus grandis Lesquereux, 1883
Kerria DC.
Calyptranthes Sw.
Coccoloba colombiana Howard
Metopium P.Browne
Cissampelos L.
Paulownia Siebold & Zucc.
Laurophyllum litseaefolia MacGinitie, 1941
Diphysa Jacq.
Cinnamomum heerii Berry, 1914
Dryophyllum longipetiolatum (Knowlton, 1899)
Quercus coriacea Bechst.
Castanea pulchella Knowlton, 1899
Colubrina Rich. ex Brongn.
Grewia crenata Hochst. ex Mast.
Gymnocladus Lam.
Chrysobalanus ellipticus Sol. ex Sabine
Combretum Loefl.
Cercocarpus antiquus Lesq.
Apocynophyllum Unger, 1850
Cocculus DC.
Nelumbago McIver & Basinger, 1993
Petrea L.
Spirea Pierre
Canavalia DC.
Nelumbo Adans.
Juglans schimperi Lesquereux, 1878
Florissantia quilchenensis Manchester, 1992
Lomatia R.Br.
Quercus mohavensis Axelrod, 1939
Carpinus lanceolata Hand.-Mazz.
Dalbergia retusa Hemsl.
Sorbus hardeggensis Kovanda
Gordonia Ellis
Microdesmis Planch.
Conzattia Rose
Pterospermites Heer, 1959
Odontocaryoidea nodulosa Scott, 1954
Sapotacites Ettingshausen, 1853
Symplocarpus Salisb. ex W.P.C.Barton
Cercocarpus cuneatus Dorf
Magnolia elliptica (W.T.Aiton) Link
Ficus ungeri Lesquereux, 1878
Pterospermites haguei Knowlton, 1899
Salix stipulacea Mart. & Galeotti
Quercus convexa Lesquereux, 1878
Robinia californica Axelrod, 1939
Quercus scotica Gand.
Populus speciosa Ward
Mallotus Lour.
Ulmus mossii A.Henry ex J.V.Armstr. & P.D.Sell
Meliosma rostellata Crane et al., 1990
Betula fauriei H.Lév. ex Nakai
Symplocos Jacq.
Fagus undulata Knowlton, 1899
Sabia Colebr.
Planera J.F.Gmel.
Celtis kansana Chaney & Elias, 1936
Quercus castaneopsis Lesq.
Corylus macquarryi Heer, 1865
Ficus artocarpoides Warb.
Aristolochia mexicana Kostel.
Tsukada J.A.Wolfe & W.Wehr, 1987
Asimina Adans.
Populus cordata hort.
Quercus dispersa (Dorf, 1878)
Viburnum tinoides L.fil.
Salix rivularis Schleich.
Crataegus flavescens Bosc ex DC.
Quercus tennesi Wesm.
Florissantia speirii Manchester, 1992
Celastrinites Saporta, 1865
Bohlenia J.A.Wolfe & W.Wehr, 1987
Rhus ×milleri R.Fern. & A.Fern.
Cornus kelloggii Lesquereux, 1878
Castanea intermedia Lesquereux, 1878
Nectandra Rol. ex Rottb.
Aralia wrightii Knowlton, 1899
Aralia whitneyi (Lesquereux, 1878)
Anona
Dryandroides Unger, 1850
Ilex affinis Gardner
Ulmus floridana Chapm.
Amesoneuron H.R.Göppert, 1852
Ficus cuneata Hoffmanns.
Ficus planicostata Kunth & C.D.Bouché
Juglans laurifolia Knowlton, 1899
Cyperacites giganteus Knowlton, 1899
Drimys Forster & G.Forst.
Reynosia Griseb.
Cercis spokanensis Knowlt.
Aralia angustiloba (Lesquereux, 1878)
Langeria J.A.Wolfe & W.Wehr, 1987
Rhamnus elegans Kunth
Oenothera strigosa (Rydb.) Mack. & Bush
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. aridum (Greene) S.Stokes
Cornus alba subsp. baileyi (J.M.Coult. & W.H.Evans) Wangerin
Castilleja hispida subsp. acuta Pennell
Chrysopsis villosa var. hispida (Hook.) A.Gray ex D.C.Eaton, 1871
Muhlenbergia asperifolia (Nees & Meyen ex Trin.) Matthei
Jasione montana L.
Cuscuta squamata Engelm.
Randia aculeata L.
Cotyledon orbiculata var. orbiculata
Solanum dulcamara var. dulcamara
Petasites japonicus subsp. japonicus
Aristolochia chilensis Miers
Escobaria robbinsiorum (W.H.Earle) D.R.Hunt
Setaria viridis var. major (Gaudin) Posp.
Plumeria rubra var. acutifolia (Poir.) L.H.Bailey
Corymbia aparrerinja K.D.Hill & L.A.S.Johnson
Osmanthus armatus Diels
Dactylis glomerata subsp. glomerata
Veronica diosmifolia A.Cunn.
Senna reticulata (Willd.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Ficus septica Burm.fil.
Impatiens tricornis Lindl.
Aquilegia atrata Koch
Hemizonia multiglandulosa (DC.) A.Gray
Eriogonum cupulatum S.Stokes
Eriogonum dendroideum (Nutt.) S.Stokes
Acacia rupicola F.Muell. ex Benth.
Stellaria ruderalis M.Lepsí, P.Lepsí, Z.Kaplan & P.Koutecký
Eriogonum vimineum subsp. molestum (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. typicum S.Stokes
Luina hypoleuca var. californica A.Gray
Astragalus wittmannii Barneby
Astragalus triphyllus Pursh
Elymus hystrix L.
Eriogonum trachygonum subsp. membranaceum (S.Stokes ex Jeps.) S.Stokes
Askellia nana (Richards.) W.A.Weber
Haplopappus eastwoodae Hall
Astragalus villosus Michx.
Elymus hondae (Kitag.) S.L.Chen
Ericameria microphylla Nutt.
Agave parviflora subsp. flexiflora Gentry
Pedicularis parryi subsp. purpurea (Parry) G.D.Carr
Metastelma barbigerum Scheele
Watsonia borbonica subsp. ardernei (Sander) Goldblatt
Plumeria obtusa L.
Daphne odora f. marginata Makino
Viola lanceolata L.
Plantago rugelii Decne.
Eriocoma latiglumis (Swallen) Romasch.
Elymus lanceolatus subsp. psammophilus (J.M.Gillett & Senn) Á.Löve
Physaria hitchcockii subsp. hitchcockii
Erechtites minima var. heterophyllus (Colenso) Allan
Coleus scutellarioides (L.) Benth.
Mammillaria grahamii subsp. grahamii
Leptosiphon nuttallii subsp. howellii (T.W.Nelson & R.Patt.) J.M.Porter & L.A.Johnson
Phyla nodiflora var. minor (Gillies & Hook.) N.O'Leary & Múlgura
Guadua longifolia (E.Fourn.) R.W.Pohl
Chusquea liebmannii E.Fourn.
Otatea fimbriata Soderstr.
Chusquea sulcata Swallen
Chusquea glauca L.G.Clark
Guadua aculeata E.Fourn.
Chusquea pittieri Hack.
Otatea glauca L.G.Clark & G.Cortés
Arabis mcdonaldiana Eastw.
Viguiera gentryi B.L.Turner
Bahia dissecta var. anisopappa S.F.Blake
Mabrya geniculata subsp. lanata Elisens
Eriosema laetum I.M.Johnst.
Perityle alamosana B.L.Turner
Arnicastrum glandulosum Greenm.
Heterotheca vandevenderorum B.L.Turner
Sisymbrium wootonii B.L.Rob.
Phaseolus supinus Wiggins & Rollins
Euphorbia chiribensis V.W.Steinm. & Felger
Laennecia pimana G.L.Nesom & Laferr.
Wedelia pimana B.L.Turner
Caesalpinia blasiana M.E.Jones
Geranium albidum Rydb.
Physalis caudella var. parva Waterf.
Agiabampoa congesta Rose ex O.Hoffm.
Cosmos linearifolius var. magnifolius Sherff
Sclerocarpus triunfonis M.E.Jones
Pectis pimana Laferr. & D.J.Keil
Arabis caucasica Willd.
Allium tolmiei Baker ex J.M.Coult.
Quercus germana Schltdl. & Cham.
Carex bebbii Olney ex Britton
Calamagrostis sesquiflora (Trin.) Tzvelev
Sarcomphalus amole (Sessé & Moc.) Hauenschild
Rosa blanda Aiton
Betula papyracea Aiton
Toiyabea alpina (L.C.Anderson & Goodrich) R.P.Roberts, Urbatsch & Neubig
Disporum lanuginosum (Michx.) G.Nicholson
Lythrum hyssopifolium Thunb.
Chandlera R.A.Scott, 1954
Alangiaceae
Allophylus L.
Florissantia F.H.Knowlton, 1916
Theaceae
Aesculus hickeyi Anonymus
Trochodendraceae
Trapago E.McIver & J.F.Basinger, 1993
Serjania Mill.
Asterocarpinus S.R.Manchester & P.R.Crane, 1987
Edenoxylon parviareolatum Kruse, 1954
Cleyera Thunb.
Polyptera S.R.Manchester & D.L.Dilcher, 1982
Toricellia bonesii Manchester, 1999
Maureroxylon E.A.Wheeler & S.R.Manchester, 2002
Polyptera manningii Manchester & Dilcher, 1982
Calycocarpum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Styracaceae
Sloanea ungeri Manchester & Kvacek, 2009
Cornus hyperborea Heer, 1871
Saxifragispermum E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Iodes Blume
Illigera eocenica Manchester & O'Leary, 2010
Platanus neptuni Buzek et al., 1967
Flacourtiaceae
Iodes multireticulata Reid & Chandler, 1933
Altingia Noronha
Anonaspermum pulchrum Reid & Chandler, 1933
Browniea serrata Manchester & Hickey, 2007
Chattawaya S.R.Manchester, 1980
Ulmus microphylla Pers.
Amelanchier grayi R.W.Chaney
Hooleya E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1926
Pentoperculum minimus Manchester, 1994
Cornus swingii Manchester et al., 2009
Trochodendron Siebold & Zucc.
Tilia parvifolia Ehrh.
Tapiscia Oliv.
Engelhardia Lesch. ex Blume
Icacinaceae
Persites L.J.Hickey, 1977
Loxopterygium Hook.fil.
Leguminocarpum Dotzler, 1937
Palaeosinomenium venablesi Chandler, 1961
Bignonia L.
Dryas L.
Pentoperculum S.R.Manchester, 1994
Anonaspermum O.M.Ball, 1931
Apocynospermum C.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1926
Diploclisia Miers
Myrtophyllum torreyi Dorf, 1942
Nordenskioldia Heer, 1870
Cedrelospermum leptospermum Manchester, 1987
Mastixioidiocarpum oregonese Scott, 1954
Parvileguminophyllum P.S.Herendeen & D.L.Dilcher, 1990
Mastixioidiocarpum R.A.Scott, 1954
Vitis magtiisperma Chandler, 1961
Liriodendron L.
Peltophoroxylon W.R.Müller-Stoll & E.Mädel, 1967
Mastixia Blume
Sabal bracknellense Mai, 1976
Cryptocaryoxylon G.A.Leisman, 1986
Pseudofagus C.J.Smiley & L.M.Huggins, 1981
Corylites J.S.Gardner, 1887
Sapindoxylon R.Kräusel, 1922
Laurocalyx E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Staphyleaceae
Decodon J.F.Gmel.
Macginistemon S.R.Manchester, 1986
Iodicarpa S.R.Manchester, 1994
Cannabaceae
Pinckneya Michx.
Browniea S.R.Manchester & L.J.Hickey, 2007
Simaroubaceae
Myricaceae
Torricellia DC.
Trochodendroides speciosa Berry, 1930
Tremophyllum L.Rüffle, 1963
Ailanthus confucii Unger, 1850
Fortunearites S.R.Manchester, 1994
Odontocaryoidea R.A.Scott, 1954
Beilschmiedia Nees
Platananthus S.R.Manchester, 1986
Mezilaurinoxylon E.A.Wheeler & S.R.Manchester, 2002
Langtonia bisulcata Reid & Chandler, 1933
Florissantia ashwillii Manchester, 1992
Crataegus newberryi Cockerell
Caesalpinia spokanensis (Knowlt.) Herend. & Dilcher
Rehderodendron Hu
Clarnoxylon S.R.Manchester & E.A.Wheeler, 1993
Populus tidwellii Manchester et al., 2006
Ulmus changii W.C.Cheng
Acer salweenense W.W.Sm.
Pseudofagus idahoensis
Paleonelumbo macroloba Knowlton, 1930
Caesalpinia flumen-viridensis Herend. & Dilcher
Ceratophyllum muricatum Cham.
Tetrastigma (Miq.) Planch.
Mastixicarpum M.E.J.Chandler, 1926
Magnolia angustifolia Millais
Wheelera Schreb.
Manihotites E.W.Berry, 1910
Gleditsia triacanthus Mill.
Hovenia Thunb.
Canellaceae
Engelhardioxylon nutbedensis Manchester, 1983
Sabiaceae
Ptelea paliuruoides Manchester & O'Leary, 2010
Juglans laciniosa Michx.
Platanites Forbes, 1851
Allenbya S.R.S.Cevallos-Ferriz & R.A.Stockey, 1989
Pyrenacantha occidentalis Byng & Utteridge
Proteaciphyllum Carpenter & Jordan, 1997
Tetrapleuroxylon W.R.Müller-Stoll & E.Mädel, 1967
Paliurus favonii Unger, 1847
Anamirta Colebr.
Mastixioid Collinson et al., 2012
Acer changii Z.R.Xu
Platanoxylon haydenii Suss & Muller-Stoll, 1977
Gleditsia L.
Rutaspermum M.E.J.Chandler, 1957
Rubus freynii Hayek
Kardiasperma S.R.Manchester, 1994
Meliosmaceae
Aucuba Thunb.
Apeiba Aubl.
Trochodendroides genetrix Manchester, 2014
Terrazoxylon E.A.Wheeler & S.R.Manchester, 2002
Typhoides Moench
Cornaceae
Tinospora Miers
Protoyucca W.D.Tidwell & L.R.Parker, 1990
Platananthus synandrus Manchester, 1986
Saurauia Willd.
Nordenskioldia borealis Heer, 1870
Magnolia borealis (Sarg.) Kudô
Persea coriacea Kosterm.
Rhus parvifolia Engl., 1883
Credneria Zenker, 1833
Odontocarya Miers
Paliurus clarnensis Burge & Manchester, 2008
Hamamelidoxylon uniseriatum Wheeler & Manchester, 2002
Triplochitioxylon oregonensis
Olea L.
Leea van Royen ex L.
Nyssidium arcticum Iljinskaja, 1974
Nyssidium Heer, 1870
Atriaecarpum Chandler, 1978
Zenia Chun
Plerandreoxylon E.A.Wheeler & S.R.Manchester, 2002
Xanthoxylum Mill.
Bumelia Sw., 1788
Actinidiaceae
Ensete Bruce ex Horan.
Crataegus gracilis Sarg.
Palaeocarpinus joffrense Sun & Stockey, 1992
Alsinites revelatus Cockerell, 1925
Tapirira clarnoensis Manchester
Trapa angulata Brown, 1962
Tetracentron remberi Manchester & Chen, 2006
Anacardites Saporta, 1861
Juglandicarya E.Reid & M.Chandler
Magnoliaceae
Paleopanax S.R.Manchester, 1994
Tiliaceae
Diplopanax Hand.-Mazz.
Staphylea L.
Clarnoxylon blanchardii Manchester & Wheeler, 1993
Dichrostachyoxylon W.R.Müller-Stoll & E.Mädel, 1967
Icacinicaryites K.B.Pigg, S.R.Manchester & M.L.Devore, 2008
Calocarpum Pierre
Tetrapteris Cav.
Meliosma jenkinsi Chandler, 1961
Leguminocarpon Göppert, 1855
Pteleaecarpum H.Weyland, 1948
Florissantia physalis Knowlton, 1916
Ternstroemites aureavallis Hickey, 1977
Platycarya manchesterii S.L.Wing & L.Hickey, 1984
Swartzia Schreb.
Pteroceltis Maxim.
Smilacaceae
Alfaropsis Iljinsk.
Polygonocarpum curtisii Manchester & O'Leary, 2010
Comicilabium S.R.Manchester, 1994
Banksia L.fil.
Magnoliaceoxylon E.Wheeler, R.A.Scott & E.S.Barghoorn, 1977
Tapiscia pusilla Mai, 1976
Anaphalis DC.
Eucalyptus rudis subsp. rudis
Operculina roseana House
Papilionaceae
Citrus volkameriana Ten. & Pasq.
Arachis hypogea L.
Lindera benzoin Linnaeus, 1753
Lecythis elliptica Kunth
Ebenaceae
Pyrus malus Murmann
Prunus communis Bab.
Anethum L.
Bravoa geminiflora Lex.
Triticum vulgare L.
Agave virginica L.
Aralia spinosa L.
Lycopersicum Hill
Capsicum pendulum Willd.
Capsicum chinense Jacq.
Acacia wrightii A.Gray
Carduaceae
Catalpa bignonoides Walt.
Hamatocactus setispinus (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Commelinantia anomala (Torr.) Tharp
Pelargonium tomentosum Jacq.
Eriocoma arnowiae (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) Romasch.
Asemeia apopetala (Brandegee) J.F.B.Pastore & J.R.Abbott
Tillandsia caput-medusae É.Morren
Ceratophyllum demersum var. demersum
Cassia purpusii Brandegee
Hosackia glabra subsp. brevialata (Ottley) Abrams
Euphorbia neorubella Bruyns
Mimosa texana (A.Gray) Small
Caesalpinia peninsularis (Britton) Eifert
Lotus ornithopus (Greene) Greene
Euphorbia angularis Klotzsch
Phyllanthus peninsularis Brandegee
Eleocharis dombeyana Kunth
Euphorbia bussei Pax
Aulacodiscus Hook.f.
Actinocyclus Klotzsch
Atriplex pentandra (Jacq.) Standl.
Gnaphalium sphacelatum Kunth
Salvia verecunda Epling
Sedum madrense S.Watson
Setaria villosissima (Scribn. & Merr.) K.Schum.
Rhamnus rosei M.C.Johnst. & L.A.Johnst.
Soliva mutisii Kunth
Cordylanthus rigidus var. filifolius J.F.Macbr.
Schizachyrium sanguineum var. sanguineum
Hyptis pectinata Linnaeus, 1759
Corrigiola andina Planch. & Triana
Echinocereus laui G.Frank
Pomaria multijuga (S.Watson) B.B.Simpson
Bidens ferulifolia Hemsl., 1881
Stevia ovata var. ovata
Senecio umbraculifera S.Watson
Acourtia platyphylla (A.Gray) Reveal & R.M.King
Macvaughiella chiapensis R.King & H.Rob.
Mammillaria saboae Glass
Diodia sarmentosa Sw.
Laennecia Cass.
Smallanthus uvedalia (L.) Mack.
Lasianthaea DC.
Machaeranthera turneri M.L.Arnold & R.C.Jacks.
Verbesina robinsonii (Klatt) Fernald ex B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Chamaecrista rufa (M.Martens & Galeotti) Britton & Rose
Rorippa nasturtium (L.) Beck
Daucus montanus Humb. & Bonpl. ex Schult.
Pachycereus grandis Rose
Diphysa thurberi (A.Gray) Rydb.
Adenophyllum cancellatum (Cass.) Kuntze
Mimulus brevipes A.Gray
Lepechinia schiedeana (Schltdl.) Vatke
Ruellia nudiflora var. nudiflora
Sideroxylon capiri subsp. tempisque (Pittier) T.D.Penn.
Acacia farnesiana Linnaeus, 1753
Galvezia juncea Brandeg., 1891
Lonicera pilosa Willd. ex Kunth
Echinocereus scheeri var. gentryi (Clover) N.P.Taylor
Tricerma Liebm.
Symphyotrichum ericoides subsp. pansum (S.F.Blake) Semple
Vernonia pallens Sch.Bip.
Salvia roscida Fernald
Seymeria glandulosa (Pennell) Standl.
Rhus schmidelioides Schltdl.
Erigeron sceptrifer G.L.Nesom
Tithonia calva var. lancifolia (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) Mc Vaugh
Bidens mollifolia var. glabrescens Sherff
Perymenium berlandieri DC.
Asclepias jaliscana Rob.
Hochreutinera amplexifolia (DC.) Fryxell
Vigna peduncularis var. peduncularis
Brickellia filipes B.L.Rob.
Quercus acutifolia Née
Setaria leiophylla (Nees) Kunth
Dyssodia porophyllum (Cav.) Willd.
Ayenia palmeri A.Gray
Tridax mexicana A.M.Powell
Acacia villosa (Sw.) Willd.
Heliocarpus occidentalis Rose
Elephantopus spicatus B.Juss. ex Aubl.
Bastardia viscosa (L.) Kunth
Tithonia auriculata (Brandegee) S.F.Blake
Centaurea americana Spreng.
Lupinus ehrenbergii var. barberi C.P.Sm.
Ranunculus petiolaris var. petiolaris
Hoffmannia rosei B.L.Rob.
Lithospermum tubiliflorum Greene
Stephanomeria schottii (A.Gray) A.Gray, 1876
Desmodium scorpiurus (Sw.) Desv. ex DC.
Ageratum gaumeri B.L.Rob.
Tillaea L.
Gutierrezia alamanii A.Gray
Polygonum punctatum Kit., 1864
Tomentaurum niveum (S.Watson) G.L.Nesom
Calceolaria mexicana Benth.
Viguiera longifolia var. annua (Jones) S.L.Welsh
Acmella Rich. ex Pers.
Heterotoma aurita Brandegee
Stevia salicifolia var. virgulifera B.L.Rob.
Gomphrena nana (Stuchlík) Standl.
Koanophyllon palmeri var. tonsa (B.L.Rob.) B.L.Turner
Quercus barrancana Spellenb.
Teloxys ambrosioides (L.) W.A.Weber
Zephyranthes lindleyana Herb.
Agalinis wrightii (A.Gray) Tidestr.
Montanoa karwinskii (DC.) C.Koch
Eriogonum abertianum var. cyclosepalum (Greene) Fosberg
Ageratina glabrata (Kunth) R.King & H.Rob.
Bidens oligantha Brandegee
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. pauciflorum (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Lasiacis procerrima (Hack.) Hitchc. ex Chase
Fouquieria peninsularis Nash
Pseudogynoxys chenopodioides var. chenopodioides
Machaeranthera gypsophila B.L.Turner
Mollugo cerviana Linnaeus, 1753
Dyschoriste schiedeana var. schiedeana
Eritrichium Schrad.
Cirsium californicum Jeps., 1901
Hedyotis arenaria (Rose) W.H.Lewis
Trigonospermum Less.
Ageratina rubricaulis (Kunth) R.King & H.Rob.
Lotus alamosanus Rose
Conyza filaginoides (DC.) Hieron.
Hura polyandra Baill.
Archibaccharis asperifolia (Benth.) S.F.Blake
Polemonium melindae Rzed., Calderón & Villarreal
Prunus pruna Crantz
Sapium P.Browne
Tabernaemontana Plum. ex L.
Populus bonatii H.Lév.
Vaccinium vicinum E.P.Bicknell
Catalpa catalpa Sudw.
Portlandia pterosperma S.Watson
Boerhavia spicata var. palmeri S.Watson
Silene multicaulis Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Veronica allenii Greenman
Froelichia alata S.Watson
Carex torta Boott ex Tuck.
Potentilla dissecta Pursh
Castilleja affinis Benth.
Galium mollugo var. cinereum (All.) Knoche
Ribes hudsonianum Bourg.
Populus deltoides var. occidentalis Rydb.
Capsicum ovatum DC.
Cephalanthera Rich.
Aristida californica var. fugitiva Vasey
Aristida divergens Vasey
Mimulus guttatus var. grandis Greene
Cyperus esculentus var. heermannii (Buckley) Britton
Lolium multiflorum f. microstachyum R.Uechtr.
Proboscidea louisiana subsp. louisiana
Juncus canadensis J.Gay ex Laharpe
Carum oreganum (Nutt.) S.Watson
Dondia nigra (Raf.) Standl.
Stellaria calycantha var. sitchana (Steud.) Fernald
Leptodactylon californicum subsp. leptotrichomum P.J.Gordon
Oxytheca Nutt.
Galium concinnum Torr. & A.Gray
Epidendrum alatum Bateman
Gentiana triflora Pall.
Acer craibianum Delendick
Pedicularis racemosa Douglas
Rhamnus caroliniana Walter
Houstonia stenophylla
Sphaeromeria Nutt.
Agave sisalana Perrine ex Engelm.
Forsellesia nevadensis f. glabra Ensign
Dalea carnea var. gracilis (Nutt.) Barneby
Krameria imparata (J.F.Macbr.) Britton
Bowlesia lobata Ruiz & Pav.
Achaetogeron mexicanus (A.Gray) De Jong
Leptosiphon ciliatus subsp. ciliatus
Haplopappus divaricatus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Downingia elegans var. brachypetala (Gand.) McVaugh
Draba reptans var. micrantha Fernald
Quercus pringlei Seemen, 1900
Stachys palustris subsp. palustris
Aristolochia tricaudata Lem.
Carex lagopina Wahlenb.
Delphinium collinum Ewan
Claytonia triphylla S.Watson
Carex liddonii Boott
Sphaeralcea acerifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Eriogonum vimineum var. agninum (Greene) S.Stokes
Hakea nodosa R.Br.
Heteromeles salicifolia (C.Presl) Abrams
Galium boreale subsp. boreale
Spermacoce prostrata Aubl.
Diplopappus Cass.
Cicuta virosa L.
Cogswellia triternata (Pursh) M.E.Jones
Neurolaena lobata (L.) R.Br.
Elaphrium hindsianum Benth.
Synthyris pinnatifida var. lanuginosa (Piper) Cronquist
Lupinus sierrae-blancae subsp. sierrae-blancae
Stanhopea J.Frost ex Hook.
Lepidospartum squamatum var. obtectum Jeps.
Dracophilus montis-draconis (Dinter) Dinter & Schwantes
Cornus pubescens Nutt.
Pyrola chlorantha var. convoluta (W.Bartram) Fernald
Acca sellowiana (Berg) Burret
Limnia cordifolia (S.Watson) Rydb.
Androsace nivalis (Lindl.) Wendelbo
Anemone globosa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Hymenopappus eriopoda A.Nelson
Melampodium cinereum DC.
Thelesperma gracile (Torr.) A.Gray
Juttadinteria albata (L.Bolus) L.Bolus
Mohavea A.Gray
Listera convallarioides (Sw.) Torr.
Juttadinteria kovisimontana (Dinter) Schwantes
Mascagnia septentrionalis (A.Juss.) Nied.
Pachylophus caespitosus (Nutt.) Raim.
Carum kelloggii A.Gray
Carex spicata Huds.
Agastache scrophulariifolia var. mollis (Fernald) A.Heller
Coriaria ruscifolia L.
Townsendia spathulata Nutt.
Grevillea robusta A.Cunn., 1830
Lupinus macrocarpus Torr.
Mentha occidentalis Rydb.
Eriogonum vimineum var. elegans (Greene) Jeps.
Chrysothamnus stenophyllus (A.Gray) Greene
Acer pectinatum Wall. ex Pax
Gilia gilioides var. greeneana Brand
Micranthes nivalis (L.) Small
Aconitum divaricatum Finet & Gagnep.
Clematis florida Thunb.
Sorbus sitchensis Roem., 1847
Carex rostrata var. utriculata (Boott) L.H.Bailey
Dracophilus delaetianus (Dinter) Dinter & Schwantes
Aristolochia taliscana Hook. & Arn.
Radicula lyrata (Nutt.) Greene
Lepidium montanum f. cinereum C.L.Hitchc.
Honckenya peploides subsp. diffusa (Hornem.) Hultén
Pieris formosa var. forrestii (R.L.Harrow) Airy Shaw
Hypericum patulum Thunb.
Hedyotis humifusa Engelm. ex A.Gray
Astragalus hypoglottis L.
Cryptantha linearis (Colla) Greene
Vicia caroliniana Walter
Matelea gonoloboides (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) Woodson
Tofieldia glutiriosa
Collomia debilis f. debilis
Polygonum coarctatum Douglas
Penstemon washoensis Greene
Wyethia scabra var. attenuata W.A.Weber
Atriplex expansa S.Watson
Silvia Allemão
Gayophytum diffusum var. typicum Munz
Hypericum maculatum Crantz
Campanula lactiflora M.Bieb.
Lactuca virosa Hablitz
Potentilla egedii Wormsk. ex Oeder
Polygala scoparia Kunth
Antennaria concinna E.Nelson
Epilobium fasciculatum Suksd.
Silene watsonii B.L.Rob. & Seaton
Anisomeris C.Presl
Xanthocephalum sarothrae (Pursh) Shinners
Brachiaria meziana Hitchc.
Platanus mexicana Moric.
Haplopappus heterophyllus (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Brachiaria plantaginea (Link) Hitchc.
Rhagadiolus hedypnois Fisch. & C.A.Mey. ex Fisch., C.A.Mey. & Trautv.
Vaccaria vulgaris Host
Fritillaria recurva var. coccinea Greene
Bidens aurea var. wrightii (A.Gray) Sherff
Vincetoxicum nigrum (L.) Moench
Jaumea peduncularis (Hook. & Arn.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Oliv.
Lesquerella alpina (Nutt.) S.Watson
Symphoricarpos mollis var. mollis
Hibiscus denudatus var. involucellatus A.Gray
Hedyotis nigricans (Lam.) Fosberg
Fagonia californica subsp. longipes (Standl.) Felger
Bromus purgans L.
Gloriosa superba L.
Calylophus Spach
Spermacoce assurgens Ruiz & Pav.
Physalis subulata Rydb.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. psilocarpus S.F.Blake
Erodium trifolium (Cav.) Cav.
Hemizonia congesta subsp. leucocephala (Tanowitz) D.J.Keil
Sorbus occidentalis (S.Watson) Greene
Luckhoffia A.C.White & B.Sloane
Rhigozum obovatum Burch.
Ipomoea muelleri Benth.
Kalanchoe pinnata (Lam.) Pers.
Acacia cognata Domin
Acacia leprosa Sieber ex DC.
Acacia visco Lorentz ex Griseb.
Desmodium elegans DC.
Quercus dentata Thunb.
Vigna radiata (L.) R.Wilczek
Gossypium lanceolatum Tod.
Ficus doliaria (Miq.) Miq.
Ficus sakalavarum Baker
Calothamnus Labill.
Eucalyptus camaldulensis var. obtusa Blakely
Eucalyptus baxteri (Benth.) Maiden & Blakely ex J.M.Black
Eucalyptus moluccana Roxb.
Melaleuca lateriflora Benth.
Clematis ×lawsoniana And.-Henry ex T.Moore & Jackman
Citrus ichangensis Swingle
Microcitrus Swingle
Cyphomandra betacea (Cav.) Sendtn.
Celtis tala Gillies ex Planch.
Tovaria pendula Ruiz & Pav.
Triticum dicoccoides var. spontaneovillosum (Flaksb.) Percival
Salvia madrensis Seem.
Eucalyptus pryoriana L.A.S.Johnson
Cyanella hyacinthoides Royen ex L.
Ficus geniculata subsp. abnormalis Kurz
Ficus socotrana Balf.fil.
Clausena harmandiana (Pierre) Pierre ex Guill.
Aloe pretoriensis Pole-Evans
Aloe lutescens Groenew.
Dianella caerulea Sims
Eremophila R.Br.
Hypoestes sanguinolenta Hook.
Glycosmis pentaphylla (Retz.) Corrêa
Luzula campestris var. campestris
Fouquieria leonilae Miranda
Astrophytum ornatum (DC.) Britton & Rose
Artemisia tripartita subsp. tripartita
Aster falcatus Lindl.
Bupleurum subovatum Link ex Spreng.
Dyschoriste xylopoda Kobuski
Abronia villosa var. pinetorum (Abrams) Jeps.
Cirsium campylon Sharsm.
Eriophyllum lanatum var. aphanactis J.T.Howell ex Eastw.
Eriocaulon cinereum R.Br.
Rhus palmeri Rose
Phlox longifolia subsp. humilis (Douglas) Wherry
Neohintonia monantha (Sch.Bip.) R.King & H.Rob.
Eupatorium purpusii Brandegee
Chenopodium serotinum L.
Twisselmannia californica Al-Shehbaz
Portulaca mundula I.M.Johnst.
Echinocereus pectinatus var. rigidissimus (Engelm.) Rümpler
Maurandya acerifolia Pennell
Euphorbia ocymoidea var. barnesii (Millsp.) McVaugh
Schiedeella parasitica (A.Rich. & Galeotti) Schltr.
Acacia angustissima subsp. suffrutescens (Rose) Wiggins
Spermacoce tenuior L.
Talinum angustissimum (Engelm.) Wooton & Standl.
Avicennia nitida Jacq.
Cyperus compressus L.
Chloris inflata Link
Arabis sparsiflora var. atrorubens (Suksd. ex Greene) Rollins
Opuntia pulchella Engelm.
Ehrharta panicea Sm.
Monardella viridis subsp. viridis
Monardella sinuata subsp. gerryi Elvin, A.C.Sanders & R.A.Burgess
Matthiola bicornis (Sm.) DC.
Fatshedera lizei (Cochet) Guillaumin
Stapelia variegata L.
Carpobrotus deliciosus (L.Bolus) L.Bolus
Stachys germanica L.
Anredera scandens (L.) Moq.
Weigelia Pers., 1805
Convolvulus farinosus L.
Synadenium grantii Hook.f.
Acacia aneura F.Muell. ex Benth.
Acacia truncata (Burm.f.) Hoffmanns.
Acacia splendens Maslin & C.P.Elliott
Adenocarpus viscosus (Willd.) Webb & Berthel.
Bauhinia variegata var. candida Voigt
Cassia schultesii Colla
Prostanthera striatiflora F.Muell.
Beilschmiedia miersii (Gay) Kosterm.
Gossypium somalense (Gürke) J.B.Hutch., Silow & S.G.Stephens
Pavonia sepium A.St.-Hil.
Ficus iteophylla Miq.
Ficus pretoriae Burtt Davy
Ficus sundaica Blume
Calothamnus rupestris Schauer
Eucalyptus lansdowneana subsp. albopurpurea Boomsma
Eucalyptus occidentalis Endl.
Ligustrum japonicum var. rotundifolium Blume
Agrimonia procera Wallr.
Citrus macroptera Montrouz.
Scopolia lurida (Link) Dunal
Liriope spicata Lour.
Crinum powellii Baker
Triticum araraticum var. thumanianii (Jakubz.) Jakubz.
Eucalyptus griffithsii Maiden
Aloe cryptopoda Baker
Aloe globuligemma Pole-Evans
Crinodendron Molina
Salvia sylvestris L.
Plectranthus amboinicus (Lour.) Spreng.
Lonicera standishii Carrière
Allium fistulosum L.
Balsamocitrus dawei Stapf
Ferocactus pilosus (Salm-Dyck) Werderm.
Lamiastrum galeobdolon subsp. argentatum (Smejkal) Stace
Heterotheca foliosa (Nutt.) Shinners
Hymenoxys jamesii Bierner
Machaeranthera aquifolia Greene ex Wooton & Standl.
Layia chrysanthemoides subsp. chrysanthemoides
Schkuhria wislizeni var. wrightii (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Montanoa patens A.Gray
Cyperus regiomontanus Britton
Lupinus arbustus subsp. arbustus
Ancistrocactus uncinatus (Galeotti) L.D.Benson
Lophocereus schottii var. tenuis Engelm.
Cleome aculeata L.
Viola canadensis var. scopulorum A.Gray
Calliandra schottii subsp. rosei (Wiggins) Felger
Lathyrus alefeldii T.G.White
Gaudichaudia albida Cham. & Schltdl.
Verbena shrevei Moldenke
Choisya dumosa var. mollis (Standl.) L.D.Benson
Paullinia pinnata L.
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. glomerulum (S.Stokes) S.Stokes
Stephanotis floribunda Brongn.
Felicia fruticosa subsp. fruticosa
Persea americana var. tolimanensis (Zentmyer & Schieber) Scora
Tecoma radicans (L.) Juss.
Cereus aethiops Haw.
Acacia subcaerulea Lindl.
Ortholobium Gagnep.
Michelia compressa (Maxim.) Sarg.
Clerodendrum thomsoniae Balf.f.
Mentzelia arborescens Urb. & Gilg
Hibiscus esculentus L.
Pittosporum heterophyllum Franch.
Grevillea polybractea Williamson
Evodia lepta Merr.
Scopolia sinensis Hemsl.
Dombeya tiliacea (Endl.) Planch.
Rulingia pannosa R.Br.
Eremopyrum hirsutum (Bertol.) Nevski
Triticum boeoticum subsp. thaoudar (Hausskn.) Grossh.
Ficus zambesiaca Hutch.
Eucalyptus shirleyi Maiden
Ophiopogon jaburan (Siebold) G.Lodd.
Lycianthes armentalis J.L.Gentry
Citropsis daweana Swingle & Kellerm.
Drymocallis glandulosa subsp. glabrata (Rydb.) Soják
Ferocactus latispinus (Haw.) Britton & Rose
Solidago bigelovii Gray
Erigeron incomptus A.Gray
Hemizonia fasciculata var. ramosissima (Benth.) A.Gray
Scorzonera hispanica L.
Zigadenus fremontii var. inezianus Jeps.
Opuntia littoralis var. piercei (Fosberg) L.D.Benson & Walk.
Magnolia schiedeana Schltdl.
Sesamum orientale L.
Potentilla drummondii subsp. bruceae (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Viola macloskeyi subsp. macloskeyi
Gaura coccinea var. arizonica Munz
Delphinium virescens var. wootonii (Rydb.) Shinners
Trifolium gambelii Nutt.
Stellaria nemorum L.
Andropogon sanguineus (Retz.) Merr.
Crusea setosa (M.Martens & Galeotti) Standl. & Steyerm.
Priva Adans.
Chaerophyllum temulentum L.
Agropyron trachycaulum var. majus (Vasey) Fernald
Panicum rigidulum subsp. rigidulum
Holodiscus dumosus var. dumosus
Senecio crocatus Rydb.
Cestrum thyrsoideum Kunth
Tridens albescens (Benth. ex Vasey) Wooton & Standl.
Solanum umbelliferum var. clokeyi (Munz) D.J.Keil
Dorstenia contrajerva L.
Gamolepis Less.
Olearia passerinoides (Turcz.) Benth.
Trichocereus pachanoi Britton & Rose
Trifolium glanduliferum Boiss.
Xenostegia tridentata (L.) D.F.Austin & Staples
Diospyros austroafricana var. microphylla (Burchard) DeWinter
Acacia gladiiformis A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Pachyrhizus tuberosus (Lam.) Spreng.
Cornutia grandifolia (Cham. & Schltdl.) Schauer
Ficus erecta Thunb.
Ficus subpisocarpa subsp. pubipoda C.C.Berg
Eucalyptus burdettiana Blakely & Steedman
Eucalyptus dives Schauer
Eucalyptus youngiana F.Muell.
Leptospermum scoparium var. nichollsii (Dorr.Sm.) Turrill
Melaleuca pentagona Labill.
Ziziphus spina-christi (L.) Desf.
Feronia limonia (L.) Swingle
Anthurium scherzerianum Schott
Scilla L.
Avena longiglumis Durieu
Aegilops triaristata Willd.
Triticum araraticum var. nachitschevanicum (Jakubz.) Jakubz.
Salvia lasiantha Benth.
Ficus subpisocarpa subsp. subpisocarpa
Aloe sinkatana Reynolds
Dioscorea alata L.
×Heucherella H.R.Wehrh.
Dalechampia pernambucensis Baill.
Citropsis schweinfurthii (Engl.) Swingle & Kell.
Microcitrus australasica (F.Muell.) Swingle
Ferocactus hamatacanthus var. hamatacanthus
Echinocactus platyacanthus Link & Otto
Aster spathulatus Lindl.
Cynanchum angustifolium Pers.
Senecio octobracteatus var. octobracteatus
Eupatorium sordidum Less.
Chrysanthemum carinatum Schousb.
Aristida wrightii var. parishii (Hitchc.) Gould
Bromus tectorum var. nudus Klett & Richt.
Heuchera leptomeria Greene
Astragalus neomexicanus Wooton & Standl.
Stipa nelsonii subsp. nelsonii
Cuscuta potosina W.Schaffn. ex Engelm.
Gaya minutiflora Rose
Eriogonum abertianum var. neomexicanum Gand.
Agrostis exarata var. minor Hook.
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. latiloba Nutt.
Stephanomeria pauciflora var. parishii (Jeps.) Munz
Draba pedicellata (Rollins & R.A.Price) Windham
Nymphaea odorata var. odorata
Ficaria verna subsp. ficariiformis (Rouy & Foucaud) Maire
Rumex paucifolius subsp. paucifolius
Centaurea candidissima Lam.
Huernia R.Br.
Persea longipes (Schltdl.) Meisn.
Manettia luteorubra (Vell.) Benth.
Coriaria japonica A.Gray
Escallonia organensis Gardner
Acacia restiacea Benth.
Acacia stricta (Andrews) Willd.
Gourliea chilensis Clos
Plectranthus myrianthus Briq.
Abutilon ×hybridum Voss
Gossypium tomentosum Nutt. ex Seem.
Eucalyptus calophylla R.Br.
Eucalyptus flocktoniae (Maiden) Maiden
Melaleuca adnata Turcz.
Melaleuca seriata Lindl.
Limonium arborescens (Brouss.) Kuntze
Hakea amplexicaulis R.Br.
Stranvaesia nussia (D.Don) Decne.
Fortunella hindsii (Champ. ex Benth.) Swingle
Murraya J.Koenig ex L.
Anigozanthos humilis Lindl.
Aloe dolomitica Groenew.
Rhyncholaelia digbyana (Lindl.) Schltr.
Avena pilosa Scop.
Stipa tortilis Desf.
Triticum turgidum subsp. pyramidale (Percival) Valdés & H.Scholz
Gladiolus carmineus C.H.Wright
Persea drymifolia Cham. & Schltdl.
Diospyros nigra (J.F.Gmel.) Perrier
Aloe greatheadii var. davyana (Schönland) Glen & D.S.Hardy
Micromelum minutum (G.Forst.) Wight & Arn.
Echinocactus grusonii Hildm.
Aphanostephus DC.
Pseudocymopterus J.M.Coult. & Rose
Cynoglossum L.
Phoenicaulis eurycarpa (A.Gray) Abrams
Calystegia purpurata subsp. solanensis (Jeps.) Brummitt
Chrysanthemum anethifolium Brouss. ex Willd.
Grindelia stricta subsp. venulosa (Jeps.) D.D.Keck
Palafoxia linearis var. gigantea M.E.Jones
Silene douglasii var. monantha (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Aster riparius Kunth
Wedelia gentryi B.L.Turner
Ranunculus aquatilis var. codyanus (B.Boivin) B.Boivin
Elymus hispidus subsp. barbulatus (Schur) Melderis
Glyptopleura marginata var. setulosa (A.Gray) Jeps.
Populus trichocarpa f. ingrata Jeps.
Zygophyllum fabago subsp. brachycarpum Boiss.
Stipa formicarum Delile
Thermopsis macrophylla var. macrophylla
Opuntia neoarbuscula Griffiths
Epilobium angustifolium var. canescens Alph.Wood
Andropogon scoparius var. scoparius
Pedicularis attollens subsp. attollens
Dodecatheon alpinum subsp. alpinum
Orcuttia greenei Vasey
Coryphantha (Engelm.) Lem.
Leptochloa P.Beauv.
Tradescantia andrieuxii C.B.Clarke
Carex laevicaulis Hochst. ex Seub.
Raillardella muirii A.Gray
Oxytropis sericea var. spicata (Hook.) Barneby
Schinus latifolius (Gillies ex Lindl.) Engl.
Helichrysum bracteatum var. viscosum DC.
Parthenium schottii Greenm. ex Millsp. & Chase
Hippeastrum bifidum (Herb.) Baker
Ipomoea hochstetteri House
Acacia dodonifolia (Pers.) Willd.
Acacia sowdenii Maiden
Cassia circinnata Benth.
Plectranthus australis R.Br.
Callistemon shiressii Blakely
Eucalyptus parramattensis E.C.Hall
Leptospermum phylicoides (Schauer) Cheel, 1943
Banksia burdettii Baker fil.
Hakea arborescens R.Br.
Prunus ×blireiana Andr
Warszewiczia coccinea (Vahl) Klotzsch
Ulmus rubra Muhl.
Anigozanthos viridis Endl.
Aloe isaloensis H.Perrier
Hyacinthus Tourn. ex L.
Avena prostrata Ladiz.
Spinifex L.
Eucnide grandiflora Rose
Viburnum ×carlcephalum Burkwood
Diplolaena grandiflora Desf.
Passiflora citrina J.M.Mac Dougal
Lithocarpus henryi (Seemen) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Limnocitrus littoralis (Miq.) Swingle
Bergera koenigii L.
Cassia nemophila var. coriacea (Bong. ex Benth.) Symon
Eucalyptus ×paulistana Navarro de Andrade
Chrysopsis villosa var. sessiliflora (Nutt.) A.Gray
Machaeranthera scabrella (Greene) Shinners
Calycadenia mollis f. rosea D.D.Keck
Erigeron foliosus var. mendocinus (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Eupatorium surutatoanum B.L.Turner
Oenothera delessertiana Steud.
Viola psychodes Greene
Arenaria saxosa var. mearnsii (Wooton & Standl.) Kearney & Peebles
Chimaphila maculata var. dasystemma (Torr. ex Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Mentzelia longiloba var. chihuahuaensis J.J.Schenk & L.Hufford
Lappula redowskii subsp. desertorum (Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Carex aperta var. viridans Kük.
Sphaeralcea fendleri subsp. albescens Kearney
Streptopus fassetii Á.Löve & D.Löve
Microrhamnus ericoides A.Gray
Crotalaria incana var. incana
Schrankia heterocarpa Standl.
Gossypium klotzschianum subsp. davidsonii (Kellogg) Roberty
Psychotria panamensis var. panamensis
Echinodorus rostratus (Nutt.) Engelm.
Atriplex gmelinii var. gmelinii
Ambrosia salsola var. fasciculata (A.Nelson) Strother & B.G.Baldwin
Desmodium sericophyllum Schltdl.
Scirpus prolifer Rottb.
Hackelia hispida var. hispida
Saltugilia (V.E.Grant) L.A.Johnson
Agave celsii Hook.
Haemanthus albiflos Jacq.
Euonymus kiautschovicus Loes.
Ipomoea setosa Ker Gawl.
Kalanchoe synsepala Baker
Acacia brachystachya Benth.
Acacia glandulicarpa Reader
Acacia trigonophylla Meisn.
Prosopis alba Griseb.
Quercus ithaburensis Decne.
Ficus citrifolia Mill.
Ficus hispida L.fil.
Ficus neriifolia var. nemoralis (Wall. ex Miq.) Corner ex R.R.Stewart
Eucalyptus cambageana Maiden
Eucalyptus marginata Sm.
Melaleuca diosmifolia Andrews
Melaleuca subtrigona Schauer
Syncarpia glomulifera (Sm.) Nied.
Jasminum humile var. siderophyllum (H.Lév.) Kobuski
Hakea gibbosa (Sm.) Cav.
Reseda lutea L.
Cydonia sinensis Thouin
Citropsis gilletiana Swingle & Kellerm.
Paramignya scandens (Griff.) Craib
Populus alba var. subintegerrima Lange
Belamcanda chinensis (L.) Redouté
Hymenocallis americana (Mill.) M.Roem.
Avena ventricosa Balansa
Trifolium gemellum Pourr. ex Willd.
Cnidoscolus aconitifolius subsp. aconitifolius
Nymania capensis (Thunb.) Lindb.
Helichrysum italicum (Roth) G.Don
Salvia ianthina Otto & A.Dietr.
Aloe elgonica Bullock
Mandevilla Lindl.
Merrillia caloxylon (Ridl.) Swingle
Chaenomeles ×superba (Frahm) Rehder
Kalanchoe hildebrandtii Baill.
Balsamorhiza hookeri var. idahoensis (Sharp) Cronquist
Flourensia pringlei (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Ageratina pazcuarensis (Kunth) R.King & H.Rob.
Raillardella minima Rydb.
Caulanthus lasiophyllus var. inalienus (B.L.Rob.) Payson
Doyerea emetocathartica Grosourdy
Indigofera nelsonii Rydb.
Crotalaria angulata Mill.
Conyza gnaphalioides Kunth
Luzula parviflora subsp. melanocarpa (Michx.) Hämet-Ahti
Eupatorium viscosissimum Rolfe
Apatzingania arachoidea Dieterle
Haplopappus whitneyi subsp. whitneyi
Acer glabrum var. greenei Keller
Ludwigia palustris var. americana (DC.) Fernald & Griscom
Descurainia incana var. incisa (Engelm.) S.L.Welsh
Chorizanthe vortriedei Brandegee
Parvisedum pentandrum (H.Sharsm.) Clausen
Mentzelia monoensis Brokaw & L.Hufford
Artemisia aucheri Boiss.
Ilex ×altaclerensis (Loud.) Dallim.
Senecio cuneatus Hook.fil.
Gymnophyton isatidicarpum (DC.) Mathias & Constance
Distictis laxiflora (DC.) Greenm.
Acanthocereus pentagonus (L.) Britton & Rose
Brassica oleracea var. caulorapa DC.
Peniocereus serpentinus (Lag. & Rodrigues) N.P.Taylor
Crassula coleae Baker
Scabiosa africana L.
Acacia caesiella Maiden & Blakely
Acacia hamiltoniana Maiden
Acacia triptera Benth.
Clianthus formosus (G.Don) Ford & Vickery
Lagerstroemia speciosa (L.) Pers.
Ficus platypoda (Miq.) A.Cunn. ex Miq.
Eremophila mackinlayi F.Muell.
Eucalyptus carnei C.A.Gardner
Eucalyptus populnea F.Muell.
Melaleuca thymifolia Sm.
Jasminum officinale var. grandiflorum (L.) L.H.Bailey
Hakea leucoptera R.Br.
Reseda scoparia Brouss. ex Willd.
Acronychia J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Geijera Schott
Acnistus umbellatus (Ruiz & Pav.) Miers
Dracaena Vand. ex L.
Spathicarpa sagittifolia Schott
Nerine filifolia Baker
Tulbaghia fragrans I.Verd.
Arundinaria falcata Nees
Aegilops squarrosa L.
Triticum vavilovii Jakubz.
Triticum dicoccoides var. kotschyanum Percival
Ipomoea santillanii O'Donell
Persea primatogena L.O.Williams & A.Molina
Aloe mutabilis Pillans
Coriaria myrtifolia L.
Jasminum laurifolium Roxb.
Sedum sarmentosum Bunge
Livistona R.Br.
Pleiospermium alatum (Wight & Arn.) Swingle
Pamburus missionis Swingle
Euphorbia grandicornis Goebel ex N.E.Br.
Oscularia caulescens (Mill.) Schwantes
Begonia gracilis var. martiana A.DC.
Haplopappus spinulosus var. gooddingii (A.Nelson) S.F.Blake
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides var. glabra Jeps.
Pseudoconyza viscosa (Mill.) D' Arcy
Penstemon speciosus subsp. speciosus
Mentzelia texana Urb. & Gilg
Physalis virginiana var. sonorae (Torr.) Waterf.
Lotus argophyllus var. adsurgens Dunkle
Alopecurus fulvus Sm.
Karwinskia parvifolia var. pubescens (Standl.) Wiggins
Lycium densifolium Wiggins
Axonopus compressus (Sw.) P.Beauv.
Sarcostemma cynanchoides subsp. hartwegii (Vail) Shinners
Scirpus heterochaetus Chase
Cleistocactus Lem.
Juncus inflexus subsp. inflexus
Spermacoce verticillata L.
Lewisia pygmaea var. nevadensis (A.Gray) Fosberg
Achillea aegyptiaca subsp. taygetea (Boiss. & Heldr.) Hayek
Nothoscordum inodorum (Aiton) G.Nicholson
Plagiobothrys tener var. tener
Ceropegia debilis N.E.Br.
Justicia fulvicoma Cham. & Schltdl.
Craspedia glauca (Labill.) Spreng.
Rudbeckia laciniata var. hortensia L.H.Bailey
Thunbergia coccinea Wall.
Monvillea cavendishii (Monv.) Britton & Rose
Trifolium dichroanthum Boiss.
Ipomoea kituiensis Vatke
Ipomoea ×sloteri (House) Ooststr.
Elaeocarpus cyaneus Sims
Itea yunnanensis Franch.
Acacia furcatispina Burkart
Acacia irrorata Sieber ex Spreng.
Cicer reticulatum Ladiz.
Crotalaria laburnifolia subsp. laburnifolia
Velleia paradoxa R.Br.
Ficus obliqua G.Forst.
Eremophila santalina (F.Muell.) F.Muell.
Eucalyptus sepulcralis F.Muell.
Kunzea pulchella (Lindl.) A.S.George
Melaleuca glomerata F.Muell.
Hakea petiolaris Meisn.
Colletia spinosa Lam.
Iochroma fuchsioides (Kunth) Miers
Eurya kanehirae Hatus.
Vitex negundo L.
Trifolium pilulare Boiss.
Chileranthemum lottiae T.F.Daniel
Salix ×sepulcralis var. chrysocoma (Dode) Meikle
Tropaeolum peregrinum L.
Spilanthes Jacq.
Pleiospermium latialatum Swingle
Plectranthus neochilus Schltr.
Opuntia scheeri F.A.C.Weber
Astragalus subcinereus var. sileranus (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Delilea biflora Kuntze, 1891
Nicotiana trigonophylla var. palmeri (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Tithonia calva var. auriculata (Brandegee) La Duke
Cynanchum californicum (Benth.) Moran
Dodecatheon jeffreyi var. redolens H.M.Hall
Carex suberecta (Olney) Britton
Potamogeton tenuifolius Raf.
Galvezia juncea var. foliosa I.M.Johnst.
Valeriana robertianifolia Briq.
Lippia strigulosa M.Martens & Galeotti
Pennellia robinsonii Rollins
Hieracium vulgatum
Leptospermum J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Gaillardia arizonica subsp. arizonica
Physaria occidentalis var. cinerascens (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) S.L.Welsh
Stachys rigida subsp. lanata Epling
Artemisia arbuscula subsp. longiloba (Osterh.) L.M.Shultz
Stipa exigua (Thurb.) Columbus & J.P.Sm.
Rorippa truncata (Jeps.) Stuckey
Sporobolus asperifolius (Nees & Meyen ex Trin.) Nees & Meyen
Garryaceae
Asclepias michauxii Decne.
Spondias pinnata (L.fil.) Kurz
Dyssodia tenuiloba (DC.) B.L.Rob.
Senecio magnificus F.Muell.
Brillantaisia nitens Lindau
Ruschia pungens (A.Berger) Jacobsen
Ligularia tussilaginea (Burm.fil.) Makino
Ceratotheca Endl.
Berberis ×wisleyensis Ahrendt
Radermachera gigantea (Blume) Miq.
Cistus incanus subsp. corsicus (Loisel.) Heywood
Echeveria pilosa J.A.Purpus
Erica chamissonis Klotzsch ex Benth.
Acacia vestita Ker Gawl.
Cassia nemophila var. nemophila
Scaevola nitida R.Br.
Ficus burkei (Miq.) Miq.
Ficus oligodon Miq.
Eremophila serpens Chinnock
Eucalyptus conglobata var. anceps Maiden
Eucalyptus socialis F.Muell. ex Miq.
Jasminum volubile Jacq.
Dryandra praemorsa Meisn.
Hakea obtusa Meisn.
Eremocitrus Swingle
Argania spinosa (L.) Skeels
Hermannia candicans Aiton
Oxera pulchella Labill.
Stypandra R.Br.
Aloe vaombe Decorse & Poiss.
Zea perennis (Hitchc.) Reeves & Mangelsd.
Cestrum L.
Scilla violacea Hutch.
Oncoba spinosa Forssk.
Nierembergia Ruiz & Pav.
Vepris lanceolata (Lam.) G.Don
Cleistocactus samaipatanus (Cárdenas) D.R.Hunt
Aster wasatchensis var. wasatchensis
Ruellia elegans Poir.
Gnaphalium viscosum Poepp. ex DC.
Erodium cicutarium subsp. jacquinianum (Fisch., C.A.Mey. & Avé-Lall.) Briq.
Opuntia basilaris var. whitneyana (E.M.Baxter) E.M.Baxter ex W.T.Marshall
Chaetopappa lyonii (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Lavandula officinalis Chaix
Vicia villosa subsp. pseudocracca (Bertol.) Rouy
Eriogonum deflexum subsp. austrinum S.Stokes
Caulanthus crassicaulis var. major M.E.Jones
Ipomopsis tridactyla (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Fluminia festucacea (Willd.) Hitchc.
Jacquemontia Choisy
Galium collomae J.T.Howell
Muhlenbergia xerophila Goodd.
Nesaea longipes A.Gray
Chrysothamnus pulchellus (A.Gray) Greene
Agrostis ampla Hitchc.
Lygodesmia entrada S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Arenaria kingii subsp. kingii
Acer saccharum subsp. brachypterum (Wooton & Standl.) A.E.Murray
Mauranthemum paludosum subsp. paludosum
Convolvulus fruticetorum Greene
Rubus hayata-koidzumii Naruh.
Valeriana micrantha E.Nelson
Allamanda cathartica L.
Montanoa tomentosa Cerv.
Acokanthera oblongifolia (Hochst.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex B.D.Jacks.
Persea americana var. steyermarkii (C.K.Allen) Scora
Bouvardia longiflora (Cav.) Kunth
Coryphantha minima Baird
Echinocereus pentalophus (DC.) Lem.
Ipomoea violacea L.
Bischofia javanica Blume
Acacia acuminata Benth.
Acacia spectabilis A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Daubentonia tripetii Poit.
Prosopis ruscifolia Griseb.
Tephrosia vogelii Hook.f.
Vigna subterranea (L.) Verdc.
Pycnostachys urticifolia Hook.
Ficus variegata Blume
Agonis juniperina Schauer
Callistemon pallidus (Bonpl.) DC.
Eucalyptus pyriformis Turcz.
Amelanchier denticulata (Kunth) W.D.J.Koch
Evodia glauca Miq.
Ixora coccinea L.
Caladium Vent.
Dianella revoluta R.Br.
Lycaste deppei (G.Lodd. ex Lindl.) Lindl.
Aegilops triaristata subsp. elongata E.Schiem.
Edgeworthia Meisn.
Aloe deltoideodonta Baker
Crataegus monogyna var. monogyna
Helianthella Torr. & A.Gray
Cleistocactus areolatus (Muehlenpf. ex K.Schum.) Riccob.
Peperomia fraseri C.DC.
Malus toringo (Siebold) de Vriese
Crotalaria retusa L.
Alternanthera peploides (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Urb.
Chenopodium chenopodioides var. degenianum (Aellen) Aellen
Antirrhinum nuttallianum f. pusillum (Brandegee) Munz
Sida tragiifolia A.Gray
Sparganium minimum Wallr.
Cuscuta umbellata var. dubia Yunck.
Ptelea pallida Greene
Nicotiana palmeri A.Gray
Andropogon saccharoides Sw.
Gilia congesta var. palmifrons (Brand) Cronquist
Verbena lasiostachys var. septentrionalis Moldenke
Euphorbia dentata var. cuphosperma Engelm.
Rhamnus californica subsp. crassifolia (Jeps.) C.B.Wolf
Dipsacus fullonum var. sylvestris (Huds.) Huds.
Cryptantha decipiens var. corollata I.M.Johnst.
Penstemon ×dubius Davidson
Sparganium emersum var. multipedunculatum (Morong) Reveal
Gonolobus productus Torr.
Tridens grandiflorus (Vasey) Wooton & Standl.
Lathyrus maritimus Bigelow
Eupatorium micranthum Less.
Parthenium integrifolium L.
Salvia muirii L.Bolus
Chamaedorea radicalis Mart.
Opuntia monacantha (Willd.) Haw.
Echeveria agavoides Lem.
Acacia burkittii F.Muell. ex Benth.
Acacia filicifolia Cheel & M.B.Welch
Acacia graffiana F.Muell.
Crotalaria laburnifolia L.
Castanea seguinii Dode
Hibiscus pedunculatus L.fil.
Ficus mallotocarpa Warb.
Eremophila glabra (R.Br.) Ostenf.
Eucalyptus alba Reinw. ex Blume
Eucalyptus comitae-vallis Maiden
Eucalyptus gardneri Maiden
Eucalyptus megacarpa F.Muell.
Melaleuca teretifolia Endl.
Acnistus arborescens (L.) Schltdl.
Avena wiestii Steud.
Bambusa oldhamii Munro
Eremopyrum distans (K.Koch) Nevski
Ocimum sanctum L.
Aloe lettyae Reynolds
Leonotis (Pers.) R.Br.
Musa basjoo Siebold & Zucc. ex Iinuma
Swinglea glutinosa (Blanco) Merr.
Rubus anglocandicans A.Newton
Antirrhinum coulterianum var. appendiculatum Durand & Hilg.
Crotalaria acapulcensis Hook. & Arn.
Hypericum ×moserianum André
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. latisquameus (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Yucca whipplei var. intermedia (A.L.Haines) J.M.Webber
Haplopappus bloomeri var. compactus (H.M.Hall) S.F.Blake
Siphonoglossa mexicana Hilsenb.
Amaranthus blitoides var. reverchonii Uline & W.L.Bray
Lithophragma trifoliata Eastw.
Mimulus viscidus var. compactus D.M.Thomps.
Lolium subulatum Vis.
Arenaria uintahensis A.Nelson
Turbina corymbosa (L.) Raf.
Hibiscus citrinus Fryxell
Lopezia cornuta S.Watson
Fuirena Rottb.
Piperia dilatata var. leucostachys (Lindl.) Szlach. & Rutk.
Polypogon littoralis Sm.
Arida crispa (Brandegee) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Hedera nepalensis K.Koch
Mandevilla sanderi (Hemsl.) Woodson
Pandanus veitchii Mast.
Aporocactus Lem.
Selenicereus macdonaldiae (Hook.) Britton & Rose
Stictocardia tiliifolia (Desr.) Hallier fil.
Trichosantha Steud.
Acacia gonophylla Benth.
Cytisus rosmarinifolius (Webb & Berthel.) Masf.
Heteropteris beecheyana A.Juss.
Ficus superba var. henneana (Miq.) Corner
Eucalyptus dwyeri Maiden & Blakely
Lhotskya ericoides Schauer
Heimerliodendron brunonianum (Endl.) Skottsb.
Pittosporum napaulensis Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Jamesbrittenia grandiflora (Galpin) Hilliard
Grevillea stenobotrya F.Muell.
Dodonaea inaequifolia Turcz.
Dombeya rotundifolia (Hochst.) Planch.
Daphne L.
Puya berteroniana Mez
Paphiopedilum Pfitzer
Henrardia persica var. glaberrima (Hausskn. ex Bornm.) C.E.Hubb.
Manihot utilissima Pohl
Mitragyna speciosa (Korth.) Havil.
Aloe dawei A.Berger
Cassia excelsa Schrad.
Chenopodium berlandieri subsp. nuttalliae (Saff.) H.D.Wilson & Heiser
Dalechampia Plum. ex L.
Ocimum gratissimum L.
Lonicera morrowii Gray
Acacia angustissima subsp. lemmonii (Rose) Wiggins
Basistelma angustifolium (Torr.) Bartlett
Acrachne racemosa (B.Heyne ex Roth) Ohwi
Betula papyrifera var. occidentalis (Hook.) Sarg.
Stephanomeria minor var. minor
Eriogonum lobbii var. robustum (Greene) M.E.Jones
Argania sideroxylon Roem. & Schult.
Gilia lottiae subsp. lottiae
Salvia fluviatilis Fernald
Euphorbia incisa var. mollis (Norton) L.C.Wheeler
Potentilla hippiana var. diffusa Lehm.
Pennisetum americanum subsp. americanum
Periptera punicea (Lag.) DC.
Gilia incisa Benth.
Sida angustifolia Lam.
Ribes brandegeei Eastw.
Draba longipes Raup
Lesquerella arenosa var. arenosa
Erysimum coarctatum Fernald
Arabis holboellii var. consanguinea (Greene) G.A.Mulligan
Neotorularia humilis (C.A.Mey.) Hedge & J.Léonard
Arabis divaricarpa var. dacotica (Greene) B.Boivin
Thellungiella salsuginea (Pall.) O.E.Schulz
Arabis depauperata A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Arabis columbiana Macoun
Arabis drepanoloba Greene
Cardamine parviflora var. arenicola (Britton) O.E.Schulz
Camelina alyssum (Mill.) Thell.
Arabis calderi G.A.Mulligan
Arabis pinetorum Tidestr.
Arabis microphylla Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Arabis murrayi G.A.Mulligan
Descurainia sophioides (Fisch. ex Hook.) O.E.Schulz
Solanum chippendalei Symon
Lewisia cantelowii J.T.Howell
Aspris caryophyllea (L.) Nash
Aira caespitosa Muhl.
Lolium temulentum subsp. arvense (With.) Tzvelev
Ribes divaricatum var. inerme (Rydb.) McMinn
Stipa columbiana var. columbiana
Brodiaea crocea (Alph.Wood) S.Watson
Chaetochloa lutescens Stuntz
Glyceria erecta Hitchc.
Polygonum scabrum Moench
Allionia pumila Standl.
Cerastium vulgatum var. hirsutum Fr.
Eriogonum marifolium var. incanum (Torr. & A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Eriogonum indictum Jeps.
Brodiaea lutea var. anilina (Greene) Munz
Polygonum acre Kunth
Brodiaea pulchella var. pauciflora (Torr.) C.V.Morton
Lolium strictum C.Presl
Limnorchis sparsiflora (S.Watson) Rydb.
Potamogeton epihydrus subsp. nuttallii (Cham. & Schltdl.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Disporum hookeri var. trachyandrum (Torr.) Q.Jones
Trisetum spicatum var. molle (Kunth) Beal
Sphenopholis obtusata subsp. lobata (Trin.) Scribn.
Streptanthus coulteri A.Gray
Limnorchis leucostachys (Lindl.) Rydb.
Descurainia brachycarpon (Richardson) O.E.Schulz
Eriogonum latifolium subsp. sulphureum (Greene) S.Stokes
Claytonia bellidifolia Rydb.
Syntherisma sanguinalis (L.) Dulac
Aira danthonioides Trin.
Lupinus deflexus Congdon
Acacia decipiens R.Br.
Salix anglorum var. antiplasta C.K.Schneid.
Delphinium sonnei Greene
Draba stenoloba var. nana (O.E.Schulz) C.L.Hitchc.
Erysimum asperum var. perenne S.Watson ex Coville
Prunus demissa (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Walp.
Allium uniflorum Larrañaga
Calochortus luteus var. oculatus S.Watson
Ophrys convallarioides (Sw.) W.Wight ex House
Bartonia Muhl. ex Willd.
Castilleja coccinea (L.) Spreng.
Oligochaeta (DC.) C.Koch
Hypochaeris radiata Falk
Luzula wahlenbergii Rupr.
Calochortus ownbeyi M.A.García-Mart., Aarón Rodr. & H.P.McDonald
Pombalia glabra (Dowell) Paula-Souza
Amaranthus retroflexus var. retroflexus
Allium karataviense Regel
Mimulus trisulcatus Pennell
Polanisia erosa (Nutt.) Iltis
Cordylanthus capitatus Nutt.
Clematis pitcheri Torr. & A.Gray
Coronopus Zinn
Roubieva multifida (L.) Moq.
Penstemon attenuatus subsp. militaris (Greene) D.D.Keck
Collinsia tenella (Pursh) Piper
Saxifraga montanensis Small
Camassia esculenta (Ker Gawl.) B.L.Rob.
Orthocarpus erianthus var. versicolor (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Jeps.
Viola erectifolia A.Nelson
Nymphaea polysepala (Engelm.) Greene
Erigeron uniflorus Sm.
Sium cicutaefolium Schrank
Eritrichium elongatum var. argenteum (W.Wight) I.M.Johnst.
Oligosporus filifolius (Torr.) W.A.Weber
Eriogonum leptocladon var. papiliunculum Reveal
Carex scirpoidea var. curatorum (Stacey) Cronquist
Hypopitys Hill
Agropyron subsecundum var. andinum (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Hitchc.
Chamaenerion Seguier
Torresia macrophylla (Thurb. ex Bol.) Hitchc.
Oenothera contorta var. strigulosa (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Munz
Bahia oblongifolia (A.Gray) A.Gray
Lupinus aduncus Greene
Medicago sativa var. turkestanica Vilbouchevich
Anaphalis margaritacea var. occidentalis Greene
Ceanothus sorediatus W.S.Lyon
Sisymbrium reflexum Nutt.
Sisymbrium parviflorum Lam.
Packera cymbalaria (Pursh) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Collinsia bicolor Raf.
Aster caerulescens DC.
Geranium caespitosum subsp. atropurpureum (A.Heller) W.A.Weber
Peramium decipiens (Hook.) Piper
Senecio uintahensis (A.Nelson) Greenm.
Haplopappus acaulis var. glabratus D.C.Eaton
Mimulus langsdorffii Donn ex Greene
Saxifraga virginiensis var. californica (Greene) Jeps.
Solidago corymbosa Elliott
Argentina argentea (L.) Rydb.
Batrachium confervoides Fries
Cercocarpus parvifolius Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.
Geum aleppicum var. strictum (Aiton) Fernald
Fragaria americana (Porter) Britton
Ivesia gordanii (Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Bromus rigidus var. gussonei (Parl.) Coss. & Durieu
Sphacele calycina Benth.
Salvia carnosa var. argentea (Rydb.) McMinn
Dichelostemma pulchellum var. pauciflorum (Torr.) Hoover
Roripa Adans.
Arnica latifolia var. teucriifolia L.O.Williams
Eriogonum umbellatum var. intectum A.Nelson
Cornus californica var. nevadensis Jeps.
Alyssum parviflorum Schloss. ex Nyman
Arenaria rossii var. apetala Maguire
Salix rotundifolia var. dodgeana (Rydb.) A.E.Murray
Drymocallis glandulosa subsp. pseudorupestris (Rydb.) Soják
Heuchera parvifolia var. nivalis (Rosend.Butters & Lakela) Á.Löve.D.Löve & B.M.Kapoor
Gilia congesta var. crebrifolia (Nutt.) A.Gray
Eriogonum microthecum var. macdougalii (Gand.) S.Stokes
Quercus eastwoodiae Rydb.
Senecio malmstenii S.F.Blake ex Tidestr.
Microseris indivisa Greene
Fendlera falcata Thornber ex Wooton & Standl.
Silene multicaulis Boiss.
Boechera williamsii (Rollins) Dorn
Helichrysum angustifolium Planellas, 1852
Laburnum Fabr.
Jamesia californica Fedde
Scirpus occidentalis (S.Watson) Chase
Acacia sophorae (Labill.) R.Br.
Baeria uliginosa A.Gray
Trifolium rydbergii Greene
Claytonia megarhiza var. bellidifolia (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Androsace diffusa Small
Penstemon spectabilis Thurb.
Potentilla monspeliensis L.
Chrysothamnus glaucus A.Nelson
Penstemon glabrescens Pennell
Erigeron viscidus Rydb.
Erigeron asper Nutt.
Verbena bracteosa Michx.
Draba densiflora Nutt.
Elaeagnus argentea Nutt.
Gentiana elegans A.Nelson
Urtica californica Greene
Quercus utahensis (A.DC.) Rydb.
Brassica rapa var. campestris (L.) W.D.J.Koch
Erigeron luteus A.Nelson
Aster longifolius Desf., 1829
Silene drummondii hort.
Epilobium franciscanum Barbey
Eriogonum taxifolium Greene
Penstemon procerus subsp. aberrans (M.E.Jones) D.D.Keck
Quercus idonea Goldman
Sicyos L.
Plumbaginaceae
Paronychia Mill.
Trachymene pilosa Sm.
Phoebe Nees
Cinnamomum sezannense Brown, 1962
Platanus nobilis Newberry, 1868
Meliosma truncata MacGinitie, 1941
Quercus yanceyi Knowlton, 1899
Trapa microphylla Lesquereux, 1878
Salix ionensis MacGinitie, 1941
Calycites mikanoides MacGinitie, 1941
Ficus shastensis Lesquereux, 1888
Vouapa geminifolia MacGinitie, 1941
Robinia ×ambigua Poir.
Delphinium xantholeucum Piper
Agave verdensis W.C.Hodgs. & Salywon
Coleus neochilus Schltr., 1961
Peperomia bracteata A.W.Hill
Verbascum creticum (L.) Cav.
Narcissus cyclazetta Chater & Stace
Rumex obtusifolius subsp. obtusifolius
Primula angustifolia Torr.
Plantago asiatica L.
Cylindropuntia imbricata subsp. rosea (DC.) M.A.Baker
Asclepias contrayerba Sessé & Moc.
Magnolia alba (DC.) Figlar
Rubus phoenicolasius Maxim.
Crocus speciosus M.Bieb.
Pseudognaphalium obtusifolium (L.) Hilliard & B.L.Burtt
Bursera concinna Sandwith
Tabebuia rosea (Bertol.) DC.
Opuntia reflexispina Wiggins & Rollins
Stenorrhynchos michuacanum (Lex.) Lindl.
Haematoxylum L.
Karwinskia Zucc.
Tridax L.
Sideroxylon obtusifolium (Roem. & Schult.) T.D.Penn.
Zosterella dubia (Jacq.) Small
Mammillaria saboae var. haudeana (A.B.Lau & K.Wagner) Glass & R.A.Foster, 1979
Acer cappadocicum Gled.
Avena ×hybrida Peterm.
Lathyrus bijugatus var. sandbergii T.G.White
Vitis piasezkii var. pagnucii (Planch.) Rehder
Ficus cordata subsp. salicifolia (Vahl) C.C.Berg
Aegilops caudata L.
Elymus semicostatus (Steud.) Melderis
Lupinus christinae A.Heller
Ipomoea lobata (Pilg.)
Fragaria chiloensis f. patagonica Staudt
Manihot esculenta subsp. esculenta
Cinnamomum pachypodum (Nees) Kosterm.
Xanthosoma wendlandii (Schott) Standl.
Ribes missouriense Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Lupinus sulphureus var. echlerianus C.P.Sm.
Ribes magellanicum Poir.
Rubus hispidus L.
Rubus parvus Buchanan
Gossypium nandewarense Derera
Lathyrus nervosus Lam.
Ficus drupacea Thunb.
Camellia rusticana Honda
Lupinus navicularius A.Heller
Malus baccata var. himalaica (Maxim.) C.K.Schneid.
Prunus serotina var. salicifolia (Kunth) Koehne
Acer ukurunduense Trautv. & C.A.Mey.
Camellia fraterna Hance
Ipomoea ×multifida (Raf.) Shinners
Allium moly L.
Lupinus caeruleus A.Heller
Ficus henneana Miq.
Erodium speciosum (L.) Salisb.
Deinandra greeneana var. greeneana
Plantago speciosa E.Morris
Quercus hybr
Trifolium uniflorum L.
Trifolium rostratum Greene
Pyrola dentata var. apophylla Copel.
Romulea Maratti
Danthonia pilosa R.Br.
Ericameria ericoides f. blakei (C.B.Wolf) Hoover
Dysphania R.Br.
Trifolium piorkowskii Rand.Morgan & A.L.Barber
Trifolium ×jankae Soó
Piperia elegans subsp. decurtata Rand.Morgan & Glic.
Lampranthus spectabilis (Haw.) N.E.Br.
Monardella stebbinsii Hardham & Bartel
Trifolium silvestre Ducommun, 1869
Oxalis radicosa A.Rich.
Trifolium lanatum Thunb.
Trifolium californicum Jeps.
Trifolium neolagopus Lojac.
Trifolium rupestre Ten.
Mimulus arvensis Greene
Trifolium mercedense P.B.Kenn.
Trifolium pseudoalbopurpureum P.B.Kenn.
Ornithopus L.
Trifolium gracilentum var. inconspicuum Fernald
Trifolium traskae P.B.Kenn.
Allocarya Greene
Centromadia pungens subsp. maritima (Greene) B.G.Baldwin
Acanthomintha (A.Gray) A.Gray
Phragmites vulgaris Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Carex lasiocarpa var. americana Fernald
Rubus parviflorus subsp. velutinus (Hook. & Arn.) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Lasthenia minor subsp. minor
Lasthenia minor subsp. maritima (A.Gray) Ornduff
Leontodon nudicaulis subsp. taraxacoides (Vill.) Schinz & Thell.
Astragalus tegetarius S.Watson
Parapholis C.E.Hubb.
Pentachaeta Nutt.
Antirrhinum vagans A.Gray
Collinsia sparsiflora var. solitaria (Kellogg) Newsom
Datura stramonium var. stramonium
Scoliopus Torr.
Conyza bilbaoana J.Rémy
Diplacus fasciculatus (Pennell) McMinn
Consolida Gray
Trifolium melananthum Hook. & Arn.
Philotheca myoporoides (DC.) Bayly
Paulownia kawakamii Ito
Trifolium longipes subsp. multipedunculatum (P.B.Kenn.) J.M.Gillett
Trifolium geminiflorum Greene
Melicytus crassifolius (Hook.fil.) Garn.-Jones
Trifolium depauperatum var. laciniatum (Greene) Jeps.
Trifolium dianthum Greene
Tillandsia balbisiana Schult. & Schult.f.
Oenothera hookeri var. hookeri
Arctostaphylos glandulosa f. cushingiana (Eastw.) P.V.Wells
Trifolium phaeocephalum Greene
Erodium botrys var. brachycarpum Godr.
Streptanthus amplexicaulis (S.Watson) Jeps.
Sidalcea malviflora var. sancta C.L.Hitchc.
Briza L.
Astragalus dispermus A.Gray
Rubus spectabilis var. menziesii (Hook.) S.Watson
Yucca whipplei subsp. percursa A.L.Haines
Potentilla californica Greene
Merremia Dennst. ex Endl.
Akebia Decne.
Haematoxylum campechianum L.
Iresine schaffneri S.Watson
Macrotomia DC.
Epilobium maysillesii Munz
Distichlis spicata var. divaricata Beetle
Morisonia americana L.
Penstemon kunthii G.Don
Pilea Lindl.
Scutellaria albida subsp. albida
Cinnamomum zeylanicum Breyn.
Poa griffithsii Hitchc.
Epicampes ligulata Scribn. ex Vasey
Sophora flavescens Aiton
Terminalia chebula Retz.
Cyathula Blume
Trifolium eriocephalum Ledeb.
Opuntia occidentalis var. occidentalis
Aponogeton distachyus L.f.
Cinchona L.
Hedyotis microtheca (Cham. & Schltdl.) Steud.
Collinsia bicolor (Mill. & Muhl.) Benth.
Buchnera cruciata Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Stipa columbiana subsp. columbiana
Castilleja integra var. intermedia Cockerell
Brongniartia lupinoides (Kunth) Taub.
Leonurus L.
Haplopappus parryi Gray
Astrocaryum mexicanum Liebm. ex Mart.
Serenoa serrulata (Michx.) G.Nicholson
Cologania pulchella Kunth
Semiaquilegia adoxoides (DC.) Makino
Arnebia euchroma (Royle) I.M.Johnst.
Cogswellia nevadensis M.E.Jones
Asparagus deflexus Baker
Durio zibethinus Murray
Weinmannia trichosperma Cav.
Sisyrinchium tenuifolium Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Gaultheria glaucifolia var. rosei (Small) Luteyn
Acer hyrcanum Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Lupinus lutosus A.Heller
Carya aquatica (F.Michx.) Nutt.
Vitis vinifera var. vinifera
Vaccinium corymbosum var. albiflorum (Hook.) Fernald
Psidium cattleianum var. cattleianum
Aegilops squarrosa subsp. typica Zhuk
Acer opalus Mill.
Ilex dipyrena Wall.
Lupinus minimus var. hellerae (A.Heller) C.P.Sm. & H.St.John
Medicago polymorpha var. denticulata (Willd.) Kerguélen
Ribes trilobum Meyen
Nicotiana caesia Suksd.
Lupinus lepidus subsp. lyallii (A.Gray) Detling
Rubus hesperius W.M.Rogers
Fortunella Swingle
Ribes ambiguum Maxim.
Chenopodium opulifolium Schrad.
Echinochloa muricata var. muricata
Rubus pectinellus Maxim.
Rubus hybr
Acer campbellii subsp. sinense (Pax) P.C.de Jong
Lupinus howard-scottii C.P.Sm.
Rubus illecebrosus Focke
Malus sieversii (Ledeb.) Roem.
Ficus congesta Roxb.
Manihot oaxacana D.J.Rogers & Appan
Rubus neglectus P.J.Müll. ex Focke
Ilex opaca var. opaca
Solanum nigrum var. douglasii (Dunal) A.Gray
Triteleia versicolor Hoover
Lomandra hystrix (R.Br.) L.R.Fraser & Vickery
Xylorhiza cronquistii S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Ipomoea ancisa House
Papaver nudicaule subsp. americanum Rändel ex D.F.Murray
Escobaria vivipara var. kaibabensis (P.C.Fisch.) N.P.Taylor
Artemisia campestris var. wormskioldii (Besser ex Hook) Cronquist
Sclerocactus whipplei subsp. whipplei
Spathodea P.Beauv.
Mammillaria heyderi subsp. gummifera (Engelm.) D.R.Hunt
Eucephalus gormanii Piper
Caesalpinia pulcherrima subsp. flava Bailey & Rehder
Juncus inflexus L.
Montanoa pteropoda S.F.Blake
Muhlenbergia bushii R.W.Pohl
Telanthophora grandifolia (Less.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Juncus brachycephalus (Engelm.) Buchenau
Melampodium montanum Benth.
Cymodoceaceae
Alstroemeria aurea Graham
Drosera trinervia Spreng.
Malva olbia (L.) Alef.
Aloe plicatilis (L.) Mill.
Gentiana scabra Bunge
Panicum dissitiflorum Vasey
Stellaria cuspidata Willd. ex Schltdl.
Dioscorea batatas Decne.
Ipomoea clavata (G.Don) Ooststr. ex J.F.Macbr.
Astragalus austriacus Jacq.
Codonopsis lanceolata (Siebold & Zucc.) Benth. & Hook.f. ex Trautv.
Lupinus polyphyllus var. grandifolius (Lindl. ex J.Agardh) Torr. & A.Gray
Luina stricta (Greene) B.L.Rob.
Geranium subulatostipulatum R.Knuth
Mandragora L.
Cedrela mexicana M.Roem.
Spergularia diandra (Guss.) Heldr.
Psoralea corylifolia L.
Combretum farinosum Kunth
Eucalyptus corrugata Luehm.
Pennellia lasiocalycina (O.E.Schulz) Rollins
Salix famelica (C.R.Ball) Argus
Trichocereus schickendantzii (F.A.C.Weber) Britton & Rose
Astragalus membranaceus Moench
Aristolochia palmeri S.Watson
Microlobius foetidus (Jacq.) M.Sousa & G.Andrade
Phelypaea californica (Cham. & Schltdl.) G.Don
Populus ×bernardii B.Boivin
Cassia hirsuta L.
Euphorbia serpyllifolia Bojer, 1837
Eriogonum dichotomum Douglas ex Benth.
Astragalus dorycnioides Douglas ex G.Don
Agave pringlei Engelm. ex Orcutt
Elytraria tridentata Vahl
Glinus latoides L.
Cornus paucinervis Hance
Mahonia japonica (Thunb.) DC.
Mahonia piperiana Abrams
Berberis gagnepainii C.K.Schneid.
Aconogonon newberryi (Small) Soják
Limosella subulata Ives
Aesculus ×neglecta Lindl.
Michelia L.
Cotoneaster frigida Wall.
Hibbertia volubilis Andr.
Eriogonum apricum var. prostratum Myatt
Campanula sharsmithiae Morin
Eritrichium nanum (L.) Gaudin
Mimulus longulus Greene
Sarcococca hookeriana Baill.
Maximowiczia sonorae S.Watson
Erythea brandegeei Purpus
Cassia goldmanii Rose
Spartina spartinae (Trinius) Merrill ex Hitchcock, 1913
Trifolium amplectens var. stenophyllum (Nutt.) Jeps.
Aristotelia macqui L'Hér.
Stipa comata var. intermedia Scribn. & Tweedy
Artemisia californica var. californica
Duchesnea indica var. indica
Castanea crenata Siebold & Zucc.
Lupinus citrinus var. deflexus (Congdon) Jeps.
Mimulus subulatus (A.L.Grant) Pennell
Saxifraga punctata L.
Sinapis L.
Atocion armeria (L.) Raf.
Hypericum formosissimum Takht.
Loiseleuria procumbens Linnaeus, 1753
Atriplex parishii var. parishii
Stipa lemmonii subsp. lemmonii
Chrysanthemum serotinum L.
Urochloa mutica (Forssk.) T.Q.Nguyen
Xanthosoma sagittifolium (L.) Schott
Stylosanthes dissitiflora B.L.Rob. & Seaton
Senna mensicola (H.S.Irwin & Barneby) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Calycadenia multiglandulosa subsp. cephalotes (DC.) D.D.Keck
Humulus lupulus var. lupulus
Portulaca umbraticola subsp. umbraticola
Viola aurea subsp. mohavensis M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen
Cogswellia rigida M.E.Jones
Baccharis salicifolia var. longifolia (DC.) Cuatrec.
Ziziphus sonorensis S.Watson
Ericameria nauseosa subsp. washoensis (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Astragalus tegetarius var. danaus Barneby
Arctostaphylos tomentosa var. crinita J.E.Adams
Euphorbia cuspidata Bertol.
Veronica hederifolia var. triloba Opiz
Lupinus albifrons var. johnstonii (C.P.Sm.) Jeps.
Astragalus sileranus var. cariacus M.E.Jones
Eriogonum heermannii subsp. heermannii
Salvia funerea var. fornacis Jeps.
Cotyledon laxa var. nevadensis (S.Watson) Jeps.
Carsonia sparsiflora (S.Watson) Greene
Vaccinium nivictum Camp
Lepidospartum squamatum var. squamatum
Langloisia flaviflora A.Davidson
Calamagrostis micrantha var. sierrae M.E.Jones
Cymopterus lapidosus var. deserti M.E.Jones
Pachylophus canescens Piper
Schoenoplectus hallii (A.Gray) S.G.Sm.
Gilia davyi Milliken
Thalictrum duriusculum Greene
Opuntia phaeacantha var. superbospina (Griffiths) L.D.Benson
Arctostaphylos viscida var. oblongifolia (Howell) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Machaeranthera lagunensis D.D.Keck
Drymocallis rhomboidea Rydb.
Arctostaphylos uva-ursi subsp. uva-ursi
Lathyrus coriaceus T.G.White
Rhynchosia rariflora Standl.
Mentzelia albescens (Gillies & Arn) Herter
Tripleurospermum perforatum (Mérat) Wagenitz
Dalea hutchinsoniae M.E.Jones
Gilia congesta var. paniculata M.E.Jones
Montia clara Ö.Nilsson
Trifolium monanthum var. parvum (Kellogg) McDermott
Lycium verrucosum Eastw.
Cistus incanus subsp. creticus (L.) Heywood
Astragalus tegetarius var. rotundus (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Hedychium flavescens Carey ex Roscoe
Sphaeralcea purpurea Parish ex Jeps.
Salix herbacea L.
Cercocarpus arizonicus M.E.Jones
Lotus torreyi var. seorsus J.F.Macbr.
Microseris laciniata subsp. leptosepala (Nutt.) K.L.Chambers
Ribes watkinsii Eastw.
Schoenoplectus fluviatilis (Torr.) M.T.Strong
Tradescantia tuberosa Roxb.
Arabis davidsonii var. parva Rollins
Anogra californica Small
Penstemon confertus var. aberrans M.E.Jones
Clarkia purpurea var. hirsuta (Kellogg) Hoover
Pedicularis flavida Pennell
Acacia glaucescens Willd.
Spergularia salina var. tenuis (Greene) Jeps.
Cymopterus aboriginum var. ovalis M.E.Jones
Phaca jucunda Jeps. & Rydb.
Salvia arizonica var. huachucana M.E.Jones
Eriogonum flexum var. ferronis M.E.Jones
Eschscholzia californica var. douglasii (Benth.) A.Gray
Drudeophytum clementis M.E.Jones
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. multicaulis (Greene) Payson
Rhododendron albiflorum var. albiflorum
Vaccinium oxycoccos var. ovalifolium Michx.
Amorpha occidentalis var. emarginata E.J.Palmer
Psoralidium lanceolatum var. stenostachys (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Allium kessleri Davidson
Cereus giganteus Engelm.
Cirsium tweedyi (Rydb.) Rydb.
Eschscholzia procera Greene
Eriogonum rubidum Gand.
Hibiscus coulteri var. brevipedunculata M.E.Jones
Citrullus colocynthis var. lanatus (Thunb.) Matsum. & Nakai
Aquilegia coerulea var. calcarea M.E.Jones
Carex langeana Fernald
Abelia grandifolia Villarreal
Lessingia ramulosissima A.Nelson
Penstemon fruticosus subsp. fruticosus
Galium multiflorum var. hirsutum (A.Gray) Jeps.
Chaenactis gillespiei Stockw.
Ziziphus lycioides A.Gray
Astragalus campestris var. hylophilus (Rydb.) M.E.Jones
Delphinium variegatum subsp. apiculatum (Greene) Ewan
Linanthus rattanii (A.Gray) Greene
Eriogonum vimineum var. glabrum S.Stokes
Desmodium spirale var. exiguum (A.Gray) B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Hugelia Benth.
Leucosyris Greene
Ambrosia simulans Shinners
Potentilla drummondii var. drummondii
Echinocactus cylindraceus (Engelm.) Engelm.
Sclerocactus parviflorus subsp. intermedius (Peebles) K.D.Heil & J.M.Porter
Eriogonum jamesii var. rupicola Reveal
Camissonia hardhamiae Raven
Aquilegia coerulea var. flavescens (S.Watson) G.Lawson
Arabis hirschbergiae S.Boyd
Eschscholzia minutiflora var. darwinensis M.E.Jones
Morus australis Poir.
Castilleja spiralis Jeps.
Hosackia argophylla var. decora I.M.Johnst.
Kelloggia Torr. ex Benth. & Hook.f.
Grusonia parishiorum (Orcutt ex Britton & Rose) Pinkava
Astragalus owyheensis A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Crassula connata var. subsimplex (S.Watson) M.Bywater & Wickens
Rhynchospora capitellata f. discutiens (S.F.Blake) Gale
Dalea fremontii var. saundersii (Parish) Munz
Parosela californica (S.Watson) Vail
Panicum rigidulum var. rigidulum
Vicia humilis Kunth
Ziziphus Mill.
Echinochloa aristata Raspail
Echinospermum redowskii (Hornem.) Lehm.
Leersia Sw.
Taraxacum kok-saghyz Rodin
Hermidium alipes var. pallidum Ced.Porter
Arabis arcuata var. rubicundula Jepson
Lotus platycarpos Viv.
Dudleya affinis (K.M.Nakai) P.H.Thomson
Penstemon owenii A.Nelson
Penstemon pseudohumilis M.E.Jones
Haplopappus venetus subsp. tridentatus H.M.Hall
Asclepias vestita subsp. vestita
Melica californica var. californica
Lavatera insularis S.Watson
Orobanche ludoviciana subsp. ludoviciana
Erigeron caespitosus var. laccoliticus M.E.Jones
Castilleja wootonii Standl.
Epilobium obcordatum subsp. siskiyouense Munz
Salvia lanceolata Lam.
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. virgata Jeps.
Carex gravida L.H.Bailey
Polygala lasseniana A.Heller
Krynitzkia oblata M.E.Jones
Solidago algida Piper
Plantago major var. pachyphylla Pilg.
Eriogonum spathulare Gand.
Ranunculus inamoenus var. alpeophilus (A.Nelson) L.D.Benson
Ericameria monactis McClatchie
Arctostaphylos glauca f. puberula (J.T.Howell) P.V.Wells
Ptiloria parryi (A.Gray) Coville
Sphaeralcea rusbyi var. rusbyi
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. bernardinus H.M.Hall
Erodium ciconium (L.) L'Hér.
Mimulus brachiatus Pennell
Lotus trispermus Greene
Habenaria sparsiflora var. brevifolia (Greene) Correll
Astragalus triflorus var. playanus (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Eriogonum carneum (J.T.Howell) Reveal
Plectritis samolifolia F.Meigen
Arenaria laricifolia (L.) B.L.Rob.
Eriogonum ochrocephalum var. angustum M.E.Jones
Astragalus strigulosus var. brevidentatus Hemsl.
Echeveria lanceolata var. composta Jeps.
Chylismia clavaeformis var. clavaeformis
Vicia californica Greene
Astragalus montanus var. coloradoensis (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Melica stricta var. albicaulis Boyle
Agave consociata Trel.
Arabis lyrata var. occidentalis S.Watson
Pyrrocoma halophila Greene
Orthocarpus erianthus var. laevis A.Gray
Lathyrus strictus var. alefeldii (T.G.White) Jeps.
Silene scouleri var. scouleri
Schoenoplectiella Lye
Perezia pinetorum Brandegee
Cuscuta denticulata var. vetchii (Brandegee) T.Beliz
Phaca sabulonum (A.Gray) Rydb.
Stenotus Nutt.
Salix nigra var. vallicola Dudley
Arctostaphylos obtusifolia Piper
Crassula perfoliata var. falcata (J.C.Wendl.) Toelken
Euphorbia polycarpa var. typica L.C.Wheeler
Godetia quadrivulnera var. hallii Jeps.
Abronia wootonii (Standl.) Tidestr.
Malvastrum nesioticum B.L.Rob.
Parosela parryi (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Heller
Arctostaphylos nummularia subsp. sensitiva (Jeps.) P.V.Wells
Cistanthe parryi var. hesseae (J.H.Thomas) Kartesz & Gandhi
Godetia purpurea (Curtis) G.Don
Oryzopsis miliacea (L.) Burtt Davy, 1897
Stellaria borealis var. bongardiana Fernald
Cheiranthus pacificus E.Sheld.
Erigeron decumbens subsp. robustior Cronquist
Amsinckia intermedia var. echinata (A.Gray) Wiggins
Gilia floccosa var. ambigua M.E.Jones
Allium pseudobulbiferum Davidson
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. brevior Jeps.
Downingia immaculata Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Galium angustifolium var. foliosum Hilend & J.T.Howell
Arabis spathulata Walp.
Psoralea lanceolata var. lanceolata
Echinocereus fendleri var. bonkerae (Thornber & Bonker) L.D.Benson
Holocarpha obconica subsp. obconica
Haplopappus eximius H.M.Hall
Monardella nana var. tenuiflora (S.Watson ex A.Gray) Abrams
Arabis pinzlae Rollins
Plagiobothrys ursinus A.Gray
Mucronea californica var. suksdorfii (J.F.Macbr.) Goodman
Ribes nevadense var. jaegeri Berger
Mentzelia multiflora var. longiloba (J.Darl.) Kartesz
Amaranthus fimbriatus var. fimbriatus
Eriophyllum multiflorum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Echinocereus engelmannii var. howei L.D.Benson
Collinsia bruceae M.E.Jones
Oxytropis borealis var. australis S.L.Welsh
Hemizonia angustifolia DC.
Eriogonum longilobum M.E.Jones
Lotus rubriflorus H.Sharsm.
Astragalus wootonii var. endopterus Barneby
Haplopappus armerioides var. gramineus S.L.Welsh & F.J.Sm.
Poinsettia dentata (Michx.) Klotzsch & Garcke
Carex filifolia var. miser L.H.Bailey
Cotoneaster magnificus J.Fryer & B.Hylmö
Astragalus gracilentus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Ledum glandulosum subsp. glandulosum
Lupinus fruticulosus Greene
Papaver glaucum Boiss. & Hausskn.
Panicum capillare var. capillare
Xylophacos uintensis (M.E.Jones) Rydb.
Helianthus fascicularis Greene
Heterocodon Nutt.
Astragalus bicristatus var. tetrapteroides M.E.Jones
Capsella elliptica C.A.Mey.
Pasania densiflora f. lanceolata Jeps.
Poa laxa var. debilior M.E.Jones
Ivesia purpurascens (S.Watson) D.D.Keck
Opuntia phaeacantha var. castorea S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Amorpha occidentalis Abrams
Viola pteropoda Hemsl.
Opuntia brachyarthra Engelm. & Bigelow
Echinocereus engelmannii var. purpureus L.D.Benson
Gazania linearifolia Bolus
Verbena prostrata Savi
Potentilla acuminata H.M.Hall
Carex vahlii Schkuhr
Trifolium neurophyllum Greene
Euphorbia hieronymi Subils
Wedelia incarnata (L.) Kuntze
Aster glaucodes subsp. pulcher S.F.Blake
Tribulus L.
Penstemon nelsoniae D.D.Keck & Thomps.
Rubus glaucifolius var. ganderi (L.H.Bailey) Munz
Grusonia stanlyi (Engelm.) H.Rob.
Monardella odoratissima subsp. australis (Abrams) Epling
Astragalus jessiae M.Peck
Aster torreyi Kuntze
Vaccinium cespitosum var. paludicola (Camp) Hultén
Ranunculus suksdorfii subsp. caespitosus F.J.F.Fisher, J.A.Rowley & Marchant
Potentilla wheeleri var. paupercula Jeps.
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. taxifolium (Greene) Parish
Dinebra retroflexa var. retroflexa
Townsendia florifer var. communis M.E.Jones, 1895
Lotus eriophorus Greene
Tribulus grandiflorus Benth. & Hook.fil. ex S.Watson
Oenothera abramsii J.F.Macbr.
Opuntia aureispina (S.Brack & Heil) Pinkava & B.D.Parfitt
Lupinus leucophyllus var. tenuispicus (A.Nelson) C.P.Sm.
Oenothera laciniata subsp. pubescens (Willd.) Munz
Juncus macrandus Coville
Euryops chrysanthemoides (DC.) B.Nord.
Sarracenia alata (Alph.Wood) Alph.Wood
Sclerocactus sileri (Engelm. ex Coult.) K.D.Heil & J.M.Porter
Stenocereus kerberi (K.Schum.) A.C.Gibson & K.E.Horak
Silene gallica subsp. anglica (L.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Kuruna debilis (Thwaites) Attigala, Kaththr. & L.G.Clark
Ecdeiocolea monostachya F.Muell.
Penstemon rattanii subsp. rattanii
Aloe salm-dyckiana Schult. & Schult.f.
Githopsis diffusa var. guadalupensis Morin
Codonopsis tangshen Oliv.
Sophia ochroleuca Wooton
Coriaria nepalensis Wall.
Artemisia cana var. viscidula Osterh.
Petroselinum crispum (Mill.) Nyman
Spirodela Schleid.
Thladiantha grosvenorii (Swingle) C.Jeffrey
Iresine diffusa f. diffusa
Leontodon saxatilis var. saxatilis
Apocynum tomentellum Greene
Dalbergia odorifera T.C.Chen
Lupinus pusillus Ch.Anders.
Verbena simplex var. orcuttiana (L.M.Perry) N.O'Leary
Cissus trifolia (L.) K.Schum.
Boechera breweri var. breweri
Begonia rhopalocarpa Warb.
Cynanchum stauntonii (Decne.) Schltr. ex H.Lév.
Asparagus densiflorus var. sprengeri Kunth
Asclepias circinalis (Decne.) Woodson
Sisyrinchium palustre Diels
Jatropha dioica Sessé ex Cerv.
Echeandia palmeri Cruden
Rubus procerus P.J.Müll. ex Boulay
Hedeoma pulegioides (L.) Pers.
Caesalpinia ortegae Standl.
Boechera goodrichii (S.L.Welsh) N.H.Holmgren
Ruschia granitica (L.Bolus) L.Bolus
Cleistocalyx Blume
Cirsium segetum Bunge
Solanum hazenii Britton
Pittosporaceae
Schoepfia mexicana A.DC.
Lathyroides Heist. ex Fabr.
Euphrasia officinalis L.
Plantago brunnea E.Morris
Senecio taraxacoides (A.Gray) Greene
Metrosideros Banks ex Gaertn.
Croton tiglium L.
Saxifraga nivalis L.
Beaucarnea recurvata Lem.
Solanum lyratum Thunb. ex Murray
Bursera tenuifolia Rose
Achatocarpus Triana
Solidago scabrida DC.
Bromelia L.
Opuntia hitchcockii J.G.Ortega
Nicotiana torreyana A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Stemona Lour.
Bambusa textilis McClure
Oplismenus burmannii var. burmannii
Melica ciliata subsp. taurica (K.Koch) Tzvelev
Escallonia ×langleyensis M.Vilm. & Bois
Saussurea lappa (DC.) Sch.Bip.
Melia L.
Xanthium sibiricum Widd.
Litsea glaucescens Kunth
Quercus peduncularis Née
Crusea megalocarpa (A.Gray) S.Watson
Heterotheca leptoglossa DC.
Artemisia campestris subsp. caudata (Michx.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Elionurus Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Corynanthe Welw.
Liatris lancifolia (Greene) Kittel
Cylindrophyllum Schwantes
Clerodendranthus spicatus (Thunb.) C.Y.Wu ex H.W.Li
Carex rostrata Muhl. ex Willd.
Oxalis divergens Benth. ex Lindl.
Meliosma matudae Lundell
Passiflora racemosa Brot.
Panax pseudoginseng Wall.
Agrimonia pilosa var. japonica (Miq.) Nakai
Citrus tangerina hort. ex Tanaka
Momordica cochinchinensis (Lour.) Spreng.
Mimosa tricephala var. tricephala
Geranium attenuilobum G.N.Jones & F.F.Jones
Scrophularia californica var. oregana (Pennell) Cronquist
Lupinus rivularis J.Agardh
Ipomoea muricata Cav.
Schiedeella Schltr.
Malvaviscus arboreus subsp. arboreus
Amomum tsao-ko Crevost & Lemarié
Phaseolus calcaratus Roxb.
Linum usitatissimum subsp. bienne (Mill.) Stank.
Quercus crassipes Bonpl.
Acacia longifolia subsp. longifolia
Zephyranthes minuta (Kunth) D.Dietr.
Richardia scabra L.
Thevetia ahouai (L.) A.DC.
Penstemon grandiflorus Fraser
Campanula giesekiana Vest ex Schult.
Lantana camara subsp. aculeata (L.) R.W.Sanders
Symphyotrichum patens (Aiton) G.L.Nesom
Silene uniflora Roth
Noccaea fendleri subsp. idahoensis (Payson) Al-Shehbaz & M.Koch
Spinifex sericeus R.Br.
Agave salmiana subsp. crassispina (Trel.) Gentry
Lithocarpus pseudokunstleri A.Camus
Arenaria trichophylla C.Y.Wu ex L.H.Zhou
Phlox andicola Nutt.
Viola longipes Nutt.
Viola renifolia var. brainerdii (Greene) Fernald
Delphinium cyanoreios Piper
Solidago graminifolia (L.) Salisb.
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. gnaphalodes (Nutt.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Grindelia perennis A.Nelson
Cirsium kelseyi (Rydb.) Petr., 1917
Agropyron dasystachyum var. riparium (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Bowden
Vahlodea atropurpurea subsp. latifolia (Hook.) A.E.Porsild
Saussurea nuda var. densa (Hook.) Hultén
Crepis runcinata subsp. hispidulosa (Howell ex Rydb.) Babc. & Stebbins
Agropyron trachycaulum (Link) Malte
Agropyron trachycaulum var. unilaterale (Vasey) Malte
Arnica latifolia var. gracilis (Rydb.) Cronquist
Erigeron glabellus var. pubescens Hook.
Sisyrinchium septentrionale E.P.Bicknell
Ranunculus circinatus Sibth.
Lesquerella arenosa Rydb.
Plantago patagonica var. patagonica
Ranunculus purshii Richardson
Ranunculus arcticus Richardson
Naiocrene Rydb.
Claytonia caroliniana var. lanceolata (Pursh) S.Watson
Camassia quamash var. quamash
Juncus albescens (Lange) Fernald
Ranunculus abortivus var. acrolasius Fernald
Viola praemorsa subsp. linguifolia (Nutt.) M.S.Baker
Ranunculus rhomboideus Goldie
Clematis chiisanensis Nakai
Anthoxanthum hirtum subsp. hirtum
Senecio cymbalarioides subsp. cymbalarioides
Honckenya peploides var. major (Hook.) Abrams
Lilium columbianum Leichtlin ex Duch.
Arnica amplexicaulis var. amplexicaulis
Vicia nigricans subsp. gigantea (Hook.) Lassetter & C.R.Gunn
Platanthera unalaschcensis (Spreng.) Kurtz
Carex straminea var. straminea
Oglifa arvensis (L.) Cass.
Bidens vulgata var. vulgata
Menziesia ferruginea subsp. glabella (A.Gray) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Arabis hirsuta var. hirsuta
Mirabilis hirsuta var. linearis (Pursh) B.Boivin
Plantago patagonica var. spinulosa (Decne.) A.Gray
Lactuca scariola f. integrifolia (Bogenh.) Beck
Polygonum monspeliense Pers.
Senecio streptanthifolius var. borealis (Torr. & A.Gray) J.F.Bain
Senecio flettii Wiegand
Solidago glaberrima Martens
Viola palustris var. brevipes (M.S.Baker) R.J.Davis
Hedysarum alpinum subsp. americanum (Michx. ex Pursh) B.Fedtsch.
Helianthus couplandii B.Boivin
Achillea borealis var. borealis
Solidago glutinosa subsp. glutinosa
Actinea richardsonii (Hook.) Kuntze
Solidago serotina Retz., 1781
Pedicularis flammea L.
Medicago sativa subsp. varia (Martyn) Arcang.
Solidago gigantea var. pitcheri (Nutt.) Shinners
Euthamia graminifolia var. graminifolia
Salix myrtillifolia var. cordata (Andersson) Dorn
Astragalus kentrophyta var. kentrophyta
Hieracium umbellatum var. scabriusculum (Schwein.) Farw.
Hieracium triste subsp. gracile (Hook.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Antennaria erigeroides Greene
Pulsatilla nuttalliana (DC.) Bercht. & J.Presl
Antennaria densifolia Porsild
Helianthus subrhomboideus Rydb.
Haplopappus lanuginosus A.Gray
Lygodesmia rostrata (A.Gray) A.Gray
Disporum oreganum (S.Watson) W.T.Mill.
Trisetum spicatum subsp. majus (Rydb.) Hultén
Populus sargentii Dode
Lactuca scariola var. integrata Gren. & Godr.
Hedysarum alpinum var. americanum Michx. ex Pursh
Hedysarum boreale var. mackenziei (Richardson) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex oederi var. recterostrata (L.H.Bailey) Dorn
Carex vallicola var. vallicola
Astragalus pectinatus Boiss.
Astragalus striatus Torr. & A.Gray
Astragalus aboriginorum Richardson
Potentilla lasiodonta Rydb.
Hedysarum boreale subsp. mackenziei (Richardson) S.L.Welsh
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. woodsonii B.Boivin
Juncus ensifolius subsp. ensifolius
Juncus tweedyi Rydb.
Coeloglossum bracteatum (Muhl. ex Willd.) Parl.
Carex platylepis Mack.
Gentianopsis virgata subsp. macounii (Holm) J.S.Pringle
Agropyron spicatum var. inerme (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) A.Heller
Streptopus amplexifolius var. denticulatus Fassett
Eriophyllum lanatum var. typicum Constance
Arnica longifolia subsp. longifolia
Chrysanthemum leucanthemum var. leucanthemum
Helianthus annuus f. lenticularis (Douglas ex Lindl.) B.Boivin
Carex prairea Dewey
Helianthus nuttallii subsp. canadensis R.W.Long
Erigeron acris subsp. politus (Fr.) H.Lindb.
Aster falcatus subsp. commutatus (Torr. & A.Gray) A.G.Jones
Ratibida columnifera f. pulcherrima (DC.) Fernald
Lesquerella ludoviciana var. arenosa (Richardson) S.Watson
Erigeron compositus var. nudus (Rydb.) A.Nelson, 1909
Rosa ×canadensis W.H.Lewis
Carex raymondii Calder
Stipa spartea var. curtiseta Hitchc.
Hedysarum americanum (Michx. ex Pursh) Britton
Rumex longifolius DC.
Packera paupercula var. paupercula
Poa gracillima var. gracillima
Poa secunda var. elongata (Vasey) Dorn
Zizania latifolia (Griseb.) Turcz. ex Stapf
Arnica louiseana Farr
Kobresia macrocarpa Clokey ex Mackenzie
Viola adunca var. minor (Hook.) Fernald
Agrohordeum macounii (Vasey) Lepage
Agropyron smithii var. smithii
Carex macloviana var. microptera (Mack.) B.Boivin
Carex macloviana subsp. pachystachya (Cham. ex Steud.) Hultén
Habenaria dilatata var. dilatata
Artemisia ludoviciana var. pabularis (A.Nelson) Fernald
Artemisia ludoviciana var. gnaphalodes (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Phyllostachys Siebold & Zucc.
Syringa persica L.
Packera pseudaurea subsp. pseudaurea
Arnica lonchophylla Greene
Castilleja pallida (L.) Kunth
Veronica alpina var. unalaschcensis Cham. & Schltdl.
Bahia oppositifolia (Nutt.) DC.
Solidago decumbens Greene
Galium labradoricum (Wiegand) Wiegand
Bromus inermis subsp. pumpellianus (Scribn.) Wagnon
Quercus dumosa var. turbinella (Greene) Jeps.
Scirpus pungens subsp. pungens
Trisetum spicatum var. spicatum
Solidago nemoralis var. decemflora (DC.) Fernald
Senecio congestus var. palustris (L.) Fernald
Actaea rubra var. arguta (Nutt.) Breitung
Salicornia europaea subsp. rubra (A.Nelson) Breitung
Draba nemorosa var. leiocarpa Lindblom
Phoenicaulis menziesii Greene
Koeleria cristata (L.) Bertol.
Nothocalais cuspidata (Pursh) Greene
Agoseris alpestris (A.Gray) Greene
Agoseris vestita Greene
Agoseris villosa Rydb.
Alisma gramineum C.C.Gmel.
Agropyron trachycaulum var. latiglume (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Beetle
Senecio farriae Greenm.
Gentiana prostrata var. americana Engelm.
Anaphalis margaritacea var. subalpina (A.Gray) A.Gray
Pachystima Raf. ex Endl.
Solidago rigida var. humilis Porter
Linum compactum A.Nelson
Euphorbia serpillifolia var. rugulosa Engelm. ex Millsp.
Euthamia graminifolia var. nuttallii (Greene) Sieren
Erigeron acris subsp. debilis (A.Gray) Piper
Agropyron trachycaulum var. glaucum (Pease & A.H.Moore) Malte
Agropyron pseudorepens var. vulpinum (Rydb.) Bowden
Alopecurus occidentalis Scribn.
Corallorhiza striata f. fulva Fernald
Bouteloua gracilis (Kunth) Lag. ex Steud.
Solidago gigantea var. serotina (Kuntze) Cronquist
Liatris punctata f. punctata
Smilacina sessilifolia Nutt.
Comandra umbellata var. angustifolia (A.DC.) Torr.
Draba cuneifolia var. platycarpa (Torr. & A.Gray) S.Watson
Stipa coronata subsp. parishii (Vasey) Hitchc.
Erigeron eriophyllus Gray
Orobanche ludoviciana var. ludoviciana
Carex haysii S.L.Welsh
Malaxis monophyllos (L.) Sw.
Aster hesperius var. laetevirens (Greene) Cronquist
Aster ericoides subsp. unranked (Rydb.) F.C.Gates, 1940
Aster falcatus subsp. falcatus
Festuca subulata var. subulata
Festuca richardsonii Hook.
Osmorhiza longistylis (Torr.) DC.
Arnica chamissonis subsp. chamissonis
Cryptantha bradburiana Payson
Veronica agrestis L.
Calamagrostis canadensis var. scabra (J.Presl) Hitchc.
Elymus glaucus var. jepsonii Burtt Davy
Puccinellia cusickii Weath.
Artemisia caudata var. rydbergiana B.Boivin
Erigeron glabellus subsp. glabellus
Achillea sibirica Ledeb.
Ambrosia artemisiifolia var. elatior (L.) Descourt.
Artemisia herriotii Rydb.
Valerianella anomala A.Gray
Aligera macroptera var. obtusa Suksd.
Euphorbia rattanii S.Watson
Krynitzkia suksdorfii Greenm.
Epilobium jucundum var. viridifolium Suksd.
Juncus tenuis var. secundus (P.Beauv. ex Poir.) Engelm.
Malvastrum howellii Eastw.
Nasturtium sinuatum var. columbiae Suksd. ex B.L.Rob.
Sanicula nevadensis S.Watson
Sphaeralcea bakeri Jeps.
Eriogonum dasyanthemum var. jepsonii Greene
Leptotaenia anomala J.M.Coult. & Rose
Peperomia huanucoana Trel.
Echinocereus chloranthus (Engelm.) Haage
Eriogynia uniflora S.Watson
Yucca rigida (Engelm.) Trel.
Delphinium californicum f. longipilis Ewan
Epilobium jucundum A.Gray
Juncus scirpoides Lam.
Astragalus kernensis subsp. charlestonensis Clokey
Rumex subalpinus M.E.Jones
Carum lemmonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eunanus pictus Curran ex Greene
Krynitzkia floribunda (Torr.) A.Gray
Euphorbia occidentalis Drew
Ranunculus alveolatus A.M.Carter
Agastache glaucifolia A.Heller
Juncus fucensis H.St.John
Malvastrum helleri Eastw.
Xanthium affine Greene
Delphinium sierrae-blancae subsp. amplum Ewan
Styrax californicus var. fulvescens Eastw.
Geum turbinatum Rydb.
Stachys flaccida Eastw.
Phyllanthus polygonoides Nutt.
Rhamnus occidentalis Howell ex Greene
Melica macbridei Rowland
Claytonia perfoliata var. angustifolia Greene
Thysanocarpus foliosus A.Heller
Juncus leersii T.Marsson
Juncus mertensianus var. filifolius Suksd.
Agoseris altissima Rydb.
Oenothera hookeri subsp. wolfii Munz
Peucedanum torreyi J.M.Coult. & Rose
Salix speciosa Nutt.
Senecio franciscanus Greene
Chorizanthe insularis R.Hoffm.
Trifolium caurinum Piper
Ipomoea egregia House
Rubus parviflorus f. parbifarius Fassett
Carex acutina L.H.Bailey
Lupinus alpinus A.Heller
Agave asperrima subsp. asperrima
Eschscholzia orcuttiana Greene
Arctostaphylos arguta var. diversifolia Parry
Malvastrum palmeri S.Watson
Balsamorhiza hirsuta var. neglecta W.M.Sharp
Cyperus tetragonus Elliott
Jatropha giffordiana Dehgan & G.L.Webster
Glyceria septentrionalis Hitchc.
Salix polaris Wahlenb.
Epilobium ursinum Parish ex Trel.
Eriogonum ursinum var. venosum S.Stokes
Monardella coriacea A.Heller
Agave applanata Lem. ex Jacobi
Saxifraga bracteosa var. leptopetala Suksd.
Carex cristatella Britton
Euphorbia pseudoserpyllifolia Millsp.
Amelanchier basalticola Piper
Ziziphus lycioides var. canescens A.Gray
Coleosanthus venulosus Nelson
Scutellaria viarum A.Heller
Lobelia graminea var. intermedia E.Wimm.
Juncus lampocarpus Ehrh. ex Hoffm.
Malvastrum gracile Eastw.
Eriogonum nudicaule subsp. parleyense S.Stokes
Epilobium coloratum Biehler
Euphorbia rusbyi Greene
Mammillaria alversonii Coult. ex Zeiss.
Euphorbia plummeriae S.Watson
Peucedanum austinae J.M.Coult. & Rose
Phlox pinifolia Brand
Oenothera brevipes var. parviflora S.Watson
Amsinckia pustulata A.Heller
Panicum huachucae Ashe
Eriogonum niveum var. candelabrum Gand.
Eriogonum chrysocephalum subsp. alpestre S.Stokes
Carex viridula var. elatior (Schltdl.) Crins
Eriogonum filicaule Stokes
Malvastrum clementinum Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Peucedanum martindalei J.M.Coult. & Rose
Epithelantha micromeris (Engelm.) F.A.C.Weber ex Britton & Rose
Pectocarya setosa var. aptera I.M.Johnst.
Hymenoxys chrysanthemoides var. excurrens Cockerell
Lupinus latifolius var. barbatus (L.F.Hend.) Munz
Aphyllon arenosum Suksd.
Grindelia integerrima Rydb.
Senecio solidago Rydb.
Lupinus brachypodus Piper
Salix lemmonii var. melanolepis Bebb
Sedum obtusatum var. retusum (Rose) H.Ohba
Phalaris intermedia var. angustata Beal
Lavauxia hamata Wooton & Standl.
Arenaria macdougalii A.Heller
Salix laevigata var. congesta Bebb
Oenothera nitida Greene
Euphorbia petaloidea var. intermedia Engelm.
Potentilla daucifolia Greene
Juncus abjectus F.J.Herm.
Puccinellia angustata (R.Br.) E.L.Rand & Redfield
Cirsium remotifolium var. oregonense Petr.
Thalictrum campylopodum Greene
Orogenia fusiformis var. leibergii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Eschscholzia alcicornis Greene
Peperomia tetragona Ruiz & Pav.
Triteleia angustiflora A.Heller
Carex jamesii Schwein.
Glyceria melicaria (Michx.) F.T.Hubb.
Eschscholzia xylorrhiza Greene
Spiranthes lucida (H.H.Eaton) Ames
Malephora crocea var. purpureocrocea (Haw.) H.Jacobsen & Schwantes
Oenothera californica var. avita (W.M.Klein) S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Trisetum spicatum subsp. molle (Kunth) Piper
Taraxia breviflora (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt. ex Small
Solidago neomexicana (A.Gray) Wooton & Standl.
Lupinus versicolor Sweet
Erigeron acer L.
Stipa pringlei (Beal) Scribn. ex Vasey
Roldana gilgii (Greenm.) H.Rob. & Brettell
Sericotheca discolor (Pursh) Rydb.
Dudleya bryceae Britton ex Britton & Rose
Trifolium longipes subsp. longipes
Cyperus sesquiflorus (Torr.) Mattf. & Kük.
Ageratina glechonophylla (Less.) R.King & H.Rob.
Physalis pubescens var. pubescens
Hexalectris grandiflora (A.Rich. & Galeotti) L.O.Williams
Ipomoea ampullacea Fernald
Antirrhinum coulterianum Benth.
Viguiera decurrens (A.Gray) A.Gray
Evolvulus ovatus Fernald
Acourtia butandae L.Cabrera
Rorippa mexicana (Moc., Sessé & Cerv. ex DC.) Standl. & Steyerm.
Argythamnia brandegeei var. intonsa (I.M.Johnst.) J.W.Ingram
Calliandra anomala (Kunth) J.F.Macbr.
Sclerocarpus sessilifolius Greenm.
Gonolobus barbatus Kunth
Bessera Schult.f.
Euphorbia tomentosa Pers.
Lopezia grandiflora Zucc.
Chorizanthe procumbens var. mexicana Goodman
Buddleja lanceolata Benth.
Quamoclit coccinea (L.) Moench
Sclerocarpus uniserialis (Hook.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hemsl.
Lepidium gerloffianum Vatke ex Thell.
Tragia glanduligera Pax & K.Hoffm.
Schoenocaulon megarrhizum var. megarrhizum
Aloysia sonorensis Moldenke
Croton ciliatoglandulosus Steud.
Stylophorum heterophyllum (Benth.) Steud.
Macroscepis diademata (Ker Gawl.) W.D.Stevens
Pippenalia delphiniifolia (Rydb.) McVaugh
Citharexylum Linnaeus, 1753
Dalea tinctoria Brandegee
Cuscuta gracillima Engelm.
Calochortus venustulus var. venustulus
Tagetes jaliscana Rydb., 1913
Garrya ovata subsp. ovata
Justicia pacifica (Oerst.) Hemsl.
Corchorus siliquosus L.
Eschscholzia minutiflora var. minutiflora
Tetramerium Nees
Adenophyllum aurantium (L.) Strother
Astragalus ammophilus M.Bieb. ex Besser
Packera streptanthifolia var. borealis (Torr. & A.Gray) Trock
Myosotis alpestris subsp. asiatica Vestergr.
Bellis L.
Ranunculus ficaria subsp. bulbifera (Marsden-Jones) Lawalrée
Agoseris gaspensis Fernald
Tiarella menziesii Pursh
Liparis Rich.
Saxifraga ferruginea var. macounii Engl. & Irmsch.
Juncus supinus Moench
Gaillardia aestivalis (Walter) H.Rock
Gilia minutiflora Benth.
Eriogonum minutiflorum S.Watson
Scirpus caespitosus var. callosus Bigelow
Allium douglasii var. douglasii
Galium glaucum L.
Lotus stipularis var. ottleyi Isely
Zigadenus gramineus Rydb.
Eremogone pumicola (Coville & Leiberg) Ikonn.
Epilobium montanum L.
Agropyron triticeum Gaertn.
Leontodon hirtus L.
Cirsium remotifolium Jeps., 1901
Lobelia spicata Lam.
Erythronium grandiflorum var. nudipetalum (Applegate) C.L.Hitchc.
Lonicera hirsuta Eaton
Lupinus formosus var. sonomensis (A.Heller) Conrad
Cacaliopsis nardosmia var. glabrata Piper
Monnina phillyreoides (Bonpl.) B.Eriksen
Ptelea trifoliata subsp. trifoliata
Haplopappus macrocephalus (Poepp. ex Less.) DC.
Polygala tweedyi Britton ex Wheelock
Thouinia acuminata S.Watson
Felicia aethiopica (Burm.fil.) Grau
Abutilon tridens Standl. & Steyerm.
Valeriana sitchensis subsp. scouleri (Rydb.) Piper
Amsinckiopsis kingii var. harknesii (S.Watson) Guilliams, Hasenstab & B.G.Baldwin
Aconogonon phytolaccifolium var. glabrum S.P.Hong
Subularia Ray ex L.
Boltonia asteroides var. recognita (Fernald & Griscom) Cronquist
Arctostaphylos oblongifolia Howell
Leucocrinum montanum Nutt.
Plantago maritima var. juncoides (Lam.) A.Gray
Lolium temulentum subsp. temulentum
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. lindleyana (Besser) Lesica
Sanicula graveolens Poepp.
Sidalcea asprella subsp. virgata (Howell) Halse
Sidalcea asprella subsp. elegans (Greene) Halse
Festuca rubra subsp. commutata Gaudin
Eucephalus Nutt.
Rumex cuneifolius Campd.
Delphinium distichum Geyer ex A.Gray, 1887
Viola orbiculata (A.Gray) Geyer ex B.D.Jacks.
Crataegus columbiana Sarg.
Horkelia daucifolia var. caruifolia (Rydb. ex Howell) Ertter & Reveal
Askellia pygmaea subsp. ramosa (Babc.) K.L.Chambers & S.C.Meyers
Salix sitchensis var. sitchensis
Horkelia ×howellii Rydb.
Trifolium plumosum Douglas
Ozomelis stauropetala (Piper) Rydb.
Salix exigua var. columbiana Dorn
Synthyris missurica subsp. major (Hook.) Pennell
Saxifraga vespertina (Small) Fedde
Spiraea tomentosa L.
Artemisia estesii K.L.Chambers
Trifolium plumosum subsp. plumosum
Muhlenbergia mexicana f. mexicana
Calamagrostis howellii Vasey
Cimicifuga elata var. alpestris H.W.Lee & C.W.Park
Dichodon viscidum (M.Bieb.) Holub
Sambucus mexicana subsp. cerulea (Rafinesque) A.E.Murray
Dodecatheon poeticum L.F.Hend.
Cryptantha rostellata (Greene) Greene
Astragalus conjunctus var. conjunctus
Sabulina howellii (S.Watson) Dillenb. & Kadereit
Drymocallis campanulata (C.L.Hitchc.) Ertter
Persicaria sagittata (L.) H.Gross
Allium fibrillum M.E.Jones ex Abrams
Centaurea debeauxii var. thuillieri (Dostál) P.D.Sell
Valerianella dentata (L.) Pollich
Aegilops speltoides Tausch
Lomatium brevifolium J.M.Coult. & Rose
Plagiobothrys figuratus var. figuratus
Cacaliopsis nardosmia subsp. nardosmia
Duchesnea indica (Andrews) Teschem.
Pedicularis bracteosa var. pachyrhiza (Pennell) Cronquist
Potentilla versicolor Rydb.
Sidalcea asprella subsp. nana (Jeps.) S.R.Hill
Plantago maritima var. californica (Fernald) Pilg.
Glyceria grandis f. grandis
Festuca saximontana subsp. purpusiana (St.-Yves) Tzvelev
Rumex hesperius Greene
Packera porteri (Greene) C.Jeffrey
Trifolium beckwithii W.H.Brewer
Carex vulgaris L.H.Bailey
Rosa yainacensis Greene
Erigeron cascadensis A.Heller
Vicia tetrasperma Linnaeus, 1753
Trifolium eriocephalum subsp. cascadense J.M.Gillett
Collomia macrocalyx Leiberg, 1921
Ceanothus cuneatus A.Gray
Calochortus rustvoldii Callahan
Lolium multiflorum var. multiflorum
Lomatium andrusianum M.Stevens & Mansfield
Paspalum distachyon Poir.
Chamaenerion angustifolium var. canescens (Alph.Wood) Britton
Gruvelia pusilla A.DC.
Arrhenatherum elatius subsp. bulbosum (Willd.) Schübl. & G.Martens
Noccaea fendleri subsp. siskiyouensis (P.K.Holmgren) Al-Shehbaz & M.Koch
Corydalis aquae-gelidae M.Peck & W.C.Wilson
Rhamnus californica var. occidentalis (Howell) Jeps.
Diplacus clivicola (Greenm.) G.L.Nesom
Mentha ×piperita subsp. piperita
Oreocarya subretusa (I.M.Johnst.) Abrams
Lupinus sulphureus subsp. subsaccatus (Suksd.) L.Ll.Phillips
Streptanthus cordatus subsp. cordatus
Eriocoma occidentalis subsp. californica (Merr. & Burtt Davy) Romasch.
Melica stricta var. stricta
Gladiolus communis L.
Damasonium Mill.
Cimicifuga laciniata S.Watson
Drymocallis ashlandica (Greene) Rydb.
Lewisia tweedyi (Gray) B.L.Rob.
Nabalus hastatus (Less.) A.Heller
Festuca rubra subsp. juncea (Hack.) K.Richt.
Penstemon spatulatus Pennell
Boechera fecunda (Rollins) Dorn
Astragalus succumbens Douglas
Lonicera maackii (Rupr.) Herder
Heuchera glabra Willd.
Aster engelmannii var. glaucescens A.Gray
Salix planifolia var. planifolia
Hieracium sabaudum L.
Hackelia diffusa var. cottonii (Piper) R.L.Carr
Mentha ×villosa var. alopecuroides (Hull) Briq.
Eriocoma ×bloomeri (Bol.) Romasch.
Muhlenbergia mexicana var. filiformis (Torr.) Scribn.
Lomatium oreganum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Stipa robusta (Vasey) Scribn.
Campanula rotundifolia var. petiolata (A.DC.) J.K.Henry
Cynodon magennisii Hurcombe
Festuca lemanii T.Bastard
Cryptantha grandiflora Rydb.
Ambrosia grayi (A.Nelson) Shinners
Fragaria ×ananassa subsp. ananassa
Juncus alpinus Pers., 1805
Panicum miliaceum subsp. ruderale (Kitag.) Tzvelev
Torilis henryi C.Norman
Luzula campestris subsp. campestris
Veronica peregrina var. peregrina
Berkheya Ehrh.
Euchiton sphaericus (Willd.) Anderb.
Trillium cuneatum Raf.
Trifolium longipes var. elmeri McDermott
Setaria viridis var. maior (Gaudin) Peterm.
Plagiobothrys shastensis Greene
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum var. sublineare (S.Stokes) Reveal
×Schedololium holmbergii (Dörfl.) Soreng & Terrell
Campanula parryi var. idahoensis McVaugh
Horkelia fusca var. fusca
Trifolium longipes var. pedunculatum (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Polygonum leptocarpum B.L.Rob.
Sporobolus compositus var. compositus
Galium glabrescens subsp. josephinense Dempster & Ehrend.
Galium pedemontanum (Bellardi) All.
Lotus subbiflorus subsp. subbiflorus
Setaria pumila subsp. pallide-fusca (Schumach.) B.K.Simon
Agrostis murbeckii Fouill.
Aquilegia sibirica Lam.
Crepis vesicaria subsp. taraxacifolia (Thuill.) Thell. ex Schinz & R.Keller
Heuchera grossulariifolia var. tenuifolia (Wheelock) C.L.Hitchc.
Veronica undulata Wall.
Prunus serotina var. serotina
Amsinckiopsis kingii (S.Watson) Guilliams, Hasenstab & B.G.Baldwin
Abdra brachycarpa (Nutt.) Greene
Tomostima reptans (Lam.) Al-Shehbaz, M.Koch & Jordan-Thaden
Erythranthe washingtoniensis (Gand.) G.L.Nesom
Polygonum fowleri subsp. fowleri
Cladoraphis cyperoides (Thunb.) S.M.Phillips
×Amelasorbus jackii Rehder
Eremogone franklinii var. thompsonii (M.Peck) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Microseris nutans subsp. siskiyouensis K.L.Chambers
Danthonia spicata var. pinetorum Piper
Hieracium canadense Froel.
Festuca rubra subsp. fallax (Thuill.) Nyman
Hypericum humifusum L.
Sarcocornia A.J.Scott
Carex montanensis L.H.Bailey
Carduus crispus L.
Mertensia brachycalyx Piper
Oreocarya schoolcraftii (Tiehm) R.B.Kelley
Nasturtium ×sterile (Airy Shaw) Oefelein
Trifolium siskiyouense J.M.Gillett
Hibiscus palustris Thore, 1803
Haplopappus aberrans (A.Nelson) H.M.Hall
Sagittaria graminea Michx.
Carex intumescens Rudge
Erythranthe unimaculata (Pennell) G.L.Nesom
Neoholmgrenia hilgardii (Greene) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Dodecatheon pulchellum subsp. macrocarpum (A.Gray) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Salsola kali subsp. pontica (Pall.) Mosyakin
Hieracium columbianum Rydb.
Sidalcea cusickii var. cusickii
Neviusia A.Gray
Haloragis erecta (Banks ex Murray) Eichler
Salvia verticillata L.
Horkelia fusca var. filicoides (Crum) M.Peck
Eriocoma nevadensis (B.L.Johnson) Romasch.
Thinopyrum Á.Löve
Rubus idaeus var. peramoenus (Greene) Fernald
Hypericum canadense L.
Aloysia Paláu
Lapsanastrum apogonoides (Maxim.) Pak & K.Bremer
Horkelia tridentata var. flavescens (Rydb.) Ertter & Reveal
Chlorogalum pomeridianum subsp. austrooreganum Callahan
Prunus pumila var. besseyi (L.H.Bailey) Waugh
Ammophila breviligulata subsp. breviligulata
Nothocalais nigrescens (L.F.Hend.) A.Heller
Claytonia multiscapa subsp. multiscapa
Greeneochloa P.M.Peterson, Soreng, Romasch. & Barberá
Tauschia hooveri Mathias & Constance
Carex brunnescens subsp. brunnescens
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. bijugatus (T.G.White) Broich
Elymus tsukushiensis Honda
Sagina japonica (Sw. ex Steud.) Ohwi
Horkelia daucifolia var. daucifolia
Ballota nigra subsp. foetida (Vis.) Hayek
Potentilla versicolor var. darrachii Ertter & Di Nicola
Erigeron peregrinus var. thompsonii (S.F.Blake ex J.W.Thomps.) Cronquist
Lupinus sericeus var. asotinensis (E.Phillips) C.L.Hitchc.
Crepis nicaeensis Balb. ex Pers., 1807
Allium douglasii var. columbianum Ownbey & Mingrone
Phyteuma scorzonerifolium Vill.
Muhlenbergia uniflora (Muhl.) Fernald
Molinia caerulea (L.) Moench
Erythraea minima Howell
Erythranthe hymenophylla (Meinke) G.L.Nesom
Lallemantia peltata (L.) Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Epilobium alpinum var. albiflorum (Suksd.) C.L.Hitchc.
Amorpha californica Torr. & A.Gray
Viola cognata Greene
Chamaemelum mixtum (L.) All.
Dactylis L.
Salix ×meyeriana Rostk. ex Willd.
Zea mays var. mays
Cerastium nutans var. nutans
Calamagrostis tweedyi (Scribn.) Scribn.
Sidalcea valida Greene
Sedum lanceolatum var. rupicola (G.N.Jones) C.L.Hitchc.
Triglochin maritima var. elata (Nutt.) A.Gray
Hypericum maculatum subsp. obtusiusculum (Tourlet) Hayek
Murdannia keisak (Hassk.) Hand.-Mazz.
Lepyrodiclis holosteoides (C.A.Mey.) Fenzl ex Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Sporobolus confusus (E.Fourn.) Vasey
Eriogonum microtheca var. schoolcraftii Reveal
Carex tribuloides var. tribuloides
Eriogonum shockleyi var. packardae Reveal, 1989
Eriogonum umbellatum var. aridum (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Bromus thominei Hardouin
Chylismia scapoidea subsp. utahensis (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Corydalis lutea (L.) DC.
Polygonum nodosum Pers.
Oncosiphon suffruticosum (L.) Källersjö
Heterotheca villosa var. ballardii (Rydb.) Semple
Rhynchospora colorata (L.) H.Pfeiff.
Eucephalus glaucescens (A.Gray) Greene
Amelanchier florida Wiegand
Phleum arenarium L.
Calochortus clavatus subsp. recurvifolius (Hoover) Munz
Pyrola picta var. picta
Alnus rubra var. pinnatisecta Starker
Ononis spinosa subsp. maritima (Dumort.) P.Fourn.
Epilobium glaberrimum var. fastigiatum (Nutt.) Trel. ex Jeps.
Lathyrus glandulosus Broich
Phlox kelseyi var. missoulensis (Wherry) Cronquist
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. macropodum (Gand.) Reveal
Calochortus coeruleus var. fimbriatus Ownbey
Achnatherum lemmonii subsp. pubescens (Crampton) Barkworth
Sagina alexandrae Iamonico
Linaria triornithophora (L.) Willd.
Salix euxina I.V.Belyaeva
Cryptantha pterocarya var. genuina I.M.Johnst.
Crataegus heterophylla Flüggé
Narcissus odorus L.
Rorripa
Festuca rubra subsp. trichophylla Ducros ex Gaudin
Torilis Adans.
Salicornia virginica Fern. & Brack.
Lallemantia Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Doronicum plantagineum L.
Aegilops umbellata Zhuk.
Anemone oregana var. felix (M.Peck) C.L.Hitchc.
Sandbergia perplexa (L.F.Hend.) Al-Shehbaz
Eleocharis olivacea Clem. & E.G.Clem., 1914
Lobelia hirtella (A.Gray) Greene
Silene hookeri subsp. serpentinicola (T.W.Nelson & J.P.Nelson) K.L.Chambers & S.C.Meyers
Physaria geyeri subsp. geyeri
Cardamine holmgrenii Al-Shehbaz
Senecio lugens var. exaltatus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Cirsium edule var. wenatchense D.J.Keil
Lupinus subvexus var. fluviatilis C.P.Sm.
Dichanthelium commutatum (Schult.) Gould
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum subsp. tenue Piper, 1906
Elyleymus B.R.Baum
Calamagrostis canadensis var. imberbis (Stebbins) C.L.Hitchc.
Inula britannica M.Bieb., 1808
Rytidosperma biannulare (Zotov) Connor & Edgar
Corrigiola litoralis subsp. litoralis
Corispermum B.Juss. ex L.
Salix sepulcralis nothovar. sepulcralis
Arnica betonicifolia Greene
Agoseris procera Greene
Chloris radiata (L.) Sw.
Krascheninnikovia Gueldenst.
Asperula orientalis Boiss. & Hohen.
Atriplex thornberi (M.E.Jones) Standl.
Cuscuta potosina W.Schaffn.
Nicotiana quadrivalvis var. bigelovii (Torr.) DeWolf
Chamaesyce polycarpa var. hirtella (Boiss.) Millsp. ex Parish
Oxalis dillenii subsp. dillenii
Plantago patagonica var. gnaphalioides (Nutt.) A.Gray
Gilia achilleifolia subsp. staminea (Greene) H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Coryphantha sneedii var. orcuttii (Boed.) Gorelick
Opuntia engelmannii var. aciculata (Griffiths) D.Weniger
Echinocereus fendleri var. fendleri
Ferocactus wislizeni var. wislizeni
Opuntia congesta Griffiths
Chrysothamnus pulchellus subsp. baileyi (Wooton & Standl.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Opuntia emoryi Engelm.
Opuntia compressa var. macrorhiza (Engelm.) L.D.Benson
Opuntia compressa J.F.Macbr.
Panicum ghiesbreghtii E.Fourn. ex Hemsl.
Heliomeris multiflora var. brevifolia (Greene ex Wooton & Standl.) Yates
Hymenoxys ambigens var. ambigens
Hymenoxys ambigens var. floribunda (A.Gray) W.L.Wagner
Chamaesyce chaetocalyx (Boiss.) Wooton & Standl.
Vernonia marginata (Torr.) Raf.
Salsola pestifer Nelson
Rosa cathayensis (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) L.H.Bailey
Hatiora salicornioides Britton & Rose
Hesperaloe Engelm.
Pithecellobium flexicaule (Benth.) J.M.Coult.
Pachycereus marginatus (DC.) Britton & Rose
Sansevieria Thunberg, 1794
Tecoma Juss.
Raphia P.Beauv.
Berlandiera monocephala (B.L.Turner) Pinkava
Tillandsia ghiesbreghtii Baker
Baccharis heterophylla Spreng.
Aeschynomene falcata Desv., 1826
Elionurus tripsacoides Kunth, 1816
Nemastylis tenuis Benth. & Hook.f., 1883
Panicum hians Spruce ex Griseb.
Paspalum paniculatum Walter
Eupatorium odoratum Walter
Cassia holwayana Rose
Zexmenia seemannii A.Gray
Bogenhardia crispa (L.) Kearney
Quercus leiophylla A.DC.
Eysenhardtia amorphoides Kunth
Ipomoea bracteata Wight
Begonia martiana Schltdl.
Plantago linearis Raf.
Astrocasia neurocarpa (Müll.Arg.) I.M.Johnst. ex Standl.
Cereus emoryi Engelm.
Echinocereus scheeri var. obscuriensis A.B.Lau
Bebbia aspera (Greene) A.Nelson
Cylindropuntia ×tetracantha (Toumey) F.M.Knuth
Cestrum tomentosum Moc. & Sessé ex Dunal
Mammillaria swinglei (Britton & Rose) Boed.
Russelia furfuracea Brandegee
Erioneuron avenaceum (Kunth) Tateoka
Cuscuta grandiflora Kunth
Erythea S.Watson
Lonchocarpus capassa Rolfe
Hordeum pusillum subsp. pusillum
Trichocereus thelegonus (K.Schum.) Britton & Rose
Linum sativum Hasselq.
Agave ghiesbreghtii Verschaff.
Agave inaequidens K.Koch
Cylindropuntia ×grantiorum P.V.Heath
Dracaena deremensis Engl.
Penstemon attenuatus var. hyacinthinus (Pennell) M.Peck
Penstemon lanceolatus Benth.
Opuntia acanthocarpa var. acanthocarpa
Cerastium fontanum subsp. fontanum
Astrebla lappacea (Lindl.) Domin
Euchlaena luxurians Durieu & Asch.
Sorghum vulgare var. bicolor (L.) Eaton & Wright
Aloe ×spinosissima Jahand.
Trifolium parryi var. montanense (Rydb.) Isely
Aster linariifolius L.
Boechera angustifolia (Nutt.) Dorn
Tarchonanthus L.
Erysimum linifolium (Nutt.) M.E.Jones
Elymus ambiguus var. strigosus (Rydb.) Hitchc.
Sigmoidotropis speciosa (Kunth) A.Delgado
Kallstroemia brachystylis Vail
Gynura procumbens (Lour.) Merr.
Limnanthes floccosa var. bellingeriana (M.Peck) C.T.Mason
Melochia Dill. ex L.
Oenothera decorticans var. rutila (Davidson) Munz
Castilleja flavescens Pennell ex Edwin
Castilleja inverta (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Pennell & Ownbey
Orthocarpus densiflorus var. obispoensis D.D.Keck
Hydrocera triflora (L.) Wight & Arn.
Chondrilla juncea Ledeb., 1833
Conyza bonariensis var. bonariensis
Punica L.
Crossosoma bigelovii var. glaucum (Small) Kearney & Peebles
Lathyrus brachycalyx subsp. eucosmus (Butters & H.St.John) S.L.Welsh
Polygonum incanum F.W.Schmidt
Lupinus hillii var. arizonicus (C.P.Sm.) Harmon
Lupinus succulentus var. brandegeei C.P.Sm.
Medicago polymorpha var. vulgaris (Benth.) Shinners
Oenothera deltoides var. cineracea (Jeps.) Munz
Oenothera longissima var. longissima
Lycium macrodon var. macrodon
Carex lenticularis var. pallida (Boott) Dorn
Juncus longistylis var. scabratus F.J.Herm.
Aristida purpurea var. laxiflora Merr.
Lampranthus roseus (Willd.) Schwantes
Trigonella L.
Echinomastus Britton & Rose
Opuntia engelmannii var. laevis (J.M.Coult.) Felger, Verrier & Carnahan
Evax verna Raf.
Heterotheca subaxillaris var. psammophila (B.Wagenkn.) Gandhi
Machaeranthera bigelovii var. mucronata (Greene) B.L.Turner
Melampodium leucanthum var. leucanthum
Chamaesyce chaetocalyx var. chaetocalyx
Taraxacum officinale subsp. vulgare Schinz & R.Keller
Chamaesyce theriaca (L.C.Wheeler) Shinners
Notocactus (K.Schum.) A.Berger & Backeb.
Leucanthemum paludosum (Poir.) Bonnet & Barratte
Lotus mearnsii var. equisolensis J.L.Anderson
Abama Adans.
Carissa L.
Aeschynanthus Jack
Machaeranthera mexicana B.L.Turner & Horne
Potamogeton filifolius Phil.
Astragalus proriferus M.E.Jones
Oreopanax peltatus Linden
Dalea gentryi Standl.
Haplopappus gooddingii (A.Nelson) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Drymaria hypericifolia Briq.
Ipomoea jalapa Schiede & Deppe ex G.Don
Ipomoea pes-caprae (L.) Roth
Begonia porteana Van Geert
Luzuriaga Ruiz & Pav.
Acalypha polystachya Sessé & Moc.
Croton fragilis Schltdl.
Sapium pedicellatum Huber
Opuntia vivipara Rose
Cereus schottii var. australis Brandegee
Mammillaria occidentalis (Britton & Rose) Boed.
Begonia ×gracilis Vilmorin-Andrieux
Cylindropuntia alcahes subsp. gigantensis (Rebman) U.Guzmán
Spermacoce tenuior Pav. ex DC., 1830
Fritillaria biflora Sessé & Moc.
Calochortus luteus var. citrinus (Baker) S.Watson
Alocasia macrorrhiza (L.) Schott
Psidium guineense Sw.
Agave scabra Salm-Dyck
Agave weberi J.F.Cels ex J.Poiss.
Sphaeralcea emoryi var. californica (Parish) Shinners
Penstemon cyananthus subsp. subglaber (A.Gray) Pennell
Acacia schaffneri (S.Watson) F.J.Herm.
Stapelia hirsuta L.
Kleinia pendula (Forssk.) DC.
Agrostis rosea Griseb.
Festuca aristulata (Torr.) Piper
Poa glaucifolia Scribn. & T.A.Williams
Poincianella palmeri (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Senegalia furcatispina (Burkart) Mscr.
Astragalus robbinsii var. alpiniformis (Rydb.) Hitchc. et al.
Lupinus sericeus subsp. marianus (Rydb.) Fleak & D.B.Dunn
Gentiana acuta Michx.
Eleocharis nodulosa (Roth) Schult.
Persicaria wallichii var. wallichii
Urochloa ramosa (L.) T.Q.Nguyen
Artemisia ludoviciana subsp. typica D.D.Keck
Adansonia za Baill.
Astragalus lentiginosus var. mokiacensis (A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Draba aurea var. leiocarpa (Payson & H.St.John) C.L.Hitchc.
Neptunia pubescens Benth.
Erythranthe parvula (Wooton & Standl.) G.L.Nesom
Mentzelia lindheimeri Urb. & Gilg
Toxylon pomiferum Raf.
Ranunculus pentadontus Standl.
Dichrostachys cinerea (L.) Wight & Arn.
Schedonorus phoenix (Scop.) Holub
Carex laevigata Sm.
Acacia macmurphyi Wiggins
Calea L.
Paspalum convexum Willd. ex Döll
Guardiola Cerv. ex Humb. & Bonpl.
Desmanthus subulatus (Britton & Rose) Wiggins
Desmodium orbiculare Schltdl.
Mimosa aspera M.E.Jones
Doyerea emeto-cathartica Grosourdy ex Bello
Agastache barberi (B.L.Rob.) Epling
Porophyllum porophyllum (L.) Kuntze
Euphorbia californica Boiss., 1860
Verbena ehrenbergiana Schauer
Rhizophora mangle Roxb.
Echinocereus stoloniferus subsp. tayopensis (W.T.Marshall) G.Pichl.
Nicotiana plumbaginifolia Willd.
Pediomelum pauperitense S.L.Welsh, Licher & N.D.Atwood
Muhlenbergia mexicana f. ambigua (Torr.) Fernald
Phlox speciosa subsp. lanceolata (E.Nelson) Wherry
Duranta L.
Mancoa pubens (A.Gray) Rollins
Haplopappus linearifolius var. interior (Coville) M.E.Jones
Eriogonum concinnum Reveal
Agave cantala (Haw.) Roxb. ex Salm-Dyck
Agave obscura Schiede
Cleistocactus winteri D.R.Hunt
Erigeron ursinus var. ursinus
Lycium berlandieri var. brevilobum C.L.Hitchc.
Amaryllis vittata L'Hér.
Sphaeralcea fendleri var. fendleri
Sphaeralcea angustifolia var. angustifoloa (Cav.) G.Don
Chrysalidocarpus lutescens H.Wendl.
Polianthes tuberosa L.
Penstemon attenuatus subsp. attenuatus
Colophospermum mopane (J.Kirk ex Benth.) J.Léonard
Phaseolus coccineus Moc. & Sessé ex G.Don
Arundinaria simonii (Carrière) Rivière & C.Rivière
Stapelia nobilis N.E.Br. ex Hook.fil.
Gazania rigens (L.) Moench
Elymus albicans var. griffithsii (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Dorn
Senna aphylla (Cav.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Tetradymia canescens var. canescens
Fagonia chilensis var. laevis (Standl.) I.M.Johnst.
Rhus cismontana Greene
Gilia sinuata var. sinuata
Polygonum natans (Michx.) Eaton
Asparagus retrofractus Schousb., 1800
Salix hindsiana var. parishiana (Rowlee) C.R.Ball
Saxifraga fragosa Suksd. ex Small
Chloris cucullata Bisch.
Lycium californicum var. arizonicum A.Gray
Symphyotrichum ericoides var. stricticaule (Torr. & A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Agropyron pseudorepens Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Opuntia ellisiana Griffiths
Hymenoxys brandegeei Porter ex A.Gray
Solidago canadensis subsp. salebrosa (Piper) D.D.Keck
Ficus retusa var. nitida (Thunb.) Miq.
Echinodorus rostratus (Nutt.) Engelm. ex A.Gray
Hosackia disticha Greene
Cuphea llavea Lindl.
Galphimia brasiliensis (L.) A.Juss.
Galphimia glauca Bartl.
Oenothera claviformis subsp. peirsonii (Munz) P.H.Raven
Drypetes lateriflora (Sw.) Krug & Urb.
Euphorbia lata Engelm.
Priva mexicana Sieber ex Steud.
Corindum halicacabum Medik.
Lemaireocereus eruca (Brandegee) Britton & Rose
Cereus gummosus F.A.C.Weber
Physalis crassifolia var. cardiophylla (Torr.) A.Gray
Relbunium (Endl.) Hook.f.
Opuntia santamaria (Baxter) Wiggins
Muhlenbergia filiformis var. fortis Kelso
Cleomella longipes Torr.
Agave macroacantha Zucc.
Pereskia sacharosa Griseb.
Lomatium inyoense Mathias & Constance ex Munz & Roos
Acacia verticillata Sieber ex Benth.
Agropyron cristatum subsp. cristatum
Dahlia ×pinnata Cav.
Wedelia trilobata (L.) Hitchc.
Salvia cleavelandii (A.Gray) Greene
Penstemon ternatus subsp. septentrionalis (Munz & I.M.Johnst.) D.D.Keck
Salix anglorum var. araioclada C.K.Schneid.
Ambrosia ×platysperma (Seaman) Strother & B.G.Baldw.
Hirschfeldia Moench
Pappostipa speciosa var. media (Torres) Romasch.
Polygala reducta Blake
Hymenothrix A.Gray
Dichrostachys (A.DC.) Wight & Arn.
Beckwithia juniperina A.Heller
Tragus racemosus (L.) All.
Washingtonia filifera var. robusta (H.Wendl.) Parish
Stenotopsis linearifolia var. interior (Coville) H.M.Hall
Senecio neomexicanus var. toumeyi (Greene) T.M.Barkley
Cassia emarginata Mill.
Dalea elata M.Martens & Galeotti
Hosackia humilis (Greene) Abrams
Ipomoea arborescens Sweet, 1830
Halenia brevicornis var. chihuahuensis C.K.Allen
Perityle pseudociliata A.M.Powell & Yarb.
Viola crenulata Greene
Bernardia obovata I.M.Johnst.
Croton sphaerocarpus Kunth
Euphorbia thymifolia Wall., 1847
Condaliopsis lycioides (Gray) Suess.
Solanum umbellatum Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Cylindropuntia alcahes subsp. mcgillii (Rebman) U.Guzmán
Eriastrum eremicum subsp. zionis (T.T.Craig) S.J.DeGroot
Brachiaria texana (Buckley) S.T.Blake
Musa nana Lour.
Agave deserti var. simplex (Gentry) W.C.Hodgs. & Reveal
Agave pygmae Gentry, 1982
Astragalus musimonum Barneby
Bauhinia macranthera Benth. ex Hemsl.
Ottleya oroboides (Kunth) D.D.Sokoloff
Penstemon modestus Greene
Aloe secundiflora Engl.
Osteospermum hyoseroides (DC.) Norl.
Sarracenia L.
Brassica juncea var. crispifolia L.H.Bailey
Catabrosa aquatica subsp. aquatica
Puccinellia pallida (Torr.) R.T.Clausen
Astragalus tephrodes var. eurylobus Barneby
Hypericum formosum var. nortoniae (M.E.Jones) C.L.Hitchc.
Epilobium latifolium F.W.Schmidt
Polygonum punctatum var. leptostachyum (Meisn.) Small
Citrus ×tangelo Ingram & H.E.Moore
Lysiloma microphyllum var. thornberi (Britton & Rose) Isely
Astragalus newberryi var. aquarii Isely
Eriogonum abertianum var. villosum Fosberg
Neolloydia erectocentra (Coult.) L.D.Benson
Ranunculus hydrocharoides var. hydrocharoides
Hibiscus grandiflorus Michx.
Mascagnia (Bertero ex DC.) Bertero
Pyrrocoma crocea var. crocea
Ambrosia arborescens Mill.
Horsfordia A.Gray
Neptunia plena Lindl.
Hosackia nivea S.Watson
Spergularia macrocarpa C.Presl
Citrullus vulgaris Eckl. & Zeyh.
Opuntia erinacea var. aurea (E.M.Baxter) S.L.Welsh
Oenothera drummondii Walp.
Gilia gloriosa Brandegee
Acacia dolichostachya S.F.Blake
Ferocactus alamosanus subsp. alamosanus
Ferocactus wislizenii var. tiburonensis G.E.Linds.
Myrcianthes cisplatensis (Cambess.) O.Berg
Monarda fistulosa subsp. menthifolia (Graham) L.S.Gill
Astrophytum ornatum (DC.) Weber
Nicotiana benthamiana Domin
Echinocereus engelmannii subsp. decumbens (Clover & Jotter) W.Blum & Mich.Lange
Penstemon laetus subsp. roezlii (Regel) D.D.Keck
Rudbeckia hirta var. hirta
Incarvillea delavayi Bureau & Franch.
Lupinus caudatus subsp. montigenus (A.Heller) L.W.Hess & D.B.Dunn
Lupinus microcarpus subsp. scopulorum (C.P.Sm.) C.P.Sm.
Artemisia wrightii A.Gray
Eriogonum pinetorum Greene
Oenothera andina Nutt.
Solanum sylvestre Audib. ex Dunal
Gilia latifolia var. imperialis S.L.Welsh
Gilia latiflora subsp. exilis (A.Gray) H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Gilia lottiae A.G.Day
Senna costata (J.F.Bailey & C.T.White) Randell
Delphinium menziesii var. ochroleucum Nutt.
Lupinus argentus Pursh
Sansevieria cylindrica Bojer
Smilacina liliacea (Greene) Wynd
Populus fremontii var. pubescens Sarg.
Tephrocactus alexanderi (Britton & Rose) Backeb.
Isocoma wrightii (A.Gray) Rydb.
Dimorphocarpa Rollins
Erysimum asperum var. amoenum (Greene) Reveal
Pennellia Nieuwl.
Cucumis anguria var. anguria
Stapelia L.
Chaerophyllum tainturieri Hook. & Arn.
Rhipsalis Gaertn.
Dimorphotheca cuneata (Thunb.) Less.
Pereilema crinitum Trin.
Ocimum micranthum Willd.
Aristolochia batucensis Wiggins & Rollins
Lippia wrightii A.Gray ex Torr.
Bumelia lanuginosa (Michx.) Pers.
Spergularia bocconei Foucaud ex R.P.Merino
Cucumis dipsaceus Wender. ex Steud.
Thryallis glauca (Cav.) Kuntze
Solidago canadensis var. elongata (Nutt.) M.Peck
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. dentatum (S.Stokes) S.Stokes
Citharexylum scabrum Willd. ex Cham.
Pedilanthus Neck., 1790
Tephrosia cana Brandegee
Mammillaria pondii Greene
Opuntia acanthocarpa var. ganderi (C.B.Wolf) L.D.Benson
Tetracoccus fasciculatus var. hallii (Brandegee) Dressler
Rhus rydbergii Small ex Rydb.
Kuhnia gooddingi Nelson
Jacquinia pungens Donn.Sm.
Calcaratolobelia goldmanii (Fernald) Wilbur
Bauhinia carronii F.Muell.
Paspalidium retiglume (Domin) Hughes
Agave geminiflora Lindl.
Macroptilium supinum (Wiggins & Rollins) A.Delgado & L.Torres
Vachellia bravoensis (Isely) Seigler & Ebinger
Pachypodium saundersii N.E.Br.
Brassaia actinophylla F.Muell., 1863
Gerbera jamesonii Bolus ex Adlam
Opuntia stricta subsp. esparzae Scheinvar
Ateleia cubensis Griseb.
Sphaeralcea rusbyi subsp. rusbyi
Lupinus cottonii C.P.Sm.
Lupinus erectus L.F.Hend.
Lomatium depauperatum (M.E.Jones) J.A.Alexander & Whaley
Rubus strigosus var. arizonicus (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Carex howei Mack.
Salix hindsiana var. leucodendroides (Rowlee) C.R.Ball
Aristida setifolia Kunth
Bauhinia lunarioides A.Gray ex S.Watson
Galactia wrightii var. wrightii
Gentiana aquatica L.
Lotus unifoliatus Benth., 1836
Achyranthes L.
Acacia pringlei Rose
Eupatorium monanthum Sch.Bip.
Guardiola carinata B.L.Rob.
Chamaecrista dussii Britton
Sida lodiegensis Baker fil.
Cerastium thermale Rydb.
Bombax palmeri S.Wats
Euphorbia biformis S.Watson
Linaria canadensis (L.) Chaz.
Acuan covillei Britton & Rose
Solanum tribulosum Schauer
Euphorbia nicaeensis All.
Monarda ramaleyi A.Nelson
Tilia mexicana Schltdl.
Elymus canadensis var. brachystachys (Scribn. & C.R.Ball) Farw.
Angelica tomentosa var. hendersonii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Di Tomaso
Chlorophytum comosum Baker, 1873
Camelina Crantz
Andropogon ischaemum Thunb.
Elymus arenarius L.
Oenothera contorta var. epilobioides (Greene) Munz
Oenothera dentata var. gilmanii Munz
Eriastrum sapphirinum subsp. gymnocephalum (Brand) H.Mason
Chorizanthe douglasii Parry
Amelanchier utahensis subsp. utahensis
Saxifraga occidentalis var. wallowensis M.Peck
Echinocereus apachensis W.Blum & Rutow
Habenaria filifera S.Watson
Mosiera ehrenbergii (Berg) Landrum
Draba brachycarpa Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Draba cuneifolia var. typica C.L.Hitchc.
Polygala alba var. suspecta S.Watson
Quercus chrysolepis var. palmeri (Engelm.) Sarg.
Berlandiera DC.
Agropyron trichophorum (Link) K.Richt.
Lepismium houlletianum (Lem.) Barthlott
Echinocereus bristolii var. pseudopectinatus N.P.Taylor
Platanthera hyperborea var. purpurascens (Rydb.) Luer
Exacum affine Balf.fil.
Cyclospermum Lag.
Elaeocharis laeviseta Nakai, 1914
Quercus conspersa Benth.
Pediomelum palmeri (Ockendon) J.W.Grimes
Phaseolus macvaughii A.Delgado
Lupinus lupinus Rydb.
Willardia mexicana S.Watson
Senecio seemanii Sch.Bip.
Zinnia linearis Benth.
Acalypha pilosa Cav.
Aloysia lycioides var. schulziae (Standl.) Moldenke
Celtis pallida subsp. pallida
Echinocereus rectispinus Peebles
Pachycereus orcuttii Britton & Rose
Penstemon cleavelandii var. cleavelandii
Stemodia tomentosa (Mill.) Greenm. & C.H.Thomps.
Eupatorium fendleri (A.Gray) A.Gray
Eriochloa fatmensis (Hochst. & Steud.) Clayton
Philadelphus microphyllus var. argenteus (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Agave havardiana Trel.
Avena fatua var. fatua
Asparagus falcatus Thunb.
Acacia fleckii Schinz
Adhatoda Mill.
Brassaia Endl.
Myrcianthes coquimbensis (Barnéoud) Landrum & Grifo
Chrysanthemum pacificum Nakai
Echinacea pallida var. angustifolia (DC.) Cronquist
Polygonum douglasii var. microspermum (Engelm.) Dorn
Deschampsia caespitosa subsp. beringensis (Hultén) W.Lawr.
Galphimia Cav.
Anisacanthus quadrifidus (Vahl) Standl.
Pseudocymopterus beckii (S.L.Welsh & Goodrich) S.R.Downie
Schizachyrium neomexicanum (Nash) Nash
Lotus humilis Schousb. ex Ball
Vicia americana var. oregana (Nutt.) A.Nelson
Baccharis ramulosa (DC.) A.Gray
Limnanthes pumila Howell
Oenothera boothii subsp. alyssoides (Hook. & Arn.) Munz
Limonium commune Gray
Rosa eglanteria Mill.
Galium trifidum subsp. tinctorium (L.) H.Hara
Eleocharis flavescens (Poir.) Urb.
Echinochloa walteri (Pursh) A.Heller
Lupinus villosus Willd.
Calylophus hartwegii subsp. hartwegii
Eremothera gouldii (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Consolea falcata (Ekman & Werderm) F.M.Knuth
Echinofossulocactus multicostatus (Hildm.) Britton & Rose
Rhipsalis pachyptera Pfeiff.
Herissantia Medik.
Lactuca graminifolia var. graminifolia
Caladium bicolor (Aiton) Vent.
Yucca confinis McKelvey
Hypoxis decumbens L.
Phaseolus atropurpureus DC.
Zizania aquatica var. angustifolia Hitchc.
Lobelia angustifolia (A.DC.) Urbina
Cassia wislizeni A.Gray
Suaeda vermiculata J.F.Gmel.
Ipomoea capillifolia Bertero ex Choisy
Luffa cylindrica M.Roem.
Thryallis vestita (S.Watson) Rose
Dalea dalea (L.) MacMill.
Leptodactylon Hook. & Arn.
Acalypha vagans Cav.
Mammillaria tesopacensis R.T.Craig
Codiaeum variegatum (L.) Rumph. ex A.Juss.
Erioneuron Nash
Sphenopholis obtusata var. major (Torr.) Erdman
Agave chiapensis Jacobi
Chamaecereus silvestrii (Speg.) Britton & Rose
Artemisia arbuscula var. longiloba (Osterh.) Dorn
Sabal mexicana Sauvalle
Chlorophytum Ker Gawl.
Collinsia wrightii S.Watson
Telesonix jamesii var. heucheriformis (Rydb.) Bacig.
Acacia atramentaria Benth.
Calathea rufibarba Fenzl
Andrographis Wall. ex Nees
Caralluma nebrownii Berger
Arenaria fendleri var. eastwoodiae (Rydb.) S.L.Welsh
Senecio pudicus Greene
Swainsonia salsula (Pall.) Taub.
Erigeron decrescens G.L.Nesom & C.M.Roll
Opuntia engelmannii var. linguiformis (Griffiths) Weninger
Chenopodium pratericola subsp. desiccatum (A.Nelson) Aellen
Galium pilosum Aiton
Chilopsis linearis var. glutinosa (Engelm.) Fosberg
Rhipsalis pilocarpa Loefgr.
Prosopis reptans var. cinerascens (A.Gray) Burkart
Solanum melongena Wall.
Penstemon thurberi var. anestius Reveal & Beatley
Oenothera murdockii S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Chrysactinia lehtoae D.J.Keil
Cologania ovalifolia Kunth
Abutilon lignosum (Cav.) G.Don
Mimosa distachya Vent.
Cakile cakile H.Karst.
Eriogonum wrightii subsp. taxifolium (Greene) S.Stokes
Phyla incisa Small
Echinocereus llanuraensis (Rutow) W.Blum & D.Felix
Opuntia leptocaulis var. brittonii (J.G.Ortega) Bravo
Agave hurteri Trel.
Agave lophantha Schiede
Bolivicereus samaipatanus var. multiflorus Cárdenas
Chrysopogon zizanioides (L.) Roberty
Caesalpinia violacea (Britton & Rose) Standl.
Astrebla elymoides F.Muell. ex F.M.Bailey
Anadenanthera colubrina (Vell.) Brenan
Festuca ovina var. brachyphylla (Schult.) Piper
Albizia brevifolia Schinz
Typha angustata Bory & Chaub.
Thermopsis argentata Greene
Dicentra formosa var. brevifolia L.F.Hend.
Echinocereus chloranthus subsp. rhyolithensis W.Blum & Mich.Lange
Ceiba speciosa (A.St.-Hil., A.Juss. & Cambess.) Ravenna
Triphora trianthophoros (Sw.) Rydb.
Dendranthema coronaria (L.) M.R.Almeida
Mimulus guttatus var. arvensis (Greene) A.L.Grant
Calylophus hartwegii var. pubescens (A.Gray) Shinners
Gardenia J.Ellis
Pistacia lentiscus L.
Yucca pendula Sieber ex Carrière
Melaleuca citrina Turcz.
Tradescantia occidentalis var. typica E.S.Anderson & Woodson
Alyssoides utriculata (L.) Medik.
Vernonia joyaliae B.L.Turner
Agave angustifolia var. rubescens (Salm-Dyck) Gentry
Bouteloua alamosana Vasey ex Rose
Astragalus pondii Greene
Aralia pubescens DC.
Wimmeria lanceolata Rose
Suaeda eltonica Iljin
Cuscuta macrocephala W.Schaffn., 1921
Leptodactylon veatchii (Parry ex Greene) Wherry
Xanthocephalum ramulosum (Greene) Shinners
Echinocereus stolonifer W.T.Marshall
Bacopa monniera
Hedyotis vegrandis W.H.Lewis
Leucophyllum Humb. & Bonpl.
Serjania californica Radlk.
Echinocereus arizonicus subsp. matudae (Bravo) Rutow
Spermacoce verticillata Vell., 1831
Seymeria coahuilana (Pennell) Standl.
Vicia linearis (Nutt.) Greene
Jaquinia L., 1759
Sideroxylon occidentalis (Hemsl.) T.D.Penn., 1990
Eriogonum douglasii var. tenue (Small) C.L.Hitchc.
Agave ornithobroma Gentry
Cereus hildmannianus K.Schum.
Cleistocactus smaragdiflorus (F.A.C.Weber) Britton & Rose
Clivia miniata (Lindl.) Bosse
Howea forsteriana (F.Muell.) Becc.
Brasiliopuntia brasiliensis (Willd.) A.Berger
Acacia trachycarpa E.Pritz.
Arundinaria pygmaea (Miq.) Asch. & Graebn.
Aloe affinis A.Berger
Aloe variegata L.
Steirodiscus Less.
Senecio rowleyanus H.Jacobsen
Yucca de-smetiana Baker
Festuca rubra var. littoralis Vasey ex Beal
Trisetum spicatum var. congdonii (Scribn. & Merr.) Hitchc.
Havardia pallens (Benth.) Britton & Rose
Lupinus rubricaulis Greene
Poa fendlerana (Steud.) Vasey
Oenothera grandis Smyth
Stylomecon heterophylla var. micropetala Hoover
Holodiscus glabrescens (Greenm.) A.Heller
Saxifraga integrifolia var. columbiana (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Grusonia F.Rchb. ex Britton & Rose
Consolida pubescens (DC.) Soó
Caulanthus lasiophyllus var. utahensis (Rydb.) Payson
Erigeron hodgsoniae G.L.Nesom
Echinocactus emoryi Engelm.
Caralluma R.Br.
Bromus diandrus subsp. rigidus (Roth) O.Bolòs, Masalles & Vigo
Agave polyacantha Haw.
Eysenhardtia reticulata Pennell
Capparis flexuosa Vell.
Graptopetalum occidentale Rose ex E.Walther
Pedilanthus rubescens Brandegee
Chilopsis saligna D.Don
Erioneuron avenaceum var. longiaristatum (Kurtz) Beetle
Fingerhuthia africana Lehm.
Andropogon hirtiflorus var. feensis (E.Fourn.) Hack.
Eriogonum baileyi var. divaricatum (Gand.) Reveal
Agave lechuguilla Torr.
Agave glomeruliflora (Engelm.) A.Berger
Cereus childsii Blanc
Abutilon wrightii A.Gray
Stapelia tsomoensis N.E.Br.
Podranea Sprague
Rudbeckia serotina (Nutt.) Sweet
Dimorphotheca Moench
Lactuca sativa var. capitata L.
Linum spergulinum A.Gray
Jatropha curcas Wall., 1847
Chenopodium pratericola var. leptophylloides (Murr) Aellen
Polygonum bistortoides var. oblongifolium (Meisn.) H.St.John
Uncarina roeoesliana Rauh
Oenothera primiveris var. caulescens Munz
Gilia ophthalmoides subsp. australis V.E.Grant
Opuntia elatior Mill.
Ilex Tourn. ex L.
Cassia wrightii A.Gray
Quercus resinosa Liebm.
Alternanthera bettzickiana (Regel) G.Nicholson
Argythamnia sericophylla A.Gray ex S.Watson, 1880
Euphorbia preslii Guss.
Euphorbia schlechtendalii Boiss.
Ribes prostratum L'Hér.
Echeveria obtusifolia Rose ex Britton & Rose
Lesquerella ovalifolia Rydb.
Phleum pratense subsp. pratense
Cinna arundinacea L.
Salix lindleyana Wall. ex Andersson
Prenanthes alata (Hook.) A.Dietr.
Schmaltzia integrifolia (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) F.A.Barkley
Oxycoccus microcarpus Turcz. ex Rupr.
Vaccinium vitis-idaea subsp. minus (Lodd.) Hultén
Polygala lutea L.
Polygala racemosa Blake
Croton glandulosus L.
Hyalis argentea D.Don ex Hook. & Arn.
Roldana schaffneri (Sch.Bip. ex Klatt) H.Rob. & Brettell
Podanthus mitiqui Lindl.
Bahia ambrosioides Lag.
Solanum purpureum Dunal
Opulaster malvaceus (Greene) Kuntze
Digitaria curvinervis (Hack.) Fernald
Aster scoparius Nees
Cyrtocarpa procera Kunth
Croton humilis L.
Bromus exaltatus Bernh.
Cyperus diandrus Torr.
Persea tolimanensis Zentmyer & Schieber
Eriogonum atrorubens Engelm.
Potentilla staminea Rydb.
Uniola palmeri Vasey
Cryptopleura spatulata Gardner, 1926
Jacquinia L.
Haplopappus vernicosus Phil.
Houstonia pygmaea C.H.Mull. & M.T.Mull.
Lathyrus laxiflorus (Desf.) Kuntze
Larrea cuneifolia Cav.
Houstonia greenei (A.Gray) Terrell
Eupatorium chapalense S.Watson
Croton luteovirens Wooton & Standl.
Cardamine gambellii S.Watson
Casuarina stricta Andrews, 1803
Erigeron kuschei Eastw.
Sairocarpus costatus (Wiggins) D.A.Sutton
Eupatorium pycnocephalum J.M.Coult.
Ramischia secunda (L.) Garcke
Physalis foetens Poir.
Leontodon taraxacoides Lacaita, 1918
Ungnadia Endl.
Scirpus acutus Muhl., 1817
Scirpus californicus Britton
Taraxacum laevigatum Poir.
Amaranthus bigelovii Uline & Bray
Centaurium exaltatum St.John
Disporum smithii Utech, Shinwari & Kawano
Amsinckia eastwoodae J.F.Macbr.
Trichachne californica (Benth.) Chase ex Hitchc.
Lotus purshianus (Lindl.) Ottley
Limonium erectum Erben
Abutilon indicum (L.) Sweet
Gentianella detonsa (Rottb.) G.Don
Gnaphalium leucocephalum Gand., 1883
Carex cylindrostachys Franch.
Dichelostemma volubilis A.Heller, 1903
Sarcostemma heterophyllum Engelm.
Monardella robinsonii Epling ex Munz
Rhagadiolus Scop.
Polygonum pensylvanicum Curtis
Brassica campestris Hegetschw., 1839
Halimolobos diffusus var. jaegeri (Munz) Rollins
Heterotoma cordifolia (Hook. & Arn.) McVaugh
Agropyron intermedium Rchb.
Cymopterus montanus Nutt.
Scrophularia macrantha Greene ex Stiefelh.
Populus dimorpha Brandegee
Petalostemum occidentale (A.Heller) Fernald
Cyperus esculentus var. esculentus
Portulaca coronata Small
Sairocarpus breweri (A.Gray) D.A.Sutton
Orthocarpus lasiorhynchus A.Gray
Cyperus albomarginatus Mart. & Schrad. ex Nees, 1842
Conyza bonariensis Linnaeus, 1753
Gilia multiflora Torr., 1859
Eriogonum baileyi var. brachyanthum (Coville) Jeps.
Polygonum hydropiperoides Pursh, 1813
Thlaspi montanum Bory & Chaub., 1838
Apocynum sibiricum Pall. ex Russanov, 1933
Asclepias texana A.Heller
Desmanthus leptolobus Torr. & A.Gray
Apium leptophyllum (Pers.) F.Muell.
Physalis hederoefolia A.Gray
Linum vernale Wooton
Scirpus setaceus (R.Br.) Poir., 1817
Urochloa reptans Linnaeus, 1759
Gilia tenuituba Rydb.
Elyonurus barbiculmus Hack.
Gonolobus parvifolius Torr.
Froelichia floridana (Nutt.) Moq.
Daubentonia punicea (Cav.) DC.
Alchemilla occidentalis Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Castilleja latebracteata Pennell
Filaginella uliginosa (L.) Opiz
Eriogonum rotundifolium Benth.
Kentranthus ruber (L.) DC.
Petalostemum Michx.
Hieracium rusbyi Greene ex J.M.Coult., 1894
Desmodium dichotomum (Willd.) DC.
Gnaphalium arizonicum A.Gray
Bidens ferulaefolia (Jacq.) DC.
Schrankia uncinata Willd.
Bothriochloa wrightii (Hack.) Henrard
Capsicum lanceifolium (Miers) Kuntze
Aristolochia brevipes Benth.
Pediomelum pentaphyllum (L.) Rydb.
Astrichoseris platyphylla A.Gray
Hymenopappus artemisiifolius DC.
Allocarya acanthocarpa Piper
Physalis lanceolata Michx.
Chamaecrista wrightii (A.Gray) Wooton & Standl.
Saracha Ruiz & Pav.
Stachys alba Mill.
Tillandsia macdougallii L.B.Sm.
Rhamnus crocea var. pirifolia (Greene) Little
Convolvulus linearilobus Eastw.
Senecio blochmanae Greene, 1893
Sageretia theezans (Vahl) Brongn.
Scutellaria potosina subsp. potosina
Cyperus uniflorus Thunb.
Carex retroflexa Muhl. ex Willd.
Heterotoma goldmanii Fernald
Aphanostephus riddellii Torr. & A.Gray
Encelia virginiensis subsp. actoni (Elmer) D.D.Keck
Oxalis grayi (Rose) Tidestr.
Chamaesyce indica (Lam.) Croizat
Epilobium californicum Trel.
Hemizonia wrightii A.Gray
Elyonurus tripsacoides Kunth ex Willd.
Sorghum lanceolatum Stapf
Lesquerella aurea Wooton
Senecio tridenticulatus Rydb.
Anticlea gracilenta (Greene) R.R.Gates
Echinopepon coulteri (Gray) Rose
Juncus parviflorus Kitt., 1863
Scleropogon longisetus Beetle
Cirsium nidulum (M.E.Jones) Petr., 1917
Craniolaria annua L.
Gouania Jacq.
Prosopis kuntzei Harms
Manihot angustifolia Pohl ex Steud., 1840
Senecio spathulatus A.Rich.
Achillea millefolium f. lanulosa
Ficus radulina S.Watson
Eucalyptus albens Miq.
Alhagi pseudalhagi (M.Bieb.) Desv. ex Wangerin
Aristida dissita I.M.Johnst.
Antirrhinum ×multiflorum J.Vick
Callistemon lanceolatus (Sm.) Sweet
Cirsium coloradense (Rydb.) Cockerell ex Daniels
Solanum fendleri subsp. fendleri
Tinomiscoidea E.M.Reid & M.E.J.Chandler, 1933
Laurus princeps Heer
Quercus culveri Knowlton, 1899
Ulmus minima Ward
Andromeda grayana Heer
Laurophyllum perseanum Brown, 1962
Fagus antipofii Abich
Paliurus colombi Heer
Neolitsea lata MacGinitie, 1941
Artocarpus quercoides Knowlton, 1899
Trochodendroides arctica Berry, 1926
Quercus ellisiana Lesquereux, 1872
Magnolia microphylla Knowlton, 1899
Myrtophyllum Turczaninow, 1863
Nelumbium Juss.
Phragmites latissima Knowlton, 1899
Magnolia culveri Knowlton, 1899
Nerium hinoidea MacGinitie, 1941
Pterocarya hispida Brown, 1962
Celastrus inaequalis Knowlton, 1899
Populus vivaria Knowlton, 1899
Salix lavateri Heer
Tabernaemontana chrysophylloides (Lesquereux, 1878)
Diospyros retinervis MacGinitie, 1941
Alectryon coriaceus (Benth.) Radlk.
Carex suborbiculata Mack.
Bigelowia leiosperma var. abbreviata M.E.Jones
Tradescantia wrightii Rose & Bush
Trifolium watsonii Lojac.
Eriogonum lonchophyllum var. humivagans (Reveal) Reveal
Dahlia imperialis Roezl ex Ortgies
Astragalus beatleyae Barneby
Lithophragma intermedium Rydb.
Yucca vespertina (McKelvey) S.L.Welsh
Veratrum viride var. viride
Ipomoea congesta R.Br.
Gaura decorticans Hook. & Arn.
Eriogonum deductum Greene
Hosackia cuprea Smiley
Pectis sinaloensis Fernald
Livistona australis (R.Br.) Mart.
Impatiens occidentalis Rydb.
Hymenopappus nudipes Maguire
Pseudocymopterus versicolor Rydb.
Krynitzkia peninsularis Rose ex Vasey & Rose
Gilia ophthalmoides subsp. flavocincta (A.Nelson) A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Arabis sparsiflora var. typica Rollins
Clarkia elegans Douglas ex Lindl.
Horkelia mutabilis Brandegee
Antennaria oblancifolia E.E.Nelson
Lesquerella condensata A.Nelson
Luzula arcuata Link, 1833
Eupomatia laurina Hook.
Dichorisandra thyrsiflora J.C.Mikan
Crepis andersonii A.Gray
Arabis epilobioides Greene
Ceratoides lanata var. ruinina S.L.Welsh
Spiraea corymbosa Raf.
Amorpha hispidula Greene
Aletes davidsonii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Coryphantha erecta (Lem.) Lem.
Lathyrus lanceolatus Howell
Collomia debilis var. dentata C.L.Hitchc.
Zigadenus fremontii var. minor Baker
Astragalus preussii var. sulcatus M.E.Jones
Arabis fecunda Rollins
Sisymbrium deflexum Harv. ex Torr.
Anogra vreelandii Rydb.
Brickellia umbellata (Greene) Rydb.
Lupinus densiflorus var. latilabrus C.P.Sm.
Cirsium gilense (Wooton & Standl.) Wooton & Standl.
Aristida longespica Poir.
Epilobium holosericeum Trel.
Oenothera claviformis subsp. integrior P.H.Raven
Hieracium brevipilum Greene
Banksia speciosa Lindl.
Corethrogyne californica var. obovata (Benth.) Kuntze
Iochroma arborescens (L.) J.M.H.Shaw
Astragalus mogollonicus Greene
Cerastium siculum Guss.
Euthamia linearifolia Gand.
Dudleya delicata Rose ex Britton & Rose
Oreopanax capitatus (Jacq.) Decne. & Planch.
Corallorhiza multiflora var. occidentalis Lindl.
Dalea blasiana M.E.Jones
Viola atriplicifolia Greene
Bigelowia parishii Greene
Gormania retusa Rose ex Britton & Rose
Hemicarpha intermedia Piper
Geum decurrens Rydb.
Carduus maritima Elmer
Antennaria pedicellata Greene
Aragallus luteolus Greene
Saxifraga bryophora var. tobiasiae J.W.Grimes & P.L.Packard
Echinocereus ctenoides (Engelm.) Rumpl.
Picradenia biennis (A.Gray) Greene
Sida diffusa Kunth
Erythronium grandiflorum var. multiflorum Torr.
Artemisia atomifera Piper
Arabis formosa Greene
Astragalus hyalinus M.E.Jones
Yucca toftiae S.L.Welsh
Rhapis excelsa (Thunb.) A.Henry
Astragalus macer A.Nelson
Azalea californica (Hook.) Torr. & A.Gray
Eriogonum trichotomum Small
Silene lyallii S.Watson
Hosackia tomentosa Hook. & Arn.
Oreocarya ciliohirsuta A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Viola subsagittifolia Suksd.
Triticum ciliatum DC.
Eriogonum corymbosum var. erectum Reveal & Brotherson
Eleocharis xyridiformis Fernald & Brackett
Machaeranthera cronquistii (S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood) Cronquist
Lessingia mendocina Greene
Brachychiton acerifolius (A.Cunn. ex G.Don) F.Muell.
Kosteletzkya malvaviscana Rose
Astragalus pertenuis Greene
Gilia chamissonis Greene
Brunfelsia americana L.
Echinocereus brandegei Schelle
Solanum genistoides Dunal
Rorippa pacifica Howell
Stanleya collina M.E.Jones
Limonium vulgare Mill.
Prunus pinetorum Suksd.
Rhopalostylis sapida (Sol. ex G.Forst.) H.Wendl. & Drude
Oenothera epilobioides Nutt.
Populus fremontii var. wislizenii S.Watson
Saxifraga chelanensis A.M.Johnson
Acacia decora Rchb.
Lupinus lasiotropis Greene ex Eastw.
Clematis douglasii subsp. jonesii Kuntze
Astragalus argophyllus var. cnicensis M.E.Jones
Carex norvegica subsp. stevenii (Holm) D.F.Murray
Penstemon divergens M.E.Jones
Lotus microcarpus Brot.
Astragalus endopterus (Barneby) Barneby
Epilobium angustifolium var. pygmaeum Jeps.
Oenothera palmeri S.Watson
Aquilegia pauciflora Greene
Cynanchum maccartii Shinners
Camissonia specuicola subsp. hesperia (P.H.Raven) P.H.Raven
Eriogonum pauciflorum var. panguicense M.E.Jones
Oxystylis Torr. & Frém.
Medicago sphaerocarpa Bertol., 1819
Habenaria bracteata (Muhl. ex Willd.) R.Br.
Argythamnia brandegeei var. intonsa (I.M.Johnst.) J.W.Ingram ex L.C.Wheeler
Penstemon clevelandii subsp. angelicus (I.M.Johnst.) D.D.Keck
Cogswellia caruifolia var. patens M.E.Jones
Habenaria pyramidalis Lindl.
Hofmeisteria laphamioides var. pauciseta S.F.Blake
Castilleja wyomingensis Rydb.
Orobanche comosa Wallr.
Vulpia eastwoodae (Piper) Henrard
Delosperma ecklonis (Salm-Dyck) Schwantes
Mimulus longiflorus subsp. longiflorus
Arabis rigidissima var. rigidissima
Hordeum pusillum var. pubens Hitchc.
Cymbalaria Hill
Krynitzkia echinoides M.E.Jones
Zauschneria latifolia var. johnstonii Hilend
Sphaeralcea emoryi subsp. arida (Rose) Kearney
Arenaria glabrescens Piper
Arctostaphylos glandulosa subsp. atumescens J.E.Keeley, M.C.Vasey & V.T.Parker
Lupinus jaegeranus C.P.Sm.
Collinsia diehlii M.E.Jones
Achnatherum lemmonii var. pubescens (Crampton) Barkworth
Talinum thompsonii N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh
Microseris attenuata Greene
Opuntia clavellina Engelm.
Cyperus flavus (J.Vahl) Boeck.
Quercus lobata var. turbinata Jeps.
Convolvulus floridus L.fil.
Potentilla gracilis var. rigida (Nutt.) S.Watson
Hymenothrix wislizeni var. setiformis M.E.Jones
Orthocarpus columbinus M.E.Jones
Godetia quadrivulnera f. setchelliana Jeps.
Gutierrezia ionensis Lunell
Monardella macrantha var. pinetorum H.M.Hall
Astragalus whitneyi var. pinosus Elmer
Cereus repandus (L.) Mill.
Myosurus minimus subsp. montanus G.R.Campb.
Atelophragma cobrense (A.Gray) Rydb.
Rubus parviflorus f. glabrifolius Fassett
Polygonum natans f. hartwrightii (A.Gray) Stanford
Scleria reticularis Michx.
Lepidium draba subsp. draba
Parosela formosa (Torr.) Vail
Spergularia gracilis (S.Watson) B.L.Rob.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. nanus Cronquist
Astragalus newberryi var. eriocarpus M.E.Jones
Melica striata Hitchc.
Mammillaria oliviae Orcutt
Scirpus bernardinus Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Oenothera cespitosa var. jonesii Munz
Subularia aquatica var. americana (G.A.Mulligan & Calder) B.Boivin
Blepharipappus bakeri Greene ex C.F.Baker
Opuntia bigelovii var. hoffmannii Fosberg
Gilia tenuiflora var. speciosa Jeps.
Juncus effusus subsp. gracilis (Hook.) Piper & Beattie, 1915
Ambrosia sandersonii S.L.Welsh
Hastingia K.D.Koenig ex Sm.
Echinocereus engelmannii var. armatus L.D.Benson
Arabis rupestris Nutt.
Arabis williamsii var. saximontana (Rollins) Rollins
Astragalus marianus (Rydb.) Barneby
Lycium spencerae J.F.Macbr.
Arnica glabrata Rydb.
Galium serpenticum subsp. puberulum (Piper) Dempster & Ehrend.
Delphinium maritimum Cav. ex Balb.
Cymopterus aboriginum var. subternatus M.E.Jones
Echeveria lagunensis Munz
Stephanomeria minima M.E.Jones
Lupinus andersonii var. apertus C.P.Sm.
Gilia wrightii var. pectenisecta M.E.Jones
Eriophyllum confertiflorum var. latum H.M.Hall
Gilia latiflora var. cana M.E.Jones
Eremonanus mohavensis I.M.Johnst.
Cymopterus utahensis var. monocephalus M.E.Jones
Ranunculus collomiae L.D.Benson
Oenothera multijuga var. orientalis Munz
Opuntia microcarpa Engelm.
×Chiranthomontodendron lenzii Dorr
Astragalus amphioxys var. melanocalyx Tidestr.
Dolicholus texensis (Torr. & A.Gray) Vail
Lepidium brachybotryum Rydb.
Trifolium oreganum Howell
Lycium torreyi var. filiforme M.E.Jones
Cuphea palmeri S.Watson
Michelia fuscata (Andrews) Blume
Malacothamnus mendocinensis (Eastw.) Kearney
Amaranthus hybridus subsp. hybridus
Ribes nevadense var. nevadense
Solanum novomexicanum (Bartlett) S.R.Stern
Lavauxia howardi A.Nelson
Arabis maxima Greene
Psoralea bituminosa L.
Psoralea juncea Eastw.
Gentiana amarella subsp. acuta (Michx.) Hultén
Swertia L.
Acanthomintha obovata subsp. duttonii Abrams
Polygonum lapathifolium var. lapathifolium
Cuscuta suaveolens Ser.
Scabiosa stellata L.
Convolvulus polymorphus Greene
Lepidospartum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Cordylanthus palmatus subsp. carnulosus (Pennell) Munz
Polygonum montereyense Brenckle
Stillingia annua (Torr.) Müll.Arg.
Arnica mollis var. scaberrima (Greene) Smiley
Oenothera specicola P.H.Raven
Uva-ursi manzanita A.Heller
Orthocarpus lithospermoides var. typicus D.D.Keck
Penstemon acuminatus var. congestus M.E.Jones
Ceanothus integerrimus var. peduncularis Jeps.
Coleogyne Torr.
Hemizonia paniculata subsp. cruzensis Hoover, 1970
Bumelia thornei Cronquist
Hutchinsonia M.E.Jones
Coryphantha strobiliformis var. durispina (Quehl) L.D.Benson
Lotus eriophorus var. heermannii Ottley
Lychnis elata S.Watson
Brassica rapa var. sylvestris Briggs
Opuntia ×andersonii H.M.Hern., Gómez-Hin. & Bárcenas
Gilia arenaria var. rubella Brand
Salvia ariana var. ariana
Oreostemma alpigenum subsp. andersonii (A.Gray) Semple
Galium parvifolium Gaudin ex Roem. & Schult.
Prunus omissa Koehne
Rosa adenocarpa Greene
Atriplex lentiformis subsp. typica H.M.Hall & Clem.
Chilopsis D.Don
Lupinus dedeckerae Munz & Dunn
Potentilla nevadensis Boiss.
Haplopappus wigginsii S.F.Blake
Ceanothus velutinus subsp. hookeri C.L.Schmidt
Godetia quadrivulnera var. rubrissima Jeps.
Chorizanthe floccosa M.E.Jones
Menyanthes L.
Eriogonum sulcatum var. argense M.E.Jones
Grindelia oregana A.Gray
Ceanothus divergens subsp. occidentalis (Mc Minn) Abrams
Gilia aggregata f. utahensis Brand
Salvia columbariae var. ziegleri Munz
Leptodactylon californicum subsp. brevitrichomum P.J.Gordon
Anemone berlandieri Pritz.
Eulophus parishii (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Senecio clevelandii var. clevelandii
Astragalus amphioxys var. brachylobus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Parosela albiflora (A.Gray) Vail
Lupinus caudatus var. cutleri (Eastw.) S.L.Welsh
Scirpus lineatus Michx.
Eriogonum effusum subsp. orbiculatum S.Stokes
Viola cascadensis M.S.Baker
Rubus parviflorus f. scopulorum (Greene ex Focke) Fassett
Lotus oroboides var. plebeius (Brandegee) Ottley
Mammillaria deherdtiana Farwig
Gayophytum ramosissimum var. obtusum Jeps.
Abronia neurophylla Standl.
Oreocarya rugulosa Payson
Agave utahensis var. nevadensis Engelm.
Pyrrocoma subcaesia Greene
Castilleja parviflora var. douglasii (Benth.) Jeps.
Erigeron chrysopsidis subsp. austiniae (Greene) Cronquist
Amelanchier alnifolia var. cuyamacensis Munz
Collinsia bartsiifolia var. hirsuta (Kellogg) Pennell
Astragalus austrinus (Small) E.D.Schulz
Polemonium foliosissimum subsp. albiflorum (Eastw.) Brand
Phlox viridis subsp. longipes (M.E.Jones) Wherry
Clematis alpina subsp. occidentalis (Hornem.) Kuntze
Penstemon linearifolius J.M.Coult. & Fisher
Astragalus pictus var. filifolius A.Gray
Laurentia carnosula (Hook. & Arn.) Benth. ex A.Gray
Polygonum aviculare subsp. microspermum (Boreau) Berher
Ribes lacustre var. lentum M.E.Jones
Mimulus coccineus Congd.
Parosela Cav.
Piper pellucidum L.
Penstemon virgatus subsp. pseudoputus Crosswh.
Ranunculus aquatilis subsp. diffusus With.
Cnicus calcareus M.E.Jones
Linum kingii var. pinetorum M.E.Jones
Tillaea erecta var. eremica Jeps.
Draba vestita Davidson
Monardella douglasii subsp. venosa (Torr.) Jokerst
Astragalus franciscanus E.Sheld.
Erythrina latissima E.Mey.
Hosackia neomexicana (Greene) Brand
Astragalus ibapensis M.E.Jones
Gilia leptomeria var. tridentata M.E.Jones
Arabis crandallii B.L.Rob.
Helenium decurrens (J.F.Macbr.) Moldenke
Lupinus ingratus var. confertifolius C.P.Sm.
Actinella anthemoides (Cass.) Herter
Malvastrum densiflorum S.Watson
Ammoselinum occidentale Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Eurotia subspinosa Rydb.
Microstylis montana Engelm. ex Rothr.
Eccremocarpus scaber Ruiz & Pav.
Guardiola mexicana Kunth
Croton trinitatis Millsp.
Lupinus stipulatus J.Agardh
Marina minutiflora (Rose) Barneby
Randia laetevirens Standl.
Quercus elliptica Née
Acer brachypterum Wooton & Standl.
Diastatea micrantha (Kunth) McVaugh
Eupatorium hyssopinum A.Gray
Haplopappus pinnatifidus Nutt.
Verbesina oligantha B.L.Rob.
Aristida roemeriana Scheele
Eragrostis limbata E.Fourn.
Russelia sarmentosa f. velutina Carlson
Tilia floridana (V.Engl.) Small
Quercus magnoliifolia Née
Amphilophium paniculatum (L.) Kunth
Aster carnerosanus S.Watson
Cosmos crithmifolius Kunth
Eupatorium areolare DC.
Pithecellobium seleri Harms
Prunus serotina subsp. capuli (Cav.) McVaugh
Prionosciadium thapsoides (DC.) Mathias
Bursera cuneata (Schltdl.) Engl.
Wedelia rosei (Greenm.) McVaugh
Quercus castanea Née
Quercus hypoleuca Engelm.
Daphnopsis lagunae Breedlove & León de la Luz
Vitis berlandieri Planch.
Erigeron mexicanus Sessé & Moc.
Arbutus madrensis M.S.González
Senna pendula var. ovalifolia (Britton & Rose) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Tephrosia conzattii (Rydb.) Standl.
Bouchea prismatica var. brevirostra Grenzeb.
Helianthus similis (Brandegee) S.F.Blake
Solidago paniculata DC.
Juglans pyriformis Liebm.
Seymeria laciniata (M.Martens & Galeotti) Standl.
Valeriana lesueurii Standl.
Houstonia asperuloides Brandegee, 1891
Asclepias notha W.D.Stevens
Hymenostephium superaxillare S.F.Blake
Stevia rosei B.L.Rob.
Quercus incarnata Trel.
Eragrostis pilifera Scheele
Thalictrum pubigerum Benth.
Philadelphus coulteri S.Watson
Gentiana microcalyx Lemmon ex A.Gray
Senecio pennellii Greenm.
Melica imperfecta var. imperfecta
Eysenhardtia punctata Pennell
Phaseolus galactioides (M.Martens & Galeotti) Maréchal, Mascherpa & Stainier
Houstonia cervantesii Terrell
Schizachyrium tenerum Nees
Lupinus bilineatus Benth.
Opuntia grahamii Engelm.
Eupatorium espinosarum A.Gray
Dioscorea plumifera B.L.Rob., 1894
Quercus pulchella Bonpl.
Cassia grandis L.f.
Cuphea lobophora var. elongata S.A.Graham
Aster tephrodes (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Quercus deserticola Trel.
Quercus devia Goldman
Phaseolus pedicellatus var. pedicellatus
Aegopogon cenchroides var. cenchroides
Eriogonum alatum subsp. triste (S.Watson) S.Stokes
Cuscuta ortegana Yunck.
Zigadenus mexicanus (Kunth) Hemsl.
Fraxinus pringlei Lingelsh.
Potentilla rubra Willd. ex Schltdl.
Festuca pacifica Piper
Pinguicula crenatiloba DC.
Tibouchina mexicana (D.Don) Cogn.
Oenothera cardiophylla subsp. cedroensis (Greene) P.H.Raven
Schkuhria anthemoides (Kunth) Wedd.
Agropyron spicatum (Pursh) Rydberg
Hypericum silenoides Juss.
Lupinus ehrenbergii Schltdl.
Viola primulifolia L.
Iresine discolor Greenm.
Portulaca yecorensis Henrickson & Van Devender
Hedeoma costata A.Gray
Iresine celosioides L.
Melampodium longifolium Cerv. ex Cav.
Zexmenia aurea (D.Don) Hemsl.
Clematis dioica L.
Aster tagetinus (Greene) S.F.Blake
Eupatorium hebebotrya (DC.) Hemsl.
Cerastium molle Bartl.
Porophyllum tagetoides (Kunth) DC.
Agave durangensis Gentry
Quercus frutex Trel.
Quercus tinkhamii C.H.Mull.
Caesalpinia bonduc (L.) Roxb.
Dalea alopecuroides Willd.
Sarcostemma elegans Decne.
Gibasis Raf.
Bauhinia andrieuxii Hemsl.
Lippia durangensis Moldenke
Bouteloua bromoides Lag.
Menodora longiflora Engelm. ex A.Gray
Tagetes lunulata Ortega
Viguiera hypochlora (S.F.Blake) S.F.Blake
Arracacia Bancr.
Echinacea pallida (Nutt.) Nutt.
Condalia hookeri M.C.Johnst.
Horkelia congesta subsp. congesta
Cytisus maderensis (Lowe) A.Chev.
Oenothera deltoides f. floccosa Munz
Veronica connata Raf.
Peyritschia pringlei (Scribn.) S.D.Koch
Ciminalis prostrata (Haenke) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Pedicularis siifolia Rydb.
Muhlenbergia decumbens Swallen
Pseudoeriocoma eminens (Cav.) Romasch.
Cyperoides Ség.
Glandularia canadensis (L.) Small
Sedum japonicum Siebold ex Miq.
Clinopodium acinos (L.) Kuntze
Knightia R.Br.
Odostemon Raf.
Achillea millefolium var. fusca (Rydb.) G.N.Jones
Agoseris apargioides subsp. maritima (E.Sheld.) Q.Jones
Agropyron caninum var. andinum (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Pease & A.H.Moore
Agropyron pauciflorum (Schweinitz) Hitchcock ex Silveus
Agropyron repens var. subulatum Roem. & Schult.
Agoseris gracilens (A.Gray) Kuntze
Agrostis alba var. stolonifera (L.) Sm.
Agrostis alba var. palustris (Huds.) Pers.
Agropyron spicatum var. pubescens Elmer
Agrostis exarata var. asperifolia Vasey, 1892
Agrostis schiedeana Trin.
Allium scilloides Douglas
Allium schoenoprasum var. laurentianum Fernald
Ammodenia peploides (L.) Rupr.
Anemone felix M.Peck
Apocynum cannabinum var. suksdorfii (Greene) Bég. & Belosersky
Arabis furcata var. furcata
Arenaria franklinii Douglas
Armeria maritima var. purpurea (W.D.J.Koch) G.H.M.Lawr.
Arnica parryi subsp. genuina Maguire
Aruncus sylvester subsp. acuminatus (Rydb.) Jeps.
Aruncus Adans.
Aster foliaceus subsp. foliaceus
Aster glaucescens (A.Gray) S.F.Blake
Astragalus agrestis Douglas
Astragalus filipes Torr.
Astragalus calycosus Torr.
Astragalus palliseri A.Gray
Astragalus reventus var. canbyi M.E.Jones
Atriplex dioica (Nutt.) J.F.Macbr.
Berberis julianiae C.K.Schneid.
Blepharipappus glandulosus Hook.
Calamagrostis inexpansa var. inexpansa
Calypso occidentalis (Holz.) A.Heller
Camassia quamash var. azurea (A.Heller) C.L.Hitchc.
Camassia leichtlinii var. suksdorfii (Greenm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex breweri var. paddoensis (Suksd.) Cronquist
Carex vesicaria var. major Boott
Castilleja robiginosa J.F.Macbr. & Payson, 1917
Cerastium dubium L.
Cercocarpus ledifolius var. hypoleucus (Rydb.) M.Peck
Cicuta vagans Greene
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus subsp. humilis (Greene) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Cirsium macounii (Greene) Rydb.
Claytonia megarhiza (Gray) Parry
Claytonia parvifolia var. flagellaris (Bong.) R.J.Davis
Cogswellia macrocarpa (Hook. & Arn.) M.E.Jones
Cornus stolonifera var. occidentalis (Torr. & A.Gray) C.L.Hitchc.
Cornus stolonifera var. californica (C.A.Mey.) McMinn
Cotoneaster lesliei J.Fryer & B.Hylmö
Cornus stolonifera f. californica (C.A.Mey.) C.L.Hitchc.
Crepis gracilis (D.C.Eaton) Rydb., 1900
Crepis barbigera Leiberg
Cotoneaster taylorii T.T.Yu
Cryptantha nana var. shantzii (Tidestr.) Payson
Cryptantha thompsonii I.M.Johnst.
Cypripedium montanum Douglas
Cynoglossum ciliatum Douglas ex Lehm.
Delphinium menziesii var. utahense S.Watson
Descurainia sophia (L.) Webb
Deschampsia caespitosa subsp. caespitosa
Distichlis spicata var. dentata C.L.Hitchc.
Douglasia laevigata var. ciliolata Constance
Draba stenoloba var. stenoloba
Drymocallis viscosa Rydb.
Elaeagnus canadensis (L.) A.Nelson
Epilobium alpinum var. nutans (Hornem.) Lehm. ex Hook.
Erigeron ramosus (Walter) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Erigeron peregrinus var. eucallianthemus Cronquist
Eriogonum niveum Douglas
Eriogonum strictum var. glabrum C.L.Hitchc.
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum Douglas
Erysimum arenicola var. arenicola
Erythronium grandiflorum var. albiflorum Hook.
Erythronium grandiflorum var. parviflorum S.Watson
Frasera albicaulis Douglas
Galium multiflorum subsp. puberulum Piper
Galium serpenticum subsp. scabridum (Ehrend.) Dempster & Ehrend.
Galium kamtschaticum Steller
Galium vaillantii DC.
Geranium bicknellii var. longipes (S.Watson) Fernald
Geranium pusillum Burm.f.
Geranium strigosius H.St.John
Geranium viscosissimum f. album (Suksd.) H.St.John
Gilia sinuata Douglas
Gnaphalium ustulatum Nutt.
Haplopappus stenophyllus A.Gray
Hedera helix var. hibernica (Kirchner) D.McClint.
Helianthella uniflora subsp. douglasii (Torrey & A.Gray) W.A.Weber
Haplopappus acaulis subsp. glabratus (D.C.Eaton) H.M.Hall
Hemizonia pungens var. pungens
Hieracium stoloniflorum Waldst. & Kit.
Hieracium triste Willd.
Juncus nevadensis var. badius (Suksd.) C.L.Hitchc.
Lasthenia maritima (A.Gray) Ornduff
Leontodon autumnalis L.
Leptarrhena amplexifolia (Sternb.) Ser.
Lesquerella alpestris (Suksd.) G.A.Mulligan
Leptodactylon pungens var. hookeri (Douglas ex Hook.) Jeps.
Linaria vulgaris Hill, 1756
Linum kingii var. sedoides Porter
Linanthus minimus (H.Mason) Goodw.
Lithospermum lanceolatum Rydb.
Lomatium farinosum var. farinosum
Lomatium farinosum var. hambleniae (Mathias & Constance) Schlessman
Lupinus laxiflorus Douglas
Lupinus leucophyllus Douglas
Lupinus rivularis Douglas
Lycopus americanus Muhl., 1813
Madia elegans var. densifolia (Greene) Jeps.
Melica bulbosa var. intonsa (Piper) M.Peck
Mertensia longiflora var. pulchella (Piper) J.F.Macbr.
Mimulus alsinoides Douglas
Microsteris humilis (Greene) Greene
Minuartia elegans (Cham. & Schltdl.) Schischk.
Montia chamissonis (Eschsch. ex Cham.) Greene
Oenothera hilgardii Greene
Oenanthe sarmentosa C.Presl
Ophrys convallarioides (Swartz) W.Wight
Opulaster pauciflorus A.Heller
Orthocarpus imbricatus Torr.
Penstemon humilis Nutt.
Penstemon fruticosus subsp. scouleri (Douglas ex Lindl.) Pennell & D.D.Keck
Penstemon glandulosus subsp. chelanensis D.D.Keck
Penstemon menziesii var. davidsonii (Greene) Piper
Penstemon militaris Greene
Petalostemon ornatus Douglas
Pereskia aculeata Mill.
Phlox lanceolata E.E.Nelson
Phlox speciosa subsp. euspeciosa Brand
Phlox speciosa subsp. lignosa Brand
Physostegia parviflora Nutt.
Poa suksdorfii Vasey
Polygonum confertiflorum Nutt.
Polygonum spergulariiforme Meisn.
Populus dilatata Aiton
Potentilla gracilis var. permollis (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Potentilla villosa Pall.
Prunus demissa var. melanocarpa (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Psoralea physodes Douglas
Pteryxia terebinthina var. calcarea (M.E.Jones) Mathias
Pyracantha rogersiana (A.B.Jacks.) hort. ex Coltm.-Rog.
Ranunculus aquatilis var. trichophyllus (Chaix) A.Gray
Ranunculus repens var. erectus DC.
Ranunculus repens var. villosus Lamotte
Rhododendron orthocladum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Rhododendron stamineum Franch.
Rhododendron zoelleri Warb.
Rhododendron rarum Schltr.
Ribes gooddingii M.Peck
Rorippa curvisiliqua Bessey.
Rorippa nasturtium-aquaticum (L.) Schinz & Thell.
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. lyrata (Nutt.) M.Peck
Rubus nivalis Douglas
Rubus leucodermis Douglas
Rubus nutkanus Moc.
Rubus parviflorus f. parviflorus
Rubus ursinus var. macropetalus (Douglas ex Hook.) S.W.Br.
Rudbeckia occidentalis var. alpicola (Piper) Cronquist
Salix arctica var. subcordata (Andersson) C.K.Schneid.
Salix sitchensis Sanson
Salix rigida var. macrogemma (C.R.Ball) Cronquist
Salix scouleriana var. coetanea C.R.Ball
Sanicula nevadensis var. septentrionalis (Greene) Mathias
Saxifraga caespitosa var. emarginata (Small) Rosend.
Saxifraga apetala Piper
Saxifraga caespitosa var. subgemmifera (Engl. & Irmsch.) C.L.Hitchc.
Saxifraga nelsoniana subsp. cascadensis (Calder & Savile) Hultén
Saxifraga lyallii subsp. lyallii
Scirpus setaceus L.
Senecio triangularis var. triangularis
Senecio resedifolius Less.
Silene repens Patrin
Sisymbrium incisum var. filipes A.Gray
Silene williamsii Britton
Silene paradoxa L.
Sitanion hystrix var. hordeoides (Suksd.) C.L.Hitchc.
Sisymbrium thalianum (L.) J.Gay
Solidago salebrosa (Piper) Rydb.
Solidago missouriensis var. glaberrima (M.Martens) Rosend. & Cronquist, 1945
Solidago scopulorum (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Sphaeralcea longisepala Torr.
Sporobolus cryptandrus var. occidentalis E.K.Jones & Fassett
Stachys rigida Nutt.
Stachys prattenii Durand
Stipa lemmonii subsp. pubescens Crampton, 1955
Symphoricarpos racemosus Michx.
Tellima grandiflora (Pursh) Douglas
Synthyris schizantha Piper
Taraxacum officinale Weber
Thelypodium laciniatum var. milleflorum (A.Nelson) Payson
Thlaspi alpestre var. glaucum A.Nelson
Tofieldia occidentalis subsp. brevistyla C.L.Hitchc.
Tillaea aquatica L.
Tragopogon major Jacq.
Urtica dioica var. gracilis (Aiton) Selander, 1947
Valeriana ceratophylla Kunth
Valeriana sitchensis var. sitchensis
Vicia sativa subsp. angustifolia (L.) Wahlb.
Viola praemorsa var. major (Hook.) M.Peck
Viola rugulosa Greene
Viola macloskeyi subsp. pallens (Banks ex Ging.) M.S.Baker
Wolffia gladiata Hegelm.
Viola trinervata (Howell) Howell
Zigadenus venenosus var. gramineus (Rydb.) O.S.Walsh
Zygadenus S.F.L.Endlicher, 1836
Zizia cordata (Walter) Koch ex DC.
Zizania aquatica var. aquatica
Hornungia procumbens Linnaeus, 1753
Vaccaria hispanica var. hispanica
Actinea grandiflora (Torr. & A.Gray ex A.Gray) Kuntze
Agoseris glauca var. scorzonerifolia (Schrad.) Piper
Agrostis alba f. alba
Aira elongata Hook.
Armeria maritima Girard ex Boiss.
Aster alpigenus subsp. haydenii (Porter) Cronquist
Aster canescens var. viscosus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Aster subspicatus var. grayi (Suksd.) Cronquist
Astragalus macounii Rydb.
Astragalus striatus Nutt.
Astragalus stenophyllus var. filipes (Torr. ex A.Gray) Tidestr.
Betula glandulosa var. hallii (Howell) C.L.Hitchc.
Camissonia hilgardii (Greene) Raven
Carex brunnescens var. sphaerostachya (Tuck.) Kük.
Carex scoparia Schkuhr
Centaurea cyanus var. denudata Suksd.
Cerastium beeringianum var. capillare Fernald & Wiegand
Cinna pendula var. mutica Vasey
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. artus (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. humilis (Greene) Jeps.
Cirsium lanceolatum (L.) Hill
Crepis atrabarba A.Heller
Crepis modocensis subsp. typica Babc. & Stebbins
Cryptantha torreyana var. calycosa (A.Gray) Greene
Cytherea bulbosa (L.) House
Downingia elegans var. elegans
Draba verna var. verna
Echinopanax horridum (Sm.) Decne. & Planchon
Erigeron pumilus var. euintermedius Cronquist
Eruca sativa Garsault
Erythronium nudopetalum Applegate, 1933
Euphorbia polychroma A.Kern.
Fargesia spathacea Franch.
Frasera speciosa Douglas
Gratiola ebracteata Benth.
Habenaria orbiculata (Pursh) Torr.
Haplopappus acaulis subsp. typicus H.M.Hall
Haplopappus bloomeri var. sonnei Greene
Haplopappus lanuginosus var. andersonii (Rydb.) Cronquist
Heuchera cylindrica var. typica Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Isopyrum hallii A.Gray
Juncus nevadensis var. columbianus (Coville) H.St.John
Lappula redowskii f. redowskii
Layia douglasii Hook. & Arn.
Lesquerella occidentalis var. diversifolia (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Leptarrhena R.Br.
Linanthus bicolor subsp. minimus H.Mason
Lonicera utahensis f. ebractulata (Rydb.) H.St.John
Lupinus argenteus subsp. parviflorus (Hook. & Arn.) E.Phillips
Lupinus lepidus Douglas
Lupinus oreganus var. pusillulus C.P.Sm.
Lychnis dioica L.
Lycopus uniflorus var. uniflorus
Madia filipes A.Gray
Malus hupehensis f. rosea (Rehder) Rehder
Mentzelia gracilenta var. veatchiana (Kellogg) Jeps.
Mimulus dentatus Nutt.
Montia fontana subsp. chondrosperma (Fenzl) Walters
Montiastrum dichotomum (Nutt.) Rydb.
Myosotis scorpiodes L.
Nymphaea colorata Peter
Oenothera scapoidea Nutt.
Oenothera caespitosa subsp. purpurea (S.Watson) Munz
Nicotiana attenuata Torr.
Oreocarya salmonensis A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Oxytropis saximontana (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Parrya menziesii (Hook.) Greene
Penstemon attenuatus subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Penstemon confertus subsp. procerus (Douglas ex Graham) D.V.Clark
Penstemon gairdneri subsp. hians (Piper) D.D.Keck
Penstemon scouleri Douglas
Phlox douglasii subsp. hendersonii (E.E.Nelson) Wherry
Phlox longifolia subsp. viridis (E.E.Nelson) Wherry
Plantago major subsp. major
Polemonium intermedium (Brand) Rydb.
Poa unilateralis subsp. pachypholis (Piper) D.D.Keck ex Soreng
Polygonum coccineum Muhl.
Potentilla viridescens Rydb.
Prunus melanocarpa (A.Nelson) Rydb.
Ranunculus suksdorfii subsp. suksdorfii
Rhinanthus minor subsp. groenlandicus (Ostenf.) Neumann
Rhododendron sulfureum Franch.
Rhododendron pauciflorum King & Gamble
Rosa pyrifera Rydb.
Salix mackenzieana var. macrogemma C.R.Ball
Saxifraga bronchialis var. vespertina (Small) Rosend.
Saxifraga nelsoniana subsp. pacifica (Hultén) Hultén
Saxifraga integrifolia var. integrifolia
Saxifraga occidentalis var. idahoensis (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Scrophularia lanceolata f. velutina Pennell
Scutellaria altissima L.
Selinum hookeri S.Watson, 1888
Senecio foetidus var. hydrophiloides (Rydb.) T.M.Barkley
Senecio columbianus Greene
Senecio integerrimus var. vaseyi (Greenm.) Cronquist
Sieversia ciliata (Pursh) G.Don
Sitanion brevifolium J.G.Sm.
Solidago tolmieana A.Gray
Solidago lepida var. elongata (Nutt.) Fernald
Solidago hesperia Howell
Spergularia rubra var. perennans B.L.Rob.
Spiraea betulifolia subsp. lucida (Douglas ex Greene) Taylor & Mac Bryde
Stipa occidentalis var. nelsonii (Scribn.) C.L.Hitchc.
Stipa viridula var. minor Vasey
Swainsona salsula (Pall.) Taub.
Talinum okanoganense English
Thlaspi glaucum var. pedunculatum Payson
Townsendia montana var. montana
Trillium ovatum f. ovatum
Tripleurospermum maritimum subsp. maritimum
Tripleurospermum perforatum (Mérat) M.Laínz
Trisetum subspicatum P.Beauv.
Vicia americana var. villosa (Kellogg) F.J.Herm.
Viola wittrockiana Koppert
Xanthium oviforme Wallr.
Aconogonon davisiae var. glabrum (Jones) S.P.Hong
Agoseris scorzonerifolia (Schrad.) Greene
Amelanchier alnifolia var. humptulipensis (G.N.Jones) C.L.Hitchc.
Amelanchier florida var. cusickii (Fernald) M.Peck
Anthemis arvensis var. agrestis (Wallr.) DC.
Arabis arcuata var. subvillosa S.Watson
Arenaria congesta var. cephaloidea (Rydb.) Maguire
Arnica eradiata A.Heller
Artemisia campestris var. purshii (Besser) Cronquist
Artemisia vulgaris var. gnaphalodes (Nutt.) Kuntze
Aster alpigenus subsp. typicus Onno
Aster major (Hook.) Porter
Aster subspicatus var. subspicatus
Astragalus goniatus Nutt.
Astragalus occidentalis (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Betula occidentalis var. inopina (Jeps.) C.L.Hitchc.
Bidens connata Muhl. ex Willd.
Bidens cernuus L.
Calamagrostis rigescens (J.Presl) Scribn.
Carex microptera var. limnophila (F.J.Herm.) Dorn
Claytonia lanceolata var. chrysantha (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Coleogeton filiformis subsp. occidentalis (J.W.Robbins) Les & R.R.Haynes
Convolvulus nyctagineus Greene
Cotoneaster villosulus (Rehder & E.H.Wilson) Flinck & B.Hylmö
Crepis nana subsp. clivicola A.H.Legge
Distichlis stricta var. dentata (Rydb.) C.L.Hitchc.
Draba verna var. boerhavii H.C.Hall
Empetrum nigrum subsp. nigrum
Elymus glaucus var. aristatus (Merr.) Hitchc.
Epilobium alpinum var. gracillimum (Trel.) C.L.Hitchc.
Eriogonum vimineum Douglas
Eriogonum vimineum var. commixtum (Greene ex Tidestr.) S.Stokes
Filago minima (Sm.) Pers.
Franseria villosa Rydb.
Galium humifusum M.Bieb.
Gilia pharnaceoides Benth.
Habenaria greenei Jeps.
Haplopappus brandegei A.Gray
Helianthella douglasii Torr. & A.Gray
Haplopappus lanuginosus subsp. andersonii (Rydb.) H.M.Hall
Heuchera flabellifolia var. typica Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Juncus xiphioides var. triandrus Engelm.
Lappula subdecumbens A.Nelson
Lathyrus palustris subsp. palustris
Lesquerella geyeri (Hook.) G.A.Mulligan
Leptodactylon pungens subsp. eupungens (Brand) Wherry
Lewisia columbiana subsp. rupicola (English) Ferris
Lilium parviflorum hort. ex Flor.
Luzula campestris var. frigida Buchenau
Madia sativa var. sativa
Mentzelia brandegei S.Watson
Mentzelia acuminata Tidestr.
Mimulus alsinoides var. minimus Benth.
Montia chamissoi Tidestr., 1925
Monardella nervosa Greene
Muhlenbergia squarrosa Rydb.
Myosotis virginica L., 1762
Nasturtium nasturtium-aquaticum (L.) H.Karst.
Oenothera pubens (S.Watson) Munz
Orobanche uniflora var. minuta (Suksd.) Beck
Pedicularis pachyrhiza Pennell
Pedicularis groenlandica var. surrecta (Benth.) A.Gray
Penstemon triphyllus subsp. diphyllus (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Petrophyton hendersonii (Canby) Rydb.
Petasites japonicus var. giganteus (F.Schmidt ex Trautv.) G.Nicholson
Peucedanum leiocarpum Nutt.
Phlox adsurgens Torr.
Phlox diffusa subsp. typica Wherry
Plagiobothrys granulatus (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Polygonum fowleri Rob.
Potentilla villosa var. parviflora C.L.Hitchc.
Potentilla rupestris Falk
Psoralea lanceolata subsp. scabra (Nutt.) Piper
Ranunculus reptans var. ovalis (Bigelow) Torr. & A.Gray
Rhododendron carringtoniae F.Muell.
Rhododendron makinoi Tagg ex Nakai
Rhododendron tomentosum (Stokes) Harmaja
Rhododendron solitarium Sleumer
Rorippa lyrata (Nutt.) Greene
Salix scouleriana var. thompsonii C.R.Ball
Salix sericans Tausch ex A.Kern.
Saxifraga aequidentata (Small) Rosend.
Sedum roseum var. integrifolium (Raf.) A.Berger
Sedum stenopetalum subsp. monanthum (Suksd.) Clausen
Setaria lutescens (Weigel) C.E.Hubb., 1916
Sisymbrium brachycarpon Richardson
Solidago elongata var. fallax (Fernald) G.N.Jones
Spiraea aruncus L.
Stellaria alsine Grimm
Symphoricarpus racemosus
Thlaspi fendleri var. glaucum (A.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Thysanocarpus pusillus Hook.
Thelypodium streptanthoides Leiberg ex Piper
Thlaspi glaucum (A.Nelson) A.Nelson
Tofieldia glutinosa var. montana (C.L.Hitchc.) R.J.Davis
Luzula multiflora subsp. frigida (Buchenau) V.I.Krecz.
Agropyron caninum var. tenerum (Vasey) Pease & A.H.Moore
Agrostis interrupta L.
Amsinckia densirugosa Suksd.
Anemone hudsoniana (DC.) Richardson
Arnica mollis var. mollis
Artemisia vulgaris subsp. michauxiana (H.St.John), 1929
Artemisia tilesii var. unalaschcensis Besser
Aster engelmannii var. engelmannii
Astragalus eremiticus var. spencianus M.E.Jones
Astragalus arrectus var. leibergii (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Astragalus sonneanus Greene
Balsamorhiza balsamorhiza A.Heller
Brodiaea hendersonii (Greene) S.Watson
Carex brevipes W.Boott, 1880
Centaurium exaltatum (Griseb.) W.Wight
Chrysosplenium glechomaefolium Nutt.
Claytonia chamissonis Eschsch. ex Cham.
Cotoneaster cochleatus (Franch.) Klotz
Cotoneaster ignotus G.Klotz
Crepis glareosa Piper
Crepis atribarba subsp. typica Babc. & Stebbins
Crepis virens L.
Cynomarathrum brandegeei (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Draba paysonii var. paysonii
Epilobium glandulosum var. tenue (Trel.) C.L.Hitchc.
Erigeron poliospermus var. typicus Cronquist
Eriogonum umbellatum var. chrysanthum Gand.
Erysimum torulosum Piper
Fatsia horrida (Sm.) Benth. & Hook.f.
Galium tinctorium var. subbiflorum (Wiegand) Fernald
Glyceria otisii Hitchc.
Haplopappus liatriformis (Greene) H.St.John
Heleochloa alopecuroides (Piller & Mitterp.) Host
Hemieva violacea (A.Gray) Wheelock
Heuchera suksdorfii Rydb.
Hieracium floribundum Wimm. & Grab.
Hieracium umbellatum var. umbellatum
Horkelia gordonii Hook.
Iris tenax Douglas
Lomatium platyphyllum J.M.Coult. & Rose
Lomatium simplex var. leptophyllum (Hook.) Mathias
Lupinus fikeranus C.P.Sm.
Meconopsis betonicifolia Franch.
Mentha arvensis var. canadensis (L.) Kuntze
Mimulus ringens var. ringens
Montia fontana subsp. tenerrima (Gray) Fernald & Wiegand
Oryzopsis hendersonii Vasey
Peucedanum utriculatum Nutt.
Petrea volubilis L.
Photinia melanocarpa (Michx.) K.R.Robertson & Phipps
Poa leptocoma var. paucispicula (Scribn. & Merr.) C.L.Hitchc.
Polemonium rotatum Eastw.
Potamogeton zosterifolius Schumach.
Prenanthes hastata (Less.) M.E.Jones, 1910
Pteryxia foeniculacea (Torr. & A.Gray) Nutt.
Ptilocalais nutans (Hook.) Greene
Pyrola secunda var. obtusata Turcz.
Pyrrocoma uniflora var. linearis (D.D.Keck) Kartesz & Gandhi
Quercus stellata Wangenh.
Rhododendron brachycarpum Zucc. ex Maxim.
Rhododendron brookeanum H.Low ex Lindl.
Rhododendron radians J.J.Sm.
Rhododendron gracilentum F.Muell.
Sagina saginoides (L.) Britton
Salix lutea var. platyphylla C.R.Ball
Saxifraga aestivalis Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Sanicula septentrionalis Greene
Scorzonella laciniata (Hook.) Sch.Bip.
Scirpus triqueter L.
Sedum divaricatum S.Watson
Senecio leibergii Greene
Silene douglasii var. multicaulis (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Stachys ciliata Epling
Thalictrum sparsiflorum Turcz.
Trifolium longipes var. multiovulatum (L.F.Hend.) C.L.Hitchc.
Trillium parviflorum V.G.Soukup
Trisetum cernuum f. pubescens G.N.Jones
Vicia sparsifolia Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Viola canina var. oxyceras S.Watson
Viola nuttallii subsp. praemorsa (Douglas) Piper
Viola purpurea subsp. atriplicifolia (Greene) M.S.Baker & J.C.Clausen ex M.Peck
Viola glabella var. remotifolia Suksd.
Viola nuttallii var. bakeri (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Xanthium italicum Moretti
Zizania palustris subsp. palustris
Cotoneaster henryanus (C.K.Schneid.) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Abronia turbinata Torr.
Achillea pacifica Rydb.
Adlumia cirrhosa Raf.
Agropyron caninum subsp. latiglume (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Pease & A.H.Moore
Agropyron tenerum Vasey
Antennaria umbellata Greene
Artemisia furcata subsp. furcata
Arnica macounii Greene
Arnica subplumosa Greene
Artemisia tilesii var. unalaschensis Besser
Artemisia trifurcata Stephan, 1826
Aster ledophyllus var. covillei (Greene) Cronquist
Astragalus decumbens var. serotinus (A.Gray ex E.Cooper) M.E.Jones
Astragalus hookerianus (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Carex constanceana Stacey
Cotoneaster conspicuus Comber ex Marquand
Cotoneaster induratus J.Fryer & B.Hylmö
Crepis acuminata var. intermedia (A.Gray) Jeps.
Crepis modocensis subsp. glareosa (Piper) Babc. & Stebbins
Elephantella groenlandica (Retz.) Rydb.
Eriogonum elatum Douglas
Euphorbia serrulata Thuill.
Festuca suksdorfii Piper ex Suksd.
Frasera nitida Benth.
Gilia wilcoxii A.Nelson
Grindelia integrifolia var. integrifolia
Hesperogenia stricklandii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Hieracium vulgatum Fr.
Horkelia tweedyi (Rydb.) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Lesquerella oregona (S.Watson) G.A.Mulligan
Luina nardosmia var. glabrata (Piper) Cronquist
Lupinus latifolius var. thompsonianus (C.P.Sm.) C.L.Hitchc.
Malus ×robusta (Carrière) Rehder
Mertensia perplexa Rydb.
Mimulus moschatus var. pallidiflorus Suksd.
Oxycoccus microcarpus Turcz.
Penstemon confertus var. confertus
Penstemon gairdneri var. hians Piper
Penstemon humilis subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Penstemon montanus subsp. idahoensis D.D.Keck
Penstemon whitedii subsp. tristis Pennell & D.D.Keck
Petasites vitifolia Greene
Phlox longifolia subsp. typica Wherry
Phlox longifolia subsp. longipes (M.E.Jones) Wherry
Phlox longifolia var. viridis (E.E.Nelson) Peabody
Polemonium caeruleum subsp. occidentale (Greene) J.F.Davidson
Prenanthes lessingii Hultén
Pyracantha rogersiana hort.
Rhododendron camtschaticum Pall.
Rhododendron roxieanum Forrest
Rhododendron tuba Sleumer
Rumex fenestratus Greene
Salix lasiandra var. macrophylla (Andersson) Little
Salix mackenziana Barratt
Salix phylicifolia var. pennata (C.R.Ball) Cronquist
Sambucus mexicana C.Presl
Sambucus racemosa subsp. arborescens (Torr. & A.Gray) A.E.Murray
Saxifraga oppositifolia subsp. smalliana (Engl. & Irmsch.) Hultén
Sedum lanceolatum subsp. rupicolum (G.N.Jones) C.L.Hitchc.
Silene acaulis subsp. acaulis
Streptopus amplexifolius var. papillatus Ohwi
Taraxacum eriophorum Rydb.
Taraxacum taraxacum (L.) H.Karst.
Tetradymia canescens var. inermis (Nutt.) A.Gray, 1876
Thalictrum lucidum Guenthart ex Lecoy.
Thlaspi alpestre C.C.Gmel.
Thlaspi idahoense Payson
Trientalis arctica Fisch.
Trifolium macraei var. dichotomum (Hook. & Arn.) W.H.Brewer ex S.Watson
Unifolium bifolium (L.) Greene
Valeriana sitchensis var. scouleri (Rydb.) M.E.Jones
Viola bellidifolia Greene
Viola rafinesquii Greene
Zizania L.
Aconogonum davisiae (W.H.Brewer ex A.Gray) Soják
Aquilegia formosa var. flavescens (S.Watson) M.Peck
Arabis lemmonii var. paddoensis Rollins
Arabis lyrata subsp. kamchatica (Fisch. ex DC.) Hultén
Arenaria stricta var. puberulenta (M.Peck) C.L.Hitchc.
Astragalus mortonii Nutt.
Ballota nigra L.
Bromus vulgaris var. eximius Shear
Caltha asarifolia DC.
Caltha biflora var. rotundifolia (Huth) C.L.Hitchc.
Carduus edulis (Nutt.) Greene
Chrysothamnus bloomeri (A.Gray) Greene
Clinopodium grandiflorum (L.) Stace
Convolvulus sepium var. americanus Sims
Cryptantha hypsophila I.M.Johnst.
Elaeagnus commutata Bernh.
Epilobium glandulosum var. occidentale (Trel.) Fernald
Erigeron filifolius var. typicus Cronquist
Erythronium idahoense H.St.John & G.N.Jones
Erythronium grandiflorum var. idahoense (H.St.John & G.N.Jones) R.J.Davis
Ferula L.
Euphorbia peplis L.
Floerkea occidentalis Rydb.
Gentiana calycosa var. calycosa
Geum campanulatum (Greene) G.N.Jones
Godetia amoena var. typica C.L.Hitchc.
Haplopappus resinosus (Nutt.) A.Gray
Hymenatherum aureum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Impatiens capensis f. peasei (A.H.Moore ex Weath.) Fernald & B.G.Schub.
Lamium album L.
Lepargyrea canadensis (L.) Greene
Melica bella Piper
Mentzelia dispersa var. compacta (A.Nelson) J.F.Macbr.
Mertensia nutans subsp. subcalva Piper
Myosotis azorica H.C.Watson ex Hook.
Nuttallia cerasiformis Torr. & A.Gray ex Hook. & Arn.
Orobanche valida subsp. howellii Heckard & L.T.Collins
Panicum lanuginosum var. tennesseense (Ashe) Gleason
Panicum scoparioides Ashe
Plantago hirtella Kunth
Polemonium columbianum Rydb.
Populus trichocarpa var. hastata (Dode) A.Henry
Prunus domestica subsp. domestica
Rhododendron anthopogon D.Don
Rhododendron christii F.Först.
Rhus radicans var. rydbergii (Small ex Rydb.) Rehder
Rhododendron rubropilosum Hayata
Rhododendron vaccinioides Hook.fil.
Rhododendron forrestii Balf.fil.
Rhododendron lowii Hook.fil.
Ribes hendersonii C.L.Hitchc.
Ribes lacustre var. parvulum A.Gray
Rorippa islandica subsp. islandica
Sagittaria graminea subsp. weatherbiana (Fernald) R.R.Haynes & Hellq.
Salix lasiandra var. lyallii Sarg.
Saxifraga caespitosa subsp. subgemmifera Engl. & Irmsch.
Saxifraga latepetiolata Willk.
Scabiosa purpurea Sulak.
Sedum spathulifolium subsp. pruinosum (Britton) Clausen & C.H.Uhl
Solidago gigantea var. leiophylla Fernald
Symphoricarpos racemosus var. pauciflorus J.W.Robbins
Thermopsis ovata (B.L.Rob. ex Piper) Rydb.
Torreyochloa pallida var. pallida
Trifolium covillei House
Unifolium dilatatum (Alph.Wood) Greene
Vaccinium oxycoccos var. intermedium A.Gray
Viburnum pauciflorum Bach.Pyl. ex Torr. & Gray
Zigadenus glaberrimus Michx.
Achillea millefolium var. nigrescens E.Mey.
Alisma geyeri Torr.
Allocarya scopulorum Greene
Amsinckia arenaria (Suksd.) Macbr.
Antennaria carpatica (Wahlenb.) Bluff & Fingerh.
Arenaria laricifolia L.
Arnica alpina var. tomentosa (J.M.Macoun) Cronquist
Arnica parryi var. parryi
Artemisia tridentata subsp. nova (A.Nelson) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Aster foliaceus var. cusickii (A.Gray) Cronquist
Astragalus iodanthus var. vipereus Barneby
Astragalus lentiginosus var. typicus Barneby
Boisduvalia densiflora var. salicina (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Munz
Cardamine bellidifolia subsp. bellidifolia
Carduus remotifolius Hook.
Cerastium beeringianum var. grandiflorum (Fenzl) Hultén
Cirsium callilepis var. oregonense (Petr.) J.T.Howell
Coleogeton filiformis subsp. alpinus (Blytt) Les & R.R.Haynes
Conioselinum benthamii Fernald
Cornus instolonea A.Nelson
Crepis rostrata Coville
Cyperus ×mesochoreus Geise
Eleocharis engelmannii var. monticola (Fernald) Svenson
Elymus glaucus var. breviaristatus Burtt Davy
Eriogonum carolinae Reveal
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. majus (Hook.) Piper
Erythronium grandiflorum var. candidum (Piper) Abrams
Gaura parviflora Douglas
Gilia septentrionalis (Mason) H.St.John
Haplopappus racemosus var. glomerellus A.Gray
Leptotaenia dissecta Nutt.
Limnorchis dilatata (Pursh) Rydb.
Lomatium suksdorfii var. thompsonii Mathias
Lupinus subalpinus Piper & B.L.Rob.
Malus ×sublobata (Zabel) Rehder
Medicago hispida var. denticulata (Willd.) Urb.
Mimulus guttatus var. gracilis (A.Gray ex Torr.) G.R.Campb.
Orobanche pinorum Geyer
Orobanche ludoviciana var. arenosa (Suksd.) Cronquist
Ornithogalum angustifolium Boreau
Pedicularis atrosanguinea Pennell & C.H.Thomps.
Phlox hoodii subsp. viscidula Wherry
Phoenicaulis Nutt.
Phlox multiflora subsp. depressa (E.Nelson) Wherry
Plantago juncoides Lam.
Potamogeton gramineus var. graminifolius Fr.
Rhododendron asperulum Hutch. & Kingdon-Ward
Rhododendron herzogii Warb.
Rhododendron minus var. chapmanii (Alph.Wood) Gandhi & Zarucchi
Rhododendron degronianum subsp. degronianum
Rhododendron leucogigas Sleumer
Saxifraga bongardii C.Presl ex Engl.
Saxifraga occidentalis var. allenii (Small) C.L.Hitchc.
Senecio ×albescens Burb. & Colgan
Solidago lepida f. lepida
Sorbaria kirilowii (Regel) Maxim.
Sorbus torminalis (L.) Crantz
Stenanthium (A.Gray) Kunth
Stellaria pallida (Dumort.) Piré
Trichophorum cespitosum (L.) Schur, 1853
Agropyron saxicola (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Piper
Agoseris glauca var. villosa (Rydb.) G.L.Wittr.
Antennaria carpatica R.Br., 1818
Arnica amplexifolia Rydb.
Artemisia elatior (Torr. & A.Gray) Rydb.
Artemisia tilesii var. elatior Torr. & A.Gray
Artemisia norvegica subsp. heterophylla (Besser) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Aster ericoides var. prostratus (Kuntze) S.F.Blake
Astragalus purshii var. typicus Barneby
Bassia hirsuta (L.) Asch.
Berberis chinensis Poir.
Calamagrostis canadensis var. acuminata Vasey
Camassia quamash var. maxima (Gould) C.L.Hitchc.
Carduus undulatus Nutt.
Chenopodium album var. viride (L.) Moq.
Chrysanthemum leucanthemum var. subpinnatifidum Fernald
Crepis modocensis var. rostrata (Coville) B.Boivin
Deschampsia caespitosa subsp. holciformis (J.Presl) W.E.Lawrence
Drymocallis ×valida (Greene) Piper
Erigeron divergens var. typicus Cronquist
Eriogonum nudum Douglas
Euphorbia amygdaloides subsp. amygdaloides
Galium aparine var. aparine
Galium boreale var. intermedium DC.
Gaillardia xgrandiflora hort. ex Van Houtte
Geranium sphaerospermum Fernald
Godetia amoena (Lehm.) G.Don
Haplopappus lanuginosus subsp. typicus H.M.Hall, 1928
Impatiens capensis f. immaculata (Weath.) Fernald & B.G.Schub.
Iliamna rivularis var. diversa (A.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Lepidium densiflorum var. typicum Thell.
Leptotaenia multifida Nutt.
Linum perenne subsp. perenne
Lloydia serotina subsp. serotina
Lomatium hambleniae Mathias & Constance
Medicago hispida f. apiculata (Willd.) Urb.
Melica harfordii var. viridifolia Suksd.
Mentha lanata Gand.
Mimulus caespitosus (Greene) Greene
Oxytropis columbiana H.St.John
Oxytropis nana var. argophylla (Rydb.) Isely
Panicularia Heist. ex Fabr.
Pedicularis paddoensis Pennell
Phlox douglasii subsp. eudouglasii Brand
Physalis subglabrata Mack. & Bush
Polemonium pulchellum Bunge
Polygonum hydropiperoides subsp. hydropiperoides
Ptiloria paniculata (Nutt.) Greene
Psilochenia bakeri (Greene) W.A.Weber
Rhododendron aureum Georgi
Rhus glabra var. occidentalis Torr.
Rhododendron molle (Blume) G.Don
Rhododendron santapaui Sastry, Kataki, Pet.A.Cox, Pat.Cox & Hutchison
Rhododendron veitchianum Hook.
Rhododendron lochiae F.Muell.
Sagittaria subulata var. gracillima (S.Watson) J.G.Sm.
Saxifraga tolmiei var. ledifolia (Greene) Engl. & Irmsch.
Schizonotus discolor (Pursh) Raf.
Senecio pauperculus var. pauperculus
Sinningia mauroana Chautems
Silene menziesii var. typica C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire, 1947
Solidago lepida var. fallax Fernald
Spiraea discolor var. ariifolia (Sm.) S.Watson
Troximon aurantiacum Hook.
Agropyron glaucum Roem. & Schult.
Arnica pedunculata Rydb.
Aster cusickii A.Gray
Astragalus campestris var. decumbens (Torr. & A.Gray) M.E.Jones
Avena hybrida Peterm. ex Reichenb.
Azaleastrum albiflorum (Hook.) Rydb.
Calystegia pulchra Brumm. & Heywood
Carex capitata var. arctogena (Harry Sm.) Hultén
Coleogeton pectinatus (L.) Les & R.R.Haynes
Coelopleurum gmelinii (DC.) Ledeb.
Cuscuta pentagona var. calycina Engelm.
Daphne caucasica Pall.
Delphinium menziesii var. pyramidale (Ewan) C.L.Hitchc.
Epilobium ×treleaseanum H.Lév.
Erigeron glabellus subsp. typicus Cronquist
Erigeron curvifolius Piper
Festuca capillata Lam.
Godetia amoena subsp. lindleyi (Douglas) Piper & Beattie
Hemizonella durandii A.Gray
Holboellia Wall.
Isnardia palustris L.
Lathyrus tuberosus L.
Leucanthemum lacustre (Brot.) Samp.
Lupinus microcarpus var. scopulorum (C.P.Sm.) C.P.Sm.
Mertensia foliosa var. amoena (A.Nelson) I.M.Johnst.
Oenothera hookeri var. angustifolia R.R.Gates
Oxycoccus oxycoccus (L.) Mac Mill.
Panicularia nervata (Willd.) Kuntze
Panicum lanuginosum var. fasciculatum (Torr.) Fernald
Penstemon deustus subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Perilla frutescens var. frutescens
Poa bulbosa var. vivipara Koeler
Potentilla rhomboidea Rydb.
Rhododendron baileyi I.B.Balf
Rhododendron championae Hook.
Rhododendron sargentianum Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron superbum hort. ex Lavallée, 1877
Scirpus cespitosus L.
Senecio blumeri Greene
Solidago serotina subsp. salebrosa (Piper) Piper
Tiniaria convolvulus (L.) Webb & Moq.
Troximon purpureum (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Veronica scutellata f. villosa (Schum.) Pennell
Agropyron bakeri E.E.Nelson
Arabis hirsuta subsp. eschscholtziana (Andrz. ex Ledeb.) Hultén
Arabis whitedii Piper
Arnica amplexicaulis subsp. genuina Maguire, 1943
Arnica foliosa Nutt.
Artemisia spithamea Pursh
Aster ledophyllus var. ledophyllus
Bromus marginatus var. latior Shear
Calypso borealis (Sw.) Salisb.
Carduus foliosus Hook.
Chrysothamnus viscidiflorus var. pumilus (Nutt.) Jeps.
Cotoneaster mucronatus Franch.
Distichlis stricta var. stricta
Erigeron strigosus var. septentrionalis (Fernald & Wiegand) Fernald
Eriogonum ovalifolium subsp. ochroleucum (Small ex Rydb.) S.Stokes
Festuca microstachys var. subappressa Suksd.
Gagea minima (L.) Ker Gawl.
Glyceria nervata (Willd.) Trin.
Gilia humilis (Douglas ex Hook.) Piper
Godetia gracilis Piper
Hastingsia serpenticola Becking
Hymenoxys canescens (D.C.Eaton ex S.Watson) Cockerell
Juncus mertensianus subsp. gracilis (Engelm.) F.J.Herm.
Lesquerella condensata var. laevis Payson
Moneses uniflora subsp. uniflora
Oenothera caespitosa var. psammophila (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Munz
Pectocarya linearis var. penicillata (Hook. & Arn.) M.E.Jones
Penstemon gairdneri subsp. oreganus (A.Gray) D.D.Keck
Petalostemon ornatus Douglas ex Hook.
Phoenicaulis menziesii (Hook.) Steud.
Physaria didymocarpa subsp. didymocarpa
Potentilla rivalis var. rivalis
Pyrola uniflora L.
Rhododendron moupinense Franch.
Rumex fueginus var. tanythrix Rech.f.
Rumex hesperis Greene
Saxifraga mertensiana var. eastwoodiae Engl. & Irmsch.
Saxifraga mertensiana var. glandipilosa H.St.John & Hardin
Solidago humilis Herb.Banks ex Pursh
Townsendia florifer var. watsonii (A.Gray) Cronquist, 1950
Viola langsdorfii (Regel) Fisch.
Agrostemma L.
Anthemis austriaca Jacq.
Astragalus decumbens var. oblongifolius (Rydb.) Cronquist
Bromus pseudothominei P.M.Sm.
Camassia quamash subsp. typica Gould
Carex pyrenaica subsp. pyrenaica
Carex saxatilis var. major Olney
Chaetochloa viridis (L.) Scribn.
Claytonia chamissoi Ledeb. ex Spreng.
Clematis verticillaris var. columbiana (Nutt.) A.Gray
Cornus stolonifera var. interior (Rydb.) H.St.John
Cornus pubescens var. californica (C.A.Mey.) J.M.Coult. & W.H.Evans
Crepis biennis L.
Drymocallis ×pumila Rydb.
Eriophyllum gracile A.Gray
Galium multiflorum var. watsonii A.Gray
Glaux maritima var. obtusifolia Fernald
Haplopappus lanuginosus subsp. lanuginosus
Heuchera suksdorfii f. ribesoides Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Lathyrus maritimus var. glaber (Ser.) Eames
Lithophragma thompsonii Hoover
Lonicera xylosteum L.
Lupinus columbianus A.Heller
Lupinus humicola A.Nelson
Mentha arvensis var. lanata Piper
Panicularia pauciflora (J.Presl) Kuntze
Penstemon fruticosus subsp. serratus D.D.Keck
Penstemon minidokanus A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Plagiobothrys medius (Piper) I.M.Johnst.
Rhododendron burtii P.Woods
Rhododendron maculiferum Franch.
Rhododendron orbiculatum Ridl.
Rosa ultramontana (S.Watson) A.Heller
Salix nuttallii Sarg.
Saponaria vaccaria L.
Scirpus cespitosus var. callosus Bigelow
Sisymbrium officinale var. officinale
Talinum spinescens Torr.
Tripleurospermum maritimum var. salinum (Wallr.) Kay
Valeriana capitata subsp. pubicarpa (Rydb.) F.G.Mey.
Alyssum desertorum var. desertorum
Amelanchier florida var. humptulipensis G.N.Jones
Arenaria congesta var. glandulifera Maguire
Blechum Nees
Chaenactis nevadensis var. mainsiana (A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.) Stockw.
Claytonia aurea A.Nelson
Cryptantha calycosa (A.Gray) Rydb.
Cymbalaria muralis subsp. muralis
Deschampsia calycina J.Presl
Echinodorus ranunculoides (L.) Engelm.
Dryas crenulata Juz.
Gayophytum nuttallii var. abramsii Munz
Gayophytum racemosum subsp. caesium (Torr. & A.Gray) Munz
Haplopappus racemosus subsp. congestus (Greene) H.M.Hall
Holcus mollis subsp. mollis
Jussiaea uruguayensis Cambess.
Lomatium martindalei var. martindalei
Polemonium foliosissimum subsp. decurrens (Brand) Wherry
Polygonum coccineum var. pratincola (Greene) Stanford
Potentilla norvegica var. hirsuta (Michx.) Lehm.
Psoralea scabra Nutt.
Puccinellia pauciflora var. microtheca (Buckley) C.L.Hitchc.
Pyrola elata Nutt.
Ranunculus alismifolius Geyer
Rhododendron afghanicum Aitch.
Rhododendron celebicum (Blume) DC.
Rhododendron inconspicuum J.J.Sm.
Rosa spaldingii var. hispida (Fernald) G.N.Jones
Sagina apetala var. apetala
Salix drummondiana var. bella (Piper) C.R.Ball
Sambucus racemosa var. leucocarpa (Torr. & Gray) Cronquist
Senecio ductoris Piper
Senecio leonardii Rydb.
Silene latifolia subsp. latifolia
Solidago missouriensis var. montana A.Gray
Sophia brachycarpon (Richardson) Rydb.
Spraguea Torr.
Ligustrum ibolium Coe ex Rehder
Agoseris subalpina G.N.Jones
Aquilegia flavescens var. miniata J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Artemisia incompta Nutt.
Aruncus acuminatus (Rydb.) Rydb.
Audibertia incana Benth.
Calamagrostis canadensis var. lactea (Beal) C.L.Hitchc.
Cerastium glutinosum Fr.
Cerastium brachypetalum subsp. brachypetalum
Crepis occidentalis subsp. typica Babc. & Stebbins
Deschampsia caespitosa var. longiflora Beal
Drymocallis corymbosa Rydb.
Elytrigia repens var. repens
Galium claytonii var. subbiflorum (Wiegand) Wiegand
Gayophytum nuttallii var. intermedium (Rydb.) Munz
Hackelia hendersonii (Piper) Brand
Linaria triornithophora (L.) Cav.
Matricaria maritima var. agrestis (Knaf) Wilmott
Mertensia denticulata (Lehm.) Piper
Mentha canadensis subsp. borealis (Michx.) Piper
Monarda didyma L.
Parrya cheiranthoides (Nutt.) Jeps.
Pimpinella saxifraga subsp. nigra (Mill.) Gaudin
Poa secunda var. nevadensis Vasey ex Scribn.
Polygonum triandrous Coolidge
Potentilla leucocarpa Rydb.
Prunus ×sieboldii (Carrière) Wittm.
Rhododendron wadanum Makino
Rhododendron genestierianum Forrest
Rhododendron jasminiflorum Hook.
Sedum reflexum L.
Thaspium aureum var. trifoliatum (L.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Trifolium fimbriatum Lindl.
Tragopogon floccosus Waldst. & Kit.
Vaccinium chamissonis Bong.
Aquilegia formosa var. wawawensis H.St.John
Arabis glauca H.Boissieu
Artemisia vulgaris subsp. gnaphalodes (Nutt.) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Asclepias davisii Woodson
Artemisia serrata Nutt.
Astragalus arrectus var. kelseyi (Rydb.) M.E.Jones
Astragalus tenellus var. strigulosus (Rydb.) F.J.Herm.
Boisduvalia torreyi S.Watson
Brassica rapa subsp. campestris (L.) A.R.Clapham
Carex vulpinoidea f. vulpinoidea
Chloraea austinae A.Gray
Claytonia lanceolata f. chrysantha (Greene) H.St.John
Cotoneaster monopyrenus (W.W.Sm.) Flinck & Hylmö
Cryptantha sheldonii (Brand) Payson
Cryptanthe Benth. & Hook.f., 1876
Dentaria macrocarpa Nutt.
Echinospermum floribundum Lehm.
Eriogonum verrucosum Reveal
Gaertneria bipinnatifida (Nutt.) Kuntze
Gentiana amarella var. acuta (Michx.) Herder
Gilia filifolia Nutt.
Haplopappus suffruticosus subsp. typicus H.M.Hall, 1928
Lesquerella diversifolia Greene
Lepidium montanum subsp. davisii (Rollins) C.L.Hitchc.
Oenanthe sarmentosa var. californica (S.Watson) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Ophrys caurina (Piper) Rydb.
Opuntia erinacea var. columbiana (Griffiths) L.D.Benson
Parrya menziesii var. lanuginosa S.Watson
Penstemon watsonii subsp. laxus (A.Nelson) D.D.Keck
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides var. lanuginosa (S.Watson) Rollins
Polygonum coccineum var. coccineum
Polygonum arenicola Suksd.
Porterella Torr.
Prunella vulgaris var. calvescens Fernald
Prunus jamasakura (Makino) Siebold ex Koidz.
Rhododendron lapponicum (L.) Wahlenb.
Rhododendron sororium Sleumer
Rhododendron rugosum var. coriifolium (Sleumer) Sleumer
Ribes velutinum var. gooddingii (M.Peck) C.L.Hitchc.
Saxifraga idahoensis Piper
Saxifraga integrifolia var. apetala (Piper) M.E.Jones
Saxifraga notkana Moc. ex Ser.
Schoenocrambe linifolia var. pinnata (Greene) A.Nelson
Secale montanum Guss.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. elegans (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Silene multicaulis Nutt.
Sorbus hybrida (L.) L.
Urtica dioica var. californica (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Verbascum pulverulentum Vill.
Acer negundo subsp. negundo
Allocarya stipitata Greene
Amelanchier elliptica A.Nelson
Aquilegia columbiana Rydb.
Arenaria formosa (Fisch.) Regel
Artemisia arbuscula var. nova (A.Nelson) Cronquist
Aster multiflorus Dryand. ex Aiton
Brassica rapa subsp. olifera DC.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus var. graveolens (Nutt.) Piper
Coleosanthus oblongifolius (Nutt.) Kuntze
Epipactis decipiens (Hook.) Ames
Eritrichium nanum Schrad., 1819
Galium aparine var. vaillantii (DC.) W.D.J.Koch
Gilia congesta var. viridis Cronquist
Holodiscus discolor var. ariaefolius (Sm.) Asch. & Graebn.
Juncus alpinus var. insignis Fr.
Kalmia polifolia var. microphylla (Hook.) H.M.Hall
Lactuca canadensis var. latifolia Kuntze
Lonicera bracteata Royle
Oenothera scapoidea var. seorsa (A.Nelson) Munz
Nuphar variegata Engelm.
Orobanche multiflora var. arenosa (Suksd.) Munz
Potentilla nuttallii Lehm.
Pyrus fusca Raf.
Pyrola grandiflora Radius
Rhododendron leptothrium Balf.fil. & Forrest
Rhododendron javanicum (Blume) Benn.
Sambucus nigra f. nigra
Saxifraga ranunculifolia Hook.
Senecio exaltatus Nutt.
Silene columbiana Howell
Symphoricarpos albus f. laevigatus (Fernald) G.N.Jones
Vaccinium caespitosum var. cuneifolium Nutt.
Agropyron divergens Nees ex Steud., 1854
Agrostis inflata Scribn.
Allocarya scouleri (Hook. & Arn.) Greene
Antennaria imbricata E.E.Nelson
Aruncus vulgaris Kostel.
Astragalus alpinus subsp. alpinus
Brunella vulgaris Greene
Carex atrata var. atrosquama (Mack.) Cronquist
Chenopodium leptophyllum subsp. leptophyllum
Deschampsia caespitosa var. maritima Vasey
Epilobium rubescens Rydb.
Erigeron annuus f. annuus
Gilia aggregata var. attenuata A.Gray
Glossopetalon nevadense var. stipuliferum (H.St.John) C.L.Hitchc.
Gnaphalium purpureum subsp. purpureum
Grindelia acutifolia Steyerm.
Halimolobos perplexa var. lemhiensis C.L.Hitchc.
Haplopappus hirtus subsp. hirtus
Haplopappus uniflorus subsp. typicus H.M.Hall, 1928
Hieracium lachenalii C.C.Gmel.
Ledum latifolium Jacq.
Lepidium pubecarpum A.Nelson
Lilaea subulata Humb. & Bonpl.
Lolium perenne var. cristatum Pers.
Lotus oblongifolius var. torreyi Ottley
Ononis repens L.
Ophrys cordata L.
Onobrychis sativa Lam.
Panicum acuminatum var. lindheimeri (Nash) Lelong
Potentilla viscosa Steud., 1821
Ranunculus aquatilis var. porteri (Britton) L.D.Benson
Rhododendron polyanthemum Sleumer
Salix flavescens var. scouleriana (Barratt) Bebb
Sieversia campanulata (Greene) Rydb.
Sisyrinchium inflatum (Suksd.) H.St.John
Spergularia canadensis subsp. occidentalis (R.Rossbach) A.Haines
Spiraea hendersonii (Canby) Piper
Statice arctica (Cham.) Blake
Streptopus roseus var. curvipes (Vail) Fassett
Thalictrum occidentale var. columbianum (Rydb.) M.Peck
Anaphalis margaritacea (L.) A.Gray, 1873
Anthriscus vulgaris Pers.
Arabis lyrata var. kamchatica Fisch. ex DC.
Artemisia vulgaris var. ludoviciana (Nutt.) Kuntze
Draba verna var. major Stur
Gilia spicata var. orchidacea (Brand) Cronquist
Hieracium gracile subsp. gracile
Microseris alpestris (A.Gray) Q.Jones
Navarretia leucocephala subsp. diffusa Björk
Naumburgia thyrsiflora (L.) Duby
Penstemon menziesii f. davidsonii (Greene) G.N.Jones
Prunus domestica var. insititia (L.) Fiori & Paol.
Puccinellia distans subsp. distans
Rhododendron pendulum Hook.fil.
Rhododendron tashiroi Maxim.
Rhododendron culminicolum var. angiense (J.J.Sm.) Sleumer
Rhododendron loranthiflorum Sleumer
Saxifraga cespitosa subsp. subgemmifera Engl. & Irmsch.
Senecio fastigiatus Nutt.
Senecio websteri Greenm.
Sidalcea neomexicana var. crenulata (A.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Sisymbrium incisum Engelm.
Spergularia bocconei Foucaud
Thalictrum clavatum DC.
Tissa rubra (L.) Britton
Calypso bulbosa f. occidentalis Holz.
Chrysopsis hispida (Hook.) DC.
Clarkia amoena var. lindleyi (Douglas) C.L.Hitchc.
Crepis exilis Osterh.
Delphinium nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Delphinium lineapetalum subsp. klickitatense Ewan
Drymocallis oregana (Nutt.) Rydb.
Epilobium paniculatum var. tracyi (Rydb.) Munz
Festuca octoflora subsp. octoflora
Grindelia stricta var. lanata (Greene) Steyerm.
Godetia amoena var. gracilis (Piper) C.L.Hitchc.
Lappula ciliata (Douglas ex Lehm.) Greene
Leptaxis menziesii (Pursh) Raf.
Lupinus perennis var. latifolius (J.Agardh) L.Ll.Phillips
Lysiella obtusata (Banks ex Pursh) Rydb.
Malus prunifolia var. rinki (Koidz.) Rehder
Micrampelis oregana (Torrey & S.Watson) Greene
Najas guadalupensis Morong
Oenothera contorta Bol.
Penstemon fruticosus var. crassifolius (Lindl.) Krautter
Polemonium haydenii A.Nelson
Ranunculus reptans var. strigulosus Freyn
Rhododendron kongboense L.N.Rothsch.
Rhododendron nipponicum Matsum.
Rhododendron semibarbatum Maxim.
Rhododendron suaveolens Sleumer
Sanguisorba microcephala C.Presl
Stenotus caespitosus (Nutt.) Nutt.
Thalictrum confine var. columbianum (Rydb.) B.Boivin
Troximon glaucum Pursh
Vaccinium alaskense Howell
Agoseris gracilens (A.Gray) Greene, 1891
Alopecurus aristulatus Michx.
Astragalus aculeatus A.Nelson
Brodiaea leachiae M.Peck
Calystegia sepium f. colorata
Carex egregia Mack.
Castilleja angustifolia subsp. bradburii (Nutt.) Piper & Beattie
Cirsium arvense var. arvense
Deweya Torr. & A.Gray
Erechtites hieracifolia (L.) Raf.
Frasera idahoensis (H.St.John)
Franseria chamissonis subsp. chamissonis
Gilia heterophylla (Hook.) Douglas
Gilia pungens var. hookeri (Douglas ex Hook.) A.Gray
Haplopappus integrifolius subsp. liatriformis (Greene) H.M.Hall
Lathyrus palustris var. pilosus (Cham.) Ledeb.
Montia minor C.C.Gmel.
Myosotis versicolor Sm.
Oenothera claviformis subsp. citrina P.H.Raven
Plantago juncoides var. typica Fernald
Polemonium carneum subsp. amoenum (Piper) Brand
Ranunculus aquatilis var. drouetii (F.W.Schultz ex Godr.) G.Lawson
Rhododendron konori Becc.
Rhododendron siderophyllum Franch.
Rhododendron xanthostephanum Merr.
Rhododendron williamsii Merr. ex H.F.Copel.
Rumex salicifolius subsp. angustivalvis Danser, 1926
Senecio howellii Greene
Solidago vespertina Piper
Solidago lepida var. caurina (Piper) M.Peck
Vaccinium oxycoccus subsp. oxycoccus
Verbascum densiflorum Bertol.
Viola linguifolia Nutt.
Agoseris pumila (Nutt.) Rydb.
Arctostaphylos columbiana var. tracyi Eastwood
Arenaria peploides var. major Hook.
Aster chilensis subsp. chilensis
Astragalus reventus var. reventus
Brassica rapa subsp. rapa
Claytonia flava A.Nelson
Cotoneaster perpusillus (C.K.Schneid.) Flinck & Hylmö
Echinospermum ciliatum (Douglas ex Lehm.) A.Gray
Elodea planchonii Casp.
Elymus giganteus Vahl
Erigeron chrysopsidis var. austinae (Greene) Cronquist
Erigeron scaposus DC.
Eriogonum ovalifolium var. proliferum (Torr. & A.Gray) S.Watson
Erodium pimpinellifolium Willd., 1800
Gilia floccosa A.Gray
Montia hallii (Gray) Greene
Nasturtium palustre (L.) DC.
Pachylophus eximius (A.Gray) Wooton & Standl.
Philadelphus confusus Piper
Physaria didymocarpa subsp. lyrata (C.L.Hitchc.) O'Kane
Polygonum coccineum var. terrestre (Willd.) Willd.
Radicula curvisiliqua (Hook.) Greene
Rhododendron smirnowii Trautv.
Rhododendron emarginatum Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Rhododendron laetum J.J.Sm.
Salix brachycarpa var. sansonii C.R.Ball
Salix subcaerulea Piper
Saxifraga integrifolia Schleich. ex Engl.
Tragopogon miscellus Ownbey
Tithymalus altus (Norton) Wooton & Standl.
Gilia eremica (Jeps.) T.T.Craig
Tephroseris tundricola (Tolm.) Holub
Thelypodiopsis argillacea S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Adenolinum perenne (L.) Rchb.
Crassula saginoides (Maxim.) M.Bywater & Wickens
Trichostema purpusii Brandegee
Perideridia erythrorhiza (Piper) T.I.Chuang & Constance
Festulolium Asch. & Graebn.
Sagittaria latifolia var. obtusa (Engelm.) Wiegand
Hosackia stipularis var. ottleyi (Isely) Brouillet
Eriogonum prociduum var. prociduum
Crataegus tenuior J.B.Phipps
Aira elegans Willd. ex Gaudin
Pennisetum villosum R.Br.
Euphrasia stricta D.Wolff ex J.F.Lehm.
Eleocharis engelmannii f. engelmannii
Festuca pringlei St.-Yves
Gamochaeta argyrinea G.L.Nesom
Elatine americana (Pursh) Arn.
Tofieldia glutinosa subsp. brevistyla C.L.Hitchc.
Lomatium plummerae var. sonnei (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Jeps.
Boechera breweri var. shastaensis Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Rudbeckia californica var. intermedia Perdue
Lupinus bicolor var. tridentalis (Eastw. ex C.P.Sm.) D.B.Dunn
Brodiaea rosea subsp. vallicola R.E.Preston
Abelia chinensis R.Br.
Olsynium Raf.
Sidalcea celata (Jeps.) S.R.Hill
Micranthes fallax (Greene) Small
Eragrostis curvala (Schrad.) Nees
Polanisia dodecandra subsp. dodecandra
Hosackia nevadensis (S.Watson) Parish
Lathyrus lanszwertii var. tracyi (Bradshaw) Isely
Galium ambiguum var. ambiguum
Eastwoodia Brandegee
Lathyrus sulphureus var. argillaceus Jeps.
Centaurium tenuifolium (M.Martens & Galeotti) Rob.
Sidalcea malviflora subsp. rostrata (Eastw.) Wiggins
Lessingia ramulosa var. adenophora (Greene) A.Gray
Fritillaria affinis var. tristulis (A.L.Grant) B.Ness
Gastridium phleoides Nees & Meyen
Lathyrus pauciflorus subsp. pauciflorus
Forsythia Vahl
Horkelia daucifolia var. indicta (Jeps.) Ertter & Reveal
Carex aquatilis var. minor Boott
Dodecatheon clevelandii subsp. patulum (Kuntze) Reveal
Acacia arabica (Lam.) Willd.
Parentucellia Viv.
Cordylanthus pilosus var. tenuis (A.Gray) Jeps.
Nassella manicata (É.Desv.) Barkworth
Crassula obtusa Haw.
Aster elatus (Greene) Cronquist
Helminthotheca echioides Linnaeus, 1753
Jatropha paradoxa (Chiov.) Chiov.
Jatropha capensis (L.f.) Sond.
Geranium marginale Rydb. ex Hanks & Small
Leptochloa fusca subsp. fusca
Artemisia sacrorum Ledeb.
Lolium temulentum var. leptochaeton A.Braun
Eryngium vaseyi var. vallicola (Jeps.) Munz
Polygonum patulum M.Bieb.
Actinella acaulis (Pursh) Nutt.
Lopinus
Viola priceana Pollard
Lithophragma tripartita (Greene) Greene
Jatropha hernandiifolia Vent.
Brachyglottis greyi (Hook.fil.) B.Nord.
Downingia willamettensis M.Peck
Morella rubra Lour.
Darlingtonia Torr.
Hypericum ascyron L.
Eupatorium coelestinum L.
Philadelphus grandiflorus Willd.
Distylium Siebold & Zucc.
Asclepias vestita var. parishii Jeps.
Galium parisiense subsp. parisiense
Lomatium ravenii var. ravenii
Trifolium alexandrinum var. alexandrinum
Prunus velutina Batalin
Datura arborea L.
Nicotiana suaveolens Lehm.
Helminthotheca Zinn
Pistacia mexicana Kunth
Astragalus whitneyi subsp. siskiyouensis (Rydb.) Abrams
Eriophyllum stoechadifolium var. stoechadifolium
Chamerion (Raf.) Raf.
Panicum dilatatum Steud.
Hemizonia minima A.Gray
Boechera saximontana (Rollins) Windham & Al-Shehbaz
Gratiola L.
Cercocarpus betuloides subsp. macrourus (Rydb.) A.E.Murray
Erigeron eatonii subsp. villosus Cronquist
Centromadia pungens subsp. septentrionalis (D.D.Keck) B.G.Baldwin
Hypericum hookerianum Wight & Arn.
Sagittaria graminea var. graminea
Raillardella scaposa var. scaposa
Dasiphora Raf.
Tilia rubra subsp. caucasica (Rupr.) V.Engl.
Vachellia caven (Molina) Seigler & Ebinger
Viola purpurea var. dimorpha (Baker & Clausen) J.T.Howell
Halesia monticola (Rehder) Sarg.
Carex muskingumensis Schwein.
Erigeron reductus var. reductus
Penstemon acuminatus var. latibracteatus N.H.Holmgren
Dichelostemma capitatum subsp. lacuna-vernalis (L.W.Lenz) D.W.Taylor
Cuscuta salina var. papillata Yunck.
Cardamine nuttallii var. dissecta (O.E.Schulz) Rollins
Erodiophyllum F.Muell.
Diplacus rutilus (A.L.Grant) Mc Minn
Glinus L.
Monardella antonina subsp. benitensis (Hardham) Jokerst
Vicia varia Host
Crepis modocensis var. subacaulis (Kellogg) M.Peck
Ceanothus prostratus var. laxus Jeps.
Acuba Link, 1822
Dicentra peregrina (Rudolph) Makino
Amoseris
Chloris pycnothrix Trin.
Melica bulbosa var. inflata (Bol.) Boyle
Calystegia fulcrata subsp. malacophylla (Greene) Brummitt
Lemna triscula L.
Phleum abbreviatum (Boiss.) Rivas Mart., A.Asensi, Molero Mesa & F.Valle
Brunfelsia calycina var. floribunda L.H.Bailey & Raffill
Alopecuropsis Opiz
Abelia R.Br.
Poterium L.
Triteleia ixioides var. scabra (Greene) Hoover
Myrtus communis var. microphylla Willk. & Lange
Leptospermum scoparium var. nichollsii (Dorr.Sm.) Ewart
Isomeris aborea Nutt.
Hieracium souliei Arv.-Touv. & Gaut.
Sedum spathulifolium subsp. purdyi (Jeps.) Clausen
Cercis canadensis var. orbiculata (Greene) Barneby
Hibiscus militaris Cav.
Hosackia yollabolliensis (Munz) D.D.Sokoloff
Scandix L.
Freesia Eckl. ex Klatt
Ulmus carpinifolia Gled.
Persea americana f. americana
Lupinus regius Rudolph ex Torr. & A.Gray
Brassica oleracea var. gemmifera DC.
Pectiantia pentrandra (Hooker) Rydberg
Eriogonum spectabile B.L.Corbin, Reveal & R.Barron
Eleocharis flavescens var. flavescens
Limosella australis R.Br.
Potamogetonaceae
Sparaxis Ker Gawl.
Beilschmiedia berteroana (Gay) Kosterm.
Berberis bealei Fortune
Forsythia suspensa var. fortunei (Lindl.) Rehder
Cornus florida var. rubra Weston
Azalea indica L.
Rhododendron ×morelianum Lem.
Laburnum waterii Dippel
Ranunculus bonariensis subsp. trisepalus (Gill. ex Hook. & Arn.) Molero
Coreopsis tinctoria subsp. atkinsoniana (Douglas ex Lindl.) H.M.Parker
Spondias dulcis Parkinson
Danthonia unispicata (Thurb.) Munro ex Vasey, 1885
Bromus bromoideus (Lej.) Crép.
Lappula redowskii f. cupulata (A.Gray) Scoggan
Sidalcea setosa C.L.Hitchc.
Arum L.
Cryptantha subretusa I.M.Johnst.
Psilocarphus oreganus Nutt., 1841
Eriobotrya Lindl.
Festuca multiflora Walter
Eugenia mirtiflora Rojas Acosta
Lessingia occidentalis (H.M.Hall) M.A.Lane
Arbutus canariensis Duhamel
Lindernia dubia subsp. anagallidea (L.) Pennell
Listera banksiana Lindl.
Centaurea iberica Trevis.
Pistacia integerrima J.L.Stewart
Pistacia mutica Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Abelia schumannii (Graebn.) Rehder
Zygocactus truncatus (Haw.) K.Schum.
Viburnum nudum L.
Yucca whipplei var. percursa (A.L.Haines) J.M.Webber
Pterodon abruptus (Moric.) Benth.
Epistephium lucidum Cogn.
Carex muricata subsp. muricata
Diosma ericoides Sims
Dactylis glomerata subsp. judaica Stebbins & D.Zohary
Hibiscus moscheutos subsp. moscheutos
Carex macloviana var. macloviana
Anigozanthos flavidus DC.
Ruppia spiralis Dumort.
Crupina vulgaris var. brachypappa P.Beauv.
Hieracium glomeratum (Fr.) N.P., 1885
Crepis rubra L.
Euphorbia polycarpa var. genuflexa L.C.Wheeler
Tomostima sonorae (Greene) Al-Shehbaz, M.Koch & Jordan-Thaden
Mammillaria compressa DC.
Potamogeton montezumawellensis Ricketson, G.M.Ricketson & Greenawalt
Escobaria sneedii var. orcuttii (Boed.) Gorelick
Piptatheropsis pungens (Torr. ex Spreng.) Romasch., P.M.Peterson & Soreng
Lonicera ligustrina Wall.
Viola umbraticola var. glaberrima Becker
Echinocereus stramineus Engelm. ex Rümpler
Ligustrum vicaryi Rehder
Pittosporum pentandrum (Blanco) Merr.
Heptapleurum calyptratum (Hook.f. & Thomson) Y.F.Deng
Myosotis sylvatica subsp. sylvatica
Fragaria vesca subsp. vesca
Tradescantia zanonia (L.) Sw.
Leucophyllum violaceum Pennell
Potentilla monspeliensis Gueldenst.
Mimulus guttatus Fisch.
Delphinium freynii Conrath
Potentilla arguta Porter & J.M.Coult.
Mertensia humilis Rydb.
Ribes viscosum Ruiz & Pav.
Lotus mearnsii (Britton) Britton
Richardia L.
Sporobolus cuspidatus (Torr. ex Hook.) Alph.Wood
Polemonium confertum A.Gray
Asclepias viridis Walter
Escobaria vivipara var. neomexicana (Engelm.) Buxb.
Chylismia atwoodii (Cronquist) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Agave microceps (Kimnach) A.Vázquez & Cházaro
Tara spinosa (Molina) Britton & Rose
Chenopodiastrum simplex (Torr.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Tofieldia pusilla (Michx.) Pers.
Nothofagus cliffortioides (Hook.f.) Oerst.
Argyreia nervosa (Burm.fil.) Bojer
Eupatorium capillifolium (Lam.) Small
Cotoneaster glaucophyllus Franch.
Atriplex canescens Nutt.
Sagittaria sagittifolia L.
Rhynchosia senna Gillies
Acacia neovernicosa Isley
Centaurea purpurea Bellardi ex Colla
Clerodendrum coulteri (A.Gray) Govaerts
Eragrostis hirticaulis Lazarides
Paspalum minus E.Fourn.
Porana nutans (Choisy) O'Donell
Erysimum arkansanum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Navarretia virgata var. sapphirina (Eastw.) Brand
Eriogonum parvifolium var. crassifolium Benth.
Phlox carolina L.
Paspalum lentiferum Lam.
Stelis purpurascens A.Rich. & Galeotti
Amaranthus cannabinus (L.) Sauer
Erysimum nivale (Greene) Rydb.
Cirsium drummondii subsp. vexans Petr.
Spigelia gentianoides Chapm. ex A.DC.
Navarretia hirsutissima Brand
Delphinium bicolor var. montanense Rydb.
Aster ensatus Greene
Eriogonum flavum var. polyphyllum (Small) M.E.Jones
Callisia rosea (Vent.) D.R.Hunt
Lupinus microcarpus var. ruber (A.Heller) C.P.Sm.
Stipa comata subsp. intonsa Piper
Erysimum oblanceolatum Rydb.
Navarretia virgata subsp. floccosa (Milliken) Brand
Navarretia virgata var. dasyantha Brand
Arundinella robusta E.Fourn.
Erysimum californicum Greene
Kosteletzkya pentacarpos (L.) Ledeb.
Malvastrum aurantiacum (Scheele) Walp.
Polygala ovatifolia A.Gray
Cypripedium reginae Walter
Dichaea neglecta Schltr.
Peltandra virginica Raf.
Navarretia densifolia var. lanata Brand
Nasturtium columbiae (Suksd. ex B.L.Rob.) Suksd.
Salvia texana var. canescens A.Gray
Aster diabolicus Piper
Haplopappus occidentalis H.M.Hall
Callirhoe digitata Nutt.
Hypericum denticulatum Walter
Aster eriocaulis Rydb.
Haplopappus graniticus Tiehm & L.M.Shultz
Bejaria racemosa Vent.
Chamaecrista fasciculata (Michx.) Greene
Eriogonum brevicaule var. wasatchense (M.E.Jones) Reveal
Stachys ramosa A.Heller
Cayaponia boykinii (Torr. & A.Gray) Cogn.
Oryzopsis bloomeri (Bol.) Ricker
Spigelia texana (Torr. & Gray) A.DC.
Saxifraga taylori Calder & Savile
Stachys viarum A.Heller
Clethra alnifolia var. pubescens Aiton
Aster delectus Piper
Piptothrix arizonica Nelson
Harbouria trachypleura (A.Gray) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Colubrina texensis (Torr. & A.Gray) Gray
Symphyotrichum sericeum (Vent.) G.L.Nesom
Chaptalia tomentosa Vent.
Muhlenbergia sylvatica var. californica Vasey
Hyptis collina Brandegee
Stillingia gymnogyna Pax & K.Hoffm.
Carex alopecoidea Tuck.
Pherotrichis schaffneri A.Gray
Castilleja tenuiflora var. xylorrhiza (Eastw.) G.L.Nesom
Oxytheca parishii var. abramsii (E.A.Mc Gregor) Munz
Monardella pallida A.Heller
Stachys limitanea A.Nelson
Ratibida pinnata (Vent.) Barnhart
Portulaca granulatostellulata (Poelln.) Ricceri & Arrigoni
Grimaldia californica St.
Gaura filipes Spach
Stachys lindenii Benth.
Smilax hispida Muhl. ex Torr.
Oxalis dichondrifolia A.Gray
Tilia leptophylla (Vent.) Small
Erysimum greenei Polatschek
Anemopsis bolanderi C.DC.
Smilax ecirrhata (Engelm. ex Kunth) S.Watson
Cynapium apiifolium Nutt. ex Torr. & Gray
Tellima parviflora Hook.
Eriogonum abramsii subsp. acanthoscyphus S.Stokes
Erysimum canadense Polatschek
Cirsium drummondii var. oregonense Petr.
Lycopus sherardii Steele
Cassine xylocarpa Vent.
Potamogeton subobtusus Hagstr.
Chenopodium boscianum Moq.
Brittonastrum breviflorum (A.Gray) Briq.
Malvastrum corchorifolium (Desr.) Britton ex Small
Quercus vaseyana Buckley
Montia spathulata var. tenuifolia (Torr. & A.Gray) Munz
Aconitum leibergii Greene
Claytonia spathulata var. rosulata (Eastw.) McNeill
Orobanche californica var. corymbosa (Rydb.) Munz
Claytonia tenuifolia (Phil.) Kuntze
Epilobium adenocaulon var. occidentale Trel.
Astragalus antisellii A.Gray
Polygonum confertiflorum Nutt. ex Piper
Prunella vulgaris var. elongata Benth.
Bensoniella oregana (Abrams & Bacig.) C.V.Morton
Halimolobos diffusa var. jaegeri (Munz) Rollins
Thlaspi fendleri var. hesperium (Payson) C.L.Hitchc.
Geum canescens (Greene) Munz
Pyrola dentata var. integra A.Gray
Cordylanthus viscidus (Howell) Pennell ex M.Peck
Haplopappus ophitidus (J.T.Howell) D.D.Keck
Hypochoeris radicata L.
Erigeron delicatus Cronquist
Machaeranthera shastensis var. eradiata (A.Gray) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Sedum laxum subsp. retusum (Rose) R.T.Clausen
Juncus longistylus Torr.
Aster brickellioides var. glabratus Greene
Lesquerella occidentalis subsp. diversifolia (Greene) Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Cordylanthus ferrisianus Pennell
Aster chilensis var. invenustus (Greene) Jeps.
Oenothera hookeri subsp. hewettii Cockerell
Piperia elongata subsp. michaelii (Greene) Ackerman
Dentaria gemmata (Greene) T.J.Howell
Agropyron dasystachyum (Hook.) Vasey
Chrysopsis oregona var. rudis (Greene) Jeps.
Trifolium pygmaeum (A.Gray) J.M.Gillett
Perityle dissecta (Torr.) A.Gray
Vulpia reflexa (Buckley) Rydb.
Montia perfoliata f. parviflora (Douglas) J.T.Howell
Arenaria jamesiana (Torr.) Shinners
Viola lobata var. psychodes (Greene) J.T.Howell
Rosa spithamea var. sonomensis (Greene) Jeps.
Eleocharis pauciflora var. suksdorfiana (Beauverd) Svenson
Viola adunca var. oxyceras (S.Watson) Jeps.
Eleocharis montevidensis var. decumbens (C.B.Clarke) V.E.Grant
Heuchera pringlei Rydb.
Draba howellii var. howellii
Lilium washingtonianum var. purpurascens Stearn
Erigeron flexuosus Cronquist
Carex vicaria L.H.Bailey
Trifolium longipes var. atrorubens (Greene) Jeps.
Boisduvalia glabella var. campestris (Jeps.) Jeps.
Dentaria tenella var. palmata Detling
Cordylanthus pilosus subsp. diffusus (Pennell) Munz
Zauschneria septentrionalis D.D.Keck
Calystegia fulcrata subsp. pedicellata (Jeps.) Brummitt
Brodiaea coronaria var. macropoda (Torr.) Hoover
Montia spathulata var. exigua (Torr. & A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Cyperus unifolius Boeckeler
Filago germanica (L.) Huds.
Potentilla klamathensis Rydb.
Epilobium canum subsp. septentrionale (D.D.Keck) P.H.Raven
Arnica chamissonis var. incana (A.Gray) S.L.Welsh
Orobanche uniflora var. sedi (Suksd.) Achey
Poa fibrata Swallen
Convolvulus occidentalis var. purpuratus (Greene) J.T.Howell
Arctostaphylos mariposa var. bivisa Jeps.
Orobanche grayana Beck
Thlaspi montanum var. californicum (S.Watson) P.K.Holmgren
Castilleja longispica A.Nelson
Cordylanthus mollis A.Gray
Silene hookeri subsp. pulverulenta (M.Peck) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Antirrhinum breweri A.Gray
Plantago major var. pilgeri Domin
Penstemon newberryi subsp. sonomensis (Greene) D.D.Keck
Linanthus bakeri Mason
Achillea borealis subsp. californica (Pollard) D.D.Keck
Orobanche grayana var. nelsonii Munz
Bothriochloa saccharoides var. torreyana (Steud.) Gould
Haplopappus carthamoides subsp. cusickii (A.Gray) H.M.Hall
Anemone quinquefolia var. minor (Eastw.) Munz
Disporum parvifolium (S.Watson) Britton
Atriplex johnsonii C.B.Wolf
Arabis divaricarpa var. interposita (Greene) Rollins
Aconitum hansenii Greene
Puccinellia erecta (Hitchc.) Munz
Betula platyphylla var. japonica (Miq.) H.Hara
Plectritis samolifolia var. involuta (Suksd.) Dyal
Grindelia hirsutula subsp. rubricaulis (DC.) D.D.Keck
Rumex orbiculatus A.Gray
Lotus balsamiferus (Kellogg) Greene
Arabis serpentinicola Rollins
Piptochaetium J.Presl
Lotus purshianus var. glaber (Nutt.) Munz
Sedum laxum subsp. eastwoodiae (Britton) Clausen
Delphinium variegatum f. emiliae (Greene) Ewan
Machaeranthera shastensis var. montana (Greene) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
×Stiporyzopsis B.L.Johnson & Rogler
Luzula spadicea (All.) DC.
Claytonia spathulata var. exigua (Torr. & A.Gray) Hook. & Arn.
Sambucus racemosa subsp. pubens (Michx.) Hultén
Brodiaea douglasii var. howellii (S.Watson) M.Peck
Chrysopsis villosa var. bolanderi (A.Gray) A.Gray
Rubus thyrsiflorus P.J.Müll.
Eriogonum umbellatum var. devestivum Reveal
Lewisia pygmaea subsp. longipetala (Piper) Ferris
Cymopterus humboldtensis M.E.Jones
Myrica faya (Dryand.) Aiton
Silene nuda subsp. insectivora (L.F.Hend.) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Orobanche grayana var. violacea (Eastw.) Munz
Galium parisiense var. anglicum (Huds.) Beck
Nepeta hederacea (L.) Trevis.
Streptanthus glandulosus var. sonomensis Kruckeb.
Forsellesia stipulifera (H.St.John) Ensign
Fritillaria phaeanthera Purdy
Plectritis californica var. rubens (Suksd.) Dyal
Sedum laxum subsp. perplexum Clausen
Cordylanthus capillaris Pennell
Thalictrum alpinum var. hebetum B.Boivin
Penstemon francisci-pennellii Crosswh.
Sorbus cascadensis G.N.Jones
Cyperus niger var. rivularis (Kunth) V.E.Grant
Monardella villosa subsp. neglecta (Greene) Epling
Heterotheca breweri (A.Gray) Shinners
Talinum brevifolium Torr.
Solanum cornutum Lam.
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. covillei (Small) Munz
Calamagrostis canadensis var. acuminata Vasey ex Shear & Rydb.
Ribes nevadense var. glaucescens (Eastw.) Berger
Plectritis magna (Greene) Suksd.
Cirsium douglasii var. canescens (Petr.) J.T.Howell
Hypochoeris L., 1754
Dentaria californica var. cardiophylla (Greene) Detling
Streptanthus breweri var. hesperidis (Jeps.) Jeps.
Epilobium obcordatum var. laxum (Hausskn.) Dempster ex Jeps.
Aconitum geranioides Greene
Stipa lemmonii var. pubescens Crampton
Brodiaea californica var. leptandra (Greene) Hoover
Mimulus acutidens Greene
Limnanthes floccosa subsp. bellingeriana (M.Peck) Arroyo
Silene bernardina subsp. maguirei Bocquet
Lepidium nitidum var. insigne Greene
Montia perfoliata f. glauca (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Rosa pisocarpa var. rivalis (Eastw.) Jeps.
Castilleja stenantha subsp. spiralis (Jeps.) Munz
Dubautia scabra (DC.) D.D.Keck
Epilobium adenocaulon var. holosericeum (Trel.) Munz
Oenothera hookeri subsp. montereyensis Munz
Silene marmorensis Kruckeb.
Spergularia marina var. tenuis (Greene) R.Rossbach
Rhynchospora glomerata var. capitellata (Michx.) Kük.
Lupinus tidestromii var. layneae (Eastw.) Munz
Hibiscus californicus Kellogg
Vitis arizonica var. glabra Munson
Bromus marginatus var. seminudus Shear
Opuntia whipplei var. multigeniculata (Clokey) L.D.Benson
Pyrus melanocarpa (Michx.) Willd.
Epilobium brevistylum var. ursinum (Parish) Jeps.
Luzula multiflora var. comosa (E.Mey.) H.St.John
Carya laciniosa (Michx.f.) G.Don
Carex scopulorum var. chimaphila (Holm) Kük.
Haplopappus peirsonii (D.D.Keck) J.T.Howell
Silene scouleri var. concolor (Greene) C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Torreyochloa pauciflora var. holmii (Beal) B.Boivin
Lagophylla glandulosa subsp. serrata (Greene) D.D.Keck
Erysimum argillosum (Greene) Rydb.
Lesquerella kingii var. cordiformis (Rollins) Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Hemizonia lutescens (Greene) D.D.Keck
Carex heteroneura var. brevisquama F.J.Herm.
Geum perincisum Rydb.
Arctostaphylos intricata var. oblongifolia (Howell) Munz
Oenothera graciliflora Hook. & Arn.
Ayenia californica Jeps.
Brodiaea peduncularis (Lindl.) S.Watson
Convolvulus occidentalis var. solanensis (Jeps.) J.T.Howell
Horkelia daucifolia subsp. latior D.D.Keck
Quercus kelloggii f. cibata Jeps., 1910
Agrostis filicumis M.E.Jones
Grindelia fraxinopratensis Reveal & Beatley
Orthocarpus lithospermoides var. bicolor (A.Heller) Jeps.
Polygala piliophora S.F.Blake
Hastingsia atropurpurea Becking
Limnanthus douglasii
Eupatorium shastense Taylor & Stebbins
Carya illinoensis (Wangenh.) K.Koch
Fremontodendron californicum subsp. crassifolium (Eastw.) J.H.Thomas
Atriplex patula subsp. spicata H.M.Hall & Clem.
Myosurus minimus var. sessiliflorus (Huth) G.R.Campb.
Mentha arvensis subsp. haplocalyx (Briq.) Briq.
Navarretia bakeri Mason
Ayenia ardua Cristóbal
Ceratoides lanata var. subspinosa (Rydb.) J.T.Howell
Tamarix tetrandra Pall.
Echinodorus berteroi var. lanceolatus (Engelm. ex S.Watson & Coult.) Fernald
Cirsium muticum Michx.
Arenaria kingii var. uintahensis (A.Nelson) C.L.Hitchc.
Mimulus discolor A.L.Grant
Stylocline amphibola (A.Gray) Howell
Quercus mohriana Buckley ex Rydb.
Oryzopsis hymenoides var. contracta B.L.Johnson
Epilobium pringleanum var. tenue (Trel.) Munz
Lithophragma breviloba Rydb.
Haplopappus racemosus subsp. glomeratus (Nutt.) H.M.Hall
Rhamnus californica subsp. cuspidata (Greene) C.B.Wolf
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. tomentellum (Greene) B.Boivin
Teucrium canadense var. angustatum A.Gray
Pleurocoronis R.King & H.Rob.
Arabis breweri var. austinae (Greene) Rollins
Arnica tomentella Greene
Mimulus floribundus var. subulatus A.L.Grant
Evax sparsiflora var. brevifolia (A.Gray) Jeps.
Lessingia germanorum var. tenuis (A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Agrostis exigua Thurb.
Horkelia frondosa (Greene) Rydb.
Dyssodia belenidium DC.
Machaeranthera shastensis var. glossophylla (Piper) Cronquist & D.D.Keck
Fritillaria lanceolata var. gracilis S.Watson
Antirrhinum cornutum var. leptaleum (A.Gray) Munz
Laburnum alpinum (Mill.) Bercht. & J.Presl
Gayophytum intermedium Rydb.
Opuntia littoralis var. martiniana (L.D.Benson) L.D.Benson
Fraxinus oregana Nuttall
Mimulus rattanii subsp. decurtatus (A.L.Grant) Pennell
Rumex acetosella subsp. angiocarpus (Murb.) Murb.
Castilleja integra var. gloriosa (Britton) Cockerell
Cordylanthus littoralis (Ferris) J.F.Macbr.
Linanthus ciliatus var. neglectus (Greene) Jeps.
Vicia angustifolia var. segetalis (Thuill.) W.D.J.Koch
Castilleja arachnoidea subsp. shastensis (Eastw.) Pennell
Haplopappus croceus var. genuflexus (Greene) S.F.Blake
Epilobium watsonii var. franciscanum (Barbey) Jeps.
Geranium glabratum (Hook.f.) Small
Erythronium cliftonii Hemphill
Dentaria tenella var. pulcherrima (Greene) Detling
Juncus nodosus var. meridianus F.J.Herm.
Anthriscus neglecta var. scandix (Scop.) Hyl.
Saxifraga punctata var. cascadensis (Calder & Savile) C.L.Hitchc.
Watsonia beatricis J.W.Mathews & L.Bolus
Zigadenus fremontii var. salsus Jeps.
Githopsis calycina Benth.
Haplopappus lanceolatus var. tenuicaulis (D.C.Eaton ex S.Watson) A.Gray
Grindelia robusta var. bracteosa (J.T.Howell) D.D.Keck
Achillea lanulosa subsp. alpicola (Rydb.) D.D.Keck
Caltha leptosepala var. rotundifolia Huth
Diplachne dubia (Kunth) Scribn.
Delphinium parryi subsp. blochmanae (Greene) F.H.Lewis & Epling, 1954
Myosurus minimus subsp. major (Greene) G.R.Campb.
Oenothera longissima subsp. clutei (A.Nelson) Munz
Philadelphus stramineus Rydb.
Hieracium cynoglossoides var. nudicaule Gray
Oenothera micrantha var. jonesii (Lév.) Munz
Limnanthes floccosa subsp. grandiflora Arroyo
Downingia humilis (Greene) Rattan
Phlox hoodii subsp. lanata (Piper) Munz
Sidalcea malvaeflora subsp. patula C.L.Hitchc.
Medicago lupulina var. cupaniana (Guss.) Boiss.
Poa nevadensis var. juncifolia (Scribn.) Beetle
Calystegia fulcrata subsp. tomentella (Greene) Brummitt
Calamagrostis californica Kearney
Chenopodium botryodes Sm.
Plantago hirtella subsp. galeottiana (Decne.) Thorne
Viola nuttallii subsp. vallicola (A.Nelson) R.L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Chenopodium glaucum var. pulchrum Aellen
Arctostaphylos canescens var. sonomensis (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex Mc Minn
Rhynchospora glomerata (L.) Vahl
Heuchera cylindrica var. ovalifolia (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Wheelock
Dalea schottii var. puberula Munz
Medicago hispida var. confinis (W.D.J.Koch) Burnat
Lewisia rediviva subsp. minor (Rydb.) A.H.Holmgren
Delphinium andesicola subsp. amplum (Ewan ex Kearney & Peebles) Ewan
Cycladenia humilis var. tomentosa (A.Gray) A.Gray
Galium nuttallii var. ovalifolium Dempster
Lolium persicum Boiss. & Hohen.
Opuntia erinacea var. xanthostemma (K.Schum.) L.D.Benson
Pediocactus simpsonii var. robustior (Coult.) L.D.Benson
Linnaea borealis subsp. americana (J.Forbes) Hultén
Epilobium alpinum var. nutans Hornem.
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. graveolens (A.Gray) H.M.Hall & Clem.
Ipomoea leptotoma var. wootonii E.H.Kelso
Oenothera hookeri subsp. hirsutissima (A.Gray ex S.Watson) Munz
Agave tequilana F.A.C.Weber
Syringodium Kütz.
Salvia dorrii subsp. mearnsii (Britton) E.M.McClint.
Erythranthe angulosa M.Berger
Ferocactus viscainensis H.E.Gates
Anemonoides apennina (L.) Holub
Trifolium phleoides subsp. willkommii (Chabert) Muñoz Rodr.
Jaltomata Schltdl.
Dichanthelium thermale subsp. sericeum (Schmoll) J.R.Thomas
Sedum brevifolium DC.
Sacoila lanceolata (Aubl.) Garay
Aloe schimperi Tod.
Veronica austriaca L.
Hieracium lachenalii subsp. cruentifolium (Dahlst. & Lübeck ex Dahlst.) Zahn
Origanum vulgare subsp. viridulum (Martrin-Donos) Nyman
Pleioblastus fortunei (Van Houtte) Nakai
Lipandra polysperma (L.) S.Fuentes, Uotila & Borsch
Chaenostoma cordatum Benth.
Oxalis pes-caprae var. pes-caprae
Scutellaria lateriflora var. lateriflora
Kalanchoe tomentosa Baker
Ornithogalum magnum Krasch. & Schischk.
Veronica missurica subsp. major (Hook.) M.M.Mart.Ort. & Albach
Crassula arborescens (Mill.) Willd.
Taraxacum hamatulum Hagend., Soest & Zevenb.
Babiana nervosa (Lam.) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Sagina subulata Hillebr., 1888
Pseudelephantopus spicatus (Juss. ex Aubl.) Rohr
Sanchezia parvibracteata Sprague & Hutch.
Cotoneaster vestitus (W.W.Sm.) Flinck & B.Hylmö
Agave parryi var. truncata Gentry
Xanthosoma robustum Schott
Rosa spithamea var. spithamea
Eriocapitella japonica (Thunb.) Nakai
Papaver radicatum Rottb. ex DC.
Lupinus tegeticulatus Eastw.
Erythranthe sookensis (B.G.Benedict et al.) G.L.Nesom
Eucycla Nutt.
Agave parryi subsp. neomexicana (Wooton & Standl.) B.Ullrich
Inga edulis Mart.
Lampranthus productus (Haw.) N.E.Br.
Zaluzania grayana B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Sairocarpus cornutus subsp. leptaleus (A.Gray) Barringer
Romulea minutiflora Klatt
Petroselinum segetum Linnaeus, 1753
Trimezia coerulea (G.Lodd.) Ravenna
Oxybasis rubra var. humilis (Hook.) Mosyakin
Musa balbisiana Colla
Eriogonum umbellatum var. cladophorum Gand.
Dracaena reflexa var. angustifolia Baker
Agave filifera subsp. schidigera (Lem.) B.Ullrich
Swietenia humilis Zucc.
Potentilla rhyolitica var. rhyolitica
Alvaradoa amorphoides subsp. amorphoides
Dactylis glomerata subsp. hispanica (Roth) Nyman
Anemanthele lessoniana (Steud.) Veldkamp
Fuchsia triphylla L.
Conobea pusilla (Benth.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Bromus diandrus subsp. rigidus (Roth) Laínz
Vulpia octoflora f. hirtella (Piper) Blom
Cirsium murdockii (S.L.Welsh) Cronquist
Cercidium ×molle I.M.Johnst.
Oenothera runcinata var. brevifolia (Engelm.) Munz
Carex crus-corvi Shuttlew. ex Kunze
Cymopterus montanus var. globosus S.Watson
Carex bishallii C.B.Clarke
Evolvulus discolor Benth.
Laurus nobilis Cav.
Carex rusbyi Mack.
Opuntia undulata Griffiths
Aconitum helleri Greene
Aechmea bromeliifolia (Rudge) Baker
Ericameria lignumviridis (S.L.Welsh) G.L.Nesom
Dendromecon flexilis Greene, 1886
Androsace chamaejasme var. lehmanniana (Spreng.) B.Boivin
Lomatium foeniculaceum var. daucifolium (Torr. & A.Gray) Cronquist
Geranium leucanthum Small
Phlox pungens Dorn
Castilleja ardifera J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Rumex maritimus subsp. fueginus (Phil.) Piper & Beattie
Eriogonum tenue Small
Streptanthus crassicaulis Torr.
Solidago canadensis var. lepida (DC.) Cronquist
Astragalus scariosus Benth. ex Bunge
Carex canescens var. subloliacea Laest.
Galphimia angustifolia var. ovalifolia Arènes
Bryonia L.
Hamosa austrina Small
Hypericum monogynum L.
Viola subvestita Greene
Lupinus sulphureus var. applegateianus C.P.Sm.
Pisophaca datilensis Rydb.
Mimulus platycalyx Pennell
Abutilon pringlei var. sinaloensis Hochr.
Petalostemon exilis A.Gray
Pseudostellaria oxyphylla (B.L.Rob.) R.L.Hartm. & Rabeler
Wedelia cristata Standl.
Hamosa gooddingii Rydb.
Pseudopanax crassifolius (Sol. ex A.Cunn.) K.Koch
Thysanocarpus affinis Greene
Quercus crassipocula Torr.
Aconitum mogollonicum Greene
Grayia arizonica (Standl.) E.H.Zacharias
Argemone corymbosa var. parva S.L.Welsh
Litsea Lam.
Quamoclidion multiflorum subsp. obtusum Standl.
Aragallus villosus Rydb.
Senecio prionophyllus Greene
Abronia umbellata subsp. alba (Eastw.) A.E.Murray
Lomatium triternatum var. alatum (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Spraguea irregularis Rydb.
Solidago spathulata var. randii (Porter) Cronquist
Syrmatium patens Greene
Cassia stellata M.E.Jones
Artemisia campestris var. petiolata S.L.Welsh
Jatropha arizonica I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum neglectum Greene
Prenanthes L.
Opuntia azurea Rose
Penstemon pachyphyllus A.Gray
Lathyrus puberulus T.G.White ex Greene
Pediomelum aromaticum var. aromaticum
Lepidium paysonii Rollins
Allocarya vallata Piper
Nolina parryi subsp. wolfii Munz
Anthericum L.
Asclepias kotolo Eastw.
Hieracium chelannense Zahn
Spiraea convexa Suksd.
Eriophyllum tridactylum Rydb.
Oxalis lunulata Zucc.
Ranunculus ranunculinus (Nutt.) Rydb.
Heliomeris longifolius var. annuus (M.E.Jones) W.F.Yates, 1979
Sphaeralcea angustifolia var. lobata (Wooton) Kearney
Calyptridium umbellatum var. umbellatum
Polygonum amphibium var. natans Michx.
Allium aridum Rydb.
Grevillea lavandulacea Schltdl.
Washingtonia brevipes J.M.Coult. & Rose
Thysanocarpus trichocarpus Rydb.
Eritrichium molle A.Gray
Geranium carolinianum subsp. carolinianum
Achillea millefolium f. californica (Pollard) H.M.Hall
Eschscholzia leptandra Greene
Calochortus maculosus A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Chenopodium spinescens (R.Br.) S.Fuentes & Borsch
Oenothera pterosperma S.Watson
Lappula leucotricha Rydb.
Acacia berlandieri Benth.
Dicoria canescens var. wetherillii (Eastw.) Cronquist
Physaria chambersii var. canaani S.L.Welsh, 2003
Ranunculus andersonii var. juniperinus (Jones) S.L.Welsh
Lupinus saxosus var. saxosus
Astragalus canadensis f. rydbergii Gand.
Stylosanthes biflora (L.) Britton, Sterns & Poggenb.
Gilmania Coville
Heterotheca mayoensis G.L.Nesom
Arenaria cephaloidea Rydb.
Eriogonum caespitosum var. sublineare S.Stokes
Artemisia vulgaris var. littoralis Suksd.
Fragaria firma Rydb.
Corethrogyne virgata var. bernardina Abrams
Lessingia germanorum var. tenuipes J.T.Howell
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. nitidus L.C.Anderson
Lesquerella carinata var. carinata
Delphinium elatum var. occidentale S.Watson
Synthyris cymopteroides Pennell
Cercidiphyllum genetrix
Cissus haguei Knowlton, 1899
Arctostaphylos elliptica Knowlton, 1899
Rinorea Aubl.
Sapindus alatus Ward
Vauquelinia Correa
Hydrangea californica MacGinitie, 1941
Araliopsoides E.W.Berry, 1916
Vauquelinia exigua MacGinitie, 1941
Acacia lamarensis Knowlton, 1899
Laurophyllum caudatum Brown, 1962
Fraxinus wrightii Knowlton, 1899
Acer vivarium Knowlton, 1899
Cocculus flabella Wolfe, 1966
Dombeyopsis platanoides Lesquereux, 1878
Anthericum liliago L.
Telekia speciosa (Schreb.) Baumg.
Acoelorraphe wrightii (Griseb. & H.Wendl.) H.Wendl. ex Becc.
Opuntia valida Griffiths
Petrosedum orientale ('t Hart) Grulich
Artemisia ruthiae (A.H.Holmgren, L.M.Shultz & Lowrey) Sòn.Garcia, Garnatje, Mc Arthur, Pellicer, S.C.Sand. & Vallès-Xirau
Symphyotrichum subspicatum var. subspicatum
Heptapleurum actinophyllum (Endl.) Lowry & G.M.Plunkett
Juncus communis E.Mey.
Fremontodendron napense (Eastw.) R.M.Lloyd
Drosera peltata Thunb.
Aristea Aiton
Dodecatheon jeffreyanum subsp. jeffreyanum
Pulsatilla patens subsp. multifida (Pritz.) Zämelis
Rubus ×setosus Bigelow
Viola labradorica Schrank
Lonicera caprifolium L.
Argemone mexicana subsp. ochroleuca (Sw.) Schwarzb.
Koanophyllon solidaginifolium (A.Gray) R.King & H.Rob.
Callitriche terrestris Muhl. ex Raf.
Aloe grandidentata Salm-Dyck
Convolvulus equitans var. equitans
Stenaria nigricans (Lam.) Terrell
Mammillaria marksiana Krainz
Sedum kimnachii V.V.Byalt
Alternanthera brasiliana (L.) Kuntze
Tragopogon porrifolius subsp. longirostris (Sch.Bip.) Greuter
Fendlera rupicola var. falcata (Thornb.) Rehder
Euphrosyne dealbata (A.Gray) Panero
Dudleya nubigena subsp. nubigena
Justicia insolita var. tastensis Brandegee
Lepidium lasiocarpum var. palmeri (S.Watson) C.L.Hitchc.
Prunus virginiana subsp. demissa (Torr. & A.Gray) A.E.Murray
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. pondii (Greene) C.P.Sm.
Dalea orcuttii S.Watson
Bursera laxiflora subsp. filicifolia (Brandegee) Felger & C.H.Lowe
Cirsium californicum var. bernardinum (Greene) Petr.
Lotus oroboides var. oroboides
Petalostemon evanescens (Brandegee) Rose ex Rydb.
Isocoma veneta var. oxyphylla (Greene) R.M.Beauch.
Justicia purpusii (Brandegee) D.N.Gibson
Euphorbia heterophylla var. heterophylla
Paspalum paspalodes (Michx.) Scribn.
Thysanocarpus laciniatus var. emarginatus (Greene) Jeps.
Dalea trochilina Brandegee
Dalea juncea (Rydb.) Wiggins
Zigadenus fremontii (Torr.) Torr.
Neoevansia striata (K.Brandegee) Sánchez-Mej.
Bouteloua parryi var. gentryi (Gould) Gould
Bouteloua curtipendula var. tenuis Gould & Kapadia
Padus virginiana (L.) M.Roem.
Delphinium ×inflexum Davidson
Cymopterus glomeratus var. greeleyorum (J.W.Grimes & P.L.Packard) Goodrich & S.L.Welsh
Viola alba Besser
Zea mays var. rugosa Bonaf.
Legenere valdiviana (Phil.) E.Wimm.
Crocus sublimis Herb.
Geum rossii var. depressum (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Brachypodium mexicanum var. inerme Beetle
Vitex rotundifolia L.f.
Helenium flexuosum Raf.
Hibiscus schizopetalus (Dyer) Hook.fil.
Narcissus tazetta subsp. aureus (Jord. & Fourr.) Baker
Crocus atticus (Boiss. & Orph.) Orph.
Renealmia L.f.
Parmentiera trunciflora Standl. & L.O.Williams
Artemisia potentilloides var. potentilloides
Sabal palmetto (Walter) Lodd. ex Schult. & Schult.f.
Prunus subcordata var. rubicunda Jeps.
Teucrium hircanicum L.
Euphorbia golondrina L.C.Wheeler
Eriocoma contracta (B.L.Johnson) Romasch.
Calystegia sepium subsp. americana (Sims) Brummitt
Astragalus sabulosus var. sabulosus
Lantana strigocamara R.W.Sanders
Sechium edule subsp. edule
Poa alpigena Lindm.
Lepechinia yecorana Henrickson, Fishbein & T.Van Devender
Glebionis coronaria var. discolor (d'Urv.) Turland
Setaria verticillata var. verticillata
Neottia Guett.
Erigeron acris subsp. kamtschaticus (DC.) H.Hara
Vitis cinerea Engelm. ex Millardet
Verbascum lychnitis L.
Averrhoa carambola L.
Coprosma robusta Raoul
Phleum alpinum subsp. alpinum
Arum hygrophilum Boiss.
Cerastium velutinum var. velutinum
Luculia pinceana Hook.
Balsamorhiza ×tomentosa (Rydb.) W.A.Weber
Magnolia tarahumara (Vazquez) A.Vázquez
Campanula trachelium L.
Ferocactus diguetii subsp. carmenensis (G.E.Linds.) F.Wolf & R.Wolf
Tulipa urumiensis Stapf
Yucca brevifolia subsp. herbertii (J.M.Webber) Hochstätter
Silene ×hampeana Meusel & Werner
Angelica sylvestris L.
Senecio speciosus Willd.
Astragalus sabulosus var. vehiculus S.L.Welsh
Aira caryophyllea var. capillaris (Mert. & W.D.J.Koch) Vis.
Agave horrida Lem. ex Jacobi
Symphoricarpos ×doorenbosii Krüssm.
Galearis rotundifolia var. lineata Mousley
Mimosa pudica L.
Amaranthus blitum var. emarginatus (Moq. ex Uline & Bray) Costea
Larrea glutinosa Engelm.
Jacquemontia pentanthos (Jacq.) G.Don
Lophocereus marginatus (DC.) S.Arias & Terrazas
Myosotis ramosissima Rochel
Senecio multidentatus var. huachucanus (A.Gray) T.M.Barkley
Draba asterophora var. macrocarpa C.L.Hitchc.
Camissonia sierrae Raven
Chenopodium betaceum Andrz.
Solanum muricatum Aiton
Luma apiculata (DC.) Burret
Heterotheca paniculata G.L.Nesom
Stenotis asperuloides (Benth.) Terrell
Eryngium leavenworthii Torr. & Gray
Echeveria lilacina Kimnach & Moran
Limnanthes pumila subsp. grandiflora (Arroyo) S.C.Meyers & K.L.Chambers
Ladeania juncea (Eastw.) Reveal & A.N.Egan
Ficaria verna subsp. bulbilifera Á.Löve & D.Löve
Epilobium lanceolatum Sebast. & Mauri
Lapsana communis subsp. intermedia (M.Bieb.) Hayek
Eriocoma wallowaensis (J.R.Maze & K.A.Robson) Romasch.
Persicaria filiformis (Thunb.) Nakai
Viola rostrata Pursh
Yucca sterilis (Neese & S.L.Welsh) S.L.Welsh & L.C.Higgins
Erigeron longifolius Baill.
Orchis Tourn. ex L.
Rhododendron menziesii subsp. menziesii
Malaxis rosei Ames
Agrostis schaffneri E.Fourn.
Fumaria officinalis subsp. wirtgenii (W.D.J.Koch) Arcang.
Ceanothus ×flexilis Mc Minn
Rubus canadensis L.
Rhus aromatica var. serotina (Greene) Rehder
Rhododendron dalhousiae Hook.fil.
Lasianthaea macrocephala (Hook. & Arnold) K.M.Becker
Gochnatia hypoleuca subsp. hypoleuca
Senecio carnerensis Greenm. ex Greenm.
Senecio scalaris var. scalaris
Tithonia tubiformis (Jacq.) Cass.
Chaptalia nutans var. texana (Greene) Burkart
Senecio goldmanii Greene
Chrysanthellum indicum subsp. mexicanum (Greenm.) B.L.Turner
Verbesina pauciflora Hemsl.
Dahlia sorensenii H.V.Hansen & Hjert.
Lasianthaea palmeri (Greenm.) K.M.Becker
Cosmos carvifolius Benth.
Trigonospermum melampodioides DC.
Viguiera stenoloba S.F.Blake
Alloispermum palmeri (S.Watson ex A.Gray) C.F.Fernández & L.Urb.
Psacalium globosum (Rob. & Fernald) H.Rob. & Brettell
Hymenothrix palmeri var. glandulosa (S.Watson) B.L.Turner
Senecio procumbens Kunth
Psilurus incurvus (Gouan) Schinz & Thell.
Kikuyuochloa clandestina (Hochst. ex Chiov.) H.Scholz
Leontodon borealis (Bong.) DC.
Solanum pterocaulum Dunal
Bauhinia saigonensis Pierre ex Gagnep.
Antirrhinum strictum Sibth. & Sm.
Indigofera montana Rose
Senecio reptans Turcz.
Pyrethrum parthenium (L.) Sm.
Andropogon zizanioides (L.) Urb.
Opuntia engelmannii var. littoralis Engelm.
Limnanthaceae
Acanthopanax Miq.
Hackelia deflexa subsp. americana (A.Gray) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Eustoma Salisb.
Ficus aspera G.Forst.
Afzelia tenuisecta Pennell
Elephantopus L.
Eragrostis chloromelas Steud.
Beaucarnea stricta Lem.
Betonica officinalis L.
Salvia albiflora M.Martens & Galeotti
Polygonatum officinale All.
Cola vera K.Schum.
Bracteantha bracteata (Vent.) Anderb. & Haegi
Gilia uncialis Brandegee
Trichocereus macrogonus (Salm-Dyck) Riccob.
Peteria pinetorum Ced.Porter
Notopterygium H.Boissieu
Chamissoa altissima var. altissima
Aegopogon gracilis Vasey
Schoenocaulon megarrhizum M.E.Jones
Dalea janosensis A.E.Estrada & Villarreal
Achyranthes longifolia (Makino) Makino
Lophatherum gracile Brongn.
Desmodium palmeri Hemsl.
Sclerocarpus Jacq.
Stephania tetrandra S.Moore
Tillandsia excelsa Griseb.
Anemopsis Hook. & Arn.
Euphorbia kansui S.L.Liou ex S.B.Ho
Oserya Tul. & Wedd.
Physalis sordida Fernald
Sida angustifolia Mill.
Cenchrus myosuroides var. myosuroides
Hilaria semplei Sohns
Aristida curvifolia E.Fourn.
Hibiscus pernambucensis Arruda
Jefea lantanifolia (Schauer) Strother
Hedyotis intricata Fosberg
Pithecellobium tortum Mart.
Muhlenbergia articulata Scribn.
Berginia palmeri Rose ex Vasey & Rose
Parkinsonia texana (A.Gray) S.Watson
Siphonoglossa Oerst.
Salix nakamurana Koidz.
Ditrichum Cass.
Senecio dimorphophyllus var. paysonii T.M.Barkley
Dodecatheon exilifolium J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Corylus rostrata var. californica A.DC.
Euphorbia pringlei Engelm.
Vicia cornigera Chaub.
Physaria geyeri var. geyeri
Cladothrix suffruticosa (Torr.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex S.Watson
Galium spurium Spreng.
Dodecatheon jeffreyanum subsp. pygmaeum (Hall) H.J.Thomps.
Penstemon frutescens Lamb.
Quercus dumosa f. berberidifolia (Liebm.) Trel.
Opuntia cineracea Wiggins
Andropogon perforatus Trin. ex E.Fourn.
Swietenia mahagoni (L.) Jacq.
Pithecellobium mangense (Jacq.) J.F.Macbr.
Viscainoa Greene
Villadia Rose
Okenia Schltdl. & Cham.
Hintonia standleyana Bullock
Cladocolea inorna (Rob. & Greenm.) Kuijt
Henrya ortegana Happ
Cassia rufa M.Martens & Galeotti
Kochia scoparia var. scoparia
Centaurium tenuiflorum subsp. tenuiflorum
Alnus rhombifolia var. bernardina Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Cucurbita okeechobeensis subsp. martinezii (L.H.Bailey) T.C.Andres & G.P.Nabhan ex T.W.Walters & D.S.Decker
Oreocarya depressa (M.E.Jones) J.F.Macbr.
Oreocarya creutzfeldtii (S.L.Welsh) R.B.Kelley
Oreocarya rollinsii (I.M.Johnst.) W.A.Weber
Oreocarya welshii (K.H.Thorne & L.C.Higgins) R.B.Kelley
Chenopodium luteum Benet-Pierce
Chenopodium wahlii Benet-Pierce
Chenopodium aureum Benet-Pierce
Chenopodium lineatum Benet-Pierce
Nepenthaceae
Micranthes nelsoniana subsp. aestivalis (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) Elven & D.F.Murray
Escallonia ×langleyensis Veitch
Bougainvillea ×buttiana Holttum & Standl.
Oreocarya fulvocanescens var. fulvocanescens
Genista hispanica L.
Oreocarya crymophila (I.M.Johnst.) Jeps. & Hoover
Oreocarya hypsophila (I.M.Johnst.) Hasenstab & M.G.Simpson
Verbena bipinnatifida var. nepetifolia (Tidestr.) Jeps.
Oreocarya suffruticosa var. abortiva (Greene) J.F.Macbr.
Ottleya mearnsii (Britton) D.D.Sokoloff
Oreocarya sobolifera (Payson) R.B.Kelley
Chenopodium eastwoodiae Benet-Pierce
Chenopodium howellii Benet-Pierce
Chenopodium twisselmannii Benet-Pierce
Acacia floribunda (Vent.) Willd.
Cheniella corymbosa (Roxb. ex DC.) R.Clark & Mackinder
Cassia nairobensis L.H.Bailey
Gerbera jamesonii Bolus
Ranunculus alopecuroides (Greene) Christenh. & Byng
Dalechampia dioscoreifolia Poepp.
Aristolochia gigantea Mart. & Zucc.
Xiphidium caeruleum Aubl.
Chenopodium simpsonii Benet-Pierce
Chenopodium brandegeeae Benet-Pierce
Rosa corymbifera Borkh.
Crepis nicaeensis Balb.
Oreopanax nymphaeifolius (Hibberd) Decne. & Planch. ex G.Nicholson
Brachychiton populneus subsp. populneus
Enneapogon Desv. ex P.Beauv.
Cucumis humifructus Stent
Cucurbita radicans Naudin
Vernicia fordii (Hemsl.) Airy Shaw
Maackia amurensis Rupr.
Danthonia californica var. piperi H.St.John
Auranticarpa rhombifolia (A.Cunn. ex Hook.) L.W.Cayzer, Crisp & I.Telford
Sesamum trilobum (Bernh.) Byng & Christenh.
Eucalyptus leucoxylon subsp. leucoxylon
Ranunculus cymbalaria var. alpina Hook.
Eremophila subfloccosa subsp. lanata Chinnock
Delphinium pauciflorum Royle
Zygophyllum laeve (Standl.) Christenh. & Byng
Zygophyllum pachyacanthum (Rydb.) Christenh. & Byng
Oenothera deltoides var. cognata (Jeps.) Munz
Oreocarya fulvocanescens var. nitida (Greene) R.B.Kelley
Eranthemum pulchellum Andr.
Hypoestes Sol. ex R.Br.
Allocasuarina distyla (Vent.) L.A.S.Johnson
Achnatherum speciosum Bubani
Desmanthus painteri (Britton & Rose) Standl.
Mentzelia hirsutissima var. hirsutissima
Houstonia gracilenta I.M.Johnst.
Peniocereus diguetii (F.A.C.Weber) Backeb.
Nolina beldingii var. deserticola Trel.
Euphorbia californica var. hindsiana (Benth.) Wiggins
Linanthus floribundus subsp. glaber R.Patt.
Bursera mirandae C.A.Toledo
Gnaphalium oxyphyllum DC.
Cyperus aristatus var. inflexus (Muhl.) Boeckeler ex Kük.
Verbesina grayi (Sch.Bip.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hemsl.
Valeriana vaginata Kunth
Lobelia setulosa E.Wimm.
Convolvulus aridus subsp. longilobus Abrams
Conobea intermedia A.Gray
Cleome speciosa Raf.
Valeriana pilosiuscula Mart. & Galeotti
Opuntia parkeri Engelm. ex Coult.
Proboscidea gracillima Hevly
Ipomoea peninsularis Brandegee
Calliandra brandegeei (Britton & Rose) Gentry
Pluchea adnata (Humb. & Bonpl.) C.Mohr
Drymaria glandulosa var. fendleri (S.Watson) Fosberg
Cyclanthera tamnoides Cogn.
Calliandra tetragona (Willd.) Benth.
Viburnum elatum Benth.
Lonchocarpus guatemalensis Benth.
Cuscuta coronata Beyr ex Hook.
Achyronychia Torr. & A.Gray
Asarina filipes (A.Gray) Pennell
Euphorbia heterophylla var. eriocarpa Millsp.
Desmodium procumbens var. transversum (B.L.Rob. & Greenm.) B.G.Schub.
Heliopsis parvifolia var. parvifolia
Bernardia mexicana (Hook. & Arn.) Müll.Arg.
Periptera DC.
Lisianthius nigrescens Schltdl. & Cham.
Condaliopsis parryi (Torr.) Suess.
Benthamantha brandegeei Rydb.
Desmodium hookerianum D.Dietr.
Perezia Lag.
Lemna minima (Hegelm.) Phil. ex Hegelm.
Allowissadula pringlei (Rose) D.M.Bates
Cyclanthera integrifoliola Cogn.
Valeriana subincisa Benth.
Desmanthus pumilus var. michoacanus Luckow
Ditaxis depressa (Greenm.) Pax & K.Hoffm.
Jacquemontia pentantha (Jacq.) G.Don
Solanum corymbosum Jacq.
Sedum jaliscanum S.Watson
Justicia salviifolia Kunth
Euphorbia adenoptera Bertol.
Jacquemontia sphaerostigma (Cav.) Rusby
Dactyloctenium scindicum Boiss.
Marina procumbens (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) Barneby
Euphorbia dentata var. dentata
Phyllanthus brandegeei Millsp.
Hamelia versicolor A.Gray
Bursera laurihuertae Rzed. & Calderón
Physalis viscosa L.
Malperia S.Watson
Mimulus glabratus var. fremontii (Benth.) A.L.Grant
Cyperus haspan L.
Senecio grandifolius Less.
Paullinia spinosa (Radlk.) I.M.Johnst.
Carphochaete grahamii A.Gray
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. pacificus (Engelm.) Bravo
Kosteletzkya digitata A.Gray
Peniocereus (A.Berger) Britton & Rose
Coutaportla ghiesbreghtiana (Baill.) Urb.
Porophyllum confertum var. confertum
Croton adspersus Benth.
Merremia aegyptia (L.) Urb.
Sida michoacana Fryxell
Viburnum stenocalyx (Oerst.) Hemsl.
Geranium seemannii Peyr.
Jaegeria pedunculata Hook. & Arn.
Stevia rhombifolia Kunth
Mimulus stellatus (Kellogg) Grant
Acalypha alopecuroidea Jacq.
Tragia urticifolia Benth.
Senecio angulifolius DC.
Lippia queretarensis Kunth
Lippia dulcis Trevir.
Ipomoea dimorphophylla Greenm.
Atriplex muricata Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Eupatorium rivale Greenm.
Tephrosia leiocarpa var. costenya McVaugh
Trixis peninsularis S.F.Blake
Baccharis sordescens DC.
Polygala xanti A.Gray
Senna argentea (Kunth) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Bursera heliae Rzed. & Calderón
Echinocereus sciurus (Brandegee) Dams
Acer saccharinum var. laciniatum Pax
Lathyrus chloranthus Boiss. & Balansa
Solanum cupuliferum Greene
Panicum agrostoides Hitchc. & Chase, 1910
Acer saccharum var. grandidentatum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Südw.
Rubus lasiostylus Focke
Helianthus annuus var. aridus Cockerell
Nicotiana forsteri Roem. & Schult.
Barbarea stricta Andrz. ex Besser
Pyrus elaeagnifolia Pall.
Rubus nepalensis (Hook.fil.) Kuntze
Malus ×florentina (Zuccagni) C.K.Schneid.
Rubus simplex Focke
Cucumis melo var. texanus Naudin
Potentilla tridentata (Sol.)
Prunus pumila L.
Diospyros austroafricana subsp. microphylla (Burch.) F.White
Potentilla ambigua Gaudin
Citrus cavaleriei H.Lév.
Lupinus agninus Gand.
Prunus meyeri Böckel
Potentilla gracillima Kamelin
Juglans australis Griseb.
Vitis acerifolia Raf.
Lophopyrum ponticum (Podp.) Á.Löve
Astragalus gilviflorus var. gilviflorus
Psoralea esculenta Pursh
Ranunculus pedatifidus subsp. affinis (R.Br.) Hultén
Medicago sativa subsp. xvaria (Martyn) Arcang.
Dryas ×wyssiana Beauverd
Hierochloe odorata subsp. arctica (J.Presl) Tzvelev
Packera franciscana (Greene) W.A.Weber & Á.Löve
Townsendia nuttallii Dorn
Dierama pulcherrimum (Hook.f.) Baker
Montanoa quadrangularis Sch.Bip. ex C.Koch
Syrmatium micranthum (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Greene
Trifolium plumosum var. plumosum
Mitella stauropetala var. stauropetala
Lupinus burkei subsp. burkei
Haplopappus hirtus subsp. sonchifolius (Greene) H.M.Hall
Saxifraga oregana var. montanensis (Small) C.L.Hitchc.
Agrostis pallens var. vaseyi H.St.John
Stenandrium fasciculare (Benth.) Wassh.
Mauria Kunth
Thouinidium Radlk.
Senecio riskindii B.L.Turner & T.M.Barkley
Corchorus aestuans L.
Aristida purpusiana Hitchc.
Colubrina glabra Nutt.
Tilia mexicana Benth.
Viguiera deltoidea var. tastensis Brandegee, 1903
Brickellia enigmatica B.L.Turner
Stevia martinii B.L.Turner
Amaranthus dubius Mart.
Ceanothus lanuginosus (M.E.Jones) Rose
Schiedeella michuacana (Lex.) Burns-Bal.
Bidens schaffneri var. wrightii (A.Gray) Melchert
Grindelia oxylepis Greene
Cuscuta jalapensis Schltdl.
Peperomia hispidula (Sw.) A.Dietr.
Hedyotis asperuloides Benth.
Smilax spinosa Mill.
Dyssodia porophyllum var. porophyllum
Cologania cordata Fearing ex McVaugh
Indigofera hirsuta L.
Chilopsis linearis var. tomenticaulis Henrickson
Lasiacis sorghoidea (Ham.) Hitchc. & Chase
Astranthium Nutt.
Lactuca graminifolia var. mexicana Mc Vaugh
Chaptalia Vent.
Urera baccifera (L.) Gaudich.
Coreocarpus arizonicus var. sanpedroensis (E.B.Sm.) B.L.Turner
Lycium leiospermum I.M.Johnst.
Alnus firmifolia Fernald
Dioscorea convolvulacea Cham. & Schltdl.
Brickellia paniculata (Mill.) B.L.Rob.
Esenbeckia berlandieri Baill.
Grindelia greenmanii Steyerm.
Rhamnus microphylla Larrañaga
Cercocarpus fothergilloides Kunth
Stephanomeria exigua var. deanei J.F.Macbr.
Flaveria robusta Rose
Eragrostis silveana Swallen
Montanoa speciosa (DC.) Sch.Bip. ex C.Koch
Argythamnia manzanilloana Rose ex Pax
Panicum fasciculatum Griseb., 1864
Verbesina lindheimeri B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Lopezia riesenbachia Plitmann, Raven & Breedlove
Perymenium mendezii var. mendezii
Verbesina abscondita Klatt
Chrysanthemum morifolium Ramat.
Baccharis potosina A.Gray
Agave orcuttiana Trel.
Castilleja lanta A.Nelson
Lycium californicum var. interior F.Chiang
Chamaesyce anychioides (Boiss.) Millsp.
Trisetum virletii E.Fourn.
Triumfetta lappula L.
Anoda maculata Fryxell
Perymenium vandevenderorum B.L.Turner
Erucastrum incanum (L.) W.D.J.Koch
Salvadora L.
Mertensia viridis var. caelestina (A.Nelson & Cockerell) L.O.Williams
Clarkia pulcherrima Hort.
Saurauia madrensis B.T.Keller & Breedlove
Elymus acicularis Suksd.
Allocarya eastwoodiae Piper
Anneslia brandegeei Britton & Rose
Oreobroma minima A.Nelson
Lithospermum lasiosiphon I.M.Johnst.
Eriogonum rhodanthum A.Nelson & P.B.Kenn.
Eritrichium glomeratum var. humile A.Gray
Eriogonum umbellatum var. majus Benth., 1856
Schoenocrambe pinnata Greene
Rhus diversiloba f. quinquifolia McNair
Cardamine angelorum S.Watson
Oxytropis lambertii var. lambertii
Neottia bifolia (Raf.) Baumbach
Delphinium andersoni var. cognatum (Greene) Ewan
Guardiola mexicana var. mexicana
Ceropegia dichotoma Haw.
Rorippa cantoniensis (Lour.) Ohwi
Cudrania tricuspidata (Carrière) Bureau ex Lavallée
Hemizonia fasciculata subsp. fasciculata
Opuntia caesia Griffiths
Potentilla strigosa (Pursh) Pall. ex Tratt.
Sedum spurium M.Bieb.
Sambucus trifida A.Heller
Arabis angulata Greene ex Wooton & Standl.
Silene menziesii var. menziesii
Astragalus leucophyllus Torr. & A.Gray
Eriogonum ovalifolium subsp. flavissimum (Gand.) S.Stokes
Astragalus procerus A.Gray
Bahia rubella (A.Gray) A.Gray
Schmaltzia hederacea Greene
Dahlia coccinea var. gentryi (Sherff) Sherff
Caesalpiniaceae
Convolvulus luteolus A.Gray
Salix eriocephala var. monochroma (C.R.Ball) Dorn
Astragalus avonensis S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Ptilocalais macrolepis Rydb.
Philadelphus lewisii var. helleri (Rydb.) S.Y.Hu
Muehlenbeckia platyclada (F.Muell.) Meisn.
Calycadenia cephalotes DC.
Mimulus hymenophyllus Meinke
Phoenix canariensis hort.
Artemisia norvegica var. piceetorum S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Cressa vallicola A.Heller
Amelanchier cuneata Piper
Tissa pallida Greene ex Britton
Arabis kennedyi Greene
Astragalus spectabilis Ced.Porter
Pediomelum sonorae Rydb.
Penstemon coccinatus Rydb.
Carex interimus Maguire
Rorippa curvisiliqua var. nuttallii (S.Watson) Stuckey
Guzmania monostachya Rusby
Trifolium stenophyllum Boiss.
Deinandra simplex Elmer
Dalea lanata var. lanata
Philadelphus zelleri S.Y.Hu
Philadelphus intermedius A.Nelson
Xerosicyos danguyi Humbert
Franseria pumila Nutt.
Cannabis sativa subsp. sativa
Penstemon saliens Rydb.
Micranthes franciscana Small
Lupinus debilis Greene
Melica micrantha Boiss. & Hohen.
Hieracium griseum Rydb., 1900
Gilia klickitatensis Suksd.
Psilocarphus oreganus A.Gray, 1873
Tissa macrotheca var. scariosa Britton
Penstemon ×mirus A.Nelson
Erythrina steyermarkii Krukoff & Barneby
Linum berlandieri Hook.
Juncus orthophyllus var. congestus Suksd.
Prosopis odorata Torr. & Frém.
Saxifraga rufidula (Small) Fedde
Elymus varnensis (Velen.) Runemark
Apocynum ambigens Greene
Artemisia leibergii Rydb.
Leptospermum brevipes F.Muell.
Chrysothamnus salicifolius Rydb.
Myosotis macrosperma Engelm.
Cymopterus macrorhizus Buckley
Fritillaria lanceolata var. floribunda Benth.
Amaryllis belladonna E.Mey. ex Steud.
Evolvulus laetus A.Gray
Aglaonema marantifolium Blume
Trifolium helleri P.B.Kenn.
Crataegus douglasii var. duchesnensis S.L.Welsh
Lepidium montanum var. stenocarpum Thell.
Carex lenticularis var. paullifructus Kük.
Acer giraldii Pax
Galium scabriusculum subsp. protoscabriusculum Dempster & Ehrend.
Cleome serrulata f. serrulata
Cnidoscolus sinaloensis Breckon ex Fern.Casas
Hulsea parryi Gray
Sphaeralcea albiflora Rose
Oenothera gauriflora Torr. & A.Gray
Salix farrae Ball
Hedysarum boreale subsp. mackenzii (Richardson) S.L.Welsh
Dasylirion acrotrichum (Schiede) Zucc.
Sclerocactus papyracanthus (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Heterotheca scelionis G.L.Nesom
Trigonotis peduncularis (Trevis.) Benth. ex Baker & S.Moore
Trifolium longipes var. multipedunculatum (P.B.Kenn.) J.S.Martin ex Isely
Alcea rosea var. nigra
Veronica teucrium L.
Crataegus marshallii Eggl.
Hooveria purpurea (Brandegee) D.W.Taylor & D.J.Keil
Bignonia callistegioides Cham.
Mammillaria senilis Lodd. ex Salm-Dyck
Phytolacca rugosa A.Br. & Bouché
Veronica petraea (M.Bieb.) Stev.
Malva parviflora var. parviflora
Allium proliferum (Moench) Schrad. ex Willd.
Isatis tinctoria subsp. tinctoria
Aquilegia alpina L.
Corydalis caseana subsp. aquae-gelidae (M.Peck & W.C.Wilson) Zetterl. & Lidén
Symphoricarpos symphoricarpos MacMill.
Cajanus acutifolius (F.Muell. ex Benth.) Maesen
Galactia filiformis (Jacq.) Benth.
Matelea cyclophylla (Standl.) Woodson
Panicum oligosanthes Schult.
Zosteraceae
Euphorbia serpyllifolia subsp. hirtula (S.Watson) Koutnik, 1985
Sambucus nigra var. canadensis (L.) B.L.Turner
Taravalia aptera (Parry) Greene
Trichilia colimana C.DC.
Acacia acatlensis Benth.
Borreria suaveolens G.Mey.
Sisyrinchium douglasii var. douglasii
Iresine arenaria Standl.
Agave ocahui var. longifolia Gentry
Nolina cespitifera Trel.
Rhamnus microphylla Humb. & Bonpl. ex Roem. & Schult.
Physalis crassifolia f. muriculata (Greene) Waterf.
Polygonum arifolium L.
Kibara laxiflora Benth.
Pseudelephantopus spicatus (B.Juss. ex Aubl.) C.F.Baker
Cylindropuntia rosarica (G.E.Linds.) Backeb.
Dichromena colorata (L.) C.L.Hitchc.
Cryptantha micrantha subsp. lepida (A.Gray) K.Mathew & P.H.Raven
Tripogandra elongata (G.Mey.) Woodson
Psilactis tenuis S.Watson
Stevia Cav.
Serjania unguiculata Radlk.
Gamochaeta falcata (Lam.) Cabrera
Arctostaphylos oppositifolia Parry
Amaranthus scleropoides Uline & Bray
Sisyrinchium scabrellum E.P.Bicknell
Peperomia asarifolia Schltdl.
Thymophylla pentachaeta var. hartwegii (A.Gray) Strother
Rhus aromatica var. schmidelioides (Schltdl.) Engl.
Celtis pallida var. pallida
Melampodium linearilobum DC.
Linnaea Gronov.
Shepherdia Nutt.
Muehlenbergia R.A.Hedwig, 1806
Chamaedorea pinnatifrons (Jacq.) Oerst.
Ipomoea laeta A.Gray ex S.Watson
Ipomoea crinicalyx S.Moore
Heimia myrtifolia Lourteig
Merremia quinquefolia Linnaeus, 1753
Ipomoea aristolochiaefolia G.Don
Tieghemopanax sambucifolius (Sieber ex DC.) R.Vig.
Banksia coccinea R.Br.
Senna racemosa (Mill.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Senna birostris (Dombey ex Vogel) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Markhamia hildebrandtii (Baker) Sprague
Acacia papyrocarpa Benth.
Hypericum revolutum Vahl
Jasminum nitidum Skan
Merremia cissoides (Lam.) Hallier fil.
Ipomoea rubens Choisy
Ipomoea tenuifolia (Vahl) Urb.
Quercus leucotrichophora A.Camus
Anemone virginiana var. cylindroidea B.Boivin
Chenopodium polyspermum var. acutifolium (Sm.) Gaudin
Astragalus dasyglottis Pall. ex Steud., 1840
Quercus phillyraeoides A.Gray
Coreopsis lanceolata var. villosa Michx.
Amaranthus albus Rodschied ex F.Dietr.
Prenanthes alata Hook.fil. & Thomson ex C.B.Clarke
Taraxacum erythrospermum Andrz.
Rosa gymnocarpa subsp. gymnocarpa
Rumex thyrsiflorus Fingerh.
Salicornia virginica Forssk.
Linaria canadensis var. canadensis
Fagus sylvatica var. laciniata Vignet
Cytisus multiflorus (DC) Lindl.
Pyrgophyllum yunnanensis (Gagnep.) T.L.Wu & Z.Y.Chen
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. incanum A.DC.
Sisyrinchium montanum var. montanum
Quercus cerris Blanco
Heuchera cylindrica var. septentrionalis Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Narcissus romieuxii subsp. romieuxii
Fagus sylvatica f. roseomarginata (Cripps) Domin
Caiophora lateritia (Hook.) Benth.
Cladothamnus pyrolaeflorus Bong.
Arabis eschscholtziana Andrz. ex Ledeb.
Trillium ovatum var. hibbersonii (T.M.C.Taylor & Szczaw.) G.W.Douglas & Pojar
Salix brachycarpa subsp. niphoclada (Rydb.) Argus
Solidago nemoralis subsp. decemflora (DC.) Bramwell ex Semple
Hieracium laevigatum Willd.
Chenopodium pedunculare Bertol.
Betula winteri Dugle
Toxicoscordion gramineum (Rydb.) Rydb.
Acer campbellii subsp. sinense (Pax) P.C.deJong
Brachypodium sylvaticum subsp. sylvaticum
Rhododendron sikangense var. sikangense
Festuca rubra var. rubra
Lloydia serotina var. serotina
Andromeda polifolia var. polifolia
Helianthus eggertii Small
Bredia Blume
Narcissus bulbocodium subsp. obesus (Salisb.) Maire
Vernonia gigantea (Walter) Trel. ex Branner & Coville
Diospyros lotus Blanco
Cercidiphyllum japonicum var. sinense Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Helianthus silphioides Nutt.
Festuca punctoria Sm.
Malus ×adstringens Zabel
Helianthus occidentalis Riddell
Betula ×eastwoodae Sargent
Viola sempervirens subsp. orbiculoides M.S.Baker
Galeopsis speciosa Mill.
Acer nikoense (Miq.) Maxim.
Lonicera dioica subsp. glaucescens (Rydb.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Aralia nudicaulis Blume
Helianthus resinosus Small
Rhus aromatica var. illinoensis (Greene) Rehder
Oxycoccus macrocarpus (Aiton) Pers.
Rhododendron hemsleyanum var. hemsleyanum
Erythroxylum novogranatense var. truxillense (Rusby) Plowman
Juncus alpinus var. insignis Fr. ex Buchenau
Bidens connata var. petiolata (Nutt.) Farw.
Agrostis stolonifera var. compacta Hartm.
Wolffia borealis (Engelmann) Landolt & Wildi ex Gandhi, Wiersema & Brouillet
Matthiola incana var. annua (L.) Voss
Oxalis acetosella L.
Micranthes nelsoniana var. porsildiana (Calder & Savile) Gornall & H.Ohba
Thalictrum robustum Maxim.
Achillea millefolium subsp. borealis (Bong.) Breitung
Draba palanderiana Kjellm.
Apios americana Medik.
Trillium nivale Riddell
Prunella vulgaris f. iodocalyx Fernald
Magnolia veitchii Bean
Vaccinium oreophilum Rydb.
Lychnis chalcedonica L.
Acer pseudoplatanus var. purpureum Loudon
Berberis lycium Royle
Fagus sylvatica var. atropunicea Marshall
Saxifraga cespitosa subsp. monticola (Small) A.E.Porsild
Potentilla norvegica var. norvegica
Magnolia campbellii var. mollicomata (W.W.Sm.) F.S.Ward
Alyssum murale Boiss.
Spergularia rupicola Lebel
Juncus alpinoarticulatus Vill., 1786
Corylus maxima var. purpurea (Loudon) Rehder
Viburnum awabuki K.Koch
Aesculus octandra Marshall
Armeria maritima subsp. maritima
Anemone narcissiflora var. monantha DC.
Chenopodium glaucum var. glaucum
Lolium italicum A.Braun
Antennaria pallida E.Nelson
Weigelia hybrida hort.
Hieracium sabaudum Pall., 1773
Polygonum scandens L.
Magnolia tripetala (L.) L.
Epilobium parviflorum G.Simpson & J.S.Thomson
Acer palmatum var. heptalobum Rehder
Magnolia campbellii subsp. mollicomata (W.W.Sm.) Johnstone
Epilobium mirabile Trel., 1906
Penstemon tolmiei Hook.
Acer platanoides var. rubrum Herder
Vicia sativa var. angustifolia L.
Arabis kamtschatica Pall. ex Ledeb., 1841
Erythroxylum Browne
Hebenstretia paarlensis Roessler
Saxifraga tricuspidata Rottb.
Panicum dichotomiflorum var. dichotomiflorum
Amaranthus graecizans Cutanda
Acer palmatum var. palmatum
Crepis vesicaria var. taraxacifolia (Thuill.) B.Boivin
Lupinus perennis subsp. latifolius (Lindl. ex J.Agardh) L.Ll.Phillips
Magnolia loebneri Kache
Berberis linearifolia Phil.
Corylus rostrata Aiton
Panax L.
Epilobium latifolium subsp. latifolium
Rehderodendron gongshanense Y.C.Tang
Atriplex patula subsp. obtusa (Cham.) Hall & Clem.
Pinellia tripartita (Blume) Schott
Hieracium praealtum Vill. ex Gochnat
Melilotus sulcatus Desf.
Scirpus caespitosus Willd. ex Kunth
Malus ×moerlandsii J.Door.
Artemisia princeps Pamp.
Lepidium heterophyllum (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Erica coccinea P.J.Bergius
Pedicularis langsdorffii subsp. arctica (R.Br.) Pennell ex Hultén
Magnolia kobus var. borealis Sarg.
Erigeron aureus var. typicus Cronquist
Brassica napus subsp. rapifera Metzg.
Sorbus alnifolia (Siebold & Zucc.) C.Koch
Symphytum grandiflorum DC.
Corispermum hookeri var. hookeri
Amaranthus blitum var. pseudogracilis (Thell.) Costea
Arabis hirsuta DC.
Narcissus asturiensis (Jord.) Pugsley
Cypripedium parviflorum var. makasin (Farw.) Sheviak
Silene macounii S.Watson
Lappula montana Greene
Cypripedium L.
Astragalus tenellus Willd. ex Steud.
Epilobium ×floridulum Smejkal
Erysimum cheiranthoides var. cheiranthoides
Rhododendron chrysanthum Pall.
Oxalis squamata Zucc.
Pittosporum truncatum E.Pritz.
Oxybaphus hirsutus (Pursh) Sweet
Nymphaea ×marliacea hort. ex Lat.-Marl.
Mentha cervina L.
Potentilla glabra Lodd.
Potentilla verna L.
Magnolia kobus var. kobus
Hedeoma hispida Pursh
Persicaria nepalensis (Meisn.) Miyabe
Rosa eglanteria Graebn.
Lupinus lepidus subsp. typicus Detling
Galium aparine var. echinospermum (Wallr.) T.Durand
Carex flava subsp. viridula (Michx.) O.Bolòs & Vigo
Anchusa officinalis Gouan
Corylus cornuta Du Roi ex Steud.
Gaultheria miqueliana Takeda
Viburnum sargentii Koehne
Rhododendron yedoense var. poukhanense (H.Lév.) Nakai
Viburnum tomentosum Lam.
Deutzia ×lemoinei Lemoine
Saxifraga granulata L.
Populus ×heimburgeri B.Boivin
Aster foliaceus var. foliaceus
Viola lanceolata subsp. lanceolata
Vahlodea atropurpurea subsp. paramushirensis (Kudô) Hultén
Magnolia sargentiana var. robusta Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Tilia mandshurica Rupr. & Maxim.
Saxifraga hybrida Sternb.
Fumaria reuteri Boiss.
Coeloglossum viride var. virescens (Muhl. ex Willd.) Luer
Lupinus micranthus Guss.
Aquilegia formosa subsp. formosa
Campanula cespitosa Scop.
Potentilla fruiticosa
Trifolium hybridum f. proliferum Dore
Lamium purpureum var. incisum (Willd.) Pers.
Anemone ludoviciana Nutt.
Silene asterias Griseb.
Pedicularis capitata Adams
Schizophragma integrifolium var. integrifolium
Fagus sylvatica var. pendula Lodd.
Diplarrhena moraea Labill.
Draba juvenilis Kom.
Sedum japonicum subsp. oryzifolium (Makino) H.Ohba
Rumex rugosus Campd.
Penstemon digitalis Nutt. ex Sims
Calamagrostis montanensis (Scribn.) Scribn. ex Vasey
Drosera rotundifolia var. rotundifolia
Juncus bufonius var. halophilus Buchenau & Fernald
Helianthus laevigatus Torr. & A.Gray
Euonymus sieboldianus Blume
Salix pentandra L.
Salix gracilis Andersson
Fragaria vesca f. bracteata (A.Heller) Staudt
Lomatium plummerae subsp. sonnei (J.M.Coult. & Rose) A.E.Murray
Dactylorhiza foliosa (Rchb.f.) Soó
Psoralea argophylla Pursh
Eutrema salsugineum (Pall.) Al-Shehbaz & S.I.Warwick
Euryops tysonii E.Phillips
Arundinaria viridistriata (Regel) Makino ex Nakai
Salix hookeriana var. laurifolia J.K.Henry
Lupinus luteus L.
Philadelphus ×cymosus Rehder
Erophila verna (L.) DC.
Corylus maxima Mill.
Carex lyngbyei subsp. cryptocarpa (C.A.Mey.) Hultén
Myosotis discolor subsp. dubia (Arrond.) Blaise
Hieracium flagellare
Boschniakia C.A.Mey.
Stranvaesia davidiana var. davidiana
Stipa neaei Nees ex Steud.
Potentilla megalantha Takeda
Helianthus glaucophyllus D.M.Sm.
Euphorbia spinosa L.
×Tritisecale Lebedev
Leonurus quinquelobatus Gilib.
Goodyera oblongifolia var. oblongifolia
Phyllodoce aleutica subsp. glanduliflora (Hook.) Hultén
Holboellia angustifolia subsp. angustifolia
Elaeagnus L.
Clinopodium grandiflorum (L.) Kuntze
Salix scouleriana var. brachystachys (Benth.) M.E.Jones
Polygonatum hybridum Brügger
Rumex sibiricus Hultén
Weigela sinica (Rehder) H.Hara
Melilotus albus f. proliferus Dore, 1959
Salvia forskahlii L.
Lychnis Tourn. ex L.
Origanum heracleoticum L.
Polygonum campanulatum Hook.fil.
Rosa engelmannii subsp. britannicae-columbiae W.H.Lewis
Viburnum fragrans Loisel.
Thalictrum rochebrunianum Franch. & Sav.
Berberis stenophylla Hance
Berberis hakeoides (Hook.fil.) C.K.Schneid.
Draba grandis Langsd. ex DC.
Soldanella montana Willd.
Viburnum plicatum f. tomentosum (Thunb.) Rehder
Antennaria monocephala subsp. monocephala
Anagallis arvensis f. arvensis
Halenia deflexa (Sm.) Griseb.
Silene schafta S.G.Gmel.
Crataegus pennsylvanica Ashe
Cotoneaster salicifolius var. rugosus Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Ranunculus affinis R.Br.
Spergularia rubra x salina
Clematis koreana Kom.
Caiophora J.Presl
Robinia hispida var. hispida
Galinsoga quadriradiata Cav.
Fagus sylvatica var. asplenifolia Dum.Cours.
Parahebe lyallii (Hook.fil.) W.R.B.Oliv.
Helianthus smithii Heiser
Calystegia silvatica subsp. silvatica
Centaurea stoebe subsp. stoebe
Acer pseudoplatanus var. flava-variegatum Loudon
Streptopus lanceolatus var. curvipes (Vail) Reveal
Rhododendron faberi subsp. prattii (Franch.) D.F.Chamb.
Carex exsiccata var. globosa (Olney) L.H.Bailey
Carex livida var. radicaulis Paine
Corallorhiza trifida var. verna (Nutt.) Fernald
Anemone nemorosa L.
Eryngium planum Lapeyr.
Agropyron caninum var. latiglume (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Pease & A.H.Moore
Viola nephrophylla var. cognata (Greene) C.L.Hitchc.
Carex granularis Muhl. ex Willd.
Ceratocephalus testiculatus (Crantz) Roth
Magnolia ×kewensis Pearce
Artemisia ludoviciana var. candicans (Rydb.) H.St.John
Centaurea maculata Andrz.
Acantholimon acerosum var. brachystachyum Boiss.
Tropaeolum tuberosum subsp. tuberosum
Solidago canadensis var. hargeri Fernald
Magnolia brooklynensis Kalmb.
Mentha aquatica var. citrata (Ehrh.) Fresen.
Commelina virginica L.
Euphrasia stricta Kunth
Erythroxylum ulei O.E.Schulz
Acer davidii subsp. grosseri (Pax) P.C.de Jong
Cardamine pratensis subsp. pratensis
Berberis verruculosa Hemsl. & E.H.Wilson
Gypsophila oldhamiana Miq.
Statice maritima Mill.
Allium turcomanicum Regel
Carex aquatilis var. substricta Kük.
Caltha palustris var. palustris
Drimys winteri var. chilensis (DC.) A.Gray
Betula pubescens subsp. pubescens
Reynoutria japonica var. japonica
Potamogeton zosterifolius subsp. zosteriformis (Fernald) Hultén
Magnolia amoena W.C.Cheng
Oenothera erythrosepala (Borbás) Borbás
Escallonia punctata DC.
Calypso bulbosa var. bulbosa
Campanula kemulariae Fomin
Allium beesianum W.W.Sm.
Artemisia pedemontana Balb.
Betula mandshurica var. japonica (Miq.) Rehder
Populus grandidentata Michx.
Aucuba japonica var. variegata Dombrain
Micranthes nelsoniana var. pacifica (Hultén) Gornall & H.Ohba
Veronica ornata Monjuschko
Potentilla nivea subsp. subquinata (Lange) Hultén
Saxifraga exarata subsp. moschata (Wulfen) Cavill.
Euthamia graminifolia var. major (Michx.) Moldenke
Viburnum opulus f. nanum (I.David) Zabel
Erythroxylum novogranatense var. novogranatense
Aquilegia flabellata Siebold & Zucc.
Sorbus megalocarpa var. megalocarpa
Tulipa humilis Herb.
Clematis rehderiana Craib
Cynoglossum boreale Fernald
Viburnum dentatum var. venosum (Britton) Gleason
Oxytropis deflexa subsp. foliolosa (Hook.) Cody
Potentilla bipinnatifida Douglas, 1832
Physalis philadelphica var. immaculata Waterf.
Eleocharis mamillata subsp. mamillata
Carex viridula var. viridula
Erigeron compositus var. multifidus (Rydb.) J.F.Macbr. & Payson
Hebe lycopodioides Allan
Arctanthemum arcticum (L.) Tzvelev
Sophora davidi (Franch.) Skeels
Elymus curvatus Piper
Cytisus scoparius f. andraeanus (Puiss.) Zabel
Eutrochium maculatum var. maculatum
Campanula rotundifolia var. arctica Lange
Dulichium Pers.
Disporum bodinieri (H.Lév. & Vaniot) F.T.Wang & Tang
Antennaria howellii var. howellii
Hosta lancifolia (Thunb.) Engl.
Epimedium alpinum L.
Phyllodoce nipponica subsp. tsugifolia (Nakai) Toyok.
Globularia aphyllanthes Crantz
Epilobium komarovianum Leveille
Cistus psilosepalus Sweet
Hymenolobus procumbens (L.) Nutt.
Aconitum delphinifolium subsp. delphinifolium
Lloydia serotina var. flava (Calder & Roy L.Taylor) B.Boivin
Triadenum virginicum subsp. fraseri (Spach) J.M.Gillett
Enkianthus cernuus var. matsudae (Komatsu) Makino
Magnolia proctoriana Rehder
Aesculus chinensis var. chinensis
Helichrysum chionophilum Boiss. & Balansa
Aconitum hemsleyanum E.Pritz.
Tanacetum huronense Nutt.
Tanacetum uralense (Krasch.) Tzvelev
Dierama floriferum Hilliard
Veronica austriaca subsp. vahlii (Gaudin) D.A.Webb
Diervilla Mill.
Rhododendron rupicola var. rupicola
Dryas drummondii var. drummondii
Polemonium acutiflorum Willd. ex Roem. & Schult.
Matricaria tchihatchewii (Boiss.) Voss
Vinca major subsp. hirsuta (Boiss.) Stearn
Erythroxylum coca Lam.
Schizophragma hydrangeoides Siebold & Zucc.
Lilium szovitsianum Fisch. & Avé-Lall.
Sorbus sudetica (Tausch) Fritsch
Sisyrinchium grandiflorum Cav.
Geum macrophyllum subsp. macrophyllum
Carex cryptocarpa C.A.Mey.
Salix discolor var. prinoides (Pursh) Andersson
Scirpus hudsonianus (Michx.) Fernald
Calycanthus fertilis Walter
Syringa velutina var. venosa (Nakai) Y.N.Lee
Acer japonicum var. aconitifolium Meehan
Dianthus brevicaulis Fenzl
Isopyrum savilei Calder & R.L.Taylor
Helianthus floridanus A.Gray ex Chapm.
Puccinellia pauciflora var. holmii (Beal) C.L.Hitchc.
Rosa virginiana Mill.
Carex glacialis Mack.
Beta vulgaris var. vulgaris
Dipelta yunnanensis Franch.
Spiraea douglasii f. alba J.K.Henry
Carex macloviana subsp. haydeniana (Olney) Roy L.Taylor & MacBryde
Potentilla chinensis Ser.
Anchusa azurea Schur
Eleocharis kamtschatica (C.A.Mey.) Kom.
Salvia przewalskii Maxim.
Cardamine angulata Torr.
Senecio bicolor Viv., 1802
Pseudo-fumaria lutea (L.) Borckh.
Sedum stenopetalum var. monanthum (Suksd.) H.Ohba
Centaurea simplicicaulis Boiss. & A.Huet
Buphthalmum salicifolium L.
Spiraea japonica var. fortunei Koidz.
Oenothera macrocarpa subsp. macrocarpa
Thalictrum alpinum var. alpinum
Senecio macrocephalus DC.
Alisma gramineum f. gramineum
Ilex diplosperma S.Y.Hu
Salsola vermiculata hort.
Caylusea abyssinica (Fresen.) Fisch. & C.A.Mey.
Potentilla glabra var. glabra
Micranthes ferruginea var. ferruginea
Ailanthus glandulosa Desf.
Crassula sarcocaulis Eckl. & Zeyh.
Deutzia ×kalmiiflora Lemoine
Dodecatheon dentatum subsp. dentatum
Cytisus villosus Pourr.
Indigofera decora Lindl.
Elodea callitrichoides (Rich.) Casp.
Apocynum androsaemifolium var. griseum (Greene) Bég. & Belosersky
Comandra livida Richardson
Gentiana macrophylla var. fetissowii (Regel & Winkl.) Ma & K.C.Hsia
Lysimachia verticillaris Spreng.
Dianthus ×allwoodii Bowles et al.
Ranunculus bongardii var. tenellus (A.Gray) Greene
Digitalis lutea Sibth. & Sm.
Vaccinium microcarpum (Turcz. ex Rupr.) Schmalh.
Specularia speculum (L.) A.DC., 1830
Buxus sempervirens var. rotundifolia Baill.
Ranunculus ficaria subsp. bulbilifer Lambinon
Philadelphus ×floribundus Schrad.
Petunia integrifolia (Hook.) Schinz & Thell.
Aconitum orientale Mill.
Salix nakamurana f. yezoalpina (Koidz.) H.Ohashi
Anarrhinum bellidifolium (L.) Willd.
Viola biflora var. carlottae (Calder & Roy L.Taylor) B.Boivin
Alisma plantago-aquatica var. americanum A.Gray, 1856
Lilium regale E.H.Wilson
Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme (Alef.) Voss
Xanthium commune Britton
Lithospermum diffusum Lag.
Micromeria graeca subsp. fruticulosa (Bertol.) Guinea
Robinia ×margarettiae Ashe
Fumaria officinalis subsp. officinalis
Quercus macranthera Fisch. & C.A.Mey. ex Hohen.
Helianthus atrorubens L.
Teucrium halacsyanum Heldr.
Lonas annua (L.) Vines & Druce
Scirpus lacustris L.
Verbena urticifolia var. urticifolia
Rodgersia aesculifolia var. aesculifolia
Cynanchum ascyrifolium (Franch. & Sav.) Matsum.
Stellaria longipes var. laeta (Richardson) S.Watson
Polygonum confertiflorum Douglas ex Hook., 1838
Carex rostrata Hoppe ex Schkuhr
Viburnum plicatum var. plicatum
Cotula intermedia D.G.Lloyd
Armeria maritima subsp. arctica (Cham.) Hultén
Pernettya mucronata (L.fil.) Gaudich. ex Spreng.
Lithospermum angustifolium Michx.
Helianthus salicifolius A.Dietr.
Adenophora liliifolia (L.) A.DC.
Rosa rubiginosa var. rubiginosa
Euonymus latifolius (L.) Mill.
Eryngium giganteum M.Bieb.
Euthamia graminifolia var. nuttallii (Greene) W.Stone
Parthenocissus thomsonii (M.A.Lawson) Planch.
Geranium eriostemon f. onoei (Franch. & Sav.) H.Hara
Betula uliginosa Dugle
Solidago minutissima (Makino) Kitam.
Panicum miliaceum var. ruderale Kitag.
Pinguicula vulgaris subsp. vulgaris
Rhododendron prunifolium (Small) Millais
Astilbe thunbergii (Siebold & Zucc.) Miq.
Acer negundo f. variegatum (Jacques) Geerinck
Baptisia australis (L.) R.Br.
Serratula seoanei Willk.
Spiraea beauverdiana C.K.Schneid.
Castilleja hyetophila Pennell
Lupinus mutabilis Sweet
Rumex flexuosus Sol. ex G.Forst.
Carex dioica var. gynocrates (Nyman) Ostenf.
Carex tenuiculmis (Petrie) Heenan & de Lange
Acer platanoides var. schwedleri K.Koch
Heracleum austriacum subsp. austriacum
Malus ioensis (Alph.Wood) Britton
Moneses uniflora subsp. reticulata (Nutt.) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Ligusticum scoticum subsp. hultenii (Fernald) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Potamogeton epihydrus var. ramosus House
Linum hirsutum L.
Rhododendron yakushimanum Nakai
Androsace simplex Rydb.
Chimaphila umbellata var. cisatlantica S.F.Blake
Gaultheria lanceolata Hook.fil.
Festuca heterophylla Lam.
Semiarundinaria fastuosa (Lat.-Marl. ex Mitford) Makino
Salvia dumetorum Andrz.
Rhododendron saluenense subsp. saluenense
Cotoneaster cavei Klotz
Thalictrum brevisericeum W.T.Wang & S.H.Wang
Omalotheca sylvatica (L.) Sch.Bip. & F.W.Schultz
Carex debilis var. rudgei L.H.Bailey
Hieracium atratum (Fr.) Fr.
Sinosenecio newcombei (Greene) Janovec & T.M.Barkley
Epilobium alpinum var. lactiflorum (Hausskn.) C.L.Hitchc.
Bromelica subulata (Griseb.) Farw.
Rhododendron prostratum W.W.Sm.
Acer cappadocicum f. rubrum (G.Kirchn.) Rehder
Cassiope lycopodioides subsp. lycopodioides
Urtica dioecia Hill
Heuchera americana L.
Capsella rubella (E.B.Almq.) E.B.Almq.
Clematis nannophylla Maxim.
Dianthus pamiralaicus Lincz.
Coelogyne cristata Lindl.
Aster lateriflorus (L.) Britton
Potentilla chiloensis (L.) Mabb.
Arrhenatherum elatius f. bulbosum (Willd.) T.Koyama
Acer circinatum var. fulvum J.K.Henry
Elymus repens var. subulatus (Roem. & Schult.) Szczep.
Eleocharis ovata var. obtusa Kük. ex Skottsb.
Montiopsis umbellata (Ruiz & Pav.) D.I.Ford
Acer pictum Thunb.
Echinacea tennesseensis (Beadle) Small
Rumex hydrolapathum (Scop.) Huds.
Saxifraga lyallii subsp. hultenii (Calder & Savile) Calder & Taylor
Thalictrum omeiense W.T.Wang & S.H.Wang
Putoria calabrica (L.f.) DC.
Luzula multiflora subsp. frigida (Buchenau) Sam. ex Hultén
Rosa albertii Regel
Populus ×rouleauiana B.Boivin
Viburnum wrightii Miq.
Oenothera depressa subsp. strigosa (Rydb.) Roy L.Taylor & Mac Bryde
Erythroxylum rufum Cav.
Erigeron strigosus var. typicus Cronquist
Pseudolysimachion longifolium (L.) Opiz
Arenaria gypsophiloides L.
Hemizonia pungens var. septentrionalis (D.D.Keck) Cronquist
Carex brunnescens subsp. alaskana Kalela
Armeria juniperifolia J.Gay ex Boiss.
Scirpus microcarpus var. confertus (Fernald) House
Campanula trachelium Brot.
Lupinus arcticus subsp. arcticus
Delphinium pachycentrum Hemsl.
Oxytropis nigrescens (Pall.) Fisch. ex DC.
Elliottia bracteata (Maxim.) Benth. & Hook.fil.
Ranunculus affinis var. validus A.Gray
Erigeron arthurii B.Boivin
Hosta undulata (Otto & A.Dietr.) L.H.Bailey
Cytisus nigricans L.
Solanum dulcamara var. villosissimum Desvaux
Thlaspi caerulescens J.Presl & C.Presl
Euphrasia condensata Jord.
Acer campbellii Hook.fil. & Thomson
Juncus mertensianus subsp. mertensianus
Linum hypericifolium C.Presl
Alstroemeria leporina Ehr.Bayer & Grau
Viola praemorsa var. flavovirens (Pollard) R.J.Little
Arabis androsacea Fenzl
Junellia tridens (Lag.) Moldenke
Helichrysum basalticum Hilliard
Prunus emarginata subsp. mollis (Hook.) A.E.Murray
Bromus carinatus var. hookerianus (Thurb.) Shear
Pseudolysimachion kiusianum (Furumi) Holub
Ranunculus ficaria subsp. ficariiformis Rouy & Foucaud
Erigeron divaricatus Michx.
Eleocharis nitida Fernald
Mitella diphylla L.
Salix nakamurana subsp. nakamurana
Erigeron flagellaris var. typicus Cronquist
Fagus orientalis Lipsky
Rhododendron eudoxum Balf.fil. & Forrest
Deinanthe bifida Maxim.
Erigeron umbellatus Gilib.
Phleum phleoides (L.) H.Karst.
Deschampsia caespitosa var. arctica Vasey
Linum campanulatum L.
Galium rotundifolium L.
Fumaria muralis subsp. boraei (Jord.) Pugsley
Helianthus pumilus Nutt.
Juncus ×lemieuxii B.Boivin
Sorbus ursina (Wenz.) Hedl.
Adenophora stricta Miq.
Allium vineale subsp. vineale
Thymus praecox subsp. britannicus (Ronniger) Holub
Lappula fremontii (Torr. & A.Gray) Howell
Carex aquatilis var. altior (Rydb.) Fernald
Alyssum rostratum Wierzb. ex Nyman
Leucojum autumnale L.
Rhododendron sanguineum subsp. sanguineum
Tetragonia expansa Thunb., 1794
Scrophularia umbrosa L.
Hedera pastuchovii Woronow
Potentilla villosa var. villosa
Hieracium ×inops Peter
Fargesia fungosa T.P.Yi
Helianthus simulans E.Watson
Vaccinium caespitosum var. caespitosum
Phleum alpinum var. commutatum (Gaudin) Griseb.
Petasites japonicus var. giganteus F.Schmidt ex Makino, 1909
Bromus riparius Rehmann
Sedum forsterianum Rchb.
Clematis verticillaris DC.
Glandularia hybrida (Groenland & Rümpler) G.L.Nesom & Pruski
Lotus frondosus Freyn ex Nevski
Oxytropis campestris var. varians (Britton & Rydb.) Barneby
Arctium minus f. laciniatum Clute
Allium schoenoprasum var. sibiricum (L.) Garcke
Sorbus rosea McAll.
Brassica rapa subsp. nipposinica (L.H.Bailey) Kitam.
Primula veris subsp. macrocalyx (Bunge) Lüdi
Dichroa febrifuga Lour.
Androsace rotundifolia Sm.
Ranunculus ficaria subsp. bulbifer Lawalrée
Camissonia contorta P.H.Raven
Piptatherum pungens (Torr. ex Spreng.) Dorn
Bidens cervicata Sherff
Euphrasia americana Wettst.
Carex enanderi Hultén
Parahebe decora Ashwin
Wahlenbergia Schrad. ex Roth
Myosurus clavicaulis Peck
Koeleria cristata var. major Koch
Teucrium occidentale A.Gray
Aconitum uchiyamae Nakai
Satureja vulgaris var. neogaea Fernald
Amelanchier florida var. cusickii (Fernald) B.Boivin
Filipendula hexapetala Gilib.
Lilium brownii F.E.Br. ex Miellez
Kniphofia fibrosa Baker
Quercus glauca Bürger ex Blume
Papaver kluanense D.Löve
Fuchsia magellanica var. molinae Espinosa
Packera subnuda var. moresbiensis (Calder & Roy L.Taylor) Trock
Lonicera pileata Oliv.
Veronica ×lackschewitzii J.Keller
Lepidium montanum subsp. papilliferum (L.F.Hend.) C.L.Hitchc.
Micranthes nelsoniana var. carlottae (Calder & Savile) Gornall & H.Ohba
Caiophora lateritia Klotzsch
Picris hieracioides subsp. hieracioides
Tropaeolum tuberosum Ruiz & Pav.
Phellodendron japonicum Maxim.
Carex deflexa var. deflexa
Deutzia ×rosea (Lemoine) Rehder
Campanula raddeana Trautv.
Ranunculus yakushimensis Masam.
Tofieldia Huds.
Agrostis stolonifera subsp. maritima (Lam.) Vasc.
Oenothera perangusta R.R.Gates
Elymus hoffmannii K.B.Jensen & Asay
Verbena corymbosa Ruiz & Pav.
Acer platanoides var. palmatifidum Tausch
Rhynchospora capillacea var. leviseta E.J.Hill ex A.Gray
Celosia argentea var. cristata (L.) Kuntze
Saxifraga bracteosa Suksd.
Amaranthus blitum subsp. blitum
Zinnia haageana Regel
Echinopanax horridus (Sm.) Decne. & Planch. ex Harms
Dendranthema zawadskii (Herbich) Tzvelev
Hemiboea subcapitata var. subcapitata
Rubus allegheniensis var. allegheniensis
Carex scirpoides Schkuhr
Oenothera fruticosa subsp. glauca (Michx.) Straley
Daphne ×mantensiana Manten ex T.M.C.Taylor & Vrugtman
Polygonum tenuicaule Biss. & S.Moore
Sedum arenarium Brot.
Acer platanoides var. lasciniatum Hovey
Draba stenopetala Trautv.
Hieracium lanatum (L.) Vill.
Cerastium arvense x tomentosum
Telesonix jamesii (Torr.) Raf.
Castanopsis sclerophylla (Lindl. & Paxton) Schottky
Spergula canadensis (Pers.) D.Dietr.
Lupinus hirsutissimus A.Gray
Illecebrum verticillatum L.
Mentha villosa-nervata Opiz
Kalmia angustifolia L.
Rheum palmatum var. tanguticum Maxim. ex Regel
Kniphofia nelsonii Mast.
Salvia przewalskii var. glabrescens E.Peter
Calystegia pubescens Lindl.
Tropaeolum tuberosum subsp. silvestre Sparre
Primula denticulata Wight
Allium flavum subsp. tauricum (Besser ex Rchb.) K.Richt.
Melica altissima L.
Geranium swatense Schönb.-Tem
Daboecia azorica Tutin & E.F.Warb.
Rhododendron pachytrichum var. monosematum (Hutch.) D.F.Chamb.
Silene ostenfeldii (A.E.Porsild) J.K.Morton
Cautleya gracilis (Sm.) Dandy
Carex canescens subsp. disjuncta (Fernald) Toivonen
Brassica pekinensis Skeels
Tecoma radicans (L.) Juss. ex DC., 1845
Orthilia secunda subsp. obtusata (Turcz.) Böcher
Potamogeton sparganiifolius Laest. ex Fr.
Chenopodium berlandieri var. macrocalycium (Aellen) Cronquist
Sinocalycanthus chinensis W.C.Cheng & S.Y.Chang
Clematis montana var. montana
Quercus imbricaria Michx.
Astragalus membranaceus Fisch. ex Bunge
Athrixia fontana MacOwan
Arnica angustifolia subsp. attenuata (Greene) G.W.Douglas & Ruyle-Dougl.
Quercus acuta Raf.
Berberis thunbergii var. minor Rehder
Oreanthes Benth.
Iliamna rivularis var. diversa (A.Nelson) Wiggins
Acer negundo subsp. latifolium (Pax) Schwer.
Antennaria parvifolia var. rosea (D.C.Eaton) Greene, 1898
Bowkeria gerrardiana Harv. ex Hiern
Iris douglasiana var. oregonensis R.C.Foster
Scrophularia occidentalis (Rydb.) E.P.Bicknell
Senecio castoreus S.L.Welsh
Ambrosia artemisiaefolia Besser
Penstemon keckii Clokey
Amsinckia rugosa Rydb.
Crepis acuminata subsp. pluriflora Babc. & Stebbins
Allium diehlii (M.E.Jones) M.E.Jones
Haplopappus rydbergii S.F.Blake
Draba nivalis var. elongata S.Watson
Astragalus palans M.E.Jones
Senecio seridophyllus Greene
Senecio platylobus Rydb.
Castilleja rhexifolia var. sulphurea (Rydb.) N.D.Atwood
Pleioblastus distichus (Mitford) Nakai
Fraxinus excelsissima Koidz.
Munroa pulchella (Kunth) Amarilla
Castilleja brunnescens Rydb.
Eritrichium angustifolium Y.S.Lian & J.Q.Wang
Euphorbia schubei Pax
Euphorbia graniticola L.C.Leach
Euphorbia tortilis Rottler ex Ainslie
Euphorbia tithymaloides L.
Festuca subverticillata (Pers.) E.B.Alexeev
Euphorbia debilispina L.C.Leach
Euphorbia squarrosa Haw.
Euphorbia teixeirae L.C.Leach
Euphorbia magnicapsula S.Carter
Euphorbia galgalana S.Carter
Euphorbia adjurana P.R.O.Bally & S.Carter
Prosopis chilensis var. velutina (Wooton) Standl.
Indigofera salmoniflora Rose
Parkinsonia torreyana S.Watson
Cyperus mesochorus Geise
Euphorbia spectabilis (S.Carter) Bruyns
Euphorbia angustiflora Pax
Piptadenia platycarpa (Rose ex Micheli) J.F.Macbr.
Euphorbia tithymaloides subsp. smallii (Millsp.) V.W.Steinm.
Marina holwayi (Rose) Barneby
Euphorbia ballyana Rauh
Euphorbia cryptospinosa P.R.O.Bally
Eragrostis oreophila L.H.Harv.
Euphorbia inarticulata Schweinf.
Euphorbia subscandens P.R.O.Bally & S.Carter
Echinochloa polystachya (Kunth) Hitchc.
Coreopsis petrophila A.Gray
Euphorbia yattana (P.R.O.Bally) Bruyns
Tillandsia benthamiana Klotzsch ex Beer, 1856
Fuirena incompleta Nees
Euphorbia dissitispina L.C.Leach
Odontonema glaberrimum (M.E.Jones) V.M.Baum
Thrinax radiata Lodd. ex Schult. & Schult.f.
Euphorbia petraea S.Carter
Palafoxia arenaria Brandegee
Lythrum gracile Benth.
Aristida heymannii Regel
Cynanchum palmeri var. peninsulare (S.F.Blake) I.M.Johnst.
Bealia mexicana Scribn.
Philibertia linearis A.Gray
Gaertneria tenuifolia Kuntze
Thelypodiopsis versicolor (Brandegee) Rollins
Symplocos nokoensis (Hayata) Kaneh.
Lilium callosum Siebold & Zucc.
Tellima bulbifera (Rydb.) Fedde
Astragalus collinus Douglas ex Hook., 1831
Cirsium andersonii (A.Gray) Jeps., 1925
Gilia tenuiflora subsp. interior H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Gilia latiflora subsp. speciosa (Jeps.) H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Arnica parviflora Gray
Deschampsia ambigua P.Beauv. ex B.D.Jacks.
Juncus grisebachii Buchenau
Layia glandulosa subsp. typica D.D.Keck
Gilia leptalea subsp. pinnatisecta H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Andropogon macrourus Michx.
Trifolium longipes Torr. & A.Gray
Trifolium involucratum Lam.
Festuca spicata Pursh
Glyceria canbyi Scribn.
Glyceria distans (Jacq.) Wahlenb.
Trifolium ciliatum E.D.Clarke
Deyeuxia forsteri Kunth
Ocotea pulchella (Nees & Mart.) Mez
Alibertia A.Rich. ex DC.
Piptatherum racemosum (Sm.) Eaton
Brandegea Cogn.
Hordeum secalinum Schreb.
Eragrostis cinniformis Schrad.
Gaultheria myrsinites Hook.
Deyeuxia canadensis (Michx.) Munro ex Hook.f.
Carex festiva var. gracilis Olney
Galium bloomeri A.Gray
Salix flavescens Nutt.
Mimulus luteus var. alpinus A.Gray
Mimulus glutinosus var. puniceus (Nutt.) Gray
Penstemon azureus var. ambiguus A.Gray
Penstemon jaffrayanus Hook.
Trifolium involucratum Sm.
Gilia squarrosa (Eschsch.) Hook. & Arn.
Gilia nuttallii A.Gray
Gilia dianthoides Endl.
Gilia filicaulis Torr. ex A.Gray
Triticum repens L.
Ericameria parryi var. aspra (Greene) G.L.Nesom & Baird
Lupinus calcaratus Kellogg
Carex adusta var. congesta W.Boott
Tillaea connata Ruiz & Pav.
Vaccinium cespitosum var. cuneifolium Nutt.
Eritrichium pterocaryum Torr.
Actinolepis DC.
Swida stolonifera (Michx.) Rydb.
Erythraea nuttallii S.Watson
Lepidium intermedium A.Rich.
Disporum Salisb. ex D.Don
Quercus undulata var. gunnisonii (Torr. & A.Gray) Engelm.
Polemonium humile var. pulchellum (Bunge) A.Gray
Eritrichium leiocarpum S.Watson
Carex tenella Froel. ex Kunth, 1837
Lupinus aridus var. utahensis S.Watson
Aster nuttallii Torr. & A.Gray
Aster glaucus (Nutt.) Torr. & A.Gray
Aster angustus (Lindl.) Torr. & A.Gray
Sagittaria variabilis Engelm. ex A.Gray
Peucedanum villosum Nutt. ex S.Watson
Actinolepis multicaulis DC.
Microseris major Sch.Bip.
Microseris aphantocarpha (A.Gray) Sch.Bip.
Eritrichium oxycaryum A.Gray
Eritrichium muriculatum A.DC.
Alsine media L.
Muhlenbergia debilis (Kunth) Kunth
Muhlenbergia distichophylla (J.Presl) Kunth
Oryzopsis membranacea Vasey
Muhlenbergia parishii Vasey
Brickellia linifolia D.C.Eaton
Physalis pensylvanica L.
Epilobium glaberrimum var. latifolium Barbey
Saxifraga punctata Gunnerus, 1772
Carex muricata var. gracilis Boott
Carex fulva var. hornschuchiana W.Boott
Carex laciniata Boott
Carex filiformis var. latifolia Boeckeler
Sedum rhodiola DC.
Cuscuta curta (Engelm.) Rydb.
Ribes lacustre var. molle A.Gray
Ribes divaricatum var. irriguum (Douglas) A.Gray
Eritrichium chorisianum (Cham.) DC.
Trifolium pauciflorum Nutt.
Calochortus benthamii Baker
Dodecatheon meadia L.
Euphorbia commutata Engelm. ex A.Gray
Geranium incisum Andr.
Juncus longistylis var. latifolius Engelm.
Actinolepis tenella (Nutt.) A.Gray
Panicum dichotomum L.
Arnica amplexicaulis var. piperi H.St.John
Melilotus parviflorus Desf.
Eritrichium intermedium A.Gray
Eritrichium nothofulvum A.Gray
Actinolepis mutica A.Gray
Juncus bufonius subsp. juzepczukii (V.I.Krecz. & Gontsch.) Soó
Hosackia argophylla A.Gray
Trifolium multicaule M.E.Jones
Eritrichium californicum (Fisch. & C.A.Mey.) DC.
Ribes sanguineum var. variegatum S.Watson
Juncus xiphioides var. montanus Engelm.
Quercus chrysolepis var. vacciniifolia (Kellogg) Engelm.
Eritrichium micranthum Torr.
Quercus dumosa f. myrtifolia Trel.
Lupinus chamissonis var. longifolius S.Watson
Quercus densiflora Hook. & Arn.
Gentiana serrata Lam.
Polygonum polymorphum Ledeb.
Poa tenuifolia A.Rich.
Gastridium australe (L.) P.Beauv.
Dalea polydenia S.Watson
Poa pulchella Vasey
Poa andina Trin.
Hordeum maritimum With.
Astragalus glareosus Douglas ex G.Don, 1832
Pappophorum laguroideum Schrad.
Pappophorum wrightii S.Watson
Lupinus micranthus var. trifidus S.Watson
Lupinus andersonii var. grayi S.Watson
Carex walteriana L.H.Bailey
Phalaris intermedia Bosc ex Poir.
Phalaris amethystina Trin.
Serjania rutifolia Radlk.
Erythrina americana Mill.
Datura reburra Barclay
Aristida gentilis Henrard
Cuscuta potosina var. globifera Yunck.
Malaxis ochreata (S.Watson) Ames
Cladocolea pringlei Kuijt
Trevirana grandiflora Schiede
Cologania humilis Rose
Berberis lanceolata Benth.
Ipomoea decasperma Hallier fil.
Cyperus ovularis (Michx.) Torr.
Justicia masaiensis C.B.Clarke
Aristida marginalis Ekman
Acalypha havanensis Müll.Arg.
Citharexylum B.Juss.
Elvira biflora (L.) DC.
Dasylirion wheeleri var. durangense (Trel.) Laferr.
Euphorbia humayensis Brandegee
Chloris dandyana C.D.Adams
Perityle leptoglossa subsp. palmeri (S.Watson) Felger
Melampodium sinuatum Brandegee
Eragrostis lehmannii Pilg.
Sapium macrocarpum Müll.Arg.
Tinantia leiocalyx C.B.Clarke
Bouteloua pectinata Feath.
Muhlenbergia setifolia Vasey
Commelina coelestis var. bourgeaui C.B.Clarke
Gomphrena sonorae var. watsonii Stuchlík
Phyla strigulosa (M.Martens & Galeotti) Moldenke
Drymaria effusa var. confusa (Rose) J.A.Duke
Quercus alamosensis Trel.
Achras zapota L.
Esenbeckia Kunth
Cuphea tolucana Peyr.
Dalea watsonii (Rose) Gentry
Arundinella berteroniana (Schult.) Hitchc. & Chase
Schizachyrium condensatum (Kunth) Nees
Brassica alba (L.) Rabenh.
Bletia coccinea Lex.
Tauschia madrensis J.M.Coult. & Rose
Setaria auriculata E.Fourn.
Lycopersicon esculentum var. cerasiforme (Dunal) A.Gray
Bidens riparia var. refracta (Brandegee) O.E.Schulz
Mimulus wiensii R.K.Vickery
Eriochloa punctata var. minor Vasey
Hedyotis vergrandis W.H.Lewis
Lopezia racemosa Cav.
Dalea maritima Brandegee
Heterotheca pilosa (Nutt.) Shinners
Rhynchosia discolor var. discolor
Rhynchosia discolor M.Martens & Galeotti
Pinguicula moranensis Kunth
Bouteloua hirsuta var. palmeri Beal
Amaranthus palmeri var. glomeratus Uline & W.L.Bray
Brahea clara (L.H.Bailey) Espejo & López-Ferr.
Delphinium viride S.Watson
Polygala grandiflora Walter
Macrosiphonia macrosiphon (Torr.) A.Heller
Tillaea saginoides Maxim.
Ribes leptosmum (Coville) Fedde
Achimenes glabrata (Zucc.) Fritsch
Polygonum cuspidatum Willd. ex Spreng.
Ruellia occidentalis var. lundelliorum Tharp & F.A.Barkley
Bacopa procumbens (Mill.) Greenm.
Heliocarpus reticulatus Rose
Sympetaleia rupestris (Baill.) Gray ex S.Watson
Bumelia peninsularis Brandegee
Atriplex patula subsp. hastata (L.) Gray
Luehea candida (DC.) Mart.
Castilleja latifolia var. wightii (Elmer) Zeile
Eriogonum atrorubens var. pseudociliatum Reveal
Salix cana Mart. & Galeotti
Kochia trichophylla Stapf
Chenopodium ambrosioides var. vagans (Standl.) J.T.Howell
Orthocarpus noctuinus Eastw.
Echeveria collomiae (Rose) Kearney & Peebles
Polygala paucifolia Willd.
Salix hartwegii Benth.
Swietenia mahogani L.
Mimulus parviflorus Lindl.
Rumex salicifolius var. crassus (Rech.fil.) J.T.Howell
Bumelia laetevirens Hemsl.
Geranium pilosum Sol.
Penstemon microphyllus A.Gray
Philadelphus mearnsii W.H.Evans
Conobea multifida (Michx.) Benth.
Stemodia jorullensis Kunth
Chilianthus arboreus (L.f.) DC.
Fremontia californica subsp. obispoensis (Eastw.) Munz
Delphinium pedatisectum Hemsl.
Ribes californicum var. oligacanthum (Eastw.) Jeps.
Quercus canbyi Trel.
Carlowrightia glabrata Fernald
Mimulus langsdorffii Donn.Sm. ex Sims
Kochia iranica Bornm.
Penstemon vulcanellus Crosswh.
Castilleja latifolia var. rubra (Pennell) J.T.Howell
Penstemon torreyi Benth.
Polygala subalata S.Watson
Collinsia antonina subsp. antonina
Castilleja californica Abrams
Castilleja flavescens Pennell
Eriogonum wrightii var. curvatum (Small) Munz
Campanula angustiflora var. exilis J.T.Howell
Sida leprosa (Ortega) K.Schum.
Argemone subfusiformis G.B.Ownbey
Penstemon speciosus var. piliferus (A.Heller) Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Bumelia cartilaginea Cronquist
Plectritis samolifolia (DC.) Höck
Eriogonum umbellatum subsp. cognatum (Greene) S.Stokes
Echeveria pulverulenta Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Echeveria pumila Van Houtte
Limonium commune var. californicum Greene
Buddleja tomentella Standl.
Ferocactus wislizenii subsp. herrerae (J.G.Ortega) Pilbeam & Bowdery
Solanum fructo-tecto Cav.
Buddleja sessilifolia B.S.Sun ex S.Y.Pao
Polanisia Raf.
Polygala subspinosa var. heterorhyncha Barneby
Glandularia tenuisecta (Briq.) Small
Ficus petiolaris subsp. petiolaris
Potentilla exsul Standl.
Chamaecrista Moench
Hilaria swallenii Cory
Chaenactis glabriuscula f. glabriuscula
Cressa nudicaulis Griseb.
Stanhopea maculosa Knowles & Westc.
Phyllanthus hexadactylus McVaugh
Sclerothrix fasciculata C.Presl
Dalea enneandra C.Fraser
Phemeranthus multiflorus (Rose & Standl.) Ocampo
Quercus greggii (A.DC.) Trel.
Zauschneria californica var. mexicana (C.Presl) Hoover
Peperomia cordovana C.DC.
Quercus chuhuichupensis C.H.Mull.
Gomphrena pringlei Coult. & Fisch.
Verbena fastigiata Brandegee
Ageratina havanensis (Kunth) R.King & H.Rob.
Cnidoscolus elasticus Lundell
Acacia hybrida Lodd.
Verbesina callilepis S.F.Blake
Viguiera superaxillaris (S.F.Blake) B.L.Turner
Randia tetracantha (Cav.) DC.
Escobedia peduncularis Pennell
Sesamum L.
Fimbristylis ciliatifolia Britton ex S.Watson, 1887
Oxalis corniculata var. wrightii (A.Gray) B.L.Turner
Nemastylis tenuis var. pringlei (S.Watson) R.C.Foster
Erigeron inoptatus A.Gray
Panicum aquaticum Poir.
Carlowrightia A.Gray
Prunus eriogyna Mason
Juncus trinervis Liebm.
Lycium modestum I.M.Johnst.
Croton morifolius var. brandegeeanus (Croizat) G.L.Webster
Ageratina ayerscottiana B.L.Turner
Dyssodia greggii (A.Gray) B.L.Rob.
Kosteletzkya sagittata C.Presl
Buettneria aculeata (Jacq.) Jacq.
Stylophyllum attenuatum (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Lupinus confusus A.Heller
Bouteloua eriopoda var. eriostachya Swallen
Florestina tripteris DC.
Cyperus flavescens var. piceus (Liebm.) Fernald
Fimbristylis laxa Vahl
Oxalis corniculata var. pilosa (Nutt.) B.L.Turner
Rhamnus mucronata Schltdl.
Atriplex lurida Brandegee
Castilleja ornata Eastw.
Stellaria montana Rose
Linum rigidum var. filifolium Shinners
Inga vera Willd.
Galvezia juncea var. typica Munz, 1926
Cinnamomum macrophyllum Miq.
Lupinus pondii Greene
Bauhinia uniflora S.Watson
Nissolia pringlei Rose
Erigeron potosinus Standl.
Sarcodes Torr.
Oenothera purpusii Munz
Quercus hartwegii Benth.
Gomphrena nealleyi Coult. & Fisch.
Sida acuta Burm.fil.
Fuertesimalva jacens (S.Watson) Fryxell
Amyris lurida Lundell
Astragalus cedrosensis Vasey & Rose
Trichachne Nees
Ipomoea glaucescens (Kunth) G.Don
Erigeron mayoensis G.L.Nesom
Scleria setacea Poir.
Acalypha radians Torr.
Canavalia brasiliensis Mart. ex Benth.
Salvia reptans var. reptans
Gilia macombii Torr. ex A.Gray
Diplacus aurantiacus subsp. australis (Mc Minn) Beeks ex Thorne
Psittacanthus palmeri (Watson) Barlow & Wiens
Tropidocarpum Hook.
Thevetia ovata (Cav.) A.DC.
Iresine orientalis G.L.Nesom
Panicum frondescens G.Mey.
Conopholis Wallr.
Calea urticifolia var. urticifolia
Crataegus greggiana Eggl.
Fraxinus berlandieriana A.DC.
Jussiaea suffruticosa L.
Prunus serotina subsp. serotina
Pseudognaphalium purpurascens (DC.) Anderb.
Tridax erecta A.Gray
Guaiacum L.
Govenia Lindl.
Phyla fruticosa (Mill.) K.Kenn. ex Wunderlin & B.F.Hansen
Spiranthes michuacana (Lex.) Hemsl.
Aldama dentata var. dentata
Garrya ovata subsp. lindheimeri (Torr.) Dahling
Callaeum septentrionale (A.Juss.) D.M.Johnson
Schistocarpha liebmannii Klatt
Couepia polyandra (Kunth) Rose
Roldana gentryi H.Rob. & Brettell
Muhlenbergia durangensis Y.Herrera
Bouchea linifolia A.Gray ex Torr.
Ponthieva schaffneri (Rchb.f.) E.W.Greenw.
Spiranthes orchioides (Sw.) A.Rich.
Stevia palmeri var. constricta Grashoff
Argemone mexicana var. mexicana
Lupinus chihuahuensis S.Watson
Gutierrezia texana var. glutinosa (S.Schauer) M.A.Lane
Turbina Raf.
Astragalus hartmanii Rydb.
Pouzolzia nivea S.Watson
Grindelia grandiflora Hook.
Rubus coriifolius Liebm.
Sesbania exasperata Kunth
Ayenia pilosa Cristóbal
Potentilla atropurpurea de Vriese
Neopringlea S.Watson
Eryngium juncifolium (Urb.) Mathias & Constance
Osmorhiza mexicana subsp. mexicana
Bastardiastrum (Rose) D.M.Bates
Oplismenus cristatus J.Presl
Spiranthes transversalis A.Rich. & Galeotti
Zauschneria latifolia var. arizonica (Davidson) Hilend
Dioscorea carpomaculata O.Téllez & B.G.Schub.
Heteropterys cotinifolia A.Juss.
Cirsium durangense (Greenm.) G.B.Ownbey
Plantago caulescens S.Watson
Hypericum hintonii Bullock
Platanus occidentalis var. glabrata (Fernald) Sarg.
Andira inermis (W.Wright) DC.
Hedyotis nigricans var. nigricans
Aeschynomene fruticosa Rose
Habenaria guadalajarana S.Watson
Muhlenbergia bourgeaei E.Fourn.
Gaura suffulta Engelm.
Zauschneria californica var. typica Hilend
Lotus prostratus L.
Chamaesyce spurca (M.C.Johnst.) B.L.Turner
Spiranthes schaffneri Rchb.f.
Castilleja mexicana (Hemsl.) Gray
Bursera tecomaca Standl.
Perymenium lancifolium S.F.Blake
Alchemilla subalpestris Rose
Marina neglecta (B.L.Rob.) Barneby
Comarostaphylis polifolia subsp. polifolia
Helenium scorzonerifolium (DC.) A.Gray
Poa scabra Asch.
Asclepias atroviolacea Woodson
Esenbeckia berlandieri Baill. ex Hemsl.
Meliosma dentata (Liebm.) Urb.
Corallorhiza odontorhiza var. pringlei (Greenm.) Freudenst.
Cyperus virens var. virens
Galactia grayi Vail
Ambrosia orobanchifera Meyen
Onobrychis viciaefolia Scop.
Chenopodium leptophyllum (Moq.) Nutt.
Draba caroliniana Walter
Gilia mcvickerae M.E.Jones
Panicum acuminatum var. thermale (Bol.) Wipff
Arctostaphylos tomentosa var. hebeclada (DC.) J.E.Adams
Bromus rubens subsp. rubens
Bromus diandrus var. gussonei (Parl.) Coss. & Durieu
Mimulus filicifolius Sexton, K.G.Ferris & Schoenig
Amaranthus tuberculatus var. rudis (J.D.Sauer) Costea & Tardif
Spergularia media subsp. media
Lupinus littoralis var. variicolor (Steud.) Isely
Oenanthe pimpinelloides L.
Utricularia alpina Jacq.
Maesa japonica (Thunb.) Moritzi & Zoll.
Vitis smalliana L.H.Bailey
Vitis shuttleworthii House
Vitis munsoniana Simpson ex Munson
Sasamorpha borealis (Hack.) Nakai
Quercus margarettae (Ashe) Small
Telesonix Raf.
Clianthus maximus Colenso
Chamomilla Godr.
Elymus trachycaulus var. majus (Vasey) Beetle
Cynodon dactylon subsp. villosus (Grossh.) Regel
Elymus albicans var. albicans
Githopsis pulchella var. glabra (Jeps.) Morin
Sorghum bicolor subsp. arundinaceum (Desv.) Davidse
Dysphania chilensis (Schrad.) Mosyakin & Clemants
Vitex agnus Stokes
Solanum kwebense N.E.Br. ex C.H.Wright
Cyphostemma quinatum (Aiton) Desc.
Pellionia repens (Lour.) Merr.
Vilfa gigas Steud.
Schisandra glabra (Brickell) Rehder
Eupomatia laurina R.Br.
Quercus obtusata Bonpl.
Mimulus jungermannioides Suksd.
Caltha leptosepala subsp. biflora (DC.) P.G.Sm.
Solanum pyracanthos Lam.
Agrostis capillaris var. aristata (Parn.) Druce
Heleniastrum Fabr.
Quercus chrysolepis subsp. vacciniifolia (Kellogg) A.E.Murray
Eleocharis quinqueflora var. suksdorfiana (Beauverd) J.T.Howell
Poa bolanderi subsp. bolanderi
Poa sinaica Steud.
Hunnemannia hintoniorum G.L.Nesom
Myriophyllum humile (Raf.) Morong
Viola pedunculata var. tenuifolia (Baker & Clausen) J.T.Howell
Aphyllon validum subsp. howellii (Heckard & L.T.Collins) A.C.Schneid.
Sida fallax Walp.
Kedrostis leloja (Forssk. ex J.F.Gmel.) C.Jeffrey
Begonia foliosa Kunth
Celtis spinosa Spreng.
Quercus mexicana Bonpl.
Quercus coccifera subsp. calliprinos (Webb) Holmboe
Agrostis hallii var. pringlei (Scribn.) Hitchc.
Bromus hordeaceus var. intermedius (Guss.) Shear
Penstemon heterophyllus var. azureus (Benth.) Jeps.
Paspalum boscianum Flüggé
Lopezia racemosa subsp. racemosa
Sarracenia rosea Naczi, Case & R.B.Case
Streptocarpus saxorum Engl.
Hydnophytum formicarum Jack
Eucalyptus woodwardii Maiden
Indigofera canescens Lam.
Quercus muehlenbergii Engelm.
Quercus oleoides Schltdl. & Cham.
Quercus ilex var. ballota (Desf.) A.DC.
Bromus hordeaceus var. glabrescens (Coss.) Shear
Lolium multiflorum subsp. italicum (Husn.) Schinz & R.Keller
Phyla nodiflora var. reptans (Kunth) Moldenke
Lewisia serrata Heckard & Stebbins
Lachenalia pearsonii (R.Glover) W.F.Barker
Atriplex cordulata var. cordulata
Arctostaphylos nisseniana Merriam
Cobananthus calochlamys (Donn.Sm.) Wiehler
Dalechampia spathulata (Scheidw.) Baill.
Amaranthus viridus L.
Vitis gigas J.L.Fennell
Austrobaileya scandens C.White
Indigofera heterantha Wall. ex Brandis
Galium andrewsii var. andrewsii
Bromus hordeaceus var. leptostachys (Pers.) Beck
Euphorbia geroldii Rauh
Clerodendrum speciosissimum C.Morren
Dendrosicyos socotrana Balf.fil.
Clytostoma binatum (Thunb.) Sandwith
Vitis tiliifolia Humb. & Bonpl. ex Roem. & Schult.
Spiraea trilobata L.
Hakea platysperma Hook.
Quercus diversifolia Née
Scirpus americanus var. polyphyllus (Boeckeler) Beetle
Arctostaphylos ×helleri Eastw.
Achyrodes aureum (L.) Kuntze
Poa douglasii subsp. douglasii
Azara Ruiz & Pav.
Capsella Medik.
Euphorbia guiengola W.R.Buck & Huft
Stylidium debile F.Muell.
Quercus macrolepis Kotschy
Hakea polyanthema Diels
Quercus infectoria subsp. veneris (A.Kern.) Meikle
Tillandsia ferrisiana L.B.Sm.
Sison L.
Panicum oligosanthes var. scribnerianum (Nash) Beetle
Cynodon plectostachyus (K.Schum.) Pilg.
Armeria alliacea (Cav.) Hoffmanns. & Link
Carthamus nitidus Boiss.
Luzula comosa var. macrantha S.Watson
Juglans hybrida hort. ex Lavallée, 1877
Euphorbia neobosseri Rauh
Quercus fusiformis Small
Psorothamnus tinctorius (Brandegee) Rydb.
Draba densifolia var. globosa (Payson) S.L.Welsh
Quechualia H.Rob.
Arctostaphylos tracyi (Eastwood) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Arctostaphylos pungens var. ravenii (Wells) Roof
Echinochloa zelayensis var. macera Wiegand
Lolium multiflorum var. muticum DC.
Drosera spatulata Labill.
Raillardella (A.Gray) Benth.
Anemone ×hybrida (hort. ex L.H.Bailey) Makino
Osa pulchra (D.R.Simpson) Aiello
Codonanthe devosiana Lem.
Ruttya fruticosa Lindau
Illicium lanceolatum A.C.Sm.
Allocasuarina lehmanniana (Miq.) L.A.S.Johnson
Quercus gravesii Sudw.
Quercus pilicaulis Trel.
Poa douglasii var. macrantha (Vasey) B.Boivin
Ruta L.
Dichelostemma lacuna-vernalis L.W.Lenz
Oreostemma Greene
Boehmeria nivea (L.) Gaudich.
Columnea schiedeana Schltdl.
Ruellia chartacea (T.Anderson) Wassh.
Begonia sutherlandii Hook.fil.
Zoysia Willd.
Illicium mexicanum A.C.Sm.
Ottleya greenei (Ottley) D.D.Sokoloff
Paronychia echinulata var. echinulata
Digitaria sanguinalis subsp. vulgaris (Schrad.) Henrard
Bromus hordeaceus subsp. divaricatus (Bonnier & Layens) Kerguélen
Lathyrus grandiflorus Sm.
Pseuderanthemum carruthersii (Seem.) Guill.
Illicium floridanum Ellis
Quercus candicans Née
Douglasia Lindl.
Anthoxanthum nitens subsp. nitens
Tridens flavus (L.) Hitchc.
Agrostis polypogon Salzm. ex Steud.
Coincya monensis subsp. recurvata (All.) Leadlay
Hemizonia congesta var. tracyi (Babc. & H.M.Hall) Jeps.
Erigeron robustior (Cronquist) G.L.Nesom
Silybum Vaill. ex Adans.
Pavonia multiflora A.St.-Hil.
Acacia beauverdiana Ewart & Sharman
Eucalyptus baueriana Schauer
Cichorium L.
Eupomatia bennettii F.Muell.
Quercus castaneifolia C.A.Mey.
Delphinium hesperium f. pallescens Ewan
Bromus carinatus var. linearis Shear
Malpighia coccigera L.
Deppea splendens Breedlove & Lorence
Thunbergia laurifolia Lindl.
Quercus mongolica var. grosseserrata (Blume) Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Zanthoxylum fagara var. fagara
Cercis canadensis var. mexicana (Rose) M.Hopkins
Symphoricarpos albus subsp. laevigatus (Fernald) P.D.Sell
Cuscuta difficilis Stefanovic & Costea
Aruncus aethusifolius (H.Lév.) Nakai
Crypsis niliaca Fig. & De Not.
Panicum portoricense Desv. ex Ham.
Streptanthus tortuosus var. foliosus (Greene) D.W.Taylor
Mimusops elengi L.
Epicampes lanata (Kunth) J.Presl ex Kunth
Schisandra henryi C.B.Clarke
Quercus trojana Webb
Chenopodium ×pseudostriatum (Zschacke) Druce
Arundinaria Michx.
Cynodon dactylon var. hirsutissimus (Litard. & Maire) Maire
Eragrostis capillaris (L.) Nees
Lolium temulentum var. arvense (With.) Bab.
Rytidosperma Steud.
Cynanchum marnierianum Rauh
Lepismium cruciforme (Vell.) Miq.
Anredera Juss.
Vitis ×slavinii Rehder
Arctostaphylos pungens var. montana (Eastw.) Munz
Sonchus oleraceus var. asper L.
Crataegus media Sarg.
Sparaxis grandiflora (D.Delaroche) Ker Gawl.
Holcus L.
Clusia orthoneura Standl.
Globba winitii C.H.Wright
Sesleria Scop.
Grevillea endlicheriana Meisn.
Quercus deamii Trel.
Quercus durandii Buckley
Quercus faginea Lam.
Arctostaphylos patula var. coalescens W.Knight
Bromus diandrus var. diandrus
Cynodon dactylon var. aridus J.R.Harlan & de Wet
Eustachys petraea (Sw.) Desv.
Satureja calamintha subsp. ascendens (Jord.) Briq.
Helenium amarum var. amarum
Quercus hispanica Lam.
Silene macrotheca Braun-Blanq. & Maire
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. campbelliae (Eastw.) J.E.Adams ex McMinn
Bromus berteroanus var. excelsus (Shear) Pavlick
Chamerion Raf. ex Holub
Joinvilleaceae
Lapageria rosea Ruiz & Pav.
Impatiens wallerana Hook.f., 1868
Lysionotus pauciflorus Maxim.
Desfontainia spinosa Ruiz & Pav.
Salvia uliginosa var. rufescens Benth.
Monocostus uniflorus (Poepp. ex Petersen) Maas
Arctostaphylos glandulosa var. australis J.E.Adams
Lolium temulentum subsp. ramosum Guss.
Cistus ladaniferus L.
Sarracenia oreophila (Kearney) Wherry
Lindernia All.
Freesia verrucosa (B.Vogel) Goldblatt & J.C.Manning
Viola tricolor subsp. subalpina Gaudin
Illicium parviflorum Michx. ex Vent.
Quercus prinoides Willd.
Zeltnera muhlenbergii (Griseb.) G.Mans.
Polycarpon L.
Erythrina fusca Lour.
Carex molesta Mackenzie ex Bright
Salix scoulerana Barratt ex Hook.
Crossandra nilotica Oliv.
Juanulloa aurantiaca Otto & D.Dietr.
Origanum majoricum Cambess.
Eucalyptus largiflorens F.Muell.
Papaver radicatum Rottb.
Symphyotrichum campestre var. bloomeri (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Hordeum vulgare var. pallidum Ser.
Polygonum humifusum subsp. caurianum (B.L.Rob.) Costea & Tardif
Astragalus succumbens Douglas ex G.Don, 1832
Erodium cicutarium L
Muhlenbergia uniseta (Lag.) Columbus
Draba fladnizensis Wulfen
Ruppia lacustris Macoun
Rumex aquaticus L.
Lappula Fabr., 1759
Pleioblastus variegatus Makino
Thalictrum occidentale var. macounii B.Boivin
Dinebra panicea var. mucronata (Michx.) P.M.Peterson & N.Snow
Euphrasia arctica Lange ex Rostr.
Scabiosa ochroleuca L.
Potamogeton ×hagstroemii A.Bennett
Elyonurus Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.
Agoseris glauca var. monticola (Greene) Q.Jones ex Cronquist
Chenopodium macrospermum subsp. halophilum (Phil.) Aellen
Anticlea elegans var. elegans
Picris hieracioides var. hieracioides
Salix athabascensis Raup
Potamogeton schreberi G.Fisch.
Linnaea L.
Arctostaphylos tomentosa var. nuda (Hook.) Lindl.
Eschscholzia minuscula Greene
Veronica spuria L.
Grindelia columbiana (Piper) Rydb.
Ficus coronata Pittier
Physaria hemiphysaria var. lucens (S.L.Welsh & Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Gilia virgata var. floribunda A.Gray
Chaenactis attenuata A.Gray
Mertensia membranacea Rydb.
Impatiens aurella f. badia H.St.John
Troximon arizonicum Greene
Taraxacum flavovirens G.E.Haglund, 1948
Bambusa beecheyana Munro
Claytonia cupulata Suksd.
Lesquerella macrocarpa A.Nelson
Hamosa paysonii Rydb.
Quercus sonomensis Benth.
Oenothera nuttallii Sweet
Carduus tweedyi Rydb.
Ptelea crenata Greene
Gilia tenuiflora var. latiflora A.Gray
Stenotus scaber A.Nelson
Hamosa atratiformis Rydb.
Kennedia rubicunda (Schneev.) Vent.
Erigeron anchana G.L.Nesom
Potentilla breweri var. viridis Jeps., 1925
Allionia melanotricha Standl.
Lesquerella hemiphysaria Maguire
Clomenocoma laciniata Rydb.
Arabis tenuis Greene
Ptelea subvestita Greene
Polygonum kelloggii var. esotericum (L.C.Wheeler) Reveal
Muscaria emarginata Small
Atriplex palmeri S.Watson
Potamogeton heterophyllus f. maximus Morong
Epilobium tracyi Rydb.
Houstonia gracilis Brandegee
Eriogonum jamesii var. higginsii S.L.Welsh
Sedum borschii (R.T.Clausen) R.T.Clausen
Arenga engleri Becc.
Arabis microphylla var. typica Rollins
Angophora subvelutina F.Muell.
Gilia merrillii A.Nelson
Verbena bingenensis Moldenke
Poincianella arida Britton & Rose
Centaurea scabiosa L.
Eriogonum effusum var. durum S.Stokes
Ranunculus montanensis Rydb.
Lycopus sinuatus Elliott
Claytonia lanceolata var. idahoensis R.J.Davis
Ruellia brevifolia (Pohl) C.Ezcurra
Apocynum ×viride Wooton & Standl.
Eunanus austinae Greene
Vagnera Adans.
Sedum californicum Britton
Acacia notabilis F.Muell.
Arctium nemorosum Lej.
Mentzelia albescens (Gillies ex Arn.) Benth. & Hook.f. ex Griseb.
Lesquerella occidentalis var. cinerascens Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Cnemidophacos reventiformis Rydb.
Petasites warrenii H.St.John
Bauhinia mexicana Vogel
Sophia californica (Torr. & A.Gray) Rydb.
Chimaphila acuta Rydb.
Quercus longiglanda Torr. & Frém.
Cowania davidsonii Rydb.
Tagetes alamensis Rydb.
Acacia breviracemosa Britton & Rose
Lupinus flavicaulis Rydb.
Eriogonum curvatum Small
Astragalus convallarius var. xiphoides Barneby
Verbena ×suksdorfii Moldenke
Crassula viridis (S.Watson) Fedde
Psoralea aromatica Payson
Pescatoria cerina (Lindl. & Paxton) Rchb.f.
Arabis setulosa Greene
Isocoma tomentosa G.L.Nesom
Aster umbachii Rydb.
Heuchera nivalis Rosend., Butters & Lakela
Anticlea fremontii Torr.
Astragalus hallii var. hallii
Rorippa clavata Rydb.
Lesquerella occidentalis var. parvifolia Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Navarretia virgata var. floribunda (A.Gray) Brand
Plectritis ciliosa var. insignis (Suksd.) Dempster
Daucus hispanicus Gouan
Vallisneria americana var. americana
Elymus edentatus Suksd.
Fendlerella cymosa Greene, 1913
Oxypolis greenmanii Mathias & Constance
Fragaria glauca (S.Watson) Rydb.
Allocarya inornata Piper
Salix macrocarpa Nutt.
Gormania anomala Britton ex Britton & Rose
Astragalus misellus var. misellus
Myosurus tenellus var. amphioxys Greene
Washingtonia leibergii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Castilleja lithospermoides Kunth
Acacia constricta var. vernicosa (Standl.) L.D.Benson
Salvia chionophylla Fernald
Krameria Loefl.
Ambrosia tenuifolia Spreng.
Ruellia leucantha subsp. postinsularis (Gentry) T.F.Daniel
Pseudognaphalium greenmannii (S.F.Blake) Anderb.
Quercus bolanyosensis Trel.
Euphorbia fendleri var. fendleri
Croton punctatus Jacq.
Rubus arizonicus (Greene) Rydb.
Marsdenia astephanoides (A.Gray) Woodson
Caesalpinia coriaria (Jacq.) Willd.
Perityle scopulorum (M.E.Jones) A.M.Powell & B.L.Turner
Baccharis texana (Torr. & A.Gray) A.Gray
Solanum diphyllum L.
Dichelostemma pauciflorum (Torr.) Standl.
Desmodium hartwegianum var. hartwegianum
Desmodium cinereum (Kunth) DC.
Passifloraceae
Pectis papposa var. grandis Keil
Leptospron gentryi (Standl.) A.Delgado
Gutierrezia sericocarpa (A.Gray) M.A.Lane
Funastrum elegans (Decne.) Schltr.
Struthanthus Mart.
Tauschia tenuifolia (Nutt.) Mathias & Constance
Polyclathra cucumerina Bertol.
Acaciella lemmonii (Rose) Britton & Rose
Hydrolea spinosa var. maior (Brand) L.J.Davenp.
Mortonia hidalgensis Standl.
Echinopsis bridgesii Salm-Dyck
Sida linearifolia Thonn.
Stylosanthes guianensis (Aubl.) Sw.
Froelichia braunii Standl.
Atalantia Corrêa
Psoralea trinervata (Rydb.) Standl.
Luffa Mill.
Oenanthe javanica (Blume) DC.
Rubus ×oligospermus Sudre
Crotalaria sonorensis Standl.
Tripogandra Raf.
Carex teretiuscula Gooden.
Zaluzania Pers.
Haloragis J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Malpighia watsonii Rose
Gentiana macrophylla Pall.
Hibiscus brasiliensis L.
Anagallis L.
Archontophoenix cunninghamii H.Wendl. & Drude
Ceratopetalum Sm.
Distichlis spicata var. borealis (J.Presl) Beetle
Vernonia amygdalina Delile
Pharbitis Choisy
Desmodium wigginsii B.G.Schub.
Protea obtusifolia De Wild.
Mimosa invisa Mart. ex Colla
Artemisia capillaris Thunb.
Acanthopanax giraldii Harms
Silene scouleri var. eglandulosa C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire
Tephrosia submontana (Rose) L.Riley
Hordeum adscendens Kunth
Juglans californica subsp. californica
Firmiana Marsili
Chamaedorea stolonifera H.Wendl. ex Hook.f.
Angelica pubescens Maxim.
Dioscorea tokoro Makino
Crassula arborescens subsp. arborescens
Anemone altaica Fisch. ex C.A.Mey.
Lagenaria Ser.
Eucalyptus baileyana F.Muell.
Frangula pinetorum (Standl.) Grubov
Hyptis leucophylla Pohl ex Benth.
Podophyllum peltatum L.
Ziziphus spinosa (Bunge) Hu ex Chen
Lysimachia christinae Hance
Houstonia prostrata var. parvula (Brandegee) Wiggins
Rubia cordifolia L.
Loranthaceae
Eleocharis dulcis (Burm.f.) Trin. ex Hensch.
Cladothrix lanuginosa (Nutt.) Nutt. ex S.Watson
Boswellia carteri Birdw.
Lopezia laciniata (Rose) M.E.Jones
Agave parviflora subsp. densiflora G.D.Starr & T.Van Devender
Aconitum kusnezoffii Rchb.
Senecio scandens Buch.-Ham. ex D.Don
Astragalus strigulosus Kunth
Cunoniaceae
Erigeron pinnatisectus (A.Gray) A.Nelson
Bulbine caulescens L.
Eriocaulon L.
Erythranthe pennellii (Gentry) G.L.Nesom
Citronella mucronata (Ruiz & Pav.) D.Don
Euphorbia mammillaris Haw.
Smilax ornata Lem.
Ranunculus ternatus Thunb.
Bertholletia excelsa Bonpl.
Amomum compactum Sol. ex Maton
Ebenopsis caesalpinioides (Standl.) Britton & Rose
Passiflora ×violacea Loisel.
Saccharum L.
Euphorbia ocymoidea var. subreniformis (S.Watson) McVaugh
Kalanchoe laciniata (L.) DC.
Gentianella wrightii (A.Gray) Holub
Apium graveolens var. dulce Pers., 1805
Adenophora Fisch.
Elytrigia dasystachya subsp. albicans (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) D.R.Dewey
Euphorbia mellii Ch.Mont.
Oxalis frutescens subsp. angustifolia (Kunth) Lourteig
Loeflingia texana Hook.
Rhamnus crocea var. crocea
Ceanothus fendleri var. fendleri
Colubrina greggii var. yucatanensis M.C.Johnst.
Randia mitis L.
Bursera excelsa (Kunth) Engl.
Acalypha nicaraguensis Pax & K.Hoffm.
Bastardiastrum incanum (Brandegee) D.M.Bates
Indigofera palmeri S.Watson
Physodium corymbosum (Moc. & Sessé ex DC.) C.Presl
Stegnosperma scandens (Lunan) Standl.
Proboscidea sinaloensis Van Eselt.
Brongniartia goldmanii Rose
Ludwigia leptocarpa (Nutt.) Hara
Struthanthus brachybotrys Standl. & Steyerm.
Chamaecrista chamaecristoides var. brandegeei (Rose) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Cathestecum varium Swallen
Mikania cordifolia (L.fil.) Willd.
Nissolia fruticosa var. fruticosa
Jacobinia spicigera (Schltdl.) L.H.Bailey
Citharexylum berlandieri B.L.Rob.
Salvia mazatlanensis Fernald
Canavalia maritima Thouars
Guazuma tomentosa Kunth
Stevia latifolia Benth.
Euphorbia oaxacana B.L.Rob. & Greenm.
Salvia rubropunctata B.L.Rob. & Fernald
Ludwigia octovalvis var. octofila (DC.) Alain
Peniocereus rosei J.G.Ortega
Guardiola rotundifolia B.L.Rob.
Wedelia fertilis McVaugh
Encyclia trachycarpa (Lindl.) Schltr.
Echinodorus radicans (Nutt.) Engelm.
Bauhinia cookii Rose
Lasianthaea ceanothifolia (Willd.) K.M.Becker
Capparis indica (L.) Fawc. & Rendle
Senna hirsuta var. hirta (Benth.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Crotalaria micans Link
Acalypha deppeana Schltdl.
Arracacia atropurpurea (Lehm.) Benth. & Hook.fil. ex Hemsl.
Erythrina lanata subsp. occidentalis (Standl.) Krukoff & Barneby
Citharexylum affine D.Don
Mimosa polyantha Benth.
Ipomoea divergens House
Jacquemontia oaxacana (Meisn.) Hallier fil.
Marsdenia coulteri Hemsl.
Castilleja canescens Benth.
Cephalocereus purpusii Britton & Rose
Phyllanthus niruri L.
Randia induta Standl.
Forestiera durangensis Standl.
Dicliptera inutilis Leonard
Disciphania mexicana Bullock
Ruellia albicaulis Bertero
Calliandra sinaloana (Britton & Rose) Standl.
Ruprechtia occidentalis Standl.
Lagascea glandulosa Fernald
Boerhavia rosei Standl.
Indigofera mucronata Lam.
Ayenia wrightii B.L.Rob.
Crateva palmeri Rose
Ampelopsis mexicana Rose
Mimosa setigera Britton & Rose
Boerhavia paniculata Rich.
Barroetea subuligera (Schauer) A.Gray
Parmentiera edulis DC.
Cyperus digitatus Roxb.
Serjania racemosa Schum.
Kallstroemia rosei Rydb.
Acanthocereus occidentalis Britton & Rose
Tragia mexicana Müll.Arg.
Philoxerus vermicularis (L.) Sm.
Schrankia diffusa Rose
Diectomis laxa Nees
Borreria densiflora DC.
Euphorbia ammannioides Kunth
Pithecoctenium echinatum (Jacq.) Baill.
Encyclia aenicta Dressler & G.E.Pollard
Rathbunia kerberi Britton & Rose
Cuphea viscosissima Jacq.
Semeiandra grandiflora Hook. & Arn.
Euphorbia delicatula Boiss.
Tillandsia bourgaei Baker
Tillandsia circinnata Schltdl.
Croton septemnervius McVaugh
Iresine paniculata (L.) Kuntze
Medicago denticulata Willd.
Matelea chrysantha (Greenm.) Woodson
Eysenhardtia platycarpa Pennell & Saff.
Staelia scabra (C.Presl) Standl.
Siphonoglossa sessilis (Jacq.) D.N.Gibson
Quamoclit hederifolia (L.) G.Don
Bunchosia biocellata Schltdl.
Pereskiopsis blakeana Ortega
Rhus allophyloides Standl.
Achatocarpus gracilis H.Walter
Amaranthus polygonoides L.
Aristida floridana (Chapm.) Vasey
Cydista potosina (K.Schum. & Loes.) Loes.
Gonolobus diadematus Ker Gawl.
Capparis verrucosa Jacq.
Hieracium mexicanum Less.
Machaonia acuminata Bonpl.
Hyptis urticoides Kunth
Rhynchosia ixodes (Standl.) Standl.
Pectis diffusa Hook. & Arn.
Erigeron polycephalus (Larsen) G.L.Nesom
Agave pedunculifera Trel.
Acacia macilenta Rose
Neea psychotrioides J.D.Sm.
Celtica gigantea (Link) F.M.Vázquez & Barkworth
Verbena moctezumae G.L.Nesom & T.Van Devender
Parosela palmeri Rose
Boerhavia sonorae Rose
Eucephalus brickellioides (Greene) G.L.Nesom
Spinacia oleracea var. inermis (Moench) Peterm.
Beta vulgaris subsp. cicla (L.) W.D.J.Koch
Melocactus levitestatus Buining & Brederoo
Xanthisma texanum DC.
Ochna multiflora DC.
Acacia binervia (J.C.Wendl.) J.F.Macbr.
Lilium longiflorum Thunb.
Salvia blepharophylla Brandegee ex Epling
Coprosma kirkii Cheeseman
Pyrus calleryana var. calleryana
Cuminum cyminum L.
Cotoneaster insignis Pojark.
Corchorus capsularis L.
Salvia castanea Diels
Salvia bulleyana Diels
Salvia hians Royle ex Benth.
Salvia lyrata L.
Solanum warszewiczii Lambertye
Emilia sagittata (Vahl) DC.
Torenia fournieri Linden ex E.Fourn.
Escallonia ×franciscana Eastw.
Citharexylum montevidense (Spreng.) Moldenke
Lisianthus nigrescens Cham. & Schltdl.
Pittosporum angustifolium Lodd.
Deutzia ×magnifica (Lemoine) Rehder
Melaleuca trichostachya Lindl.
Ornithogalum caudatum Aiton
Rogiera cordata (Benth.) Planch.
Oxygonum delagoense Kuntze
Salvia verbascifolia M.Bieb.
Salvia reticulata M.Martens & Galeotti
Salvia roemeriana Scheele
Salvia staminea Montbret & Aucher ex Benth.
Salvia nilotica Juss. ex Jacq.
Salvia nutans L.
Glandularia peruviana (L.) Small
Clinopodium hortense (L.) Kuntze
Rosmarinus officinalis var. prostratus Pasq.
Crassula lycopodioides Lam.
Hypericum lanuginosum Lam.
Ottleya flexuosa (Greene) D.D.Sokoloff
Chimonanthus nitens Oliv.
Jasminum fluminense Vell.
Eucalyptus pachyphylla F.Muell.
Eremophila debilis (Andr.) Chinnock
Mirabilis laevis Brandegee
Navarretia willamettensis S.C.Spencer
Calamagrostis scopulorum var. lucidula Kearney
Selinocarpus diffusus subsp. nevadensis Standl.
Alopecurus borealis Trin.
Castilleja rhexiifolia var. pubens A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Dichanthelium acuminatum subsp. lindheimeri (Nash) Freckmann & Lelong
Opuntia hystricina Engelm. & Bigelow
Poa juncifolia var. ampla (Merr.) Dorn
Cymopterus glomeratus var. glomeratus
Orcuttia californica var. viscida Hoover
Oryzopsis coerulescens Trab.
Poa laxa subsp. banffiana Soreng
Thelypodiopsis Rydb.
Artemisia tridentata subsp. bonnevillensis H.D.Garrison, L.M.Shultz & Mc Arthur
Diplacus glutinosus var. pubescens Torr.
Arenaria fendleri var. aculeata (S.Watson) S.L.Welsh
Antennaria densa Greene
Potentilla flabellifolia var. flabellifolia
Chrysothamnus parryi var. howardii (Parry ex A.Gray) Kittell
Ipomopsis congesta var. montana (Constance & Rollins) Reveal
Elymus trachycaulus var. unilaterale (Cassidy) Beetle
Erica ventricosa Thunb.
Stenogonum Nutt.
Lupinus argentinus Rydb.
Lomatium nevadense var. cupulatum (M.E.Jones) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Mentzelia albicaulis var. ctenophora (Rydb.) H.St.John
Brodiaea capitata var. pauciflora Torr.
Allium watsonii Howell
Festuca scabrella Torr. ex Hook.
Penstemon procerus subsp. modestus (Greene) D.D.Keck
Gentianodes algida (Pall.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Deschampsia brevifolia R.Br.
Thermopsis macrophylla var. venosa (Eastw.) Isely
Helianthus quinquenervis Hook.
Erigeron uncialis subsp. uncialis
Physaria kaibabensis (Rollins) N.H.Holmgren
Trifolium kingii subsp. rollinsii (J.M.Gillett) D.Heller
Stipa coronata var. parishii (Vasey) Hitchc.
Oenothera deltoidea Torr. & Frém.
Draba platycarpa Torr. & A.Gray
Elymus hybridus (Keng) S.L.Chen
Dodecatheon utahense (N.H.Holmgren) Reveal
Antennaria fusca E.Nelson
Austrostipa ramosissima (Trin.) S.W.L.Jacobs & J.Everett
Potamogeton pusillus var. typicus Fernald
Townsendia montana var. minima (Eastw.) Beaman
Poa sibirica Roshev.
Poa iberica Fisch., C.A.Mey. & Avé-Lall.
Cyperus drummondii Torr. & Hook.
Ericameria depressa (Nutt.) L.C.Anderson
Carex nova var. pelocarpa (F.J.Herm.) Dorn
Astragalus bigelovii var. thompsoniae (S.Watson) M.E.Jones
Quercus subturbinella Trel.
Artemisia tridentata subsp. typica H.M.Hall & Clem.
Dalea johnsonii S.Watson
Allium schoenoprasum subsp. sibiricum (Linnaeus) Čelakovský
Pneumonanthe oregana Greene
Calamagrostis vaseyi Beal
Deschampsia sukatschewii (Popl.) Roshev.
Piptatherum microcarpum (Pilg.) Tzvelev
Gilia spicata Nutt.
Lactuca serriola f. integrifolia (Gray) S.D.Prince & R.N.Carter
Pedicularis centranthera var. exulans M.Peck
Liatris Gaertn. ex Schreb.
Leymus salinus subsp. salmonis (C.L.Hitchc.) R.J.Atkins
Agropyron spicatum f. inerme (Scribn. & J.G.Sm.) Beetle
Lappula myosotis Moench
Arenaria nuttallii var. fragilis (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) C.L.Hitchc.
Linum digynum A.Gray
Alnus incana var. virescens S.Watson
Lappula squarrosa var. erecta (A.Nelson) Dorn
Noticastrum adscendens DC.
Chylismia exilis (P.H.Raven) W.L.Wagner & Hoch
Prunus persica var. platycarpa (Decne.) L.H.Bailey
Potentilla diversifolia var. multisecta S.Watson
Cornus sericea subsp. stolonifera (Michx.) Fosberg
Physalis palmeri A.Gray
Draba micrantha Nutt.
Peucedanum argense M.E.Jones
Mimulus maguirei Pennell
Fraxinus platycarpa Michx.
Gentiana amarella subsp. heterosepala (Engelm.) J.M.Gillett
Penstemon cephalanthus Pennell
Ranunculus glaberrimus var. typicus L.D.Benson
Eriogonum calcareum var. calcareum
Nymphaea odorata var. rosea Pursh
Synthyris laciniata subsp. ibapahensis Pennell
Potentilla glomerata A.Nelson
Knautia arvernensis (Briq.) Szabó
Andropogon saccharoides var. torreyanus (Steud.) Hack.
Bromus brevis Steud.
Triticosecale Wittm. ex A.Camus
Aster glaucodes var. pulcher (S.F.Blake) S.F.Blake, 1942
Chenopodium album var. berlandieri (Moq.) Mack. & Bush
Chrysopsis jonesii S.F.Blake
Carex neurocarpa Maxim.
Achillea tomentosa Pursh
Heracleum sphondylium var. lanatum (Michx.) Dorn
Hieracium gracile var. gracile
Monardella muriculata Greene
Poa pumila Host
Halimodendron halodendron (Pall.) Voss
Lathyrus lanszwertii subsp. lanszwertii
Rubus ulmifolis Schott
Kalanchoe blossfeldiana Poelln.
Euphorbia arkansana var. atrosemina Norton
Lepidium montanum var. typicum C.L.Hitchc., 1936
Gentianella detonsa subsp. elegans (A.Nelson) J.M.Gillett
Festuca elmeri var. conferta (Beal) Hitchc.
Allium purdyi Eastw.
Blepharipappus scaber var. scaber
Eriogonum thompsonae var. thompsonae
Vulpia ciliata Dumort.
Secale cereale subsp. ancestrale Zhuk.
Androsace occidentalis var. simplex (Rydb.) H.St.John
Vaccinium macrophyllum Piper
Mertensia platyphylla var. subcordata (Greene) L.O.Williams
Achillea puberula Rydb.
Leymus simplex var. luxurians (Scribn. & T.A.Williams) Beetle
Madronella rubella (Greene) Greene
Poa ligularis Nees ex Steud.
Mandevilla splendens (Hook.fil.) Woodson
Euphorbia tomentella Engelm. ex Boiss.
Kerria japonica var. pleniflora Witte
Hordeum murinum var. leporinum (Link) K.Richt.
Astilbe ×arendsii Arends
Doellingeria elegans (Nutt.) Semple, Brouillet & G.A.Allen
Elymus elongatus subsp. elongatus
Cerasus padifolia Greene
Elymus saundersii var. californicus Hoover
Pedicularis albomarginata M.E.Jones
Allium atrorubens var. inyoensis (M.E.Jones) Ownbey & Aase
Artemisia tridentata subsp. spiciformis (Osterh.) Kartesz & Gandhi
Polyctenium fremontii var. bisulcatum (Greene) Rollins
Astragalus junciformis A.Nelson
Castilleja angustifolia var. bradburii (Nutt.) Fernald
Chondrosum microstachyum E.Fourn.
Carex kobresioidea (Kük.) S.R.Zhang
Artemisia biennis var. diffusa Dorn
Agropyron caninum var. majus Scribn.
Agoseris graminifolia Greene
Androsace subumbellata (A.Nelson) Small
Haplopappus macronema var. linearis (Rydb.) Dorn
Arenaria fendleri var. brevicaulis Maguire
Xanthocephalum petradoria S.L.Welsh & Goodrich
Festuca octoflora var. glauca (Nutt.) Fernald
Nicotiana longiflora Cav.
Potamogeton panormitanus var. minor Biv.
Poa brachyanthera Hultén
Poa laxa Haenke
Leucanthemum Hill
Melica bulbosa var. spectabilis (Scribn.) B.Boivin
Boechera gunnisoniana (Rollins) W.A.Weber
Lemna cyclostasa (Elliott) Chevall. ex C.H.Thomps.
Gentiana nutans Bunge
Halliophytum hallii (Brandegee) I.M.Johnst.
Festuca groenlandica (Schol.) Fred.
Sporobolus poiretii (Roem. & Schult.) Hitchc.
Fraxinus pennsylvanica var. lanceolata (Borkh.) Sarg.
Eragrostis poaeoides P.Beauv.
Brickellia rosemarinifolia (Vent.) W.A.Weber
Sphaeralcea munroana subsp. munroana
Matricaria maritima var. inodora (L.) Soó
Lathyrus pauciflorus subsp. utahensis (M.E.Jones) Piper
Potamogeton gramineus var. gramineus
Datura stramonium f. inermis (Juss. ex Jacq.) Hupke
Poa badensis Haenke ex Willd.
Grevillea thelemanniana R.Br. ex Meisn.
Ericameria nauseosa var. iridis (L.C.Anderson) G.L.Nesom & G.I.Baird
Notholcus mollis (L.) Hitchc.
Agrostis lepida Hitchc.
Allium reticulatum Fraser ex G.Don
Pseudoroegneria spicata f. pubescens (Elmer) Barkworth
Physaria vitulifera Rydb.
Zauschneria latifolia var. garrettii (A.Nelson) Hilend
Lepidium montanum var. stelliae S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Piptochaetium stipoides var. stipoides
Panicum bisulcatum Thunb.
Antennaria reflexa E.Nelson
Menziesia glabella Gray
Crepis acuminata subsp. typica Babc. & Stebbins
Penstemon confertus var. procerus (Douglas ex Graham) Coville
Schoenoplectus pungens var. polyphyllus (Boeckeler) Dorn
Madronella parvifolia (Greene) Rydb.
Salvia officinalis Pall., 1795
Paronychia sessiliflora subsp. pulvinata (Gray) W.A.Weber
Viola beckwithii var. cachensis C.P.Sm.
Hookera capitata (Benth.) Kuntze
Philadelphus columbianus hort.
Vangueria edulis Vahl
Aristolochia durior Hill
Arenaria filiorum Maguire
Bolophyta ligulata (Jones) W.A.Weber
Festuca ovina var. ovina
Stipa lessingiana Trin. & Rupr.
Lupinus lyallii subsp. subpandens C.P.Sm. & D.B.Dunn
Dalea thompsoniae (Vail) L.O.Williams
Achillea millefolium var. maritima Jeps.
Viola xylorrhiza Suksd.
Cassia gooddingii A.Nelson
Descurainia incana var. major (Hook.) Dorn
Hibiscus laevis All.
Cucurbita ficifolia Wall.
Oenothera rydbergii House
Reseda aucheri Boiss.
Cornus controversa Prain
Rhus typhina var. laciniata Hort
Arenaria fendleri subsp. brevifolia Maguire
Gentiana tiogana A.Heller
Penstemon bicolor subsp. typicus Clokey & D.D.Keck
Erodium malacoides (L.) L'Hér. ex Aiton
Cleome serrata Jacq.
Haplopappus lanceolatus Clem. & E.G.Clem., 1914
Brassica rapa var. chinensis (L.) Kitam.
Polemonium caeruleum var. pterosperma Benth.
Stipa bavarica Martinovský & H.Scholz
Russelia pringlei B.L.Rob.
Begonia semperflorens Link & Otto
Calibrachoa La Llave & Lex.
Erysimum asperrimum (Greene) Rydb.
Malus domestica Baumg.
Triglochin maritimum var. elatum (Nutt.) A.Gray
Vincetoxicum hastulatum (A.Gray) A.Heller
Tonestus kingii (D.C.Eaton) G.L.Nesom
Euchiton gymnocephalus (DC.) Anderb.
Carex media var. stevenii (Holm) Fernald
Androsace chamaejasme subsp. carinata (Torr.) Hultén
Corallorhiza maculata var. occidentalis Cockerell, 1916
Poa tibetica Munro ex Stapf
Poa chaixii Vill.
Ludwigia natans var. stipitata Fernald & Griscom
Bartsia trixago L.
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. platyphyllis A.Gray
Dichanthelium oligosanthes subsp. oligosanthes
Celtis bungeana Blume
Lepidium dictyotum var. macrocarpum Thell.
Dalea fremontii var. johnsonii (S.Watson) Munz
Echinocactus coccineus Hort.Berol. ex Pfeiff.
Sorghum bicolor nothosubsp. drummondii (Steudel) de Wet
Atriplex phyllostegia var. draconis (M.E.Jones) Fosberg
Eriogonum aureum Nutt. ex Benth.
Androsace puberulenta Rydb.
Poliomintha bicolor S.Watson
Clematis palmeri Rose
Salix geyerana Andersson
Eriogonum nummulare var. ammophilum (Reveal) S.L.Welsh
Potentilla diversifolia var. glaucophylla (Lehm.) S.Watson
Yucca angustissima var. avia Reveal
Philibertia linearis var. hirtella (A.Gray) A.Gray
Philadelphus californicus Carrière
Pneumonanthe setigera (A.Gray) Greene
Dichanthelium acuminatum subsp. sericeum (Schmoll) Freckmann & Lelong
Sparganium natans var. minimum L.
Elymus mutabilis (Drobow) Tzvelev
Aster wasatchensis var. pulcher (S.F.Blake) S.L.Welsh
Saussurea DC.
Astragalus convallarius var. margaretiae Barneby
Bauhinia divaricata Lam.
Phaca pardalina Rydb.
Potentilla hippiana subsp. effusa (Douglas ex Lehm.) Dorn
Boechera nuttallii (Kuntze) Dorn
Armeria elongata (Hoffm.) Koch
Passiflora vitifolia Kunth
Parodia erubescens (Osten) D.R.Hunt
Secale cereale subsp. cereale
Fargesia nitida (Mitford) Keng f. & P.P.Yi
Limnanthes douglasii var. nivea C.T.Mason
Ranunculus eschscholtzii var. eschscholitzii Schltdl.
Poa chapmaniana Scribn.
Eriocoma speciosa (DC.) Kuntze
Calamagrostis breweri Thurb. ex Bol., 1866
Corydalis wyomingensis Fedde
Opuntia basilaris var. aurea (E.M.Baxter) W.T.Marshall
Petrophyton caespitosum var. elatius (S.Watson) Tidestr.
Sphaeralcea munroana var. subrhomboidea (Rydb.) Kearney
Shinnersoseris rostrata (A.Gray) Tomb
Senecio streptanthifolius var. rubricaulis (Greene) J.F.Bain
Andropogon gerardii var. chrysocomus (Nash) Fernald
Madronella pallida (A.Heller) A.Heller
Hordeum marinum subsp. marinum
Cyperus melanostachyus Kunth
Hordeum bulbosum Sieber ex Kunth
Lithospermum obtusifolium I.M.Johnst.
Artemisia arbuscula subsp. longicaulis Winward & Mc Arthur
Miscanthus giganteus J.M.Greef & Deuter ex Hodk. & Renvoize
Cordylanthus ramosus subsp. ramosus
Viola macloskeyi var. macloskeyi
Bossekia parviflora (Nutt.) Greene
Pneumonanthe sceptrum (Griseb.) Greene
Achnatherum nelsonii subsp. longiaristatum (Barkworth & J.R.Maze) Barkworth
Pyrola pallida Greene
Salix glauca subsp. glabrescens (Andersson) Hultén
Lupinus argenteus subsp. parviflorus (Nutt. ex Hook. & Arn.) L.Ll.Phillips
Erigeron maguirei var. harrisonii S.L.Welsh
Festuca rubra var. lanuginosa Mert. & W.D.J.Koch
Salvia ×hybrida Schur
Agoseris glauca var. asper (Rydb.) Cronquist
Agoseris plebeia (Greene) Greene
Achillea lanulosa subsp. typica D.D.Keck
Eleocharis flavescens var. thermalis (Rydb.) Cronquist
Cardamine oligosperma var. lucens G.S.Torr.
Festuca ovina var. duriuscula (L.) Rosenv., 1892
Gilia nudicaulis (Hook. & Arn.) A.Gray
Potamogeton angustifolius J.Presl
Potamogeton pusillus var. mucronatus (Fieber) Graebner
Lomatium angustatum var. flavum G.N.Jones
Bidens comosa (A.Gray) Wiegand
Lathyrus polymorphus Nutt.
Apocynum cannabinum var. angustifolium N.H.Holmgren
Senecio ×intermedius Wiesb.
Actinea acaulis (Pursh) Kuntze
Lupinus andersonii var. fulcratus C.P.Sm.
Selenicereus pteranthus (Link & Otto) Britton & Rose
Torresia odorata (L.) Hitchc.
Pistacia vera Mill., 1768
Carex interior var. keweenawensis F.J.Herm.
Glycosma occidentalis Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Arenaria rubella var. filiorum (Maguire) S.L.Welsh
Populus balsamifera var. californica S.Watson
Trifolium variegatum var. parunuweapensis S.L.Welsh
Vinca major var. variegata Loudon
Allium aflatunense B.Fedtsch.
Swertia parallela Greene
Agrostis scabra subsp. septentrionalis (Fernald) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Hymenoxys scaposa var. linearis (Nutt.) K.F.Parker
Aster falcatus var. crassulus (Rydb.) Cronquist
Persicaria incarnata Small
Pennisetum advena Wipff & Veldkamp
Cordylanthus wrightii subsp. kaibabensis T.I.Chuang & Heckard
Anthoxanthum monticola (Bigelow) Veldkamp
Lepidium alyssoides var. junceum Rollins
Polygonum douglasii var. utahense (Brenckle & Cottam) S.L.Welsh
Acamptopappus (A.Gray) A.Gray
Antennaria speciosa Greene
Lepidium chalepense Ledeb., 1841
Redfieldia Vasey
Stuckenia filiformis var. occidentalis (J.W.Robbins) Dorn
Panicum barbipulvinatum Nash
Bahia oppositifolia (Nutt.) A.Gray
Abronia fallax Heimerl, 1902
Panicum philadelphicum subsp. philadelphicum
Carex foetida All.
Phemeranthus thompsonii (N.D.Atwood & S.L.Welsh) Kiger
Descurainia pinnata var. osmiarium (Cockerell) Shinners
Achnatherum capense (L.) P.Beauv.
Zostera marina var. latifolia Morong
Heuchera cylindrica var. suksdorfii (Rydb.) Dorn
Oxalis oregana var. smallii (R.Knuth) M.Peck
Potamogeton pusillus var. lacunatus Fernald
Fragaria ×ananassa Duchesne ex Decne. & Naudin
Penstemon recurvatus A.Heller
Penstemon azureus var. parvulus A.Gray
Bromus tomentellus Boiss.
Pseudoroegneria deweyi K.B.Jensen, S.L.Hatch & Wipff
Pleioblastus pygmaeus (Miq.) Nakai
Milium vernale M.Bieb.
Amelichloa clandestina (Hack.) Arriaga & Barkworth
Androsace arizonica A.Gray
Populus balsamifera var. balsamifera
Arenaria franklinii var. thompsonii M.Peck
Clarkia viminea (Douglas) A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Eugenia uniflora O.Berg
Dipsacus gmelinii M.Bieb.
Lithospermum breviflorum Engelm. & Gray
Cladrastis lutea Raf.
Muhlenbergia frondosa (Poir.) Fernald
Sphaeralcea coccinea var. dissecta (Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray) Garrett
Cirsium arvense var. argenteum (Peyer ex Vest) Fiori
Streptanthella Rydb.
Haplopappus racemosus var. paniculatus (Nutt.) Cronquist
Gentiana plebeja Ledeb. ex Spreng.
Bromus berteroanus var. berteroanus
Atriplex cuneata var. introgressa C.A.Hanson
Lesquerella kingii var. parviflora (Maguire & A.H.Holmgren) S.L.Welsh & Reveal
Ranunculus pygmaeus var. pygmaeus
Leymus innovatus subsp. innovatus
Lycopersicon pimpinellifolium (L.) Mill.
Anemopsis californica var. subglabra Kelso
Erigeron zothecinus S.L.Welsh
Arbutus xalapensis var. texana (Buckley) A.Gray
Heterotheca inflata G.L.Nesom
Trimezia steyermarkii R.C.Foster
Sedum latifolium Bertol.
Amelanchier alnifolia Sarg.
Cyperus ferax Rich.
Eleocharis elegans (Kunth) Roem. & Schult.
Matelea dictyantha Woodson
Oenothera drummondii var. thalassaphila (Brandegee) Munz
Atriplex confinis Standl.
Boeberastrum littoralis (Brandegee) Rydb.
Palafoxia rosea (Bush) Cory
Verbena menthifolia var. comonduensis (Moldenke) Moldenke
Lycium berlandieri var. berlandieri
Ferocactus peninsulae subsp. townsendianus (Britton & Rose) Pilbeam & Bowdery
Bucida buceras L.
Dalea tinctoria var. arenaria Brandegee
Abutilon grandidentatum Fryxell
Abronia maritima subsp. capensis A.F.Johnson
Dalea tinctoria var. tinctoria
Aristida fasciculata Torr.
Petrophytum caespitosum var. elatius (S.Watson) Tidestr.
Randia nelsonii Greenm.
Gardenia jasminoides Retz., 1781
Randia pringlei A.Gray
Hordeum maritimum subsp. gussoneanum (Parl.) Asch. & Graebn.
Rubus vitifolius subsp. ursinus (Cham. & Schltdl.) Abrams
Allium cascadense M.Peck
Corryocactus apiciflorus (Vaupel) Hutchison
Cleistocactus strausii (Heese) Backeb.
Cephalocereus senilis (Haw.) Pfeiff.
Echinopsis chamaecereus H.Friedrich & Glaetzle
Ferocactus eastwoodiae (L.D.Benson) L.D.Benson
Machaeranthera arizonica Jackson & Johnst.
Agastache aurantiaca (A.Gray) Lint & Epling
Agastache micrantha var. durangensis R.W.Sanders
Artemisia dracunculoides var. dracunculina (S.Watson) S.F.Blake
Agave expansa Jacobi
Rorippa microtites (B.L.Rob.) Rollins
Mammillaria dioica subsp. estebanensis (G.E.Linds.) D.R.Hunt
Banisteria palmeri C.B.Rob.
Bursera inopinata Bullock
Vitex negundo var. negundo
Echinocereus sciurus subsp. floresii (Backeb.) N.P.Taylor
Peperomia deppeana Schltdl. & Cham.
Quercus turbinella subsp. ajoensis (C.H.Mull.) Felger & C.H.Lowe
Phylica oleifolia Vent.
Agave filifera subsp. multifilifera (Gentry) B.Ullrich
Ranunculus pentodontus Standl.
Talinum appalachianum W.Wolf
Eragrostis arida Hitchc.
Myrsine coriacea subsp. coriacea
Chorizanthe inaequalis Stokes
Melocactus matanzanus León
Polemonium foliosissimum subsp. robustum (Rydb.) Brand
Echinocereus fasciculatus subsp. bonkerae (Thornber & Bonker) N.P.Taylor
Polemonium caeruleum subsp. amygdalium (Wherry) Munz
Polemonium coeruleum L.
Portulaca umbraticola subsp. coronata (Small) J.F.Matthews & Ketron
Rosa arizonica var. granulifera (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Chamaerhodos erecta var. parviflora (Nutt.) C.L.Hitchc.
Rumex cristatus DC.
Carex athabascensis F.J.Herm.
Drymaria lyropetala var. coahuilana I.M.Johnst.
Geum aleppicum subsp. strictum (Aiton) R.T.Clausen
Blepharoneuron Nash
Euchlaena mexicana Schrad.
Spermolepis Raf.
Bromus purgans Torr.
Cuphea procumbens Ortega
Calliandra gentryi Standl.
Martynia althaeifolia Benth.
Yucca nana Hochstätter
Quercus microphylla Née
Verbesina virginica L.
Malpighia punicifolia L.
Bumelia lanuginosa subsp. rigida (A.Gray) Cronquist
Yucca faxoniana Sarg.
Begonia californica Brandegee
Gilia achilleifolia Lindl., 1834
Brickellia eupatorioides var. eupatorioides
Cylindropuntia parryi (Engelm.) F.M.Knuth
Opuntia salmiana J.Parm. ex Pfeiff.
Heterotheca subaxillaris subsp. subaxillaris
Stetsonia coryne (Salm-Dyck) Britton & Rose
Mammillaria wagneriana Boed.
Operculina palmeri (S.Watson) House
Dalea alamosana (Rose) Bullock
Huernia guttata (Masson) Haw.
Calonyction tastense House
Matelea hastatula (A.Gray) Sundell
Ceropegia serpentina E.A.Bruce
Aster cognatus H.M.Hall
Artemisia vulgaris subsp. heterophylla H.M.Hall & Clem.
Dyckia Schult. & Schult.f.
Hetaeria Blume
Pediocactus simpsonii var. nigrispinus W.T.Marshall, 1941
Mammillaria halei J.M.Coult. ex K.Schum., 1895
Plumeria acutifolia Poir.
Corallorrhiza striata var. vreelandii (Rydb.) L.O.Williams
Strophanthus gratus (Wall. & Hook.) Baill.
Mammillaria heyderi subsp. meiacantha (Engelm.) D.R.Hunt
Teucrium grosii Pau
Flaveria oppositifolia (DC.) Rydb.
Ranunculus aquatic
Actaea arguta var. viridiflora (Greene) Tidestr. & Kittell
Ixia L.
Bauhinia subrotundifolia Cav.
Chamaesyce adenoptera (Bertol.) Small
Jatropha platanifolia Standl.
Dalea palmeri (Rose) L.Riley
Cassia palmeri S.Watson
Dalea diffusa Moric.
Aquilegia longissima A.Gray
Andropogon glomeratus var. glaucopsis (Elliott) C.Mohr
Plantago amplexicaulis Cav.
Larrea nitida Cav.
Manfreda variegata (Jacobi) Rose
Manfreda guttata (Jacobi & C.D.Bouché) Rose
Agave rubescens Salm-Dyck
Aloe acutissima var. antanimorensis Reynolds
Heuchera sanguinea var. sanguinea
Salsola kali subsp. tragus (L.) Celak.
Yucca harrimaniae var. sterilis Neese & S.L.Welsh
Sida spinosa var. angustifolia (Lam.) Griseb.
Agave gutierreziana Trel.
Monadenium coccineum Pax
Salsola vermiculata L.
Pavonia triloba Hochst. ex Webb
Euphorbia lucida Waldst. & Kit.
Eriogonum ochrocephalum var. alexandrae Reveal
Kochia sieversiana (Pall.) C.A.Mey.
Atriplex bracteosa (Durand & Hilg.) S.Watson
Chenopodium berlandieri subsp. pseudopetiolare Aellen
Agropyron intermedium var. trichophorum (Link) Halácsy
Agropyron dasystachyum var. dasystachyum
Cercocarpus alnifolius Rydb.
Diplachne uninervia (J.Presl) Parodi
Calia arizonica (S.Watson) Yakovlev
Pisum sativum var. macrocarpon Ser.
Townsendia alpigena var. minima (Eastw.) Dorn
Townsendia alpigena var. alpigena
Acalypha neogranatensis Müll.Arg.
Vachellia aroma (Gillies ex Hook. & Arn.) Seigler & Ebinger
Evax verna var. verna
Cucurbita melopepo L.
Tragoceros zinnioides Kunth
Vachellia hebeclada subsp. hebeclada
Cylindropuntia bigelovii var. ciribe (Engelm. ex Coult.) Rebman
Buddleia L.
Bidens anthriscoides DC.
Gentiana affinis var. forwoodii (A.Gray) Kusn.
Fraxinus macropetala Eastw.
Galium tinctorium (L.) Scop.
Gaillardia arizonica var. pringlei (Rydb.) S.F.Blake
Arrhenatherum elatius var. biaristatum (Peterm.) Peterm.
Opuntia setispina Engelm., 1850
Crassula helmsii (Kirk) A.Berger
Sarcobatus vermiculatus var. baileyi (Coville) Jeps.
Salsola kali subsp. tenuifolia Moq.
Echeveria brittonii Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Ericameria viscidiflora var. viscidiflora
Rhus integrifolia var. integrifolia
Rhus leptodictya Diels
Scrophularia montana Wooton
Echeveria secunda Booth ex Lindl.
Benthamantha edwardsii (A.Gray) Rose
Heteropteris palmeri Rose
Sesbania sonorae Rydb.
Polygala decidua Blake
Casuarina stricta Miq.
Euphorbia dentata f. cuphosperma (Engelm.) Fernald
Covillea tridentata (DC.) Vail
Toxicodendron radicans subsp. rydbergii (Small ex Rydb.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Allium scaposum Benth.
Hesperaloe funifera subsp. chiangii G.D.Starr
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. toroweapensis P.C.Fisch.
Penstemon virgatus subsp. asa-grayi Crosswh.
Beschorneria calcicola García-Mend.
Agave ragusae A.Terracc.
Cordylanthus glandulosus Pennell & Clokey
Agave lurida Aiton
Phlox gracilis var. gracilis
Bouteloua gracilis var. stricta (Vasey) Hitchc.
Nolina bigelovii var. bigelovii
Mammillaria multidigitata Radley ex G.E.Linds.
Opuntia cochenillifera DC.
Claytonia spathulata var. viridis (A.Davidson) Munz
Claytonia fontana (L.) R.J.Davis
Sisyrinchium tinctorium Kunth
Opuntia cochinellifera (L.) Mill.
Mammillaria melanocentra Poselg.
Zanichellia Roth, 1793
Androsace septentrionalis var. pinetorum (Greene) R.Knuth
Dyssodia sanguinea (Klatt) Strother
Anagallis linifolia L.
Opuntia basilaris var. woodburyi Earle
Grevillea crithmifolia R.Br.
Arabis eremophila Greene
Tigridia pringlei S.Watson
Muhlenbergia dubioides Goodd.
Penstemon pseudospectabilis subsp. typicus D.D.Keck
Plummera ambigens S.F.Blake
Penstemon cleavelandii A.Gray
Coreocarpus shrevei Sherff
Descurainia obtusa subsp. typica Detling
Delphinium coelestinum Rydb.
Eriogonum shockleyi subsp. longilobum (M.E.Jones) S.Stokes
Dyckia brevifolia Baker
Abronia orbiculata Standl.
Salix phlebophylla Andersson
Dodonaea cuneata Sm.
Senna artemisioides nothosubsp. sturtii (R.Br.) Randell
Crepis nana subsp. typica Babc., 1947
Abutilon incanum subsp. incanum
Echinocereus stoloniferus W.T.Marshall
Echinocereus subinermis subsp. ochoterenae (J.G.Ortega) N.P.Taylor
Echinocereus viridiflorus Engelm.
Echinocereus subinermis Salm-Dyck ex Scheer
Echinocereus triglochidiatus var. gurneyi L.D.Benson
Hibiscus martianus Zucc.
Echinocereus scheeri subsp. gentryi (Clover) N.P.Taylor
Coreopsis tinctoria f. atropurpurea (Hook.) Fernald
Dentaria integrifolia Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Poa scaberula Hook.f.
Corallorhiza maculata subsp. occidentalis (Lindl.) Cockerell
Dasylirion wheeleri var. wheeleri
Machaeranthera canescens var. glabra Gray
Prunus emarginata var. crenulata (Greene) Kearney & Peebles
Vesicarpa potentilloides (A.Gray) Rydb.
Trichocereus (A.Berger) Riccob.
Camissonia heteranthera P.H.Raven
Oenothera marginata Nutt.
Potentilla thurberi var. sanguinea (Rydb.) Kearney & Peebles
Bursera jorullensis (Kunth) Engl.
Lithophragma parvifolium Walp., 1848
Brickellia wrightii Durand & Hilg.
Celtis mississippiensis Bosc
Hechtia Klotzsch
Obione acanthocarpa Torr.
Artemisia dracunculina S.Watson
Oenothera hexandra subsp. hexandra
Acacia mcmurphii Wiggins, 1940
Opuntia nopalilla Karw. ex Salm-Dyck
Solidago ulmifolia var. microphylla A.Gray, 1882
Penstemon corymbosus Benth. ex A.DC.
Adenia spinosa Burtt Davy
Astragalus macrocarpus subsp. macrocarpus
Cuscuta pentagona var. pentagona
Ceratotheca triloba (Bernh.) E.Mey. ex Bernh., 1842
Elaeagnus orientalis L.
Nierembergia hippomanica var. violacea Millán
Eriosyce Phil.
Lobelia cardinalis var. propinqua (Paxton) Bowden
Cercis occidentalis var. texensis S.Watson
Agave parrasana A.Berger
Epilobium paniculatum f. adenocladon Hausskn.
Eucalyptus diptera C.R.P.Andrews
Eucalyptus websteriana Maiden
Eucalyptus lesouefii Maiden
Eriogonum deflexum subsp. baratum (Elmer) Munz
Linanthus aureus var. aureus
Nicotiana trigonophylla var. trigonophylla
Linanthastrum nuttallii subsp. nuttallii
Phlox longifolia var. brevifolia (A.Gray) A.Gray
Solanum campanulatum Willd. ex Sendtn.
Fraxinus trifoliata (Torr.) F.H.Lewis & Epling
Agave albomarginata Gentry
Gaura gracilis f. glandulosa (Wooton & Standl.) Munz
Juncus acuminatus f. sphaerocephalus F.J.Herm.
Cyperus esculentus var. angustispicatus Britton
Oncidium longifolium Lindl.
Juncus marginatus var. setosus Coville
Styphelia Sm.
Aquilegia chrysantha var. chrysantha
Lygodesmia D.Don
Dichelostemma pulchellum var. capitatum (Benth.) Reveal
Juncus effusus var. compactus (Hoppe ex Mert. & W.D.J.Koch) Lej. & Courtois
Aloe angelica Pole-Evans
Lysiloma divaricatum Benth., 1844
Gilia congesta var. frutescens (Rydb.) Cronquist
Hechtia texensis S.Watson
Potamogeton gramineus var. maximus Morong
Agave ocahui var. ocahui
Valeriana obovata (Nutt.) Schult.
Oncosiphon grandiflorum (Thunb.) Källersjö
Helichrysum bracteatum (Vent.) Andrews
Guilleminea Kunth
Carex echinata var. ormantha Fernald
Streptanthus tortuosus var. flavescens Jeps.
Thelypodium longirostre (S.Watson) Jeps.
Phaseolus maculatus var. maculatus
Draba reptans var. stellifera (O.E.Schulz) C.L.Hitchc.
Symphoricarpos utahensis Rydb.
Verbena ×teasii Moldenke
Clerodendron Burm., 1737
Aloe maculata Thunb.
Aloe schomeri Rauh
Aloe kilifiensis Christian
Krameria canescens A.Gray
Euphorbia dictyosperma var. mexicana Engelm.
Opuntia quimilo K.Schum.
Dalea astragalopsis Standl.
Potentilla pulchella R.Br.
Narcissus biflorus Curtis
Epilobium paniculatum var. subulatum (Hausskn.) Fernald
Epilobium obcordatum var. obcordatum
Vachellia macracantha (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Seigler & Ebinger
Caesalpinia velutina (Britton & Rose) Standl.
Grusonia clavata (Engelm.) H.Rob.
Cucurbita maxima Wall.
Cayaponia Silva Manso
Cryptadenia Meisn.
Camellia transnokoensis Hayata
Lathyrus palustris subsp. pilosus (Cham.) Hultén
Cucurbita argyrosperma var. callicarpa Merrick & D.M.Bates
Acer pycnanthum C.Koch
Rubus innominatus var. kuntzeanus (Hemsl.) L.H.Bailey
Leymus salina var. mojavensis (Barkworth & R.J.Atkins) C.Yen & J.L.Yang
Carya cordiformis (Wangenh.) C.Koch
Ficus gomelleira Kunth & Bouché
Prunus persica subsp. persica
Fragaria nipponica Makino
Halophila decipiens Ostenf.
Symphyotrichum subulatus Michx.
Spergula platensis (Cambess.) Shinners
Holographis Nees
Juncus effusus f. gracilis Buchenau ex Matsum.
Castilleja vreelandii Rydb.
Carex piperi Mack.
Solidago scabriuscula Rydb.
Carex olneyi Boott
Cynanchum rossicum Kleopow
Forsellesia clokeyi Ensign
Chenopodium gigantospermum Aellen
Calamagrostis arundinacea (L.) Roth
Koeleria californica (Domin) Beetle
Gentiana romanzovii Ledeb. ex Bunge
Siegesbeckia orientalis L.
Pithecellobium lanceolatum (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Benth.
Lotus decumbens Poir.
Macrosiphonia woodsoniana Standl.
Aloe spectabilis Reynolds
Physocarpus torreyi (S.Watson) Maxim.
Hedera helix Lowe
Malaxis luceroana R.González
Piscidia piscipula (L.) Sarg.
Broussonetia Vent.
Sartwellia mexicana A.Gray, 1883
Poa hispidula Vasey
Polystemma Decne.
Draba unilateralis M.E.Jones
Koanophyllon solidaginoides (Kunth) R.King & H.Rob.
Cistanche Hoffmanns. & Link
Achyranthes bidentata Blume
Pandanus amaryllifolius Roxb.
Aristolochia debilis Siebold & Zucc.
Echinocereus mamillatus (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Trisetum kochianum Hern.Torres
Andrographis paniculata (Burm.f.) Wall.
Hydnocarpus anthelminthicus Pierre ex Laness.
Allowissadula holosericea (Scheele) D.M.Bates
Persicaria chinensis (L.) Nakai
Rosa carolina L.
Echium elegans Lehm.
Entada Adans.
Sempervivum webbii Schenck
Amsinckia sparsiseta Suksd.
Rhododendron macrosepalum Maxim.
Apiastrum angustifolium var. tenellum Nutt.
Conyza varia (Webb) Wild
Amsinckia strigosa Suksd.
Mimulus cupriphilus Macnair
Carex aztecica Mack.
Carex deweyana var. sparsiflora (Olney) L.H.Bailey
Doellingeria ledophylla var. ledophylla
Doellingeria engelmannii (D.C.Eaton) Semple, Brouillet & G.A.Allen
Solidago lepida var. molina Fernald
Doellingeria gormanii (Piper) Semple, Brouillet & G.A.Allen
Calochortus purdyi Eastw.
Cephalanthus occidentalis subsp. salicifolius (Humb. & Bonpl.) Borhidi & Diego
Pseudosclerochloa rupestris (With.) Tzvelev
Antirrhinum hookerianum Millsp.
Lupinus barbatus (L.F.Hend.) A.Heller
Phyllostachys bissetii McClure
Astragalus mollissimus var. mollissimus
Ruellia leucantha var. postinsularis Gentry
Juglans rupestris var. major Torr.
Leucadendron eucalyptifolium H.Buek ex Meisn.
Erigeron pumilus f. diabolicus Cronquist
Lomatium kingii (S.Watson) Cronquist
Haplopappus nuttallii var. depressa Maguire
Rubus parviflorus f. paratrichophorus Fassett
Aster leucopsis Greene
Streptanthus flavescens Hook.
Aloe camperi Schweinf.
Heuchera diversifolia Rydb.
Carex fulvescens Mack.
Lasthenia ornduffii R.Chan
Amelanchier ephemerotricha var. silvicola Suksd.
Symphyotrichum ×amethystinum (Nutt.) G.L.Nesom
Mimulus luteus var. gracilis A.Gray
Ptelea cinnamomea Greene
Arabis stokesiae Rydb.
Scutellaria racemosa Pers.
Euphorbia carmenensis Rose
Phaca lerdoensis Rydb.
Amsinckia verrucosissima Suksd.
Carex rostrata var. rostrata
Allium recurvatum Rydb.
Orthocarpus tenuis A.Heller
Senecio acutidens Rydb.
Picradenia floribunda (A.Gray) Greene
Draba nivalis var. thompsonii C.L.Hitchc.
Piptochaetium avenaceum (L.) Parodi
Linosyris serrulata Torr.
Erythrocoma aliena Greene
Mertensia intermedia Rydb.
Burrielia parviflora Nutt.
Nuttallia lobata (Hook.) Rydb.
Hymenopappus niveus Rydb.
Anthriscus scandens Steud.
Hieracium chapacanum Zahn
Gayophytum pumilum S.Watson
Draba spectabilis var. glabrescens O.E.Schulz
Chrysopsis camphorata Eastw.
Carex quadrifida var. lenis L.H.Bailey
Lathyrus violaceus Greene
Parosela goldmanii Rose
Lilium canadense var. puberulum Torr.
Therofon heucheriforme Rydb.
Eriogonum anemophilum var. cusickii Gand.
Eriogonum tomentosum Michx.
Phaca perstricta Rydb.
Lomatium tarantuloides Darrach & Hinchliff
Lepidium montanum subsp. demissum C.L.Hitchc.
Bahia pedata A.Gray
Crataegus columbiana var. columbiana
Rosa columbiana Rydb.
Neomammillaria mainiae Britton & Rose
Tanacetum diversifolium D.C.Eaton
Sidalcea diploscypha var. minor A.Gray
Apocynum oliganthum Greene
Pogogyne multiflora Benth.
Cuscuta salina var. acuminata Yunck.
Gilia tenuisecta A.Heller
Toxicodendron pumilum Greene
Mertensia eplicata J.F.Macbr.
Physalis hederifolia var. comata (Rydb.) Waterf.
Synthyris reniformis var. reniformis
Penstemon thompsoniae var. desperatus Neese
Carex nebrascensis var. eruciformis Suksd.
Mimulus bigelovii var. ovatus Gray
Scutellaria linearifolia Eastw.
Lupinus laxispicatus Rydb.
Lathyrus venosus var. californicus S.Watson
Maba latifolia Standl.
Rumex mexicanus var. strictus M.Peck
Phleum geniculatum Bellardi.
Lophochlaena californica Nees
Antennaria dimorpha var. macrocephala D.C.Eaton
Valeriana edulis f. glabra H.St.John
Lesquerella hitchcockii subsp. confluens Maguire & A.H.Holmgren
Abutilon mochisense Hochr.
Rhinanthus kyrollae Chabert
Eugenia supraaxillaris Spring
Eriophyllum nevadense Gand.
Pectis biaristata Rydb.
Coreocarpus shrevei var. latilobus Sherff
Astragalus amnis-amissi Barneby
Oenothera williamsonii (Durand & Hilg.) S.Watson
Aletes tenuifolia (Nutt.) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Trifolium anodon Greene
Bothriochloa saccharoides var. saccharoides
Paronychia drummondii Torr. & A.Gray
Oenothera tenuissima M.E.Jones
Monardella villosa subsp. globosa (Greene) Jokerst
Elymus intermedius (Vasey ex A.Gray) Scribn. & J.G.Sm.
Cercocarpus montanus var. macrourus (Rydb.) F.L.Martin
Fragaria ×ananassa var. cuneifolia (Nuttall ex Howell) Staudt
Erigeron breweri var. klamathensis G.L.Nesom
Glyceria nubigena W.A.Anderson
Hosackia parviflora Benth.
Lupinus franciscanus Greene
Arabis suffrutescens var. horizontalis (Greene) Rollins
Arabis breweri var. austiniae (Greene) Rollins
Claytonia sibirica var. bulbifera (A.Gray) A.Gray
Hibiscus lasiocarpus S.Watson
Swertia umpquaensis (Peck & Applegate) H.St.John
Physaria kingii var. diversifolia (Greene) B.L.Turner
Dichanthelium lanuginosum var. thermale (Bol.) Spellenb.
Juncus bufonius subsp. congestus Döll
Lupinus polyphyllus subsp. bernardinus (Abrams ex C.P.Sm.) Munz
Lotus argophyllus var. hancockii Dunkle
Leersia hexandra Sw.
Lathyrus californicus (S.Watson) S.Watson
Maianthemum bifolium (L.) F.W.Schmidt
Trifolium parviflorum Ehrh.
Ranunculus hederaceus L.
Allocarya diffusa Greene
Pimpinella apiodora A.Gray
Cuscuta arvensis Beyr. ex Engelm.
Polygonum aviculare var. angustissimum Meisn.
Persea persea (L.) Cockerell
Fuchsia magellanica subsp. discolor (Lindl.) L.H.Bailey
Lupinus horizontalis var. horizontalis
Elymus ×vancouverensis (Vasey) Bowden
Mitella trifida var. trifida
Sidalcea malviflora var. sparsifolia C.L.Hitchc.
Symphyotrichum laeve subsp. geyeri (A.Gray)
Horkelia congesta var. congesta
Echium lusitanicum L.
Horkelia congesta var. nemorosa (Keck) M.Peck
Keckia corymbosa (Benth.) Straw
Lotus japonicus (Regel) K.Larsen
Tripleurospermum maritimum subsp. inodorum Linnaeus, 1755
Senecio biserratus Belcher
Monotropaceae
Hippuris L.
Sarraceniaceae
Stevia subpubescens Lag.
Viguiera dentata var. canescens (DC.) S.F.Blake
Fagonia californica var. laevis (Standl.) L.D.Benson
Agave scabra subsp. potosiensis Gentry
Agave victoriae-reginae T.Moore
Pereskia bahiensis Gürke
Enceliopsis nudicaulis var. bairdii S.L.Welsh
Anredera baselloides (Kunth) Baill.
Brachypodium distachyon Roem. & Schult.
Pistacia integerrima J.L.Stewart ex Brandis
Bismarckia nobilis Hildebr. & H.Wendl.
Gilia subnuda subsp. superba (Eastw.) Brand
Hymenoxys microcephala Bierner
Iva frutescens L.
Arecastrum (Drude) Becc.
Hesperoyucca (Engelm.) Baker
Erioxylum aridum Rose & Standl.
Chamaesaracha pallida Averett
Portlandia mexicana (Zucc. & Mart. ex DC.) Hemsl.
Schoepfia parvifolia Planch. ex Hemsl.
Pereskia nemorosa Rojas
Pereskia humboldtii Britton & Rose
Arundinaria variegata Makino
Aloe mitriformis DC.
Nerium indicum Mill.
Azedarach Mill.
Castilleja ownbeyana Pennell
Gilia aggregata var. macrosiphon Kearney & Peebles
Spiraea densiflora var. densiflora
Galium multiflorum var. hirsutum (A.Gray) A.Gray
Psidium friedrichsthalianum (Berg) Nied.
Aloysia Juss.
Opuntia stenopetala Engelm.
Selenicereus (Berger) Britton & Rose
Poinciana pulcherrima L.
Berberis higginsae Munz
Hippocrateaceae
Chamaesyce chamaesyce (L.) Hurus.
Cereus eruca Brandegee
Eriogonum effusum Nutt.
Agave funkiana K.Koch & C.D.Bouché
Lomatium jonesii J.M.Coult. & Rose
Brodiaea coronaria var. coronaria
Ceropegia sandersonii Decne. ex Hook.
Kleinia Mill.
Bromus tectorum f. nudus (Klett & Richt.) H.St.John
Vachellia rigidula (Benth.) Seigler & Ebinger
Actinea odorata (DC.) Kuntze
Centaurium curvistamineum (Wittr.) Abrams
Carex cryptolepis Mack.
Corynandra viscosa (L.) Cochrane & Iltis
Agropyron griffithii Scribn. & J.G.Sm. ex Piper
Opuntia deserta Griffiths
Phemeranthus Raf.
Leucophyllum zygophyllum I.M.Johnst.
Bilbergia Wendland
Guardiola stenodonta S.F.Blake
Maximowiczia insularis Brandegee
Grossularia quercetorum (Greene) Coville & Britton
Ferocactus cylindraceus subsp. lecontei (Engelm.) N.P.Taylor
Mimulus parishii Gand.
Psidium montanum Sw.
Glandularia ciliata (Benth.) Botta
Agave nizandensis Cutak
Agave inaequidens subsp. barrancensis Gentry
Agave striata subsp. falcata (Engelm.) Gentry
Astrophytum myriostigma Lem.
Cenchrus montanus Nees
Vachellia luederitzii (Engl.) Kyal. & Boatwr.
Lilium longiflorum Wall.
Pontederia L.
Haworthia cymbiformis (Haw.) Duval
Stapelia grandiflora Masson
Kleinia herreiana (Dinter) Merxm., 1955
Lesquerella mendocina (Phil.) Kurtz
Macfadyena A.DC.
Opuntia acanthocarpa var. ramosa Peebles
Senecio carthamoides Greene
Orthocarpus erianthus var. gratiosus Jeps. & Tracy
Zygophyllum L.
Rhipsalis paradoxa (Salm-Dyck) Salm-Dyck
Nierembergia gracilis Hook.
Acacia colletioides A.Cunn. ex Benth.
Phemeranthus brevicaulis (S.Watson) Kiger
Heterotheca fulcrata var. senilis (Wooton & Standl.) Semple
Jaborosa Juss.
Acourtia macrocephala Sch.Bip.
Artemisia neomexicana Greene ex Rydb.
Chaenactis tenuifolia Nutt.
Psoralea rhombifolia Torr. & A.Gray
Mimosa quadrivalvis L.
Biscutella wislizeni Benth. & Hook.f. ex S.Watson
Cowania havardii S.Watson
Bolusanthus speciosus (Bolus) Harms
Agave peacockii Croucher
Koeleria pyramidata var. pyramidata
Vachellia permixta (Burtt Davy) Kyal. & Boatwr.
Grusonia aggeria (Ralston & Hilsenb.) E.F.Anderson
Penstemon variabilis Suksd.
Plantago patagonica var. breviscapa (Shinners) Shinners
Psoralea lanceolata var. stenophylla (Rydb.) Toft & S.L.Welsh
Sidalcea spicata var. ranunculacea (Greene) Roush
Lupinus brevicaluis S.Watson
Ageratina Spach
Pachypodium Lindl.
Trianthema L.
Ipomoea purga (Wender.) Hayne
Fraxinus berlanderiana DC.
Imperata brasiliensis Trin.
Croton spica Baill.
Acacia schaffneri var. schaffneri
Schefflera digitata J.R.Forst. & G.Forst.
Senegalia berlandieri (Benth.) Britton & Rose
Coringia J.Presl & C.Presl
Dactyloctenium aegyptiacum Willd.
Senegalia hereroensis (Engl.) Kyal. & Boatwr.
Dietes bicolor Sweet ex G.Don, 1832
Eucalyptus coolabah Blakely & Jacobs
Thelypodium micranthum (A.Gray) S.Watson
Morinda L.
Chamaerops L.
Taraxacum palustre DC.
Lupinus lepidus subsp. medius Detling
Aster falcatus var. commutatus (Torr. & A.Gray) A.G.Jones
Chaerophyllum tainturieri var. tainturieri
Carex involucratella Mack.
Arundinella berteroniana (Schult.) Mez
Amorpha fragrans Sweet
Androstephium Torr.
Leptochloa panicoides Wight ex Steud.
Arracacia edulis S.Watson
Audibertia Benth., 1829
Hibiscus phoeniceus Willd.
Gossypium klotzschianum Andersson
Operculina alatipes (Hook.) House
Evolvulus alsinodes Kuntze
Hesperonia tenuiloba (S.Watson) Standl.
Gilia palmeri subsp. spectabilis A.G.Day
Pyrrhopappus DC.
Clematis dioica Sieber ex C.Presl
Spermococe tenuior L., 1753
Solanum diversifolium Humb. & Bonpl. ex Dunal
Barkeria palmeri (Rolfe) Schltr.
Heteranthemis Schott
Urginea maritima (L.) Baker
Acacia senegal var. rostrata Brenan
Acacia tetragonophylla F.Muell.
Albizia amara subsp. sericocephala (Benth.) Brenan
Penstemon venosus (D.D.Keck) Reveal
Ageratum L.
Senecio radicans (L.fil.) Sch.Bip.
Kleinia repens (L.) Haw.
Castilleja patriotica var. blumeri (Standl.) Kearney & Peebles
Clarkia elegans Poir.
Talipariti tiliaceum (L.) Fryxell
Ipomopsis congesta subsp. crebifolia (Nutt.) A.G.Day
Opuntia superbospina Griffiths
Ranunculus bloomeri S.Watson
Tiarella trifoliata subsp. trifoliata
Eremopyrum (Ledeb.) Jaub. & Spach
Agropyron cristatum (L.) P.Beauv., 1812
Chrysothamnus nauseosus subsp. nanus (Cronquist) D.D.Keck
Yucca verdiensis McKelvey
Ellimia ruderalis Nutt.
Chrysothamnus marianus Rydb.
Cerastium arvense var. maximum Hollick & Britton
Aquilegia canadensis var. formosa (Fisch. ex DC.) J.G.Cooper, 1860
Barbarea vulgaris var. gracilis DC.
Vaccinium chihuahuense Wilbur & Luteyn
Potamogeton foliosus var. californicus (Morong) Morong
Penstemon richardsonii subsp. dentatus D.D.Keck
Penstemon auricomus A.Nelson
Gilia sinuata var. tweedyi (Rydb.) Cronquist
Calandrinia stenophylla Rydb.
Diervilla sessilifolia Buckley
Delphinium nuttallianum var. levicaule C.L.Hitchc.
Aster brevibracteatus Rydb.
Salvia dorrii subsp. argentea (Rydb.) Munz
Erigeron tephrodes Greene
Hymenoxys cooperi subsp. grayi Cockerell
Calliandra haematocephala var. haematocephala
Calamagrostis stricta Trin., 1824
Heuchera rubescens var. typica M.G.Stewart
Eriogonum corymbosum var. divaricatum Torr. & A.Gray
Cymopterus acaulis var. acaulis
Castilleja pallida var. camporum (Howell) Greenm.
Stemodia polystachya Brandegee
Senna mollissima var. glabrata (Benth.) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Acerates tomentosa Torr.
Parosela townsendii Rydb.
Pseudosasa japonica (Siebold & Zucc. ex Steud.) Makino
Cymbidium insigne Rolfe
Dalea epica S.L.Welsh
Juncus campestris L.
Penstemon cinereus subsp. cinereus
Penstemon leptophyllus Rydb.
Lomatium orogenioides (J.M.Coult. & Rose) Mathias
Kallstroemia grandiflora var. arizonica Cockerell
Amelanchier vestita Suksd.
Penstemon caespitosus subsp. perbrevis Pennell
Swertia gypsicola Barneby
Melaleuca huegelii subsp. huegelii
Draba crockeri Lemmon
Castilleja bennittii A.Nelson & J.F.Macbr.
Arabis pulchra var. duchesnensis Rollins
Dudleya helleri Rose ex Britton & Rose
Nolina nelsonii Rose
Mentzelia stenophylla Urb. & Gilg
Salvia argentea L.
Tibouchina Aubl.
Boechera pendulina var. russeola (Rollins) Dorn
Ficus grossularioides Burm.fil.
Vilfa rigens Trin.
Chamelaucium ciliatum Desf.
Eriogonum mearnsii Parry
Swertia covillei Greene
Arabis pusilla Rollins
Godetia amoena var. albicaulis Jeps.
Penstemon puniceus A.Gray
Ptelea neglecta Greene
Astragalus didymocarpus subsp. milesianus (Rydb.) Hoover
Astragalus candelarius E.Sheld.
Audibertia clevelandii A.Gray
Chaenactis humilis Rydb.
Danthonia thermale Scribn.
Quercus infralutea Trel.
Bambusa longispiculata Gamble
Senecio peninsularis Vasey & Rose
Arenaria fendleri var. subcongesta S.Watson
Potentilla osterhoutii (A.Nelson) J.T.Howell
Bromus kalmii A.Gray
Hypopitys latisquama Rydb.
Antennaria foliacea var. humilis Rydb.
Arabis caduca A.Nelson
Argentina occidentalis Rydb.
Ranunculus orthorhynchus var. alpinus S.Watson
Phellosperma tetrancistra (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Delphinium nuttallianum var. pilosum C.L.Hitchc.
Cercocarpus montanus var. blancheae (C.K.Schneid.) F.L.Martin
Pyrrocoma suksdorfii Greene
Amsinckia arvensis Suksd.
Erythraea nudicaulis Engelm.
Quamasia azurea A.Heller
Eschscholzia menziesiana var. coarctata Fedde
Lepidium scopulorum f. canescens Thell.
Microseris tenella (A.Gray) Sch.Bip.
Bursera glabrifolia (Kunth) Engl.
Anoda polygyna Fryxell
Lopezia suffrutescens Munz
Oxybaphus albidus (Walter) Sweet
Viguiera vorobikiae B.L.Turner
Cuphea meionandra Koehne
Tripterocalyx cycloptera (Gray) Standl.
Anulocaulis eriosolenus (Gray) Standl.
Aristolochia veracruzana J.F.Ortega
Bursera collina Brandegee
Ipomoea viscosa Wiggins
Agrohordeum macounii var. valencianum Bowden
Gilia schottii (Torr.) A.Gray
Sidalcea humilis A.Gray
Lonicera ledebourii Eschsch.
Sisymbrium glandulosum (Kar. & Kir.) Maxim.
Koeleria macrantha subsp. macrantha
Micranthes lyallii subsp. lyallii
Talinum whitei I.M.Johnst.
Eucalyptus diversicolor F.Muell.
Gazania rigida (Burm.fil.) Roessler
Dioscorea convolvulacea subsp. convolvulacea
Festuca arundinacea Vill.
Chenopodium rubrum Forssk.
Trifolium depauperatum var. stenophyllum (Nutt.) McDermott
Triticum turgidum subsp. turgidum
Triticum turgidum subsp. polonicum (L.) Thell.
Sesbania sesban (L.) Merr.
Limnanthes gracilis subsp. gracilis
Pycnanthemum incanum (L.) Michx.
Elyhordeum Mansf. ex Tsitsin & K.A.Petrova
Eritrichium fulvum (Hook. & Arn.) DC.
Stewartia virginica Cav.
Gordonia lasianthus L.
Heliopsis scabra Dunal
Gilia lutescens Steud.
Heliopsis Pers.
Viola tricolor var. arvensis (Murray) DC.
Euphorbia petaloidea Engelm.
Actinomeris alternifolia (L.) DC.
Bahia lanata (Pursh) DC.
Obeliscaria columnaris (Sims) DC.
Mengea californica Moq.
Anemone virginiana L.
Polygala cruciata L.
Caltha radicans T.F.Forst.
Eupatorium altissimum L.
Sabatia chloroides (Michx.) Pursh
Gordonia pubescens L'Hér.
Senecio flocciferus DC.
Sagittaria sagittifolia var. variabilis (Engelm.) Micheli
Coreopsis delphiniifolia Lam.
Physalis nyctaginea Dunal
Aster carolinianus Walter
Zanthorhiza L'Hér.
Helianthus orgyalis DC.
Erophila americana (Pers.) DC.
Vaccinium resinosum Aiton
Aster patens var. phlogifolius (Muhl. ex Willd.) Nees
Asclepias parvifolia Pursh ex Decne.
Senecio californicus var. laxior DC.
Gnaphalium decurrens Ives
Artemisia pachystachya DC.
Helianthemum ramuliflorum Michx.
Ranunculus recurvatus Poir.
Thalictrum carolinianum Bosc ex DC.
Viola palmata var. vulgaris Elliott
Eupatorium aromaticum L.
Croton cortesianus Kunth
Euphorbia ohiotica Steud. & Hochst. ex Boiss.
Eritrichium leucophaeum (Douglas) A.DC.
Gilia elongata (Benth.) Steud.
Antennaria margaritacea R.Br., 1817
Chrysopsis falcata (Pursh) Elliott
Gilia densifolia (Benth.) Benth.
Coreopsis gladiata Walter
Hieracium californicum DC., 1838
Actaea brachypetala DC.
Limnanthemum lacunosum Griseb.
Myosotis caespitosa var. laxa DC., 1846
Brachyris dracunculoides DC.
Zanthoxylum tricarpum Michx.
Bahia artemisiifolia var. douglasii DC., 1836
Bahia leucophylla DC.
Ranunculus marilandicus Poir.
Polygala corymbosa Michx.
Thalictrum anemonoides Michx.
Aster multiflorus var. ciliatus (Willd.) W.P.C.Barton
Gilia virgata (Benth.) Steud.
Magnolia auriculata Desr.
Obeliscaria pinnata (Vent.) Cass.
Alarconia helenioides DC.
Anemiopsis Endl., 1841
Croton capitatus var. lindheimeri (Engelm. & A.Gray) Müll.Arg.
Rudbeckia fulgida Aiton
Woodvillea calendulacea DC.
Aster fragilis Willd.
Gaillardia lanceolata Michx.
Gilia liniflora Benth.
Chrysostemma tripteris (L.) Less.
Bulbostylis cavanillesii (Cass.) DC.
Alarconia angustifolia DC.
Grindelia rubricaulis DC.
Calliopsis atkinsoniana (Douglas ex Lindl.) Hook.
Azalea nudiflora L.
Andromeda bracteosa DC.
Sabatia angularis (L.) Pursh
Monolopia minor DC.
Aconitum uncinatum var. michauxianum Ser.
Senecio obovatus Muhl. ex Willd.
Eupatorium linearifolium Walter
Nicotiana repanda Willd. ex Lehm.
Baccharis consanguinea DC.
Ranunculus multifidus Pursh
Centunculus lanceolatus Michx.
Erigeron purpureus Aiton
Bahia confertiflora DC.
Eupatorium sessilifolium L.
Hieracium ×marianum Willd.
Dracopis amplexicaulis (Vahl) Cass.
Silene platypetala Otth
Sabatia corymbosa Baldwin ex Elliott
Eritrichium plebeium (Cham.) A.DC.
Gentiana saponaria L.
Baccharis angustifolia Michx.
Andromeda venulosa DC.
Viola sagittata Aiton
Asclepias nivea L.
Viola ovata Nutt.
Diplopappus incanus Lindl.
Diplopappus rigidus Lindl.
Vaccinium lanceolatum DC. ex Dunal
Eupatorium occidentale var. subroseum DC.
Eupatorium pubescens Muhl. ex Willd.
Halesia diptera L.
Sabatia gracilis (Michx.) Salisb.
Cirsium breweri var. wrangelii Petr.
Ranunculus aquatilis var. caespitosus (Thuill.) DC.
Ranunculus muricatus var. carolinus DC.
Tripolium flexuosum (Nutt.) Nees
Bahia staechadifolia (Lag.) DC.
Gnaphalium polycephalum Michx.
Symplocos tinctoria (L.) L'Hér.
Viola primulifolia var. nuttallii DC., 1824
Lysimachia stricta (Sol.)
Mertensia virginica (L.) Pers.
Xanthium macrocarpum DC.
Polygala incarnata L.
Aconitum uncinatum var. linnaeanum Ser.
Cocculus carolinus (L.) DC.
Eupatorium coronopifolium (Michx.) Willd.
Calais douglasii DC.
Bahia artemisiifolia Less.
Rhexia angustifolia Nutt.
Chrysopsis canescens DC.
Oxalis lyonii Pursh
Pyrrocoma grindelioides DC.
Alisma californicum (Torr.) Micheli
Chrysopsis hirtella DC.
Adlumia Raf.
Erigeron douglasii Torr. & A.Gray
Liatris resinosa Nutt.
Eupatorium foeniculaceum Willd.
Stylisma evolvuloides Choisy
Asclepias phytolaccoides Lyon ex Pursh
Arabis sagittata var. oblongata (Raf.) DC.
Gilia densiflora Benth.
Rudbeckia digitata Mill.
Clintonia corymbosa A.DC.
Peperomia alpina (Sw.) A.Dietr.
Anemone pennsylvanica L.
Madaria elegans (D.Don) DC.
Chaenactis lanosa DC.
Collomia gracilis (Hook.) Douglas ex Benth.
Thalictrum rugosum Aiton
Aster grandiflorus L.
Hottonia inflata Elliott
Convolvulus californicus Choisy
Forsteronia difformis (Walter) A.DC.
Silene virginica L.
Hymenopappus douglasii Hook.
Gilia grandiflora (Benth.) Steud.
Rudbeckia speciosa Schrad.
Piper californicum C.Presl ex Opiz
Hepatica acutiloba DC.
Cayaponia racemosa var. palmatipartita Cogn.
Actinomeris helianthoides var. elliotii (Raf.) DC.
Viola primulifolia var. cordata (Walter) DC.
Troximon apargioides Less.
Coreopsis tenuifolia Ehrh.
Bahia tenuifolia DC.
Erythraea muehlenbergii Griseb.
Cuscuta compacta Juss. ex Choisy
Impatiens fulva Nutt.
Mirabilis heimerlii (Standl.) J.F.Macbr.
Viola beckwithii subsp. glabrata M.S.Baker
Viola purpurea var. pinetorum Greene
Draba corrugata f. vestita (Davidson) C.L.Hitchc.
Ceanothus orcuttii Parry
Sphaeralcea fasciculata var. laxiflora (A.Gray) Jeps.
Malvastrum davidsonii B.L.Rob.
Malvastrum kernensis (C.B.Wolf) Munz
Malvastrum parryi Greene
Sidalcea maxima M.Peck
Ranunculus latilobus Kit.
Abronia umbellata var. variabilis (Standl.) Jeps.
Potamogeton spirillus Tuck.
Triodia pilosa (Buckley) Merr.
Carex breviligulata Mack.
Stipa lemmonii var. jonesii Scribn.
Cassia villosa Mill.
Cowania subintegra Kearney
Dalea fremontii var. minutifolia (Parish) L.D.Benson
Puccinellia rubida Elmer
Montia perfoliata var. utahensis (Rydb.) Munz
Montia spathulata var. viridis Davidson
Astragalus whitneyi subsp. pinosus (Elmer) Abrams
Spartium L.
Monardella lanceolata var. sanguinea Jeps.
Hosackia americana (Nutt.) Piper
Zygadenus brevibracteatus H.M.Hall
Syrmatium nevadense (S.Watson) Greene
Castilleja martinii subsp. ewanii (Eastw.) Munz
Ambrosia camphorata var. camphorata
Castilleja parviflora var. californica (Abrams) Zeile
Marah fabaceus var. fabaceus
Fremontia californica var. integra M.Harv.
Potentilla hanseni Greene
Potentilla egedii var. grandis (Torr. & A.Gray) J.T.Howell
Orthocarpus lithospermoides var. lithospermoides
Hibiscus rosa-sinensis var. rosa-sinensis
Phoenicaulis cheiranthoides subsp. glabra (Jeps.) Abrams
Gilia ciliata var. montana Munz
Antirrhinum nuttallianum var. effusum A.Gray
Lyonothamnus aspleniifolius Greene
Mimulus longiflorus var. linearis (Benth.) A.L.Grant
Ivesia tridentata (Torr.) A.Gray
Silene bernardina var. sierrae (C.L.Hitchc. & Maguire) Bocquet
Galium angustifolium var. diffusum Hilend & J.T.Howell
Linaria supina (L.) Chaz.
Galium angustifolium var. pinetorum Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Keckia lemmonii (A.Gray) Straw
Galium gabrielense Munz & I.M.Johnst.
Fragaria chilensis Molina
Arenaria californica (A.Gray) W.H.Brewer
Loeflingia pusilla Curran
Dianthus cruentus Griseb.
Acacia decurrens var. decurrens
Heuchera novamexicana Wheelock
Astragalus douglasii var. megalophysa (Rydb.) Munz & McBurney
Mentzelia lindleyi var. eremophila Jeps.
Althaea L.
Oenothera hartwegii var. toumeyi (Small) Munz
Argemone munita var. robusta (G.B.Ownbey) Shinners
Mimulus guttatus var. glaucescens (Greene) Jeps.
Mimulus grayi A.L.Grant
Mimulus exilis Durand & Hilg.
Melampyrum L.
Opuntia acanthocarpa subsp. ganderi C.B.Wolf
Opuntia occidentalis var. vaseyi (J.M.Coult.) Munz
Opuntia echinocarpa var. parkeri J.M.Coult.
Callitriche autumnalis L.
Grossularia velutina (Greene) Coville & Britton
Grossularia roezlii (Regel) Coville & Britton
Limonium californicum var. californicum
Hugelia virgata Benth.
Calea peduncularis Kunth
Sitanion californicum J.G.Sm.
Gilia latiflora subsp. cosana A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia latiflora subsp. leptantha (Parish) H.Mason & A.D.Grant
Gilia leptantha subsp. vivida A.D.Grant & V.E.Grant
Gilia polyantha var. whitingii Kearney & Peebles
Dalea arborescens Torr. ex A.Gray
Stachys veronicifolia Burtt Davy ex Jeps.
Oenothera bistorta var. bistorta
Oenothera cheiranthifolia subsp. suffruticosa (S.Watson) Munz
Oenothera cheiranthifolia var. nitida (Greene) Munz
Oenothera cheiranthifolia var. suffruticosa (S.Watson) Munz
Oenothera dentata Zuccagni
Oenothera micrantha Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1840
Oenothera micrantha var. ignota Jeps.
Stylophyllum viscidum (S.Watson) Britton & Rose
Convolvulus malacophyllus subsp. pedicellatus (Jeps.) Abrams
Convolvulus deltoideus Greene
Arctostaphylos subcordata Eastw.
Wisteria venusta Rehder & E.H.Wilson
Rhamnus crocea subsp. pirifolia (Greene) C.B.Wolf
Sedum obtusifolium C.A.Mey.
Delphinium parryi var. blochmaniae (Greene) Jeps.
Astragalus palmeri var. johnstonii (Munz & McBride) Barneby
Stephanomeria virgata var. pleurocarpa (Greene) B.L.Turner
Plantago linearis var. mexicana (Link) Pilg.
Garrya flavescens var. pallida (Eastw.) Bacig.
Tripogandra angustifolia (B.L.Rob.) Woodson
Cirsium acaulescens (A.Gray) Daniels
Monardella linoides var. viminea (Greene) Munz
Ornithostaphylos Small
Convolvulus aridus subsp. tenuifolius Abrams
Haplopappus spinulosus subsp. gooddingii (A.Nelson) H.M.Hall
Crataegus induta Sarg.
Podagrostis (Griseb.) Scribn. & Merr.
Oxycoccus Hill
Honkenya peploides Linnaeus, 1753
Artocarpus lessigiana Knowlton
Celastrus ellipticus Knowlton, 1899
Acacia macrosperma Knowlton, 1899
Paliurus minimus Knowlton, 1899
Grewiopsis aldersoni Knowlton, 1899
Sabalites californicus Lesquereux, 1878
Sassafras L. ex Nees
Fraxinus denticulata Heer, 1868
Catharanthus roseus Linnaeus, 1759
Molinia Schrank
Lloydia Salisb., 1812
Calamagrostis ×acutiflora (Schrad.) Rchb.
Carduncellus helenioides (Desf.) Hanelt
Eschscholzia douglasii Benth.
Elymus elongatus subsp. ponticus (Podp.) Melderis
Juncus arcticus × balticus
Larrea tridentata subsp. tridentata
Hesperidanthus suffrutescens (Rollins) Al-Shehbaz
Oxybasis rubra var. rubra
Acer negundo var. texanum Pax
Zuckia brandegeei var. plummeri Stutz & S.C.Sand.
Panicum capillare var. barbipulvinatum (Nash ex Rydb.) McGregor
Ligustrum acuminatum Koehne
Salix eriocephala var. famelica (C.R.Ball) Dorn
Blitum hastatum Rydb.
Plantago psyllium Herb.Aegypt. ex C.Presl, 1845
Earleocassia covesii (A.Gray) Britton
Phytolacca heteropetala H.Walter
Moraea catenulata Lindl.
Ceanothus ×delilianus Spach
Dichanthelium scribnerianum (Nash) Gould
Lomatium pastorale Darrach & D.H.Wagner
Poa nervosa var. wheeleri Vasey
Acmispon strigosus var. tomentellus (Greene) Brouillet
Synthyris rubra (Douglas ex Hook.) Benth.
Gentianopsis detonsa subsp. detonsa
Diplachne fusca subsp. fusca
Cryptantha palmeri (A.Gray) Payson
Primula pauciflora var. monantha (Greene) A.R.Mast & Reveal
Sporobolus rigidus var. rigidus
Glehnia littoralis f. leiocarpa (Mathias) Liou & Y.H.Chang
Leontodon autumnalis Oeder, 1816
Tridens muticus f. muticus
Heracleum sphondylium subsp. montanum (Schleich. ex Gaudin) Briq.
Lophochlaena californica var. californica
Cephalanthus occidentalis subsp. californicus (Benth.) A.E.Murray
Neltuma glandulosa (Torr.) Britton & Rose
Boechera crandallii (B.L.Rob.) W.A.Weber
Bellardia latifolia (L.) Cuatrec.
Platanus ×hybrida Brot.
Packera aurea (L.) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Neltuma laevigata (Humb. & Bonpl. ex Willd.) Britton & Rose
Packera dimorphophylla var. intermedia (T.M.Barkley) Trock & T.M.Barkley
Greenmaniella resinosa (S.Watson) Sharp
Ligustrum ionandrum Diels
Agave montana Villarreal
Calystegia silvatica subsp. fraterniflora (Mack. & Bush) Brummitt
Elymus virginicus f. jejunus Ramaley
Carex norvegica var. stevenii (Holm) Dorn
Acmispon plebeius (Brandegee) Allred
Boerhavia linearifolia A.Gray
Dalea villosa var. villosa
Juncus castaneus subsp. castaneus
Astragalus laccoliticus (M.E.Jones) S.L.Welsh
Salix lucida subsp. lucida
Acer negundo var. arizonicum Sarg.
Panicum hallii var. filipes (Scribn.) F.R.Waller
Eriophorum angustifolium subsp. subarcticum (V.N.Vassil.) Hultén ex Kartesz & Gandhi
Pedicularis semibarbata var. semibarbata
Sphaeralcea angustifolia subsp. angustifolia
Carex norvegica subsp. inferalpina (Wahlenb.) Hultén
Asclepias sanjuanensis K.D.Heil, J.M.Porter & S.L.Welsh
Deschampsia congestiformis W.E.Booth
Lagophylla ramosissima var. congesta (Greene) Jeps.
Delphinium brachycentrum Ledeb.
Neltuma Raf.
Vernonia ervendbergii A.Gray
Galium hypotrichium subsp. nevadense Dempster & Ehrend.
Potentilla gracilis var. hippianoides S.L.Welsh & N.D.Atwood
Styrax officinalis subsp. redivivus (Torr.) Thorne
Epilobium strictum Muhl.
Sphaerophysa DC.
Sphaeralcea fendleri f. fendleri
Minuartia rossii (R.Br.) Graebn.
Poterium sanguisorba subsp. polygamum (Waldst. & Kit.) Asch. & Graebn.
Fraxinus anomala subsp. lowellii (Sarg. ex Rehder) A.E.Murray
Transberingia Al-Shehbaz & O'Kane
Cymopterus glomeratus var. higginsii (Welsh) K.M.Mason
Agrostis microphylla var. microphylla
Brickellia californica var. desertorum Parish
Croton californicus var. longipes (M.E.Jones) A.M.Ferguson
Trimorpha acris var. debilis (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Clerodendrum philippinum Schauer
Xanthisma spinulosum var. glaberrimum (Rydb.) D.R.Morgan & R.L.Hartm.
Montia fontana subsp. fontana
Condalia globosa subsp. pubescens (I.M.Johnst.) A.E.Murray
Salvia rutilans Carrière
Acaciella angustissima var. filicoides (Cav.) L.Rico
Carex macloviana subsp. subfusca (W.Boott) T.Koyama
Eriogonum capistratum var. capistratum
Camissonia boothii var. decorticans (Hook. & Arn.) Cronquist
Douglasia laevigata subsp. ciliolata (Constance) Calder & Roy L.Taylor
Mirabilis hirsuta (Pursh) Mac Mill.
Atriplex gardneri var. aptera (A.Nelson) S.L.Welsh & Crompton
Carex heteroneura var. chalciolepis (Holm) F.J.Herm.
Misopates orontium subsp. orontium
Mimosa rhododactyla B.L.Rob.
Dyschoriste pringlei Greenm.
Wislizenia refracta var. mamillata (Rose ex Greene) I.M.Johnst.
Centaurium brachycalyx Standl. & L.O.Williams
Phyla fruticosa (Mill.) K.Kenn.
Koanophyllon Arruda
Flaveria anomala B.L.Rob.
Cynanchum palmeri (S.Watson) Shinners
Echeandia reflexa (Cav.) Rose
Vachellia Wight & Arn.
Acmella repens (Walter) Richard
Angelica grayi (J.M.Coult. & Rose) J.M.Coult. & Rose
Bellis sylvestris Cirillo
Cleome arborea Schrad.
Alpinia oxyphylla Miq.
Speranskia Baill.
Campsis grandiflora (Thunb.) K.Schum.
Coreopsis cordylocarpa A.Gray
Dalea carthagenensis (Jacq.) J.F.Macbr.
Dodonaea tenuifolia Lindl.
Blumea balsamifera (L.) DC.
Gilia guttata (A.Gray) A.Gray
Inula L.
Agathosma Willd.
Cynomorium songaricum Rupr.
Glandularia malpaisana T.Van Devender & G.L.Nesom
Lonicera confusa (Sweet) DC.
Quercus dumosa f. microcarpa Trel.
Dalea filiciformis C.B.Rob. & Greenm.
Stellaria dichotoma var. lanceolata Bunge
Cinnamomum cassia Nees ex Blume
Ptelea obscura Greene
Acalypha coryloides Rose
Hesperonia heimerlii Standl.
Verbena setacea L.M.Perry
Tritonia crocosmiiflora (Lemoine) G.Nicholson
Pilocarpus microphyllus Stapf ex Wardlew.
Condalia viridis I.M.Johnst.
Santalum album L.
Pachycormus Coville
Pycreus macrostachyos (Lam.) J.Raynal
Crassula portulacea Lam.
Mentzelia hirsutissima var. stenophylla (Urb. & Gilg) I.M.Johnst.
Neeragrostis reptans (Michx.) Nicora
Berula W.D.J.Koch
Chaetopappa DC.
Harfordia Greene & C.Parry
Penstemon penstemon (L.) Britton
Menodora scabra var. glabrescens A.Gray ex S.Watson
Polycarpon depressum Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray
Lobelia laxiflora var. laxiflora
Veatchia discolor (Benth.) Brandegee
Opuntia opuntia (L.) Karst.
Lepidium lasiophyllum Brandegee
Nemacaulis Nutt.
Chamaesyce brandegeei (Millsp.) Millsp.
Haplopappus palmeri subsp. palmeri
Dicranostegia (A.Gray) Pennell
Dryopetalon A.Gray
Mentzelia hirsutissima var. nesiotes I.M.Johnst.
Hulsea Torr. & A.Gray
Echeveria campanulata Kunze
Stylophyllum anomalum Davidson
Lupinus sparsiflorus var. inopinatus Dziekan. & D.B.Dunn
Pouteria Aubl.
Gnaphalium rosaceum I.M.Johnst.
Camissonia guadalupensis (S.Watson) Raven
Polygala polygama Walter
Rhamnus crocea var. insularis Sarg.
Panicum bulbosum var. minus Vasey
Anneslia brandegeei (Britton & Rose) Gentry
Antirrhinum orcuttianum A.Gray
Melampodium camphoratum (L.fil.) Baker
Echeveria cultrata (Rose) A.Berger
Ceanothus cuneatus var. submontanus (Rose) McMinn
Aeschynomene brasiliana (Poir.) DC.
Streptanthus heterophyllus Nutt. ex Torr. & A.Gray, 1838
Syrmatium haydonii (Orcutt) A.Heller
Parthenium bipinnatifidum (Ortega) Rollins
Chamaebatia foliolosa var. australis Brandegee
Abutilon abutilon (L.) Rusby
Cistanthe Spach
Chloropyron Behr
Trifolium roseum D.Heller & Zohary
Hemizonia greeneana subsp. greeneana
Lupinus lagunensis M.E.Jones
Castilleja linearis Rydb.
Echeveria attenuata (S.Watson) A.Berger
Echinocereus polyacanthus subsp. pacificus (Engelm.) Breckw.
Phyllanthaceae
Adenothamnus D.D.Keck
Janusia scandens (Dubard & Dop) Arènes
Calcaratolobelia aurita (Brandegee) Wilbur
Laurentia debilis (A.Gray) McVaugh
Baeriopsis J.T.Howell
Mammillaria peninsularis (Britton & Rose) Orcutt
Condalia rigida Wiggins
Carlowrightia californica var. pallida I.M.Johnst.
Ceanothus submontanus Rose
Salicornia appressa Dumort.
Ruppia maritima var. brevirostris C.Agardh
Chamaesyce fendleri var. fendleri
Oxalidaceae
Bromus virens Buckley
Tradescantia pringlei S.Watson
Setaria villosa P.Beauv.
Hedyotis gracilenta (I.M.Johnst.) W.H.Lewis
Cereus gummosus Engelm. ex Brandegee
Ophiocephalus Wiggins
Diplacus latifolius (A.Gray) G.L.Nesom
Bergerocereus emoryi (Engelm.) Britton & Rose
Echeveria albiflora A.Berger
Cassia corymbosa Ortega
Comarostaphylis diversifolia subsp. planifolia (Jeps.) A.E.Murray
Nemacladus rigidus var. australis Munz
Carterella Terrell
Geranium flaccidum Small
Polygala russelliana S.F.Blake
Sisymbrium auriculatum A.Gray
Verbena montevidensis Spreng.
Oxypolis filiformis (Walter) Britton
Erythrina caffra Blanco
Martyniaceae
Hosackia Douglas ex J.Lindley, 1829
Spergularia media (L.) J.Presl
Scirpus microcarpus (Torr.) Kuntze
Uropappus lindleyi var. lindleyi
Anoda albiflora Fryxell
Opuntia pusilla (Haw.) Nutt.
Lythraceae
Hibiscus elegans Standl.
Trichosterigma miserum (Benth.) Klotzsch & Garcke
Sphaeralcea axillaris subsp. violacea (Rose) Kearney
Echeveria anthonyi (Rose) A.Berger
Parosela megalostachys Rydb.
Wilcoxia diguetii (F.A.C.Weber) Diguet & Guillaumin
Porophyllum Guett.
Mitracarpus glabrescens (Griseb.) Urb.
Sesuvium sessile Larrañaga
Antirrhinum coulterianum subsp. orcuttianum (A.Gray ex Ives) Pennell
Platystemon australis Greene
Matelea umbellata (Brandegee) Woodson
Pseudognaphalium oxyphyllum (DC.) Kirp.
Aphanosperma (Leonard & Gentry) Daniel
Raphanus sativus var. sativus
Quercus chesosensis (Sarg.) C.H.Mull.
Clevelandia beldingii Greene
Syrmatium prostratum (Nutt.) Greene
Haplopappus tridentatus (Greene) S.F.Blake
Lophocereus schottii f. spiralis A.M.Carter & León de la Luz
Berberis pinnata Sessé & Moc.
Hosackia haydonii Orcutt
Jatropha moranii Dehgan & G.L.Webster
Cottsia scandens Dubard & Dop
Macroptilium lathyroides (L.) Urb.
Chaptalia nutans (L.) Pol.
Bolboschoenus maritimus var. paludosus (A.Nelson) Á.Löve & D.Löve
Schizachyrium malacostachyum (J.Presl) Nash
Machaeranthera sonorae (A.Gray) Stucky
Cuscuta californica var. graciliflora Engelm.
Elytraria Rich. ex Michx.
Baccharis salicifolia var. salicifolia
Opuntia hybr
Eriochloa lemmonii var. lemmonii
Echinocereus pentalophus (DC.) Engelm. ex Haage
Breweria R.Br.
Paronychia mexicana Hemsl.
Ficus petiolaris subsp. brandegeei (Standl.) Felger
Physalis hylophila Standl.
Hedyotis australis W.H.Lewis & D.W.Moore
Silene conica hort.
Nolina palmeri var. brandegeei Trel.
Krynitzkia intermedia (A.Gray) A.Gray
Vaseyanthus Cogn.
Geranium cicutarium L.
Lotus grandiflorus Formánek
Salvia mellifera subsp. jonesii (Munz) Abrams
Eclipta alba var. prostrata (L.) Hassl.
Mammillaria dioica var. insularis K.Brandegee
Henrya Nees ex Benth.
Delphinium flammeum Kellogg
Lantana scorta Moldenke
Atriplex incana F.Dietr.
Blechnum pyramidatum (Lam.)
Hesperoyucca (Engelm.) Trel.
Malvastrum foliosum S.Watson
Commelinaceae
Malvastrum marrubioides var. paniculatum A.Gray
Mirabilis violacea (L.) Heimerl
Echeveria ingens A.Berger
Carlowrightia torreyana Wassh.
Verbena neomexicana var. hirtella L.M.Perry
Isocoma veneta var. furfuracea (Greene) R.M.Beauch.
Arctostaphylos australis var. sericea W.Knight
Danthonia secundiflora J.Presl
Calliandra herbacea A.Gray
Solanum esculentum Dunal
Stipa bracteata Swallen
Xylothamia G.L.Nesom, Y.B.Suh, D.R.Morgan & B.B.Simpson
Triglochin concinna var. debile (M.E.Jones) J.T.Howell
Cistanthe parryi var. parryi
Chaenactis latifolia Stockw.
Trichocoronis A.Gray
Hosackia nudata (Greene) Vasey & Rose
Pennisetum ciliares Hook.f.
Disakisperma Steud.
Echinocystis guadalupensis Cogn.
Cryptantha cedrosensis (Greene) Greene
Astragalus fresenii Decne.
Rumex persicarioides hort.
Iris mississippiensis Alexander
Stevia purpusii B.L.Rob.
Sphaeralcea angustifolia (Cav.) A.St.-Hil.
Coreopsis mutica var. subvillosa DC.
Echinocereus sciurus var. floresii (Backeb.) N.P.Taylor
Chamaecrista greggii (A.Gray) Pollard ex A.Heller
Smallanthus sonchifolius (Poepp. & Endl.) H.Rob.
Oenothera indecora Cambess.
Eulophia graminea Lindl.
Hackelia taylorii Harrod, Malmquist & R.L.Carr
Searsia leptodictya (Diels) T.S.Yi, A.J.Mill. & J.Wen
Morella faya (Aiton) Wilbur
Nemastylis geminiflora Nutt.
Verbena canescens Kunth
Alniaria alnifolia (Sieb. & Zucc.) Rushforth
Fuchsia splendens Zucc.
Hesperocallis A.Gray
Pleuropogon sabinei R.Br.
Arenaria aculeata Desv., 1816
Hamelia axillaris Sw.
Tonestus A.Nelson
Elymus macrourus (Turcz.) Tzvelev
Eleocharis elongata Chapm.
Stenogyne Benth.
Psoralidium Rydb.
Enhalus acoroides (L.f.) Royle
Comandra Nutt.
Cymophora accedens (S.F.Blake) B.L.Turner & A.M.Powell
Epilobium coloratum Muhl. ex Willd.
Carnegiea Britton & Rose
Escobaria Britton & Rose
Carex michauxiana Boeckeler
Silphium albiflorum A.Gray
Arabis pallidifolia Rollins
Amphiachyris (DC.) Nutt.
Erigenia Nutt.
Ferocactus hamatacanthus (Muehlenpf.) Britton & Rose
Stephanandra Siebold & Zucc.
Lepidium pinnatisectum (O.E.Schulz) C.L.Hitchc.
Erigeron pulchellus Michx.
Stephanomeria lygodesmoides M.A.Jones ex L.F.Hend.
Eusideroxylon Teijsm. & Binn.
Guajacum sanctum L.
Cephalanthus L.
Conopholis americana (L.) Wallr.
Pediomelum digitatum (Nutt.) Isely
Picrothamnus Nutt.
Hemarthria R.Br.
Cryptantha virgata (Porter) Payson
Polygala senega L.
Krameria ramosissima (A.Gray) S.Watson
Micrandra Benth.
Cenchrus agrimonioides Trin.
Anthemis secundiramea Biv.
Borago L.
Bobea Gaudich.
Cyperus lentiginosus Millsp. & Chase
Chaetadelpha A.Gray ex S.Watson
Ernodea Sw.
Vulpia sciurea (Nutt.) Henrard
Hillebrandia sandwicensis Oliv.
Onosmodium molle Michx.
Calamovilfa longifolia Hack.
Physaria brassicoides Rydb.
Calamagrostis holmii Lange
Aristida longispica Poir.
Lupinus punto-reyesensis C.P.Sm.
Xylothamia triantha (S.F.Blake) G.L.Nesom
Macranthera Torr. ex Benth.
Hedyotis cookiana (Cham. & Schltdl.) Steud.
Arabidopsis Heynh.
Cyrtandra longifolia (Wawra) Hillebr. ex C.B.Clarke
Polygonella gracilis (Nutt.) Meisn.
Elymus ciliaris (Trin.) Tzvelev
Eragrostis deflexa Hitchc.
Vanclevea Greene
Achillea ageratifolia (Sibth. & Sm.) Boiss.
Phlox longipilosa Waterf.
Clerodendrum indicum (L.) Kuntze
Ventenata Koeler
Cynanchum vincetoxicum (L.) Pers.
Peperomia distachya Griseb., 1866
Ceratoides arborescens (Losinsk.) C.P.Tsien & C.G.Ma
Pritchardia beccariana Rock
Delphinium robustum Rydb.
Elymus vulpinus Rydb.
Arnica frigida C.A.Mey. ex Iljin
Elephantopus elatus Bertol.
Euclidium W.T.Aiton
Eragrostis palmeri S.Watson
Sabal mexicana Mart.
Carex laevivaginata (Kük.) Mack.
Annona senegalensis Pers.
Pedicularis labradorica Wirsing
Symphyotrichum bracei (Britton ex Small) G.L.Nesom
Rhizophora L.
Thouinopsis MacGinitie, 1941
Halodule Endl.
Populus alexanderi Dorf, 1930
Platanus paucidentata Dorf, 1930
Luehea Willd.
Melastomataceae
Rhizophoraceae
Phoenicites A.T.Brongniart, 1828
Thalassia Banks & Sol. ex K.D.Koenig
Krigia dandelion (L.) Nutt.
Pelargonium cordifolium (Cav.) Curtis
Micranthes ferruginea var. vreelandii (Small)
Amsinckia linearifolia Suksd.
Micropus angustifolius Nutt.
Swida occidentalis (Torr. & A.Gray) Soják
Quercus albifolia C.H.Mull.
Quercus oblongifolia var. pallidinervis Trel.
Quercus sacame Trel.
Quercus submollis Rydb.
Quercus aurantiaca Trel.
Quercus sipuraca Trel.
Quercus ignaciensis C.H.Mull.
Quercus dumosa f. insularis Trel.
Quercus tamiapensis C.H.Mull.
Phaseolus coccineus subsp. coccineus
Phaseolus sempervirens Piper
Phaseolus salicifolius Piper
Rosa glabrifolia C.A.Mey. ex Rupr.
Rumex confertus Willd.
Saxifraga punctata subsp. cascadensis Calder & Savile
Lewisia columbiana subsp. wallowensis (C.L.Hitchc.) J.E.Hohn ex B.Mathew
Perezia microcephala (DC.) A.Gray
Ceanothus greggii subsp. greggii
Acer glabrum subsp. neomexicanum (Greene) A.E.Murray
Phalaris stenoptera Hack.
Ceanothus fendleri subsp. venosus Trel.
Eryngium serratum Cav.
Hypopitys multiflora Scop.
Bidens leptocephala var. hammerlyae Sherff
Grindelia rubricaulis var. robusta (Nutt.) Steyerm.
Lopezia ciliatula Plitmann, Raven & Breedlove
Stevia linearis Gillies ex Baker
Gentianella amarella subsp. mexicana (Griseb.) Gillett
Vulpia myuros subsp. hirsuta Hack.
Heuchera mexicana W.Schaffn. ex Rydb.
Abutilon americanum (L.) Sweet
Milla Cav.
Lupinus marschallianus Sweet
Loeselia guttata A.Gray
Berginia Harv. ex Benth. & Hook.f.
Rubus malvaceus Focke
Guaiacum palmeri Vail
Linanthastrum nuttallii subsp. floribundum (A.Gray) Ewan
Cyperus flavus (Vahl) Nees
Sida lepidota Gray
Monarda citriodora var. parva Scora
Stenocereus thurberi subsp. littoralis (K.Brandegee) N.P.Taylor
Keckia ternata (Torr.) Straw
Eriochloa gracilis var. minor (Vasey) Hitchc.
Populus wislizenii (S.Watson) Sarg.
Henrya brevifolia Happ
Coinogyne carnosa Less.
Aster subulatus var. subulatus
Mesembryanthemum speciosum Haw.
Xanthocephalum linearifolium (DC.) Greenm.
Mahonia longipes Standl.
Tagetes lacera Brandegee
Quercus convallata Trel.
Xanthocephalum gymnospermoides subsp. gymnospermoides
Zexmenia hispida (Kunth) A.Gray
Frankenia grandifolia subsp. campestris (A.Gray) A.E.Murray
Keckia cordifolia (Benth.) Straw
Perezia montana Rose.
Physodium corymbosum var. acuminatum Rose
Eriogonum irretitum Brandegee
Eleusine Gaertn.
Rapanea ferruginea (Ruiz & Pav.) Mez
Artemisia exilis Fisch. ex DC.
Agastache mexicana (Kunth) Lint & Epling
Seriphidium palmeri (A.Gray) K.Bremer & Humphries
Polanisia viscosa (L.) DC.
Acacia micrantha Benth.
Solanum xanti subsp. intermedium Parish
Krameria parvifolia subsp. glandulosa (Rose & Painter) J.F.Macbr.
Ipomoea coccinea subsp. hederifolia (L.) Gray
Verbena delticola Small ex Perry
Ipomoea purpurea subsp. diversifolia (Lindl.) O'Donell
Mentha canadensis var. glabrata Benth.
Triodia pulchella Kunth
Solanum sarachioides Rusby
Tagetes microglossa Benth.
Verbesina leptochaeta A.Gray
Platanus lindeniana Mart. & Galeotti
Hordeum geniculatum Thell.
Phyla nodiflora subsp. canescens (Kunth) Moldenke
Evolvulus sericeus subsp. discolor (Benth.) Manitz
Keckia antirrhinoides (Benth.) Straw
Banisteriopsis argentea (Kunth) C.B.Rob.
Cynanchum pringlei (Gray) Henrickson
Eupatorium aschenbornianum Schauer
Polygonum intricatum Kom.
Gilia effusa (A.Gray) J.F.Macbr.
Salix chilensis Molina
Sesuvium erectum Correll
Tanacetum martirensis Wiggins
Calliandra gracilis (M.Martens & Galeotti) Standl.
Erythroxylum havanense Jacq.
Piqueria pilosa Kunth
Batesimalva violacea (Rose) Fryxell
Lophocereus schottii var. tenuis G.E.Linds.
Parosela peninsularis Rose
Lippia barbata Brandegee
Achaetogeron seemannii A.Gray
Physalis orizabae Dunal
Ipomoea coccinea f. coccinea
Ficus glaucescens (Liebm.) Miq.
Hypericum frondosum Michx.
Hosackia greenei (Ottley) Wiggins
Chaenactis orcuttiana (Greene) Fernald
Populus arizonica Sarg.
Archibaccharis Heering
Cochemiea (K.Brandegee) Walton
Lupinus albifrons var. brandegeei C.P.Sm.
Lycium andersonii subsp. wrightii A.Gray
Lobelia dunnii subsp. dunnii
Cyperacites angustior Schimper, 1870
Rhamnacinium radiatum Felix, 1896
Diospyros brachysepala A.Braun
Sparganium stygium Heer, 1855
Sassafras thermale Brown, 1962
Myrica lamarensis Knowlton, 1899
Persea brossiana Brown, 1962
Quercus olafseni Heer
Platanus coloradensis Knowlton, 1930
Paliurus zizyphoides Lesquereux, 1878
Matthiola incana subsp. incana
Carduus ochroleucus (All.) Pers.
Panicum hirticaulum Desv.
Lophopyrum elongatum (Host) Á.Löve
Anisolotus puberulus (Benth.) Wooton & Standl.
Epicampes J.Presl
Eragrostis major Host
Oldenlandia affinis (Roem. & Schult.) DC.
Smilax acutifolia Schltdl.
Boerhavia alamosana Rose, 1891
Melaleuca glauca (Sweet) Craven
Astragalus tetrapterus var. capricornus M.E.Jones
Dichanthelium depauperatum (Muhl.) Gould
Calceolaria fruticulosa var. flavescens Dowell
Eriogonum sphaerocephalum var. brevifolium S.Stokes ex M.E.Jones
Poa filifolia Vasey
Cryptantha geminata Greene
Astragalus tener var. bruceae M.E.Jones
Trachycarpus martianus (Wall. ex Mart.) H.Wendl.
Costus dubius (Afzel.) K.Schum.
Erigeron nivalis Boiss.
Pleradenophora tikalana (Lundell) A.L.Melo & Esser
Thalictrum lentiginosum Greene
Glyceria latifolia J.S.Cotton
Rosa pringlei Rydb.
Cordylanthus ramosus var. puberulus J.F.Macbr.
Erigeron obtusatus Greene
Chamaesyce rosei Millsp.
Lysimachia validula Hand.-Mazz.
Penstemon cyanathus var. subglaber (Gray) N.H.Holmgren
Trifolium decodon Greene
Melica harfordii var. tenuis Suksd.
Philadelphus platyphyllus Rydb.
Coreopsis tripteris L.
Acaciella shrevei Britton & Rose
Hookera synandra A.Heller
Delphinium bicolor f. helleri (Rydb.) Ewan
Stellaria aquatica (L.) Scop.
Penstemon tinctus Pennell
Lycium palmeri A.Gray
Phaca unde Rydb.
Rosa crenulata Greene
Festuca dives Suksd.
Ipomoea cuneifolia A.Gray
Polygonum paronychia C.A.Mey.
Cardamine hirsuta var. bracteata O.E.Schulz
Acacia ataxacantha DC.
Vicia trifida D.Dietr.
Stellaria oxyphylla B.L.Rob.
Arenga Labill. ex DC.
Laurelia novae-zelandiae A.Cunn.
Coreocarpus johnstonii Sherff
Doryanthes palmeri W.Hill ex Benth.
Arnica foliosa var. incana A.Gray
Batidophaca humivagans Rydb.
Artemisia ripicola Rydb.
Aster pickettianus Suksd.
Geranium marginale Rydb.
Pectis salina Brandegee
Euthamia californica Gand.
Oenothera pinnatifida Nutt.
Rosa sayi Schwein.
Ranunculus laxicaulis (Torr. & A.Gray) Darby
Eriogonum thurberi var. acutangulum Gand.
Allocarya oricola Piper
Amelanchier prunifolia Greene
Agoseris taraxacoides Greene
Lupinus hillii var. osterhautianus (C.P.Sm.) Harmon, 1973
Quercus michauxii Nutt.
Mahonia wilcoxii Rehder
Acanthogonum corrugatum Torr. & A.Gray
Barbarea vulgaris var. stricta (Andrz. ex Besser) A.Gray
Erysimum capitatum var. nivale (Greene) N.H.Holmgren
Echinocactus simpsonii var. robustior J.M.Coult.
Flindersia australis R.Br.
Collomia longiflora (Torr.) A.Gray
Stylophyllum densiflorum Rose
Ceanothus hirsutus Nutt.
Arabis arcuata var. secunda (Howell) B.L.Rob.
Sedum blockmanae Eastw.
Alnus cordata Desf.
Montanoa arborescens K.Koch, 1864
Rosa granulata Greene
Polianthes gracilis Link
Polianthes tuberosa f. plena Moldenke
Polianthes howardii Verh.-Will.
Verbena neomexicana var. neomexicana
Berberis nevinii var. haematocarpa (Wooton) L.D.Benson
Tillaea erecta subsp. eremica (Jeps.) Wiggins ex Shreve & Wiggins
Habenaria quinqueseta (Michx.) Sw.
Rubus palmeri Rydb.
Bumelia angustifolia Nutt.
Leontodon taraxacoides Hoppe & Hornsch., 1818
Iresine ajuscana Suess. & Beyerle
Cephalocereus alensis Britton & Rose
Lepechinia flammea Mart.Gord. & Lozada-Pérez
Senna orcuttii (Britton & Rose) H.S.Irwin & Barneby
Lobelia laxiflora var. nelsonii (Fernald) McVaugh
